In our administration, we've appointed many women to important positions of top responsibility -- women like Ambassador Jeane Kirkpatrick, Secretary of Health and Human Services Margaret Heckler, Secretary of Transportation Elizabeth Dole, and right here at the White House, Faith Whittlesey. And one of my proudest days was when Sandra Day O'Connor became the first woman Justice on the Supreme Court. And believe me, I've had many reasons to cheer her appointment ever since.

But just as important is the fact that there are thousands of able Republican women like you serving in public office all over the country. Whether it's in the legislatures or in other State and local offices, you're on the frontlines of democracy. You're making the difference. And what I want to see is the number of Republican women officeholders grow here in Washington and in every American town, city, and State like they did in Rhode Island last year, when eight Republican women won State senate seats. The minority leader of the senate is here at my table.

Three years ago this week, in my first address to the Nation, I reported on the state of our economy. I told the American people they wouldn't like the news, but that we had to face the truth if we were going to turn the economy around. The Federal budget was careening out of control, and we faced the worst economic crisis since the Great Depression. Our economy was broken, and women were hit especially hard. The majority of elderly Americans living on fixed incomes are women, and double-digit inflation was destroying their purchasing power.

We can be proud of the results. Inflation -- I know you've been told already, and I'm plowing plowed ground here -- but down to 3.2 percent; the prime rate -- knocked nearly in half; 4 million new jobs last year alone; personal income tax rates reduced; and indexing, beginning next year, which means government can no longer use inflation to profit at the people's expense. And thanks to the hard work of the Vice President, we've reduced the growth of government regulations by 25 percent and cut well over 300 million hours of government-required paperwork, taken it off the backs of the people. And that's 300 million hours each year.

Now, to help all Americans achieve economic equality, we reduced the marriage tax penalty. We almost doubled the maximum child care credit. We increased the limits for IRA and Keogh contributions, and we've eliminated estate taxes on family farms and businesses for surviving spouses. And our work is continuing to ensure women's rights, provide for equitable treatment in pension benefits and IRA's, to facilitate child and dependent care, and to enforce delinquent parent support payments.

From solid growth in housing to new frontiers in high technology and from a healthy recovery in real wages to the sharpest drop in unemployment in nearly 33 years, America is moving forward and getting stronger.

Have we made a new beginning? You bet we have. Today our nation has one big program to help every American man, woman, and child -- it's called ``economic recovery.'' Maybe the eight Democratic candidates still haven't heard about it -- [laughter] -- they're still talking doom and gloom.

Well, good news might not always make news. But today we've got more good news. I think someone has indicated that to you; I hope they haven't given all the news away. Last month, total unemployment dropped again to 7.9 percent. And among adult women, the unemployment rate is 7.1 percent. And that's down from 9 percent in the past year. And the jobs are getting better and better. Last year, women filled 73 percent of all the new jobs in managerial, professional, and technical fields.

But there's still work to be done. Unemployment is still too high, and I'm not going to be satisfied until everyone who wants a job can find one. We need basic budget and tax reforms, like the line-item veto, a constitutional amendment mandating a balanced budget, and tax simplification -- reforms that can ensure the progress that we're enjoying will continue for our children and even our children's children.

American foreign policy. Back in 1981 we had an uncomfortable feeling that we'd lost respect overseas. Some questioned whether we had the will to defend peace and freedom. Well, 3 years later, the world knows once more what America stands for: freedom for mankind. From Central America to Africa to the Middle East, we're working hard to support democracy and to build peace.

Europe, the NATO alliance has remained united and strong. Our relations in the Far East have never been better. In our relations with the Soviet Union, by strengthening our defenses and making clear our determination to negotiate, we have laid the foundation for meaningful agreements and a safer, more peaceful world. On an island in the Caribbean, we rescued Americans and set a nation free.

All of us share a dream. It's a dream, I think, of a world at peace, and it's a dream of a broad and open land that offers opportunity and prosperity to all. It's a dream of a land where every citizen is judged only on merit, a land where every woman and man is free to become all that she or he can.

All of us are laboring in the name of that dream, and there's a lot of work yet to be done. But if we have the courage to continue the good fight, we'll get it done, and we'll achieve great good at home and throughout the world.

And I can't close for dessert here for a moment without mentioning -- I don't know whether she's been introduced or you've met her or not. But we have here a visitor we're very proud to have who was closely aligned with us in the recent rescue mission in Grenada, Prime Minister Charles of Dominica.

As you know, last Sunday I announced my candidacy for reelection to this office. I asked for your support to help finish what we began 3 years ago -- getting government spending firmly under control, encouraging growth in our economy, and strengthening peace so we can provide opportunities for the liberty and happiness of our citizens today and for millions still unborn.

I wasn't surprised that my announcement set off some pretty sharp rhetoric from the other side, but I'd like to think that with some good will and common sense Republicans and Democrats could rise above election-year politics for the good of our country. Certainly there are important areas -- and three come immediately to mind -- where we could and should be working together.

I think we could reduce projected deficits by at least $100 billion over the next 3 years. So, frankly, I was a bit puzzled why those new converts to concern about looming deficits held back on joining a bipartisan working group.

Now, I understand they will be prepared to meet next week. I urge them to approach the negotiations in the same spirit as we will. Let's try to put the partisan issues aside. I repeat that all issues can be on the table for discussion. But, obviously, we cannot compromise the principles of our tax program without compromising our economic recovery and America's future.

I simply can't agree to increase taxes on families already pinching pennies to pay their bills. We want to reduce the deficit, not the recovery. And it would be foolhardy, indeed, to compromise America's defense rebuilding program just as we're beginning to restore the credibility that was so recklessly squandered.

Yet this does not mean that there aren't areas in which to find bipartisan agreement. We could focus on the less contentious spending cuts still pending before the Congress. These could be combined with measures to close certain tax loopholes that the Treasury Department has indicated it believes worthy of support.

If we focus on what we might agree on, we can get something done for the people. And the Grace commission has come up with some 2,500 recommendations for reducing wasteful government spending. We should examine them together.

Uniting to promote democracy, peace, and prosperity in the troubled region of Central America is a second area where Republicans and Democrats should work together. Last July I appointed 12 distinguished Americans to the National Bipartisan Commission on Central America and asked former Secretary of State Henry Kissinger to serve as its Chairman. Three weeks ago, the members of that Commission delivered to me their report on the crisis confronting our Latin neighbors. Their recommendations are the basis of legislation that I will soon present to the Congress.

Commission on Central America, and he served until his death as one of its senior counselors. All his life, Scoop said what he believed and stuck to it. He believed in freedom, dignity for the individual, and a strong America. And he believed Republicans and Democrats should leave politics at the water's edge on important questions of national security. Senator Jackson's wisdom is the guiding spirit of our legislation. It offers a balance of political, economic, diplomatic, and security initiatives that can bring stability and a better life to our neighbors and ultimately greater security to our own country. This plan deserves the bipartisan support of the Congress. We have a responsibility to act.

President Gemayel to find a political solution. Support for his government is broadening among the different groups. And just as important, our efforts to strengthen the Lebanese Army and its ability to keep the peace are making sure and steady progress.

Yes, the situation in Lebanon is difficult, frustrating, and dangerous. But that is no reason to turn our backs on friends and to cut and run. If we do, we'll be sending one signal to terrorists everywhere: They can gain by waging war against innocent people.

The men and women who patrol our streets here at home also face great dangers every day. But the greatest danger of all would be to yank those police officers off the streets and to leave our neighborhoods and families at the mercy of criminals. If we're to be secure in our homes and in the world, we must stand together against those who threaten us. This is a time for unity, not partisan politics.

I was in England making a picture called ``The Hasty Heart.'' It was a story in which we were all in a field hospital in Burma -- India in World War II, and talking about things like home. And the line in the script from -- it was a famous Broadway play -- had me saying that everybody has a place to go back to and for me it's Boston. Well, after almost 4 months of an English winter, I was so homesick.

Now, Nancy and I have been looking forward to this day for a long time, and your warm welcome, believe me, touches our hearts. And before I say anything else, let me express my sincere thanks to everyone who made this terrific day possible.

Incidentally, Moon and I -- his name is Neil, but Moon since he was here in Dixon -- we've been asking everyone on this committee connected with that house undertaking up there one thing, though, that has fooled us. How did they shrink it? [Laughter] We remembered it as much bigger.

But back in 1951, another Illinois native returned to his hometown for a short visit. Carl Sandburg was also 73 years old when he spent a day on his cousin's farm in Galesburg, just about a hundred miles or so down the road from here.

Carl Sandburg understood that our greatest strength is not bullets or balance sheets, but the mighty spirit of a free people under God. And our spirit has never waned. The heart of America is strong, it's good, and it's true. We look forward to the future. We know we were never meant to be second best, and we never will be.

Like Carl Sandburg, I also remember those depression years. Times were tough. But what I remember most clearly is that Dixon held together. Our faith was our strength. Our teachers pointed to the future. People held on to their hopes and dreams. Neighbors helped neighbors. We knew -- my brother, Moon, and I, our mother and father, Nelle and Jack, saw to that -- saw that we knew we would overcome adversity and that after the storm, the stars would come.

Dixon has changed a lot since then. But in many ways, it hasn't changed at all. And I'm not talking about Lowell Park or St. Luke's or the Memorial Arch. What I'm really referring to are the values and traditions that made America great.

Our values bring us together as a nation. They help us go just as far as our God-given talents will take us. Americans are the most charitable people in the world. We reach out to the needy. We're a nation of volunteers. We seek community service. It's so easy to have faith in America. I know of the volunteer effort that it's taken from so many to bring about not only this day but the restoration of that house. And it's so easy to have faith in America.

When you're talking about the character of America, you're also talking about the small business community, about the owners of that store down the street, the faithful who support their churches and their civic organizations, all the brave men and women with faith to invest in the future to build a better America.

It's everyday people with big ideas that count -- people like Father John Dixon, who arrived here in 1830 with his wife, five children, and a dream. His ferry service provided the only means of crossing the Rock River for travelers to Galena coming from Peoria, Fort Dearborn, and Fort Armstrong. But he didn't stop there. Through his efforts, he lived to see Dixon's Ferry become the county seat and a thriving community of 8,000, and now you've doubled that.

You know, I must say, that if Father Dixon had to fill out environmental impact statements, report to regulatory agencies in Washington, or wait for an area redevelopment plan, Dixon would probably still be known as Dixon's Ferry. [Laughter] And our town might never have seen people like John Deere and the Walgreens, people with ingenuity, audacity, and vision.

We've already reduced the growth of Federal regulations by more than 25 percent. We've cut well over 300 million man-hours of government-required paperwork that was laid on the people each year. And we're going to reduce it even more. We just want to give today's pioneers the same chance that Father Dixon had.

And there's something else. When you stop to think, it's easy to understand why America's back on her feet and moving forward with confidence. Our rebirth began right here, in our homes, schools, churches, and neighborhoods. From the grocery store to the football field, from the service clubs to the Chamber of Commerce, America has recaptured her drive, energy, and determination.

Well, this community spirit responds to our desire for cooperation and brotherhood, and it makes our hometown a better place to live. If anybody wants to know about community and what community is all about, come to Lee County and Dixon, Illinois.

Come take a look at the Hometown Heritage Foundation, a community alumni organization dedicated to future development of the local area. By working together -- individuals, businesses, civic organizations, and local government -- Dixon is building a brighter future.

Another Illini, Adlai Stevenson, kind of put it all together when he said, ``America is much more than a geographical fact. It is a political and moral fact -- the first community in which men set out in principle to institutionalize freedom, responsible government, and human equality.'' And that's what we're really celebrating today.

Earlier, after arriving in Dixon, the President and his brother, Neil, and their wives toured and lunched at one of the homes the Reagan family had lived in during the President's boyhood. The home had been renovated by the Ronald Reagan Home Restoration Foundation. They then viewed a homecoming parade from the Nachusa House Hotel.

I want you to know that this has been a day that -- if I said, Neil, you wouldn't know who I was talking about -- my brother, Moon, and I will long remember. It's a day of warmth and memory, a day when the good things that have happened in our lives all seem very close and very real again.

Besides being wonderful, coming back to Eureka is also a great temptation. Sitting in a college audience can sometimes be dangerous duty. Something about your youthfulness and the bright, fresh hope it symbolizes makes guest speakers like myself very free with their reminiscenses and very reluctant to sit down.

But I don't want to miss this opportunity to share with you some thoughts on the changes that have happened to America in the 50-odd years -- and some of them were odd -- since I left this campus and to offer too some thoughts on how we can shape those changes to serve the cause of human freedom -- to inspire, not burden, those who come after us. I can't think of a better occasion for such reflections.

In addition to Founder's Day here at Eureka, we're also marking the first in a series of speeches sponsored by Time magazine to commemorate its 60th anniversary. For 60 years, Time has lived up to what Henry Luce and Briton Hadden envisioned when they founded the magazine in 1923: a weekly digest of news, put together with much more care and perspective than is usually possible under the deadline pressure of daily journalism. Well, if it's important for news organizations like Time to keep in mind the value of perspective, you can imagine how important it is for those of us in public life to remember that proximity to daily events can be as much a handicap as an advantage in understanding their meaning.

And that's what struck me when I was thinking about what I wanted to say here today: the ease, the unknowing grace with which my generation accepted technological and political changes that so radically transformed our world. We didn't know then that ours was to be one of those infrequent generations that would preside over a great transition period. We went in a single lifetime literally from horse and buggy to space travel.

In 1932, for example, I graduated from Eureka and landed a job in radio. Though I didn't realize it at the time, I had become part of the communications revolution that was shrinking the dimensions of my world even more than radio's successor, television, would shrink your own.

Yet if I'd only stopped to think about it, I would have remembered back in my boyhood days, just a few short years before, when my friends and I followed our neighborhood genius around town in Dixon trying to pick up radio signals with his jury-rigged crystals, aerial, and headphones. Can you imagine our sense of wonder when one Sunday afternoon, down by the river there in Dixon, we heard the sounds of radio for the first time, an orchestra playing over KDKA several hundred miles away in Pittsburgh?

By that time, of course, the market had crashed, the depression years were upon us, and over those radio sets now sitting in every parlor and living room in the nation came the rich, reassuring tones of Franklin Roosevelt. All of us who lived through those years can remember the drabness the depression brought. But we remember, too, how people pulled together, that sense of community and shared values, that belief in American enterprise and democracy that saw us through. It was that engrained American optimism, that sense of hope Franklin Roosevelt so brilliantly summoned and mobilized.

National Government should take onto itself new and sweeping prerogatives. In the grip of that emergency, many of us could not see the enormous and sometimes harmful -- oftentimes harmful political changes that this expanded role for the government would bring.

Once again, as I look back, the rapidity of that political change was as astonishing as the change brought by technology. At the start of that era, government collected in taxes a dime out of every dollar earned. Two-thirds of that dime went to State and local governments, with only one-third to Washington. Today government at all levels is collecting more than 40 cents out of every dollar, and the proportion is completely reversed, with two-thirds of that going to the Federal Government and only one-third for State and local governments.

My generation was a bit surprised to realize that the Federal Government, called upon in an economic emergency, was becoming an obstacle to economic progress. In addition to damaging the autonomy of local and State governments, usurping the rights of the people, the public sector had grown so large it was consuming our national wealth, discouraging energy and initiative, and suffocating the spirit of enterprise and resourcefulness that had always been at the heart of America's economic miracle.

Republic: that without proper restraints, government the servant becomes quickly government the master. I call it an American lesson, but actually it's much older. Cicero believed that the budget should be balanced, the treasury should be refilled, the public debt should be reduced, the arrogance of officialdom should be tempered and controlled. And since that time, many nations that failed to heed the words of that wise Roman have been brought to their knees by governments that borrowed and taxed their citizens into servitude.

But some peoples, like our Founding Fathers, revolted under such oppression. No one would understand better the danger of unchecked government power than those men. ``I am not a friend to a very energetic government. It is always oppressive,'' Jefferson said.

And yet even as the decades of the fifties and sixties went by, and more Americans shared my concern, government grew like Topsy. In the decade of the seventies, Federal spending tripled, taxes doubled, and the national debt reached almost a trillion dollars. Government bureaus, agencies, and employment rolls kept multiplying. It had become too easy for politicians to promise more to win more, to spend their way to election victories.

Fortunately, that juggernaut of big government has now been slowed. During the last 3 years, we've brought skyrocketing spending back to Earth and reduced that enormous momentum toward big government. It wasn't easy, but measure the results by our ability to achieve what people once said was impossible. Federal spending growth has been cut by more than half.

Government regulations have been cut by more than a quarter. And taxes on working Americans have actually been reduced and indexed to the rate of inflation. A working family earning $25,000 has $1,500 more in purchasing power today because of the cut in taxes and the lowered rate of inflation.

Today economic recovery is in full swing. But I hope we can use these moments of reflection today to understand the hard lessons we've learned since the depression about the growth of government. We need some basic reforms that will protect us against government's all too powerful tendency to grow and grow.

For one thing, it's time for the Federal Government, in the best federalist tradition, to learn something from successful experiments in the State and local laboratories of governments. The evidence from States and many municipalities is overwhelming. The executive branch needs a powerful weapon to cut out porkbarreling and special interest expenditures buried in large, catchall appropriation bills. It is time the Congress gave the President the authority to veto single-line items in the Federal budget, as Governors can do in 43 of our 50 States.

And second, politicians at the national level must no longer be permitted to mortgage your future by running up higher and higher deficits. The time has come to force government to live within its means. And I repeat my call today for making a balanced budget a constitutional amendment.

But now, in addition to the technological revolution marked by inventions like radio, and the political revolution brought on by the sweeping new scope of Federal power, there has been an additional development worth noting. That is the emergence of America's international role -- our sudden designation as the champion of peace and human freedom in the struggle against totalitarianism.

But that broad consensus of the Truman, Eisenhower, Kennedy years began to break down in the sixties and seventies. Partly in response to the Vietnam tragedy, an era of paralyzing self-doubt ruled out just and legitimate uses of American power -- even acts of self-defense.

The consequences of America's retreat were not long in coming. All of you can remember a few years back when the tragedy of the Iranian hostages was fresh in our minds; when around the world, especially in Afghanistan and Central America, Soviet expansionism proceeded unchecked; when our defenses had declined dramatically and some nations thought they could threaten or harm the United States with impunity.

We've changed this. We're trying to see to it that American citizens -- and it doesn't matter whether they're navy pilots in the Gulf of Sidra or medical students in Grenada -- can no longer be attacked or their lives endangered with impunity.

Yet, it goes beyond just self-defense. When I spoke to the British Parliament a year and a half ago, I said our cause was human freedom; and so it has been -- in Europe, in Lebanon, in Central America. We've tried to bring a new honesty and moral purposefulness to our foreign policy, to show we can be candid about the essential differences between ourselves and others while still pursuing peace initiatives with them.

As I've said before, the democracies have their own serious injustices to deal with. But this should not prevent us from making the crucial moral distinctions between pluralist systems which acknowledge their own wrongs and shortcomings and systems that excuse their defects in the name of totalitarian ideology.

Our willingness to speak out on these distinctions is the moral center of our foreign policy. For us, human freedom is a first principle, not a bargaining chip. To fail to publicly enunciate the differences between totalitarian and democratic systems of government would be to forsake this moral high ground.

Peace remains our highest aspiration, and that's why arms control isn't enough. Arms reduction is our goal. And may I interject right here -- I, a few years ago, stood in this exact spot and made the announcement then that we were going to ask for arms reduction meetings with the Soviet Union to reduce the number of strategic nuclear weapons we both held. But then, as we have tried to communicate to the people of the Soviet Union, would it not be better to do away with nuclear weapons entirely? I think our new realism is an important means to this end.

Just as important, it reestablishes the basis of that broad foreign policy consensus that existed in the pre-Vietnam era when we understood the moral imperatives of defending freedom and the importance of taking totalitarian powers seriously.

And here I want to point out that the political revolutions we've seen in America in domestic and international policy are only a reflection of a deeper trend, a trend that directly concerns the world that you have been part of here at Eureka, the world of ideas.

There has been a dramatic turnabout among the intellectuals. For most of my adult life, the intelligentsia has been entranced and enamored with the idea of state power, the notion that enough centralized authority concentrated in the hands of the rightminded people can reform mankind and usher in a brave new world. Well, I remember hearing one commonly held view of the Roosevelt era that all societies were moving toward some modified form of communism.

Well, we know now that the trend in America and the democracies has been just the other way. In the political world, the cult of the state is dying; so, too, the romance of the intellectual with state power is over. Indeed, the excitement and energy in the intellectual world is focused these days on the concerns of human freedom, on the importance of transcendent and enduring values.

In economics, for example, as the recent Nobel Prizes to Fredrick von Hayek, Milton Friedman, and George Stigler attest, the free market is again becoming the focal point. In political philosophy, a whole generation of intellectuals led especially by French thinkers like Revel, Jean Marie Benoit, Guy Sorman are rejecting the old cliches about state power and rediscovering the danger such power poses to personal freedom. Russian intellectuals ranging from majestic figures like Aleksandr Solzhenitsyn to noble crusaders like Vladimir Bukovsky have brought new attention to the horrors of totalitarian rule and to the spiritual desert that is communism.

It involved, coincidentally, an editor of Time magazine, Whittaker Chambers, who in public testimony in 1948 named former high U.S. Government officials as spies. He was not believed at first, but the inexorable power of the truth was slowly felt, and overwhelming evidence led a jury to convict one of those former officials of perjury.

In Chambers' autobiography, ``Witness,'' he added a sequel. Chambers marked the beginning of his personal journey away from communism on the day that he was suddenly struck by the sight of his infant daughter's ear as she sat there having breakfast. And then, he said, he realized that such intricacy, such precision could be no accident, no freak of nature. He said that while he didn't know it at the time, in that moment, God -- the finger of God had touched his forehead.

The western world does not know it, but it already possesses the answer to this problem, he said, but only provided that its ``faith in God and the freedom He enjoins'' is as great as communism's belief in material power.

For all the momentous change of the last 50 years, it is still the great civilized truths -- values of family, work, neighborhood, and religion -- that fuel America's technological and material progress and put the spark to our enduring passion for freedom.

We're lucky to live in a time when these traditional values and faith in the future -- this sense of hope has been reawakened in our country. Yet, we have so much more to achieve, from assuring continued economic growth to developing space, America's next frontier, to keeping the peace and extending the borders of freedom. You in this room can play a personal part in these next chapters of human progress.

Now, I know you have a sense of excitement about all of this, and that's why it strikes me as odd that some people say today that college students are too conservative. Well, I think the truth is that you've discovered early in life what it took another great American writer, Scott Fitzgerald, many tumultuous years to discover.

I hope you'll remember that and something else F. Scott Fitzgerald once said, that America is ``a willingness of the heart.'' In the past half century, America has had its flirtation with statism, but we're returning now to our roots: limited government, the defense of freedom, faith in the future and in our God. With these values as guides, the future can be even more breathtaking than the last 50 years, because it will hold out not only the promise of sweeping improvements in mankind's material conditions but progress in the spiritual and moral realm as well. And that's why I hope that 50 years from now, should Time magazine ask you for your reflections, you'll be able to recall an era exciting beyond all your dreams. Believe me, there are great days ahead for you, for America, and for the cause of human freedom.

Once more the news from Lebanon is filled with scenes of indiscriminate killing and suffering. I know that men and women of good will throughout the world share my deep concern over the renewed violence. They join me in deploring the continued shelling of innocent civilians and the actions of those who would destroy the legitimate Government of Lebanon.

I call on the Government of Syria, which occupies Lebanese territory from which much of the shelling of civilian centers originates and which facilitates and supplies instruments for terroristic attacks on the people of Lebanon, to cease this activity.

President Gemayel is now hard at work trying to form a new government. I welcome his efforts to stop the fighting and to resume the talks in Geneva aimed at achieving national reconciliation. He has set forth a specific agenda of reforms and reconciliation and demonstrated again his openness to a dialog on all the issues. He has demonstrated his strong desire to bring all factions together to develop equitable and durable political and economic arrangements for his country.

All responsible Lebanese political leaders should take this opportunity to bring into being the more broadly representative government they say they want and which we have continually supported. I urge all parties to answer President Gemayel's call. It is time for all Lebanese to rise above their confessional or factional affiliations and join together as citizens of one nation united and sovereign.

The commitment of the United States to the unity, independence, and sovereignty of Lebanon remains firm and unwavering. We will continue to support the Government and the people of Lebanon in their efforts to achieve these goals. With good will and hard work, the dream of a rebuilt and reunited Lebanon can still be made a reality. We remain committed to help in that task.

Before I say anything else, I'd like to recognize three outstanding gentlemen -- Robert Howe, the president of this association, Dale Graham, your president-elect, and Scott Thomson, your executive director. Secretary Bell has told me how much assistance these men have given us as we've worked to improve our nation's schools. And I want to thank them and all of you for the help that you've already given and ask you to keep the help coming. It means a great deal to those of us in Washington, but more important, it means a great deal to America's sons and daughters.

All of us remember all too painfully the crisis our country faced just a few years ago. Big taxing and spending had led to soaring interest rates and inflation, and our defenses had grown weak. All over the world America had become known not for strength and resolve but for vacillation and self-doubt.

Our schools, too, showed unmistakable signs of crisis. From 1963 to 1981, scholastic aptitude test scores underwent a virtually unbroken decline. Science achievement scores of 17-year-olds showed a similar drop. And most shocking, the National Commission on Excellence in Education reports that more than one-tenth of our 17-year-olds can be considered functionally illiterate.

In the face of all this bad news, our free and hard-working people began for a time to feel almost helpless. It seemed as though our nation, her schools included, was undergoing a protracted and inevitable decline.

We've knocked inflation down, and we can keep it down. The prime rate is about half what it was when our administration took office. All across this vast land of ours, a powerful economic recovery is gaining strength. Morale in the military has soared. And once again America is respected throughout the world as a force for peace and freedom.

When our administration took office only a handful of States had task forces on education. Today they all do. In addition, 44 States are increasing graduation requirements, 42 are studying improvements in teacher certification, and 13 are establishing master teacher programs. With school reform, as with so many other challenges again and again in our nation's history, the American people are showing it can be done.

Now, some insist there's only one reform that would make any real difference -- more money. But that's been tried. Total expenditures in our nation's schools this year, according to the National Center for Educational Statistics, will total $230 billion. That's up almost 7 percent from last year, about double the rate of inflation, and more than double what we spent on education just 10 years ago.

So, if money alone were the answer the problem would have been shrinking, not growing. And those who constantly call for more money are the same people who presided over two decades of unbroken education decline.

Indeed, in her well-known study, Barbara Lerner found that the amount of homework assigned in a school is the single most reliable predictor of how well the students in that school will perform on national tests.

Now, none of this is a prescription for gloomy students. We've learned that when students know their parents and teachers have confidence in their abilities the students gain self-esteem, enjoy their work, and live up to those high expectations.

We must also expect our students to learn the basics. Too many are allowed to abandon vocational and college prep courses for general ones, so when they graduate, they're prepared for neither work nor higher education. Stories abound of students who leave school unable to read and write at an adult level. In 1980, 35 States required only 1 year of math for a high school diploma; 36 required only 1 year of science.

Compare that to the case in other industrialized countries. In Japan, specialized study in mathematics, biology, and physics starts in sixth grade. In the Soviet Union, students learn the basic concepts of algebra and geometry in elementary school. So, it's not surprising that Japan, with a population only about half the size of ours, graduates from college more engineers than we do, while the Soviet Union graduates from college almost five times more engineering specialists than we do.

We cannot allow our children to continue falling behind. Instead, we must insist that all American students master the basics -- math, science, history, reading, and writing -- that have always formed the core of our civilization.

If I can interject, there is an article recently put out by Benjamin Stein. And it seems that he has made contact with a number of young, not only high school graduates, but now enrolled in some of our better universities -- and has regular contact with them. And it was almost horrifying to read his article, when he found that most of those students -- as high as juniors in universities -- did not know when World War II was fought or who was the enemy whom we were fighting.

But no learning can take place without good order in the classroom, and that means restoring good old-fashioned discipline. In too many schools, teachers lack authority to make students take tests, hand in homework, or even quiet down in class. And in some schools, teachers suffer verbal and even physical abuse.

According to a 1978 report by the National Institute of Education, each month over 2 million secondary schoolchildren were victims of in-school crime. Not ordinary highjinks -- crime. In 1981, during a 5-month period in California, there were at least 100,000 incidents of violence. A study of Boston high schools showed that during 1982 more than one-sixth of female students and more than one-third of male students carried weapons to school. And a 1983 survey of Michigan schools shows that one in five Michigan teachers has been struck by a student.

As long as one teacher is assaulted, one classroom is disrupted, or one student is attacked, then I must and will speak out to give you the support you need to enforce discipline in our schools. For too long, courts and others have concentrated on protecting the rights of the disruptive few. Well, it's high time we paid some attention to the rights of the well-behaved students who want to learn.

We must teach our sons and daughters a proper respect for academic standards, for codes of civilized behavior, and for knowledge itself -- not for the sake of those standards, not for the sake of those codes, not even for the sake of that knowledge, but for the sake of those young human beings.

Now, the Federal Government can support these reforms and do so without recycling still more tax dollars or imposing still more regulations. And our administration is doing just that. We're working to restore our nation's parents, State and local officials, teachers, school administrators, and principals to their rightful place in the educational process.

Our administration has replaced 29 narrow categorical education programs with one broad block grant to give State and local officials greater freedom. And in the budget I submitted to Congress last week I called for that grant to be increased by $250 million. We've instituted major regulatory reforms to dig educators out from under mountains of redtape. And because parents should have the right to choose the schools they know are best for their children, we've proposed education vouchers and tuition tax credits -- concepts the American people support overwhelmingly.

In October I signed a proclamation that named this school year the National Year of Partnerships in Education. The proclamation urged businesses, labor unions, and other groups of working people to form partnerships with schools in their communities. Since then, partnerships in education have increased around the country dramatically. And in December, I announced a new program to recognize outstanding students -- the President's Academic Fitness Awards.

To promote good order in our schools, the Department of Education is studying ways to combat school violence, and the Department is continuing its joint project with the National Institute of Justice to find better ways for localities to use their resources to prevent school crime.

The Department of Justice is establishing a National School Safety Center to inform teachers and other officials of their legal rights and to provide a computerized national clearinghouse for school safety resources. In addition, the Justice Department will file friend-of-court briefs in appropriate cases to support the rights of school administrators to enforce discipline. And right now, the Department of Justice is studying possible amendments of Federal law that would help principals and others reestablish good order in our schools.

As we struggle to teach our children the fundamental values we hold so dear, we dare not forget that our civilization was built by men and women who placed their faith in a loving God. If the Congress can begin each day with a moment of prayer and meditation, so then can our sons and daughters.

Despite the importance of these initiatives at the national level, the main responsibility for education rests with our States and communities, and they're moving ahead. State by State, the success stories are mounting.

Indiana has increased high school graduation requirements and initiated a basic skills program for early grades. In Iowa the State is putting together a program of incentives for students who take upper-level math and science courses. States from Tennessee to Florida have begun work on pay incentives for instructors because they know that to promote good teaching we must reward good teachers. And polls show that merit pay for teachers has the support of 61 percent of the NEA teachers, 62 percent of the AFT teachers, and 70 percent of independent teachers.

At the local level parents have begun to give schools new support in ways that range from helping out on field trips to raising money for special projects. School boards have begun to write stricter discipline codes and rewrite curriculums to stress the basics. And in community after community, principals have turned schools around.

I don't have time to tell you all the stories I've heard about principals who've made a critical difference, but there is one that I want to share. Just 5 years ago, George Washington High School suffered from all the ills that afflict so many inner-city schools -- drugs, violence, gangs.

Today the absenteeism rate at Washington High School has been cut to 11 percent, and enrollment has risen from 1,700 to 2,600 plus a waiting list. Five years ago, 42 percent of Washington High's students said they might go on to college. Last year 80 percent did go on to college. And all this because of one determined principal, a hero with faith in the commonsense values which have never failed us when we've had the courage to live up to them.

As principals you have an enormous responsibility. Perhaps more than any other Americans, you hold our nation's future in your hands. I know that you're determined to go on with the great work of making certain our schools give our sons and daughters the quality education they deserve. And I'm convinced that with your help America's future will be bright beyond our dreams.

Congresswoman Vucanovich couldn't be with us today, but she's up for reelection this year. And if there's one thing you folks of Nevada can do for your country, it's to keep her on the job. She's been a strong and creative leader for responsible government. She's been playing an important part in our efforts to revive the economy and strengthen America's defenses. We can't afford to lose her. So, please, do me a personal favor: Don't just vote for her, make sure your friends and neighbors vote for her, too.

Senators Laxalt and Hecht have been stalwart examples of how Republicans can stick to their principles even when the going gets rough. In the last 3 years we've stuck to our principles rather than trying to be everything to everybody. The opposition kept telling us it wouldn't work, but sometimes I don't think there's anything that they believe will work.

Well, today the roar of economic recovery is drowning the naysayers and the hand-wringers. But we can't take it for granted that recovery will be translated into votes in the elections. As in the past, the Republicans' biggest challenge is how to get our message out. Some of our finest accomplishments, I think, are some of the best kept secrets in the Nation's Capital. If there's one word that we must repeat to our friends and neighbors, one word that will carry the cause for our day, that word is ``remember.'' It's fair that we be judged on what we've accomplished. However, we should be compared not to what our opponents say that they will do, but instead, to what we remember our opponents did.

And what they did is what we must make certain the American people remember. They gave the country double-digit inflation that ravaged the elderly, the poor, and the middle class. They gave us economic stagnation from which we're just now recovering. They gave us interest rates that knocked the automobile and homebuilding industries right off their feet. They gave us high taxes, big spending, and government that didn't work. they gave us pessimism and national self-doubt as never before experienced in this country.

We've cut the 21\1/2\-percent prime interest rate that we inherited almost in half. We've cut the growth in Federal spending and cut that about in half. And we've prevented the people from being mangled by built-in tax increases by passing a 25-percent across-the-board tax cut and by indexing their tax rates starting next year.

Well, a letter like that makes my day, I can tell you. And if what we've done in these last 3 years has turned despair into hope, self-doubt into confidence, then the American people will judge for themselves what we've achieved.

I believe we have a solid record of achievement and accomplishment to offer. Nevertheless, we must be aware that most people are more concerned about what we offer for the future than what we've achieved in the past, even the near past. We must make certain that the public is keenly aware that it is Republicans who have a bold vision of the future.

We're the ones who will push to simplify the tax code. For 30 years the liberals have controlled the House where tax bills originate. As a matter of fact, for 27 of these last 30 years the Democratic Party has controlled both Houses of the Congress, and then for these 3 years, we have had the one House, the Senate. And believe me, nothing of what we've accomplished could have been done if we did not have the majority in that one House. If the public wants real tax reform, we're the ones that will give it to them.

We're the ones who would strengthen the social institutions that are the foundation of our society and our freedom. Fundamental American values have been under attack for too long, and it's about time we stand up and say enough is enough.

Education, of course, is something that demonstrates the difference in approach between the two parties. And here, too, we're the ones with enough courage to call for basic reform. We know that just throwing money at a problem isn't the answer. And certainly more Federal controls and regulations -- something that is a byproduct of looking to Washington as a solution to local problems -- is not the answer. No, we must reinvigorate education from the bottom up or real change will not happen.

Here in Nevada you're showing what can be accomplished when people set their mind to it. A cross section of community leaders has gotten together to establish private sector funding and support for State contributions for a school of engineering at the University of Nevada, Las Vegas. Once established, the school will provide a necessary link in preparing today's students for the new and emerging fields of high technology that will carry Nevada and the United States from the eighties to the 21st century. This is the kind of initiative that fosters progress. It represents a grassroots momentum emerging all over the country.

Well, the next week the Republicans were having a fundraiser, and he set up shop again -- same location and some of the same pups. And out came the people and, sure enough, somebody asked him if they were Republican pups. And he said, ``Yes.'' And he sold one. And a newspaper reporter who was nearby and had been present the week before said, ``Hey, kid, wait a minute.

We've got a job to do, and one of the best things that we can do -- we know what you can do for us -- it's that mouth-to-mouth, that hand-to-hand contact, and that telling about the difference in the record. And so we're going to try to see if we don't provide the information that you'll need to convince your friends and neighbors and to straighten out -- I read the other day where they were going to follow us through the campaign with truth squads. Well, that will make those the slowest truth squads in the world, because we're going to be circling around behind them telling the truth on them. [Laughter] And I doubt that they would be really telling the truth.

At the President's direction, the Vice President convened a meeting at the White House today to review the current situation in Lebanon with national security advisers. The meeting began at 11 a.m. EST and lasted 2 hours. This meeting was a follow-on to meetings and conference telephone calls yesterday and Sunday, including a meeting chaired by the President Sunday afternoon at the White House.

Ambassador Bartholomew. These efforts will be aimed at maintaining a cease-fire and working with the Government of Lebanon to form a broad-based representative government under the constitution of Lebanon. Ambassador Rumsfeld will meet with President Gemayel at the earliest opportunity. The President directed all appropriate measures be taken to ensure American interests, including the safety of American citizens in Lebanon.

The President this morning directed the Vice President to delay his departure for Europe, which was scheduled for Wednesday morning, so that he may continue to coordinate the activities in Washington.

The bloodshed we have witnessed in Lebanon over the last several days only demonstrates once again the lengths to which the forces of violence and intimidation are prepared to go to prevent a peaceful reconciliation process from taking place. If a moderate government is overthrown because it had the courage to turn in the direction of peace, what hope can there be that other moderates in the region will risk committing themselves to a similar course? Yielding to violence and terrorism today may seem to provide temporary relief, but such a course is sure to lead to a more dangerous and less manageable future crisis.

U.S. naval forces, under the existing mandate of the MNF, to provide naval gunfire and air support against any units firing into greater Beirut from parts of Lebanon controlled by Syria, as well as against any units directly attacking American or MNF personnel and facilities. Those who conduct these attacks will no longer have sanctuary from which to bombard Beirut at will. We will stand firm to deter those who seek to influence Lebanon's future by intimidation.

Second, when the Government of Lebanon is able to reconstitute itself into a broadly based representative government, we will vigorously accelerate the training, equipping, and support of the Lebanese Armed Forces, on whom the primary responsibility rests for maintaining stability in Lebanon. We will speed up delivery of equipment; we will improve the flow of information to help counter hostile bombardments; and we will intensify training in counter-terrorism to help the Lebanese confront the terrorist threat that poses such a danger to Lebanon, to Americans in Lebanon, and indeed to peace in the Middle East.

Third, in conjunction with these steps, I have asked Secretary of Defense Weinberger to present to me a plan for redeployment of the marines from Beirut Airport to their ships offshore. This redeployment will begin shortly and will proceed in stages. U.S. military personnel will remain on the ground in Lebanon for training and equipping the Lebanese Army and protecting the remaining personnel. These are traditional functions that U.S. personnel perform in many friendly countries. Our naval and marine forces offshore will stand ready, as before, to provide support for the protection of American and other MNF personnel in Lebanon and thereby help ensure security in the Beirut area as I have described.

These measures, I believe, will strengthen our ability to do the job we set out to do and to sustain our efforts over the long term. They are consistent with the compromise joint resolution worked out last October with the Congress with respect to our participation in the multinational force.

The conference call this morning here followed an extensive discussion that the Vice President had by telephone with other foreign policy advisers in Washington. The Vice President, as you know, over the past several days -- Monday and Tuesday -- had been conducting either meetings in the White House Situation Room or having the meetings by conference call. This morning's meeting was by conference call in Washington.

Overnight, the President received a decision paper from his foreign policy advisers and made a number of specific decisions that were designed to implement the plan that he announced yesterday afternoon.

The President. Commander Brand, I'd like to say a good morning to you and your crew. I'm talking to you from California. I don't know exactly where you are. I know you're up there someplace. But you're all doing a fine job on this historic mission.

And I'd like to say hello to Bruce McCandless and Bob Stewart who are sending us this spectacular television coverage of man's historic walk in space. Let me ask you, what's it like to work out there unattached to the shuttle and maneuvering freely in space?

The view is simply spectacular and panoramic. And we believe that -- maneuvering units first time working unattached -- we're literally opening a new frontier in what man can do in space, and we'll be paving the way for many important operations on the coming space station, sir.

The President. Well, that is just great. You've really opened a new era for the world in space with this mission. You've shown both our commercial partners and our foreign partners, who play an important role in this and other missions to come, that man does have the tools to work effectively in space.

Commander Brand. Well, we're pretty busy in here just keeping track of them. They have a lot of tests to go through and, of course, it is the first check out of something that's rather futuristic, the backpack, the man-maneuvering unit. So, we're just monitoring them, making sure that we don't lose sight of them.

Say, Hoot, I understand you must have a special interest in making sure everything's working right up there, since your wife will be making the trip on board the shuttle this summer. Do you have any tips to pass along to her?

Astronaut Gibson. That's true, Mr. President, she is. She's going up about in August, and that's why, as you say, I've been trying to check everything out and make sure it's going to work well when she goes. The thought of myself going up doesn't bother me, but I think I'll be nervous when she goes.

Astronaut McNair. Mr. President, the experiments are working out very well. We're very pleased with the results we're seeing, and there's a lot of promise being demonstrated in all the areas you've just mentioned. And we look forward to getting them back on the ground and analyzed and make some good use of these results.

I am pleased to report that over the past eight months significant progress has been made toward implementing the recommendations of the Scowcroft Commission. Such progress has been possible only because of bipartisan cooperation and support from both Houses of Congress. The attached report is submitted pursuant to the provisions of section 1231(e) of Title XII of the Department of Defense Authorization Act, 1984, enacted as part of Public Law 98 - 94. The attached document addresses the topics set out in section 1231(e).

This effort has provided a unique opportunity for Republicans and Democrats to work together for our common goal of equitable, verifiable arms control and a more stable peaceful world. I trust that the attached report provides you the information necessary for your continued support in implementing fully the recommendations of the Scowcroft Commission.

The President this afternoon spoke with the Vice President and Robert C. McFarlane, Assistant to the President for National Security Affairs, to receive an update on the situation in Lebanon and receive their recommendations on Secretary Weinberger's withdrawal plan and the composition of the United States delegation to the funeral services for Yuriy Andropov. They spoke at 1:30 p.m.

The President this afternoon received the plan for the redeployment for the United States multinational force in Lebanon from Secretary Weinberger. The report remains under review. The President has directed that consultations take place with the Government of Lebanon and other members of the multinational force. A decision will not be made until those consultations are complete, and we do not expect a final decision until the first of next week.

Chief of State, on the death of Chairman Andropov. In his message the President emphasized to the people and Government of the U.S.S.R. his desire for cooperation between the two countries in the search for a more peaceful world.

As the President reaffirmed in his address of January 16, the United States has sought and will continue to seek a constructive and realistic dialog with the Soviet Union aimed at building a more productive and stable relationship. Our objective is not dialog for its own sake, but a dialog that produces real solutions to the many concrete problems that divide us.

There are, to be sure, fundamental differences between the American and Soviet systems and our respective political beliefs. But the American and Soviet peoples have a common interest in the avoidance of war and the reduction of arms. It is this need to preserve and strengthen the peace that is at the heart of U.S. policy.

The President's policy toward the Soviet Union seeks to achieve progress in three broad areas: developing ways to eliminate the use and the threat of force in international relations; significantly reducing the vast arms stockpiles in the world, particularly nuclear weapons; and establishing a better working relationship with Moscow, characterized by greater cooperation and understanding and based on mutual restraint and respect.

Changes of leadership have not happened often in the Soviet Union. Yuriy Andropov was only the sixth Communist Party leader in the 66 years since the Russian Revolution. In recent months, he'd been totally absent from public view, so his death did not come as a shock to the world.

The changes in Moscow are an opportunity for both nations to examine closely the current state of our relations and to think about the future. We know that our relationship is not what we would like it to be. We've made no secret of our views as to the reasons why. What is needed now is for both sides to sit down and find ways of solving some of the problems that divide us.

Together we can help make the world a better, more peaceful place. This was also the message for the Soviet people in my address on Soviet-American relations last month. In that speech, as in my private communications with the late Chairman Andropov, I stressed our commitment to a serious and intensive dialog with the Soviet Union, one aimed at building a more constructive U.S.-Soviet relationship.

As we engage in discussions with Soviet leaders, we recognize the fundamental differences in our values and in our perspectives on many international issues. We must be realistic and not expect that these differences can be wished away. But realism should also remind us that our two peoples share common bonds and interests. We are both relatively young nations with rich ethnic traditions and a pioneer philosophy. We have both experienced the terrible trauma of war. We have fought side by side in the victory over Nazi Germany. And while our governments have very different views, our sons and daughters have never fought each other. We must make sure they never do.

Avoiding war and reducing arms is a starting point in our relationship with the Soviet Union, but we seek to accomplish more. With a good-faith effort on both sides, I believe the United States and the Soviet Union could begin rising above the mistrust and ill will that cloud our relations. We could establish a basis for greater mutual understanding and constructive cooperation, and there's no better time to make that good-faith effort than now.

At this time of transition in the Soviet Union, our two nations should look to the future. We should find ways to work together to meet the challenge of preserving peace. Living in this nuclear age makes it imperative that we talk to each other, discuss our differences, and seek solutions to the many problems that divide us.

We're prepared to meet the Soviets halfway in the search for mutually acceptable agreements. I hope the leaders of the Soviet Union will work with us in that same spirit. I invite them to take advantage of the opportunities at hand to establish a more stable and constructive relationship. If the Soviet Government wants peace, then there will be peace.

In recent days, millions of citizens inside the Soviet Union, the United States, and countries throughout the world have been brought together by one great event, the winter Olympics. The competition is fierce, and we cheer for the men and women on our respective teams. But we can and should celebrate the triumphs of all athletes who compete in the true spirit of sportsmanship and give the very best of themselves. And when each race or event is done and our teams come together in friendship, we will remember that we are meant to be one family of nations.

We who are leaders in government have an obligation to strive for cooperation every bit as hard as our athletes, who reach within for the greatest efforts of their lives. If the Soviet Government would join us in this spirit, then together we could build a safer and far better world for the human family, not just for today but for generations to come.

Abraham Lincoln guided his country through one of the most difficult periods of its history, when bloodshed decided whether two regions would remain united, or separate, because of unresolved differences. It was his belief that that struggle would ultimately determine the fate of democracy throughout the world. With a strong, patient, and sometimes weary hand, he led the American people from the most devastating war in our history to the pathway of greatness. Indeed, just as he envisioned, America remains the last, best hope for freedom in the world.

Lincoln was one of those leaders. Generations have looked up to him as the man who not only preserved the Union, but helped us realize that true democracy is an evolving process. He once said the American Revolution ``was the germ which has vegetated, and still is to grow and expand into the universal liberty of mankind.'' Since his time our democratic system has evolved and made great strides in righting the wrongs that existed. Today, all of us have the chance to reap the rich benefits of liberty and opportunity. Lincoln would be proud of how far we have come. He would be pleased with this country and what its people stand for.

Today we witness bloodshed and conflict between Iran and Iraq, in Chad, in the Western Sahara, and Lebanon. And now, as never before, it behooves people of good will to work together for peace and stability.

King Hussein has led Jordan with strength and wisdom these last three decades. He's an experienced statesman, and his insights are valuable to us as well as to the people of Jordan. His Majesty was an important force behind the U.N. Resolution 242, which continues to be the starting point for tangible Middle East peace efforts, including my own peace initiative of September 1, 1982.

Today we spoke of a number of bilateral concerns, but the focus of our meeting was on the issues affecting regional peace. We both believe that while the challenges remain formidable, the opportunities for a broader peace are still present. We also agree that terrorism cannot be tolerated and that the leaders of all states must stand together against this new barbarism that threatens civilization.

States that condone terrorism undermine their own legitimacy. In these times of trial, disillusionment would be easy. But my meeting today with King Hussein has reaffirmed to me that the good and decent people of this world can and will work together and that progress can be made toward the perplexing problem of peace in the Middle East.

Mr. President, once again, sir, it's a privilege and a pleasure for me to have the opportunity to meet with you as the leader of the United States of America, as a man I respect and admire, as a friend. And I would like to say that these feelings are shared by my government and my people -- the feelings of pride in our friendship, the feelings of pride in the fact that our goals and aims are one and the same; our ideas, our principles, our belonging to the family of free people throughout the world.

The challenges before us are indeed tremendous, but the determination is there to strive for a better tomorrow. This is a cause to which we are dedicated in Jordan -- the cause of a stable area, the cause of establishing, eventually, a just and lasting peace in the area, the cause of a better future for generations to come.

On all the subjects, sir, that you were kind enough to address, I could not in all honesty say that I could have presented my views any differently. I thank you for the opportunity and the chance, sir, to discuss problems of the moment and to share with you the vision of the future and to reaffirm our commitment to our common goals of a better future within our area and within the world and for the establishment of a just and durable peace.

Every day we rely on vision to provide us with a clear, vivid picture of our surroundings and the people we care about. Although we use our eyesight in virtually all activities, we often take it for granted until it is endangered by disease or injury. This is unfortunate because there are steps we can take to protect our eyes and to safeguard the precious gift of sight.

As a sight-saving precaution, everyone should have regular, professional eye examinations. Most people who have these checkups will get the reassuring news that their eyes are healthy. But a few people will receive an early warning of some serious eye disease requiring prompt treatment.

People with diabetes should be particularly aware of the need to have their eyes examined regularly to prevent the blindness that sometimes stems from the disease. This is especially important because there now is a sight-saving treatment which is highly effective if applied early enough in the course of the disease.

Regular eye checkups are also of special importance for older people because many serious eye diseases tend to strike in the later years. With early warning of a need for treatment, people can obtain the required medical care and give themselves the best possible chance of retaining good vision throughout their lives. Children also need regular eye examinations in order that readily treatable problems which otherwise could needlessly affect them in school and at play may be detected.

Protecting our eyes against injury is another way to preserve vision. In work with chemicals or machinery which might be dangerous to the eyes, safety glasses, goggles, or a face mask should be worn. Protective eyewear is also important for people participating in sports.

In looking to the needs of others, we can arrange to donate our eyes after death and, in this way, offer the gift of sight to a person who needs corneal transplant surgery. We also can support the many fine organizations which are devoted to research, sight conservation, and rehabilitation of the visually handicapped.

In the development of our country, the role of the surveyor has been of vital importance. In colonial days, surveyors were among the leaders in the community -- statesmen, influential citizens, and shapers of cultural standards, including people such as George Washington and Thomas Jefferson. It was the surveyor's work that determined the boundaries of land, the greatest economic asset in the colonies. Thomas Jefferson chaired a committee in 1784 to devise a plan for disposing of lands west of the Thirteen Colonies. He argued that surveying before sale was necessary to prevent overlapping claims and to simplify deeds and registers. He reportedly wrote a plan which was debated in Congress, and in modified form was adopted as the Land Ordinance of May 20, 1785. The ordinance established the Public Land Survey System (PLSS) -- the rectangular system that continues in effect today in 30 midwestern and western states.

Since 1785, the nature of surveying has changed dramatically. No longer is surveying limited to the description and location of land boundaries. Today, hydrographic surveys are important to the use of all our bodies of water; engineering surveys are utilized in the study and selection of engineering construction; geodetic surveys determine precise global positioning for such activities as aircraft and missile navigation; and cartographic surveys are used for mapping and charting, including the use of photogrammetry, the science of using aerial photographs for measurement and map production. Many services are provided through the use of sophisticated equipment and techniques, such as satellite-borne remote sensing devices and automated positioning, measuring, recording, and plotting equipment.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 13th day of Feb., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

The United States produces nearly one-twelfth of the total output of the world's major agricultural commodities. This abundant production enables us to feed not only our own population, but tens of millions of other people throughout the world.

Our remarkable food and fiber production links together 23 million Americans who are involved in growing, processing, and marketing hundreds of United States agricultural commodities. Our farmers and ranchers produce a wide variety of meat, fruits, vegetables, food grains, flowers, dairy products, fibers, fish, and livestock. Maintaining such production requires natural resources, fertilizers, chemicals, credit, specialized equipment, processing, transporting, marketing, and State and national policies that strengthen the system. This vast integration of production and labor -- an outgrowth of our free enterprise system -- has transformed agriculture into the Nation's largest industry, with assets exceeding one trillion dollars.

The municipal clerk is the oldest of public servants and a critical part of efficient and responsive local government. The accurate recording, careful safeguarding, and prompt retrieval of public records are vital functions, without which effective local government could not exist.

As local government has grown in responsibility and importance through the Nation's history, so has the role of the municipal clerk. The clerk provides a direct link between past, present, and future by preserving records for posterity and implementing governmental decisions. Municipal clerks also seek better and more effective ways to perform these critical responsibilities in light of the rapid technological advances of today's world.

In recognition of the outstanding and vital services performed by municipal clerks and their dedication to public service, the Congress, by Senate Joint Resolution 92, has designated the week beginning May 13, 1984, as ``Municipal Clerk's Week,'' and has authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of that week.

Association. The petitioner alleged that Brazil has acted inconsistently with its obligations under the Subsidies Code by granting subsidies on the production and exportation of soybean oil and meal. These subsidies include: 1) the provision of preferential loans to oil and meal exporters for operating funds and for the purchase of raw materials to be processed and exported; 2) the partial exemption from income tax of profits from oil exports; and 3) the exemption from tax of gains from foreign hedging operations. The petitioner further alleged that as a result of the Brazilian subsidy programs, Brazilian exports of oil and meal have increased and have displaced United States exports in third country markets.

Brazilian complaint against United States programs as they relate to the production and export of soybean oil and meal. During the consultation process it was learned that Brazil had suspended the application of two of its subsidy programs to soybean products. Both parties agreed to a further exchange of information regarding their respective programs which is scheduled to occur within the next month. If a resolution to the problem is not reached through consultations, the United States will continue the dispute settlement process as set forth in the Subsidies Code.

While it is disappointing that the dispute settlement process has not moved more expeditiously, I believe that the process is moving smoothly and that United States interests would be best served by following that process to its conclusion. I expect the USTR to pursue a resolution of this issue in a diligent and expeditious manner.

Relations and Planning.]  Mr. President, the three gentlemen opposite you -- Saul Friedman and Bob Boyd, the bureau chief, and also Owen Ullmann -- were going to ask most of the questions. The others might have a few questions, and we thought, perhaps, Saul would like to ask the first one.

Q. I'd like to ask the first question about what's happening in the Soviet Union. And since it's fresh, and news, my colleagues would never forgive me if I didn't ask the question. Is there something you can tell us about the new Soviet leader and how it might affect relations with the Soviet Union -- his appointment might affect our relations with the Soviets?

The President. Well, the only thing that I can say is that in this case you have to wait and see what the position's going to be. I do think that when there is a change of leadership, the new individual hasn't been on record with any positions that might cause him problems in shifting position or with regard to discussions and so forth. So, the message that I've sent with Vice President Bush is one in which we should begin to talk and negotiate on the problems that, at the moment, lie between us.

Q. There was some speculation, some reports out at Santa Barbara, that you might be willing to meet with him in what was called a get-acquainted session that wouldn't necessarily have all the trappings of a summit. Is that a possibility?

The President. Well, I think just to get acquainted -- obviously you'd get acquainted if you had a summit meeting, but, no, I think it still remains that you should have an agenda to have such a meeting that lays out the issues that we need to discuss.

There has been one example in our recent history about a kind of get-acquainted meeting, and it was under President Johnson. And, if you'll recall, there was a kind of great letdown when that's all they did was, really, get acquainted, and the world was waiting for maybe a solution to some of the problems.

The President. I don't recall exactly the details of where it was, but I do remember that thing and the result of it. No, I think that -- and we're certainly ready -- I think that to have an agenda of the things that right now concern us: the arms talks, a number of other issues of that kind. And it isn't -- some have suggested that we want to be able to claim that we can win something or other -- no, that isn't a guarantee that you want. You want to know that there's some substantive issues that we can really get down to talking about.

Q. Mr. President, in your radio talk Saturday, you said you were willing to meet them halfway and to try to get a more stable and constructive relationship. What, more specifically, do you mean by meeting them halfway? Are there some adjustments we might make on our side in our positions?

The President. Well, that -- you see, so far in the disarmament talks, for example, we have put the positions on the table. They have not come back, in reality, with any substantive positions of their own. And, in one set of negotiations where they did, we met them halfway. We proposed, then, a change in our original position. And this is what we mean: that to negotiate, one side just can't sit silent and say, ``We don't like your first proposal, make another one.'' Well then, they could sit there forever while we try to think up new proposals. No, they've got to come back with something that they think meets whatever objections they had to our proposal, and then we discuss those points to see if there's a common meeting ground. And we're willing to do that.

But it's not only just the disarmament thing where they've walked away from the table. I think all the things that have them feeling that it is necessary to keep the world in kind of armed camps -- they would be far better off, the world would be far better off, if we would find those areas where we could be a family of nations and settle our disputes and get along.

Q. Wouldn't it be -- I'm thinking about what Eisenhower said when he said he'd go anywhere, anytime, in search of peace. And wouldn't it, at this point -- could there be some gesture on the part of the United States towards this new Soviet leader, short of changing a position -- a negotiating position, but some gesture, either an offer of you to get acquainted with the new General Secretary or something other -- something symbolic, perhaps, that you might have in mind?

The President. Well, let me -- again, if I understand your question correctly, let's take the INF talks. I proposed what I think is a very commonsense idea, that in the intermediate-range weapons -- more than a thousand of which are poised on their side against the European allies, and we, at the request of the allies, a request that was made in 1979 and approved by the Government -- then Government of the United States, and of which we are implementing -- that a far more sensible proposal would be to agree on zero; no intermediate-range weapons in Europe on either side.

They refused to even discuss such a thing. So, we came back and said, ``All right then, let us meet and discuss whatever reduced number you are willing to settle for.'' And the negotiations started, and those are the negotiations that have broken off. So, I think this demonstrated some flexibility on our part.

The President. I don't know. I've seen all the speculation on that that has appeared in the media as to quoting previous statements that he has made or not. I hope that we could have a change in approach.

Q. Maybe we could switch the subject a bit to the Middle East and to your conversations this morning with King Hussein. As a result of your conversations, do you see any more chance that he may be able or willing to help you revive your September 1st peace plan?

The President. King Hussein has been, I must say, most cooperative and has taken a great deal of courage to be that way in the situation as it is, with his border with Syria and all. And, yes, he is as determined as I am to find a way to pursue the problem of overall peace in the Middle East.

Bank, because I think that whole West Bank -- that is one of the principal areas for negotiation in an effort to bring about peace in the Middle East. I've described it as a willingness to exchange territory for security.

The President. Well, it has been delayed, because after proposing that, suddenly Lebanon became the scene of open warfare. The PLO headquartered themselves and their military in the very heart of Beirut. The Israelis, who had -- their border was being used -- the terrorist PLO groups shelling across the border and so forth, they advanced, war being fought there, which prompted us to do what we've done with regard to the multinational force in order to get at the overall problem of peace in the Middle East.

Basically, that peace as we, I think, can all recognize, depends on peace between the Arab world and Israel. And, as you know, the Arab position for a long time had been that Israel did not have a right to exist as a nation and this was why the successive wars that have been fought there. But you couldn't get on with that while the strife was going on in Lebanon. It was literally war between Syria and Israel, to say nothing of the internecine war and the various factions within Lebanon itself.

Now, the function of the multinational force was predicated on the other forces, foreign forces, leaving Lebanon and the multinational force providing something of a stability while a Government of Lebanon, which had not existed to any purposeful extent for a dozen years, then could reorganize their military -- and we have helped in the training, incidentally, of their military -- could then assume sovereignty over their own soil, at which point the multinational force could go home. But in the meantime, we could get on with the resumption of the peace talks.

Now, one faction, the Syrians -- we did get the PLO out. The Israelis withdrew from their positions -- not all the way to their border, but certainly well back toward it. And I could understand their stopping short, because there still was no guarantee of safety of that border until everyone else left. The Syrians then reneged and refused to leave.

But progress has been made -- the talks in Geneva. We have trained and equipped the Lebanese forces to where it is really a capable military force. They need more. They need to be bigger, have more men than they have. There have been some setbacks, as we know, all along the line, but I think that progress was made. And that was why last August, those who don't want progress there began the terrorist acts against the multinational force and particularly our marines there at the airport. I think that that was an indication that we were being successful in this trying to find -- or secure a stable Lebanon in peace.

We, from the time of the great tragedy over there -- the explosion -- we have been trying to find a more practical and a more viable deployment in which our presence still would be felt and we would not be bugging out or abandoning the original purpose. We haven't abandoned it, although I'm afraid that some have treated this deployment, in spite of all we've tried to say, as a leaving, and it isn't. We think that they will be -- the fleet has been there for a long time; it will remain; they will remain on shipboard -- they will remain able to go ashore if there is any reason to bring them ashore. And in the meantime we are sending in a force for additional training in certain specialties, training of the Lebanese Armed Forces. So, there is no leaving at all.

Q. Is the timetable still as it was outlined by a senior administration official the other day to a group of reporters; that is to say, the troops out, redeployed within a month, save 200 left behind?

The President. Well, I understand that Secretary Weinberger said that that was something they were looking at. We had not set any time for this. It was to be a phased withdrawal. The marines that would be left in there are the marines that normally protect the Embassy, which has come under attack recently and has necessitated our responding. And then there will be, as I say, these additional forces that will be going in for this specialized training.

Q. Wasn't it a little bit unfair, Mr. President, to say that the Democrats' call for an orderly and prompt withdrawal was illfounded when you yourself were planning to do something very much like that at the same time?

The President.  --  -- but it sounded as if what, no, he was advocating was bugging out, out and go home. And as long as there is a chance for peace, we're going to continue striving for what we originally set out to achieve.

The President. They will be there training the Lebanese Armed Forces. They will be Army personnel, not Marine, and they will be specialists in certain areas having to do with terrorism and that sort of thing.

The President. No, it isn't that. It's as if -- well, just the same as if they were at the -- when they were at the airports. If they could contribute to their mission by moving from there or deploying into additional territory, they would have moved. The same thing is true with them on the vessels.

Remember that the multinational force was not there in a combat role or to be allied with any of the factions engaged in this internecine warfare. As I say, they were there to permit the limited Lebanese forces, once they were ready, to move out into the areas that had once been occupied by Syria and Israel. And I think this mission still prevails. And if that mission can be better served, if there is a development in what is going on that it can be better served by them coming back and taking over some area, they would do that. Or if it's necessary for our own security, they would.

The President. You asked that question, and I didn't answer it. I can't speculate on that. I don't really have that much information about the size of the detachment. It would not be as extensive as the marine presence that has been there.

Q. When will we make the decision on whether the feasibility of bringing them all out in a month turns into the reality? I know that Secretary Weinberger is supposed to report to you on a plan. I just wonder when you will know when they're going to be able to come out and on what this will depend?

The President. Well, all I can do is repeat what he said before the Congress the other day when he made a statement -- I think he's already made one today -- that it is feasible that we could have them on board a ship within 30 days. But he wasn't making any guarantees, so I'm not going to.

Q. Well, I'd like to ask about the recent drop in the stock market. A lot of people read that as a vote of no confidence on your budget and the lack of any action on reducing deficits either by your administration or Congress. And there is this increasing worry around the country that perhaps there will be no action on reducing the deficit for at least a year until after the election and that it's a very large risk and gamble with the economy. I'm wondering if you think there's anything to this risk and if you think perhaps the economy could falter before any major reduction of the deficit is accomplished.

The President. Well, since I was given an estimate sometime ago that the stock market could fall as much as from a hundred to two hundred points and the reason for it had nothing to do with forebodings of evil up ahead, but had to do simply with the fact that the continuing interest rates were making bonds much more attractive from a revenue standpoint than equities -- that this was what we were going to see, was a shift of money into bonds because of the return. And the interest rates didn't fall; the interest rates have stayed where they are. And we're seeing exactly what I was told we could look forward to. So, I don't think that this is any pushing a panic button at all. I think this is just plain earning capability.

And we bought the idea, and we proposed this and proposed immediate negotiations, even before we had submitted a budget and all. And they kept stalling. And finally they came up with a date -- and a date in which they knew, I'm sure, that I was due to be in Dixon, Illinois, and Eureka and Las Vegas, the 6th of February. We offered them the dates of February 2, 3, and 4 or 8, and we finally had one meeting.

And now they have gone home, as I say, on recess. And they're talking about maybe something more than a month away -- or at least a month away from when we had suggested the first meeting -- to get together again. I'm disappointed in that, because we took them at face value on their proposal.

Q. Well, one issue, Mr. President, has been your defense budget. And I'm not sure it would be defined as among the less contentious issues, but the Democrats have been saying repeatedly that it should be on the table. And I'm wondering, are you prepared to agree to some reductions in your defense budget to achieve a compromise on this downpayment?

The President. When you invite negotiations, everything went on the table. We put all three things there: the cuts in domestic spending, we put defense on the table, and we put the matter of revenues on the table. All three are in the present budget proposal we made.

Now, I think that budget proposals are based on what is a function of government and what is essential to -- well, in a matter of security. You don't go at the defense budget on the matter of dollars and cents; you go at the defense budget on what do we believe is essential to our national security. And before the figure that is in the present budget, before we arrived at that, here within our own ranks, $16 billion was knocked out of that. I remember one point joking with Cap, and I said, ``You ought to leave it in there so that they could take it out.'' But we didn't. We got down to what we thought was a realistic defense budget.

They have claimed and made some wild proposal with regard to defense spending as being the source of reducing the deficit, but again, as I say, you don't start with money; you start with what is necessary. Now, what we mean by putting that on the table is if they have a figure and they believe that they have a defense program that would meet the necessities and for their figure, bring it out on the table and let us discuss it, and let us negotiate on that. And this they've refused to do.

Now, they were a little like what I said about the Russians a little bit earlier in disarmament. They sit there and say, you know, ``We don't like that figure. Give us another one.'' Well, that's not negotiating.

The President. Yes, and without one thing as to how you could achieve that and still have a defense package or program that would meet our needs. That's what I say: They were just talking numbers of dollars; they weren't talking about national defense and what you could or could not do without.

The President. Well, I'll tell you. We take very seriously the deficits. As a matter of fact, we've taken them seriously for the last half-century. It has been their plan and their proposal, and we believe that we have got to deal with the problem of deficits. And the principal way is to reduce government spending. That's why I asked for the Grace commission -- that task force of hundreds and hundreds of business leaders in this country and experts in every field to come in. And they've come in with more than 2,500 recommendations for making government more economic and more efficient, and we now are just starting in on those.

But I would think if they're going to insist on talking about the deficits now as if it's something that they had never heard of before, when they had much to do with building the government structure that has made those deficits a way of life, I would think that they would want to meet us in an attempt, in a bipartisan way, without getting politics into it, to find out how we can achieve the goal of a balanced budget.

The President. A balanced budget? No, I think a balanced budget -- I think what is possible in what we're trying to get at is a declining level that will point down here to a point down the road in which we can have, achieve a balanced budget.

Q. Mr. President, let me ask a question on another subject. If you had to do Grenada over again, or you have a situation like that in the future, do you see there is a way that you would trust the press to come in on the first wave?

The President. Well now, with all the attacks that have been leveled against us, we didn't have anything against the press at all in the Grenada invasion. It wasn't an invasion, actually, it was a rescue mission. And it was more of a commando operation. And we felt so seriously -- it was such a short time when the request came to us from those other six island nations to head off what was happening -- and our own concern about a possible hostage situation with those several hundred young people that were down there, those students of ours.

In fact, before that request came in, we had our replacement force on its way to Beirut. And I called Secretary Weinberger and asked him if, with the turmoil down there, with the murder of Bishop and all, where was the location of that flotilla, and could it possibly change its course a little and be -- while it was still traveling toward Beirut -- be closer to Grenada if there should come a threat to those young people and, as I say, a hostage situation. Then when we received in that one eventful weekend the request -- and I okay'd it -- we recognized that we only had a very short time. And knowing, again, the danger of leaks, we didn't even take our own press department into our confidence. Only the few of us that were involved turned over to the Joint Chiefs, and the first mission, of course, was the rescue of our young people, their security. The second essential was to minimize the casualties.

Now, what we knew about the Cuban presence there, we knew that there was some ability to fight back. We also knew that Cuba was a lot closer than we were, and we knew -- we did not even confirm to those other nations that had asked for our help the absolute decision because of this concern. And we didn't see -- they only had 48 hours to plan that operation -- we didn't see how we could run the risk of having to notify people that something was going to take place. And for once we did have something that was absolutely secure, and no word was out until we ourselves called the Cubans and the Russians and told them -- guaranteed the safety of their people. They didn't resist.

The President. Right now the Defense Department has invited press representatives in and to conceive of a plan on how that we can do this. But in that particular decision -- that was not made here in the White House or anything else -- I said that because of the short planning, the necessity for secrecy, the press was never mentioned; I said this time we won't look over the shoulders of the commanders in the field. They're going to be in full charge. They're on the ground; they're going to be the ones that know what is needed. And there won't be any political opinions given to them of any kind. And so, the decision, I guess, was made by them that they saw no way that they could do this, but by the second day after the landing, as you know, a pool went in, and then, the third day, a larger pool, and then finally it was wide open.

Q. Mr. President, on the issue of Cuba, from time to time they make sounds that they would like to enter into discussions about various issues between the two nations. What set of signals would you require in order to enter into those kinds of discussions with Cuba?

The President. Well, we tried early on. There were some noises of that kind made early in my administration, and we immediately picked up on them and then found that they evidently didn't mean it; we got no place. And they're making something of the same kind of noises now. We don't think that they're really serious.

Nicaragua and stop interfering in other people's lives and other countries, we might think that they really meant it. And, believe me, I would like it. I think that Cuba and the Cuban people would be so much better off if Cuba would remember that it's a member of the Western Hemisphere and rejoin the family of nations over here instead of tying themselves so closely to the Soviet Union.

Q. Mr. President, on farm policy. You've stood, obviously, for free market and little government interference. And on farm policy, you've had to go 180 degrees the other direction and, in fact, have done more than any other administration in farm support. If you were reelected, which direction do you think you'd be going on farm policy?

There still is a problem with regard to agricultural products and some subsidy and subsidizing of sales in those. But I'm optimistic about all of our problems. We've been making great progress on that.

Q. Mr. President, I'd like to return to what you said about Lebanon a moment, and the army trainers that you said -- of whom you said would be sent in there. Do you have a timetable for that? Do you know when that will begin to happen?

Q. Mr. President, I'd like to ask you -- turn a little bit to politics, if I may, and ask you a question about something that may be a little delicate, but it's nevertheless been on my mind and on the minds of several people.

I was at your speech to the National Association of Broadcasters, and as others have commented, you've never been much to wear religion on your sleeve one way or the other. But I wonder if the comments to the National Association of Religious Broadcasters and other such speeches in which what seemed to me what you were doing was preaching the Gospel of Christ, as it were, isn't a little bit divisive and whether it might not be wise, especially since there are a heck of a lot of people in this country who are not of the same persuasion. It just doesn't seem like you in the past, and that's why I'm asking.

The President. Maybe others haven't listened to me in the past. I remember once, long before I was even the Governor of California, when I was just out of the mashed-potato circuit, I was invited to speak to a national meeting of military chaplains. They'd been having a 3-day meeting in California. And afterward, one of them came up to me and told me that -- he shook my hand and said that I was the first person in their 3-day meetings of chaplains who had mentioned the name of Christ.

No, it isn't easy for me to talk about this, or to talk about it here, but I do believe that there is, and has been -- and I've talked about it many times in speeches over the years -- that there is a great hunger for a kind of a spiritual revival in this country, for people to believe again in things that they once believed in -- basic truths and all. And, obviously, if I was speaking to those religious broadcasters, I was going to speak more on that subject than I would, say, to the Chamber of Commerce.

But I do believe and have grown up believing that these two great continents were placed here -- you can call it mystical if you want -- but were placed here between the oceans to be found by people who had a love for freedom, a courage, and that there was a divine purpose in that. And today, there's no place in the world like it. We've come from -- even around this table, if we started tracing our heritage, we would find we -- not perhaps from every corner in the world around this table, but Americans are from every corner of the world. We have respected every other religion. They're free to practice in our country, I guess, unless they go for human sacrifice.

But I just -- I feel -- and I've also felt -- I've been a history buff for a number of years -- that if you look back at the fall of any empire, any great civilization, it has been preceded by their forsaking their gods. And for a country that started as ours has and with a belief that we are a nation under God, I have sensed that maybe this hunger I mentioned is because we have under the guise of the first amendment, things of that kind, we have strayed from that. And I don't want us to be another great civilization that began its decline by forsaking its God.

The President. Yes. But may I recall that at the lighting of the Christmas tree that I said that on that birthday the man from Galilee -- that there are those in our land who recognized him as a prophet or a great teacher -- but a man, and just a teacher. And there are others of us who believe that he was of divine origin and the Son of God. And whichever, we celebrated his birthday with respect for the man.

President Mubarak. Their visit highlights the friendship between the United States and the two important countries they lead. Our countries share common interests in developing practical solutions to the problems of the Middle East. The good will and trust between us promise a solid foundation for overcoming the formidable obstacles to peace and progress in the region.

Our discussions today have reaffirmed that Egypt and Jordan will remain leaders in efforts to bring peace and security to the Middle East. King Hussein and President Mubarak have demonstrated foresight, realism, and resolve, which are essential if the peace process is to succeed.

We discussed in detail the opportunities for progress in the Middle East. Recent events in the area make it even more urgent to keep the broader peace process moving. The tragic events in Lebanon show that the occupation of territory by outside forces does not lead to peace, but rather to continued conflict and turmoil. I wish today, therefore, to reaffirm my commitment and that of our government to the principles I set forth in September of 1982, and in particular to the principle that the Arab-Israeli conflict must be resolved through negotiations involving an exchange of territory for peace.

King Hussein. Mr. President, my good brother and oldtime friend, President Mubarak, I'd like to thank you, sir, for your great kindness in enabling me and my brother, President Mubarak, to meet with you today and to discuss all aspects of the problems which we face in our area of the world; and our common goals and objectives for a better future for all in that area -- of establishment of a just and comprehensive peace for greater stability and for a better life for generations to come.

I'm very grateful for the opportunity to have had this chance to hear your views, sir, and the views of President Mubarak on all matters and to contribute what I could for the purpose of achieving better understanding of our respective positions as we move ahead with hope and determination and with a commitment to do our utmost for a better future in the area from which we come and for a just and comprehensive peace. I will carry back with me, the impressions I gained of your determination and that of the United States to contribute its full share to help all concerned achieve their objectives.

We are proud of our friendship. It is of long standing. We are hopeful that this friendship will develop and evolve and that, based on trust and confidence and with determination, we shall overcome what appear and have appeared to be for a long period of time insurmountable obstacles. After all, the cause we are striving to serve is the cause of people, their future, their rights, human dignity, and, at the same time, their freedom and a better life, which is their right.

I thank you once again, sir, for many kindnesses, and I thank you, my brother, President Mubarak, and wish you every continued success. And I would like to say that this has been a visit I shall always remember. I'll treasure the memories of this visit and the wonderful opportunity it has given me to meet with you both. Thank you very, very much indeed for your many courtesies and kindnesses and the warmth of your welcome.

I find it most rewarding to consult regularly with President Reagan and exchange views with him on matters of mutual interest. He is a statesman of great courage and wisdom. He has a profound sense of mission and responsibility. Our bilateral relations constitute a shining model for understanding and the cooperation among nations. We are determined to strengthen the bonds of friendship that link our peoples. The talks we held today will certainly add to this evergrowing friendship and mutual understanding.

I would like to seize this opportunity to thank the American people for cooperating with us in the vigorous efforts we are exerting to improve the quality of life for our masses. We are striving to reform our economic system and increase production and productivity. We are struggling to restore security and stability to the Middle East and Africa. Egypt has a pivotal role to play and a mission to fulfill. It is determined to do so with vigor and dedication. We are devoted to strengthening the structure of peace in our region and throughout the world.

The situation in Lebanon today is intolerable. The escalation of violence and the bloodshed is a threat to us all. Every nation is called upon to help. The peacekeeping role of the U.N. must be expanded and reinforced. The partition of this war-torn country should be prevented at any cost.

The Lebanese crisis is a stark reminder of the centrality of the Palestinian problem. That question must be addressed frontally and without delay. Our purpose is to create the necessary conditions for coexistence and the mutual recognition between the Palestinians and the Israelis. This coexistence must be based on justice and the recognition of rights. First and foremost, the right of the Palestinian people's self-determination should be honored and exercised. This is the clue to peace and security for all nations, including Israel.

The Palestinian people are entitled to your support and understanding. There is no substitute for a direct dialog with them through their chosen representative, the PLO. Such dialog will immensely serve the cause of peace to which we are both committed. Mr. Arafat is a responsible leader who has demonstrated tremendous courage under the most difficult circumstances. A dialog with him would reassure the Palestinian people and rekindle their hope for a better future.

No other nation can speak for the Palestinians. No other entity has a mandate to lay out their requirements for peace, and no other nation is more qualified than the American people, lending their support and backing.

The war between Iran and Iraq is another sad chapter in the history of the Middle East. We should spare no effort to bring it to an end immediately. No one can possibly benefit from the continuation of bloodshed between peoples who are linked together through the strongest cultural and spiritual bonds. To restore peace between these neighbors, certain concrete steps should be taken by those who are genuinely concerned. The mere expression of good will is no help in the face of continued fighting and escalated tension.

I came here also to plead the case for Africa. The African people need your attention and understanding. They are struggling against formidable odds. Economic crises and natural disasters are strangling their efforts for development and social transformation. Helping them is not only a moral obligation; it is a practical necessity for building a better world in which all nations live in peace and cooperate for their common good.

We are seeking your help in order to secure the unconditional independence of Namibia. The continuation of the present situation is unacceptable to all African nations. The minority regime of South Africa must know that the United States cannot support its policy of aggression and violation of human rights.

It was a happy coincidence that I met here with His Majesty King Hussein and pursued with him our ongoing consultation. We believe that Jordan has an important role to play in solidifying the structure of peace. It is an element of stability and security in the Middle East. Therefore, we support the dialog between Jordan and the PLO. This is a positive step towards peace. In the months ahead, we will be intensifying our contents with our partners in the peace process with a view of accelerating progress.

I have extended an invitation to President Reagan to visit Egypt at the earliest possible date. This will give our people an opportunity to demonstrate the depth of their sentiments towards the President and every American.

Congressional support for our continued participation in the Multinational Force remains critical to peace, national reconciliation, and the withdrawal of all foreign forces from Lebanon. We will continue to keep you informed as to further developments with respect to this situation.

I'm delighted to have the opportunity to help recognize National Crime Prevention Week and to tell you that crime prevention is a top priority on the national agenda. Americans should have the right and the opportunity to walk our streets without being afraid, to feel safe in our own homes, and to be confident that when our children leave the house they'll return safely.

For too many years, crime and the fear of crime robbed the -- or eroded the strength and vitality of our neighborhoods. We're finally making some headway. In 1982 -- or maybe you've already been told and know that the crime rate dropped by 4.3 percent, and that's the biggest drop since 1972.

Strom Thurmond, overwhelmingly passed our comprehensive crime control initiatives. Now, if the House would act -- and for the life of me I don't know what they're waiting for -- we could finally put a comprehensive and long-overdue anticrime package on the books. Clay, [Representative E. Clay Shaw, Jr., of Florida] we'll be working with you to try to get them moving on this.

We know that formidable challenges remain, and meeting them is what Crime Prevention Week is all about. This year the spotlight is on the Neighborhood Watch. But crime prevention is much more than that, and it's a nationwide movement. All across the country people are working together with law enforcement agencies to protect themselves, their loved ones, and their neighborhoods.

The National Exchange Club started the movement 37 years ago. And today its nearly 1,300 service clubs nationwide are working hard to promote crime preventive activities. The American Association of Retired Persons is helping the elderly. The National Crime Prevention Council and its spokesdog, McGruff, are leading a nationwide anticrime education program. The National Sheriffs Association has a key role in the Neighborhood Watch program.

Even sports teams are getting into the act. The Kansas City Chiefs, supported by local business, distribute football cards to local police departments, which in turn give them away to neighborhood children. The cards have a color, action picture of a player on one side and a crime prevention tip on the other. The only way to get a card is to ask a policeman, which reinforces positive communications between the cop on the beat and the neighborhood children.

And, of course, our nation's law enforcement officers are on the frontlines performing a tough job under enormous pressure. They're expected to be administrators, social workers, public relations experts, at times, philosophers and politicians, and still somehow always be an officer of the law.

And I thought my job was tough. [Laughter] Well, let me assure police officers everywhere of our firm support and unfailing gratitude. If we can get our comprehensive crime control act through the House, I think your job will become a little bit easier.

And now, let me commend the Neighborhood Watch Program. It's a program that I really like. In preparing for this ceremony, we did a little research and discovered that, using conservative estimates, of course -- no other kind -- [laughter] -- that one in six live in a community with a citizen anticrime program. Watch programs in nearly 30,000 communities involve about 10 million volunteers. The best news is that they're doing a great job. Fairfax County, Virginia, reported a 44-percent drop in burglary over the last 3 years. Each day and night a thousand citizens watch out for their neighbors. Chief Buracker estimates that it would cost the taxpayer $30 million a year to replace this volunteer effort.

In Florida's Dade County, a youth crime watch program is credited for much of the 25-percent decline in school crime and 20-percent drop in narcotics use since 1983 -- pardon me, 1981. That would have been a sudden drop. We're seeing the same positive results with watch programs all over the country, from Seattle to Las Vegas to Jackson, Mississippi. And what we're really witnessing is a reaffirmation of American values: a sense of community and fellowship, individual responsibility, caring for family and friends, and a respect for the law.

I hope we can mark our observance of National Crime Prevention Week by redoubling our efforts. We'll continue cracking down on career criminals, organized crime, drug pushers, and pornographers. We'll continue working to protect the interests of victims. But the strongest guardian against crime is the American people and the institutions that bind us together as a free society. Together we can turn the tide on crime and make it permanent. And with your help, we will.

And warm greetings to those joining us by satellite across the country. At the Susan B. Anthony birthday party in Los Angeles the celebrations are being led by former First Lady Betty Ford, by the First Lady of California Gloria Deukmejian, and by Transportation Secretary Elizabeth Dole.

In Washington State, Republican women are hosting a party at the Governor's mansion, and among the distinguished guests are Health and Human Services Secretary Margaret Heckler and a very active Republican woman, Jill Ruckelshaus. Thousands more are joining us by way of the C-Span television network, and I want to welcome all of you to this special party.

And now before I say anything else, let me give each of you my heartfelt thanks for all the time and labor that you've given to the Republican cause. In the end, it's not gloss and glitter but your determination and hard work that's made it possible for us to put our beliefs into practice -- and will again in November. And all of you are especially important, because you demonstrate the Republican commitment to American women.

Tonight we mark the birthday, as we've been told, of a great American. Susan B. Anthony was born in 1820 in an America where women were virtually excluded from public life. In many States it was difficult for women to get a public education. Women were denied the right to control their own property and, worst of all, across the country women were denied the most fundamental democratic right, the right to vote.

Throughout her life Susan Anthony struggled to correct these injustices. She traveled the land, organizing women's groups, writing pamphlets, and speaking at conventions. To dramatize her cause in 1872 she registered and voted, and for that simple act she was arrested, tried, and fined.

Republicans. We have nine outstanding Republican women in the House, and we're pleased to have three with us here tonight -- Congressmen Nancy Johnson, Claudine Schneider, and Olympia Snowe. And this year our party faces no task more important than reelecting Senator Kassebaum and her colleagues in the House and sending still more skilled women to the Congress. To give an old phrase a new twist, ``A woman's place is in the House -- and the Senate.'' As a matter of fact, Republican women ought to increase their numbers at every level of elective office.

In the executive branch we've appointed women to positions of top responsibility, as you've been told here tonight, women like our U.N. Ambassador Jeane Kirkpatrick, our Secretary of Health and Human Services Margaret Heckler, and our Secretary of Transportation Elizabeth Dole. And I'm honored to have loyal and talented women like Ambassador Faith Whittlesey in the White House. And one of my proudest days in office was when I appointed Sandra Day O'Connor to be the first woman in history on the United States Supreme Court.

You know, I have to -- I just have to pause here and say that we've heard about some of the issues that the Gang of Eight are bringing up. [Laughter] Fairness is one. Well, I have to say this about our opponents: They didn't discriminate; they have been fair; they made everyone miserable.

But the broken economy hit women especially hard. The majority of elderly Americans are women, and they found their purchasing power eaten up by inflation. Working women saw taxes eat more of their paychecks. Homemakers found that double-digit inflation made it harder and harder to buy groceries and pay the bills. And the thousands of women who wanted to start their own businesses saw 21-percent prime interest rates slam shut the doors of opportunity.

And then our administration took office. And with Republicans in control of the Senate, we went to work to make a new beginning. We reduced the growth of Federal spending, pruned needless regulations, reduced personal income tax rates, and passed an historic reform called tax indexing that means government can never again use inflation to profit at the people's expense.

To help all Americans achieve economic equality we reduced the marriage tax penalty, almost doubled the maximum child care credit, increased the limits for IRA and Keogh contributions, and eliminated estate taxes on family farms and businesses for surviving spouses. But our job is not complete.

We've asked the Congress to enact legislation designed to provide women with more equitable treatment in pension benefits and IRAs, to further increase child and dependent care tax credits for low- and middle-income workers, and to enforce delinquent parent support payments.

The prime rate is only about half what it was when we took office. Inflation plummeted by three-fourths, to only about 3 percent last year. Auto sales were up 15 percent in 1983 to the highest level since 1979. Housing starts rose by a healthy 60 percent. Factory orders are up, and last month retail sales jumped 2.2 percent, the fifth straight monthly gain. And tomorrow morning, if you're out around 8:30 -- and I can't tell you any more than that -- you're going to hear some good economic news in a couple of areas.

American workers' real wages are rising, and last year 4 million Americans found jobs. With this recovery, you'll be glad to hear that the unemployment rate among adult women has dropped from 9.1 to 7.1 percent, and today more women have jobs than ever before in our nation's history.

Just as important, the jobs women hold are getting better and better. In 1983, women filled almost three-quarters of all the new jobs in managerial, professional, and technical fields. And the number of women-owned businesses is growing four times faster than those owned by men.

I believe that we must also move boldly to develop the potential of space, while preserving our resources here on Earth -- our land, water, and air. And let us preserve our other resources which are just as precious -- our values of faith, family, work, neighborhood, peace, and freedom, which make us a good and loving people.

Just as we're regaining our confidence at home, we're bringing a new sense of purpose and direction to American foreign policy. Today the world knows once again that America stands for freedom for humankind. Around the world we're working hard to support democracy and to build peace.

And that brings me to our relationship with the Soviet Union. We know it isn't what we want it to be. Time and again in public statements and in private communications to the Soviet leadership I've stressed our commitment to a serious and intensive dialog, one aimed at building a more constructive relationship, avoiding war, and reducing arms as a starting point. But we want to accomplish much more, and for that we need a good-faith effort on both sides. That's the message Vice President Bush carried to Moscow earlier this week.

Let me share with you the Vice President's impressions of the new Soviet leadership that he passed to me following his meeting in the Kremlin. The atmosphere was positive. Although Secretary Chernenko did not depart from standard Soviet positions, he did appear ready to put our relationship on a more constructive basis. Vice President Bush and I have the impression that the new Soviet leadership is making an effort to downplay rhetoric and to explore ways to promote a more useful dialog.

America has always been willing to meet the Soviets halfway to find solutions to the many problems that divide us and to reach fair arms reduction agreements. If the new Soviet leadership decides to join us in a good faith effort we can accomplish much good together, and there's no better time to start than right now. If the Soviet Government wants peace, then there will be peace.

And finally, let me say a few words about recent events in Lebanon. We all know the peace process has been painfully slow, but we must continue to search for peace and stability in that deeply troubled country as long as there is the slightest chance to bring it about. You need only see the pain and suffering in the eyes of the Lebanese people, and particularly the children, to understand that we have a moral obligation not to abandon those people.

In recent weeks I have become increasingly concerned about the situation there. Should the various Lebanese factions fail to establish a basis for reconciliation, it would only encourage the radicals and extremists and put the Lebanese people in even more danger. And this would be more dangerous for the whole world.

The presence of the multinational force, the MNF, must never be an excuse for the Syrians and their clients to avoid a negotiated solution and reconciliation. So to use our diplomatic and military resources to the best advantage, and after consultation with President Gemayel, we have decided to shift our forces to an offshore deployment.

The recent outbreak of violence only reaffirms the importance of the actions that we're taking. If a moderate government were overthrown because it had the courage to turn in the direction of peace, imagine the consequences for the future. We will remain steady. We will pursue every avenue in the search for peace and stability in that troubled region.

All of us share a dream of America as a great force for peace and goodwill among nations. And all of us share Susan B. Anthony's dream of America as a land where every citizen is judged not according to color or sex, but on the sole basis of individual merit; a land where every woman and man is free to become all they can be. I believe that, under God, we're making that great dream come true.

Brotherhood/Sisterhood Week furthers our awareness of the universal nature of the human experience. In promoting the spirit of brotherhood among the people of our nation, we strengthen our respect for the rich diversity of our country. By focusing on the importance of the dignity of the individual, we acknowledge the bonds of birth, hope, and freedom that gave meaning to our way of life.

In reaching out in brotherhood to our fellow citizens, we help stem the tide of historic challenges to mankind's advancement -- starvation, disease, poverty, and war. Recognizing the precariousness of man's life on this planet, we strive to undergird the work of men and women of goodwill to bring about a world built upon the true values of fellowship and mutual respect.

I once learned that you're never supposed to open any remarks with an apology, but I must, because I am the reason for -- of being delayed a little bit and it was late coming here. And I have to explain the reason I was late. I was getting connected to Yugoslavia so that I could congratulate on behalf of all Americans Scott Hamilton for winning the gold.

But I'm delighted to welcome you here. And it's good to see so many friends and to have a chance to make some new ones. I want to thank all of you for what you're doing to advance the goals and ideals that unite us. It's you, the officeholders in State capitals and communities all across America, who are putting our beliefs into practice.

Washington. The only magicians are on the other end of Pennsylvania Avenue -- sleight-of-hand artists who have a way of taking your tax dollars and making them disappear. [Laughter] But it's your drive, energy, and determination that make the difference. And that's why America's future is looking better every day.

Maureen did a little research for me, and I know that even before women had the right to vote, our party became the first to elect a woman to the United States Congress. Well, that's the Republican Party tradition, and I'm determined to build on it. The only women in the Senate, Nancy Kassebaum and Paula Hawkins, are Republicans, not to mention our nine outstanding Republican Congresswomen. Now, don't you think it's about time we gave them some more company?

We're calling on the talents and leadership of women in a big way. For the first time in history, three women are in the Cabinet at the same time -- Ambassador Jeane Kirkpatrick, Secretary of Health and Human Services Margaret Heckler, and Secretary of Transportation Elizabeth Dole.

And all told, more than a thousand women hold policymaking posts in our administration. And one of my proudest days was when Sandra Day O'Connor became the first woman justice in the history of the Supreme Court. In counting the votes sometimes and some of the issues in these last 3 years, I've had reason to cheer her being there.

But just as important, thousands of able Republican women like you are serving on the frontlines in public offices all across America. We want to see the number of Republican women officeholders growing here in Washington and in every American town and city and State.

When historians write about these years, they're going to find that very skilled and talented women played a key role in putting America back on her feet. Challenges are still before us, and together we Republicans can turn them into opportunities.

Three weeks ago in my State of the Union Address, I talked about how far we've come since those days in 1980 when we were hearing sorry excuses about some sort of malaise that the American people suffered. Well, I won't belabor the point, but have you figured out why our critics are going around the country moaning and groaning? Maybe we should speak a little louder about the one big program that is helping every man, woman, and child in America. It's called economic recovery.

By turning the economy around, we've helped everyone, and particularly women. The majority of elderly Americans are women. And double-digit inflation in 1979 and 1980 was destroying their purchasing power. Now inflation is only 3.2 percent.

Personal income tax rates have been reduced, and indexing begins next year, meaning that government can no longer profit at the taxpayer's expense. We reduced the marriage tax penalty and almost doubled the maximum child care credit. We increased the limits for IRA and Keough contributions. And we've eliminated estate taxes on family farms and businesses for surviving spouses.

From solid growth in housing -- new housing starts in January were at their highest since 1978 -- to new frontiers in high technology and from a healthy recovery in real wages to the sharpest drop in unemployment in nearly 33 years, we have good reason to be proud of what's been accomplished. For 13 months we have been putting an average of 300,000 people a month back into jobs and off the unemployment rolls.

Believe me, if we didn't control one House of the Congress, none of that could ever have been done. There's still so much to do, more to do in ensuring women's rights, providing for equitable treatment in pension benefits and IRAs, facilitating child and dependent care, and enforcing delinquent parent support payments. And we've introduced legislation in all these areas to accomplish these goals.

Unemployment is now down to 7.9 percent. The unemployment rate among adult women has dropped from 9.1 to 7.1 percent. And today more women have jobs than ever before in our nation's history. But I won't be satisfied until every American who wants a job can find a job.

We need basic budget and tax reforms like the line-item veto, a constitutional amendment mandating a balanced budget, and tax simplification, so that we can make sure the progress we're enjoying will continue for generations to come. And I believe we must also move boldly to develop the enormous potential of space while preserving our resources here on Earth -- our land, water, and air. And let us preserve our other resources which are just as precious -- our values of faith, family, work, neighborhood, peace, and freedom, the values that have made us a good and a loving people.

America's foreign policy. Back in 1981 we had an uncomfortable feeling that we'd lost respect overseas. Some questioned whether we had the will to defend peace and freedom. Well, 3 years later, the world knows once more what America stands for -- freedom, dignity, and peace for everywhere, for people from Asia to Central and South America.

And that brings me to two final points. The first has to do with the Soviet Union. For the first time in years, we're on the way to restoring a constructive dialog, one that builds stability and is so essential for peace. Time and again, in public statements and in private communications to the Soviet leadership, I've stressed our commitment to a serious and intensive dialog, one aimed at building a more constructive relationship. Avoiding war and reducing arms is the starting point.

America has always been ready to meet the Soviets halfway. To find solutions to the many problems that divide us and to reach fair arms reduction agreements. If the new Soviet leadership decides to join us in a good-faith effort, we can accomplish much good together. And there's no better time to start than right now.

Finally, let me say a few words about recent events in the Middle East. We all know the peace process has been painfully slow but we must continue to search for peace and stability as long as there's a chance to bring it about.

For the past 35 years, the United States has been working to build peace and stability in that troubled region. Most of that effort has been focused on resolving the conflict between Israel and her Arab neighbors. Lebanon's troubles are just part of the overall problem in the Middle East, and her internal strife has only made it worse. The most recent outbreak of violence reaffirms the importance of redoubling our efforts to find a peaceful solution to the fundamental problems of the region. And we're trying to do just that.

Earlier this week I met with King Hussein of Jordan and President Mubarak of Egypt. We discussed our September 1982 Middle East plan and ways to move the peace process forward -- both of them in complete agreement that this should be done, and they want to be of help. We're pursuing every avenue in the search for peace and stability.

Peace and individual betterment are universal purposes. They are at the heart of the American dream. Yet, today in Central America these goals are not realized. Poverty and violence are widespread. As a consequence, democratic forces are not able to flourish, and those who seek to disrupt freedom and opportunity threaten the heart of those nations.

We face an inescapable reality: we must come to the support of our neighbors. The democratic elements in Central America need our help. For them to overcome the problems of accumulated historical inequities and immediate armed threats will take time, effort, and resources. We must support those efforts.

As the Commission recommends, our policy must be based on the principles of democratic self-determination, economic and social improvement that fairly benefits all, and cooperation in meeting threats to the security of the region.

These resources will support agricultural development, education, health services, export promotion, land reform, housing, humanitarian relief, trade credit insurance, aid for small businesses, and other activities. Because democracy is essential to effective development, special attention will be given to increasing scholarships, leadership training, educational exchanges, and support for the growth of democratic institutions.

American Bank for Economic Integration (CABEI) made a major contribution to the region's economic growth in the 1960's and early 70's. I am proposing a substantial assistance program to revitalize these institutions and thereby stimulate intra-regional trade and economic activity.

I shall explore the creation of a Central American Development Organization (CADO). This would enable political and private leaders from both the United States and Central America to review objectives and progress, and make recommendations on the nature and levels of our assistance efforts. The organization would, in effect, help to oversee and coordinate the major efforts that must be made. The legislation I am proposing sets out a series of principles to guide the negotiations for the establishment of this new regional institution. I intend to respect those principles in these negotiations and in our subsequent participation in CADO. As the Commission recognized, the ultimate control of aid funds will always rest with the donors. Consistent with the Constitution and this precept, final disposition of funds appropriated under this legislation will be subject to the ultimate control of the Congress and the President.

The National Bipartisan Commission specifically recommends significantly increased levels of military aid to the region, especially El Salvador. In the words of the Report, ``the worst possible policy for El Salvador is to provide just enough aid to keep the war going, but too little to wage it successfully.'' I propose authorization for a $259 million supplemental appropriation for the region for fiscal year 1984 and a $256 million program for fiscal year 1985.

U.S. military assistance is vital to shield progress on human rights and democratization against violence from extremes of both left and right. I shall ensure that this assistance is provided under conditions necessary to foster human rights and political and economic development, and our Administration will consult with the Members of the Congress to make certain that our assistance is used fairly and effectively.

No new laws are needed to carry out many of the Commission's recommendations. There is, for example, a consensus on an integral part of our strategy in Central America: support for actions implementing the 21 Contadora objectives to help bring about peace. The Contadora objectives are in Central America's interest and in ours. Similarly, we are urging other nations to increase their assistance to the area.

Unless we act -- quickly, humanely, and firmly -- we shall face a crisis that is much worse for everyone concerned. We owe it to our children to make sure that our neighbors have a chance to live decent lives in freedom.

States Government's international activities in the fields of science and technology. As in the past, this report has been prepared by the Department of State in collaboration with other concerned agencies of the Federal government.

I would like to take this opportunity, first of all, to express again my personal regret on the passing of Congressman Clement J. Zablocki. As Chairman of the House Foreign Affairs Committee and of the Subcommittee on International Security and Scientific Affairs, Congressman Zablocki made many significant contributions to this Nation's pursuit of foreign relations spanning several administrations. None of these, however, was more important than his tireless efforts to see that science and technology play greater roles in the conduct of foreign policy. Chairman Zablocki understood well the benefits of scientific progress toward economic growth both for our Nation and others across the globe and incorporated that understanding into the Title V legislation of which he was the prime architect. On behalf of the people of the United States, I want to express the gratitude of the Nation for his many years of distinguished service.

States. Political liberty and free enterprise provide a fertile environment to American scientists and engineers who have given us a standard of living unequaled in the history of the world. We are certain that science and technology offer similar hope to all nations committed to the pursuit of realistic and sustained economic development. The United States has increasingly made cooperative scientific and technological arrangements important to our developmental assistance efforts to Third World countries and of strengthened bilateral relations with other industrialized nations.

During 1983 we were successful in our efforts to encourage international science and technology cooperation. There were many positive developments which are set out in detail in this report. Of particular importance, though, are several of our bilateral relations. It is important to develop a strong bilateral relationship with the People's Republic of China while maintaining our friendship with the democratic nations of Asia. Broad-based science and technology agreements are a vital part of our efforts to build this relationship. The role of science and technology plays a similar role in Latin America. This is particularly true in our bilateral relations with Brazil and Mexico. I am certain that these nations attach as much importance to scientific and technology cooperation as we do. We will continue to pursue the opportunities for increased cooperation.

Perhaps the most disturbing development of 1983 in the field of science and technology has been our reluctant, but necessary, decision to give notice of our intent to withdraw from participation in UNESCO. Our persistent efforts over the past three years to convince the UNESCO bureaucracy in Paris to address the Agency's serious problems of administrative and fiscal mismanagement and to reorient its direction to pursue once again only the mission envisioned in its charter have failed. We see no viable option but to sever our ties with this Agency if its overt hostility to American values and its increasing substantive impotence and procedural abuse are not satisfactorily corrected. We will strive to minimize any significant adverse effect on beneficial science and technology activities at UNESCO by making alternative arrangements for U.S. participation in such programs.

Our scientific and technological relations with the Soviet Union and Poland have been adversely affected by disappointing Soviet attitudes and actions. In our Title V Report for 1982, I made it clear that cooperation depends upon the steps the Soviet Government takes to comply with recognized norms of international behavior. Soviet behavior still falls far short of this standard, and our position remains unchanged. We will continue to carefully observe Soviet behavior and adjust our science and technology cooperation accordingly.

In the overall international arena, we can be proud of our scientific leadership. It can go a long way in helping the cause of freedom and economic growth around the world. The international programs described in this report benefit our Nation and our cooperative partners, and are a source of good will around the world.

Section 1. Establishment. There is established the President's Advisory Committee on Mediation and Conciliation. The Committee shall be composed of not more than twelve members who shall be appointed or designated by the President from among persons with special knowledge and familiarity with labor relations problems. The Director of the Federal Mediation and Conciliation Service is hereby designated as Chairman of the Advisory Committee.

Mediation and Conciliation Service on methods of improving the efficiency of arbitration of disputes arising under collective bargaining agreements, and on other matters, not involving particular labor disputes, of general significance to strengthening and increasing the effectiveness of bilateral dispute resolution mechanisms under such agreements.

Committee. However, members appointed from among private citizens of the United States may be allowed travel expenses, including per diem in lieu of subsistence, as authorized by law for persons serving intermittently in the government service (5 U.S.C. 5701 - 5707).

Sec. 4. General. (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of any other Executive Order, the responsibilities of the President under the Federal Advisory Committee Act, as amended, except that of reporting annually to the Congress, which are applicable to the Committee established by this Order, shall be performed by the Director of the Federal Mediation and Conciliation Service, in accordance with guidelines and procedures established by the Administrator of General Services.

Shouldn't we have the right as citizens of this great country to walk our streets without being afraid and to go to bed without worrying the next sound might be a burglar or a rapist? Of course we should. But in reality we don't. The sad fact is too many of our friends and loved ones live in fear of crime. And there's no mystery as to why. For too many years, the scales of criminal justice were tilted toward protecting rights of criminals. Those in charge forgot or just plain didn't care about protecting your rights -- the rights of law-abiding citizens.

We came to Washington determined to change that by restoring the proper balance to our criminal justice system and by assisting all of you who, through Neighborhood Watch-type programs, are trying to protect life, property, and security in your communities.

Common sense is beginning to pay off. In 1982 the crime rate dropped by 4.3 percent -- the biggest decline since 1972. But we still face a tremendous challenge, and meeting that challenge is what I want to talk to you about today.

Since drugs are related to an enormous amount of violent crime, drug trafficking and organized crime are among our major targets. For the first time in this nation's history, we've thrown the resources of the FBI into drug enforcement. A new border interdiction program is underway.

In fact, since our administration came into office, the number of drug-related convictions has increased 33 percent. Since 1981 the number of enforcement agents, prosecutors, and the amount of funding and Federal cooperation with State and local agencies have all greatly increased. Even the military is providing assistance in the fight against drug traffickers. But we still need to do more. We need new laws to stop drug traffickers from harming our people, especially our young people. And we need tougher laws to fight other forms of crime so we can make the lives of all Americans more secure.

This issue should never turn into a prolonged partisan struggle, but it has. The Senate recently passed overwhelmingly our Comprehensive Crime Control Act. The House has done nothing and continues to wait. But wait for what? Bottling up long-overdue reforms that would provide you, the people, greater protection against dangerous criminals is a serious mistake you should not tolerate.

Let me give you some examples of what's at stake here. One of our bill's reforms would create tougher laws permitting Federal prosecutors to seize the profits and assets of organized crime and drug traffickers. This would be a severe blow to the crime czars. Why should any right-minded person oppose it?

Another reform, involving the so-called exclusionary rule, would allow evidence obtained reasonably and in good faith to be used in a criminal trial. How many times have we seen law enforcement officers handcuffed by the maze of technicalities that make collection and presentation of evidence so difficult?

Except in capital cases, Federal courts cannot consider the danger a defendant may pose to others if released. The judge can only consider whether it's likely the defendant will appear for trial if granted bail. Recently, a man charged with armed robbery and suspected of four others was given a low bond and quickly released. Four days later he and a companion robbed a bank, and in the course of the robbery a policeman was shot. This kind of outrage happens again and again, and it must be stopped. So, we want to permit judges to deny bail and lock up defendants who the government has shown pose a grave danger to their communities.

Independently of our crime package, we're mounting a major effort to combat crimes such as sexual assault and family violence. We're also working hard to improve the justice system treatment of our fellow citizens who were the innocent victims of crime.

These reforms make good sense, and there's no excuse for not passing them. The liberal approach of coddling criminals didn't work and never will. Nothing in our Constitution gives dangerous criminals a right to prey on innocent, law-abiding people. I would hope the Members of the House could remember this and bring up our bill for consideration without further delay. This is the most comprehensive anti-crime legislation in more than a decade. In the interest of true justice and in recognition of this past week, National Crime Prevention Week, it deserves full debate and a vote.

Q. Mr. President, this year Yugoslavia is host of the winter Olympic games and the United States of the summer Olympics. We are looking forward to it as an opportunity for strengthening of friendships and understanding among youth of the world. Children in Yugoslav schools even sent a message to the world leaders asking them to stop all wars in Olympic year as was the case in ancient Greece. How important are in today's world such events as Olympic games?

The President. I believe that the Olympic games show the human race at its best. We judge the best athletes in the world according to standards of excellence and sportsmanship, not political and economic doctrine, race, or religion. The Olympics show us what we can achieve when we agree on our goals and pursue them in a spirit of cooperation and understanding. Leaders in government have an obligation to strive for cooperation every bit as hard as our athletes who reach within for the greatest efforts of their lives. Together we should build a safer and far better world for the human family, not just for today but for generations to come. The United States has no higher priority than peace, as exemplified by the Olympic spirit.

The President. As I told President Spiljak during his visit to the United States earlier this month, we greatly admire the effort and care that went into the preparation of the Olympic games in Sarajevo. Athletes, visitors, and Olympic officials have commented that they have never seen a better organized Olympics, and the hospitality of the people of Sarajevo is unsurpassed.

Olympic Organizing Committee has spared no effort to offer the world's Olympic athletes and visitors to the games the best possible facilities. All Americans are anxious to welcome the people of the world with the same warm hospitality that was extended to our athletes in Sarajevo.

The President. In ancient Greece, the Olympic games were a celebration of human excellence, not of nation states or political systems. That is the great tradition that has brought about the popularity of the modern Olympic movement. We must do everything we can to honor that tradition.

The President. The Olympic events I have seen on TV have been exciting and inspirational. The competition is fierce and requires great stamina, spirit, and skill. Obviously, we cheer for the men and women on our respective teams. But we can and should celebrate the triumphs of all athletes who compete in the true spirit of sportsmanship and give the very best of themselves. So, while we were thrilled at the victories of our American skiers, we cheered with you when Jure Franko skied to a silver medal in the men's giant slalom. It's been a great event.

Princess Grace was a woman of great beauty -- one of the greatest beauties of our time. Yet she possessed not only outward beauty but inward character, sincerity, strength of purpose, and loving kindness. Throughout her life Princess Grace had a passion for the performing arts. As a young woman she became an actress, and no one will ever forget Grace Kelly in ``Rear Window'' or ``High Society.'' As a princess, she constantly worked to support the arts in her own Monaco and in America. And now it falls on us to carry on her work.

The Princess Grace Foundation will dedicate itself to the encouragement of emerging artists, the young performers who need support to succeed in their work. The foundation will concentrate on two of the fields that the Princess loved best -- the theater and the dance. And the foundation will conduct its work with the same dignity and commitment to excellence that were so characteristic of Princess Grace.

Princess Grace once said that ``each individual always has opportunities to do good and, in doing good, to repay the kindness of God who gives us life.'' So, Princess Grace led her life doing good, spreading joy, uplifting the spirits of so many, and now it's our turn to follow her example. And I just have to believe that by establishing this foundation we, in our small way, will be thanking God for giving us Princess Grace.

The Prince. Thank you, Mr. President. Allow me to express to you and to Mrs. Reagan, not only in my name but also in the name of my children, our deep gratitude and true appreciation for your presence here tonight.

We are all gathered here to continue what Grace had begun and do all we possibly can to turn her wish into reality. Many of us know how deeply and genuinely concerned she was in the support and help to emerging young artistic talent. It is certainly wonderful that her many friends and loved ones are here not only to witness but also to take part in this inauguration of the Princess Grace Foundation.

None better than you all can feel and know how important it is for the foundation to continue the legacy of the patronage of the arts that Grace set herself to assure with such care and heart. Most of you share in Grace's great passion for the theater and dance, and your presence here this evening demonstrates to me and to the world that her commitment to the arts will be continued.

Grace's two great loves were her family and the artistic world that beckoned her from an early age. Her personal endeavors as an artist not only taught her great appreciation of the art but also imbued her in an empathy for the tremendous dedication all artists make to bring light, love, music, and laughter into the world.

This is not just another gala evening, but because it is gratified by your presence, Mr. President, on the occasion of this inauguration, it is an evening to remember. The launching of the Princess Grace Foundation has most certainly a special significance for us all. As of now, we and all those who wish to can actively take part in the fostering of new talents in this country who will one day thrill the world with their art and skill.

As Grace is the inspiration for this great impulse, so the foundation will be the inspiration for countless people who may otherwise be prevented from sharing their talents with those who love theater and dance. It will strive to maintain the same commitment to beauty and excellence that are the hallmarks of Grace's life.

The foundation created in her name has a mission: to encourage and assist aspiring young artists in the fields of theater and dance. To fulfill that mission, the Princess Grace Foundation will provide scholarships and awards to outstanding young theater and dance students or professionals. And, of course, as time goes by, other ways and means of helping and encouraging talents may be discovered to fulfill the mission of this foundation.

Grace Foundation, confident as I am that it will achieve its goals. For you, Grace's friends and admirers, I express my most sincere gratitude for your unswerving support and the honor you bring to her name.

The President. Thank you very much, Governor Terry Branstad, and members of the Iowa delegation, and my old friend, the conscience of the Congress, H.R. Gross. Thank you all for your very warm welcome.

And may I say it's a tonic to be in this beautiful place. And if I can remember the way we used to do the call letters, ``Where the West begins in the State where the tall corn grows.'' And it's good to be back with hard-working people who share an abiding love for God and family. You don't listen to the worldly cynics; you're too busy making America's future better.

Democratic Presidential candidates. [Laughter] You know, I'm a little curious about some of the things those fellows have been saying. Now, correct me if I'm wrong, because you're closer to the situation than I am. But aren't these people who talk so much about fairness for all Americans the same ones who can't see you unless you belong to a special interest group? And don't you get a little nervous when those born-again budget balancers tell us there's only one way to reduce deficits, and it begins with raising your taxes?

But let's be fair. This is one area where all our liberal friends are willing to cut spending. There is one area. They'll cut what America needs to protect her national security. Oh, they say they're for a strong national defense. But ask them if we should build the B - 1 bomber or the MX missile or the Trident submarine or the cruise missile or the aircraft carriers or the M - 1 tank or rebuild the battleship Iowa -- but that's another story.

I don't know how they feel about slingshots -- [laughter] -- but I do know that with them in control our defenses would still be growing weaker. Oh, troops would have landed in Grenada all right; they just wouldn't have been American troops.

The Grenadians wouldn't have been applauding, and our American students might not have been saved. You know, I'm going to interrupt right here, because -- I wasn't going to tell you this, but I have to.

One of our young men, a lieutenant in the Marine Corps, pilots a Cobra, was in Grenada, and then he went on to Beirut. And this young lieutenant wrote back to the Armed Forces Journal at the Pentagon. And he said that in every story about Grenada, in every paper, he read in every one of them the same line: Grenada produces more nutmeg than any other spot on Earth. And he had come to the conclusion that that was being repeated so often, it was a code. And so he wrote back to say he had broken the code.

We removed that grain embargo and began rebuilding America's defenses. And now we're doing our best to help farmers work their way back, strengthen their prices, increase their exports, and regain their reputation as reliable suppliers.

The first truth is the old reliable: People who live in glass houses should never throw stones. Or, to put it another way: The liberals who had total control over government but who saddled America with double-digit inflation, record interest rates, huge tax increases, too much regulation, credit controls, farm embargoes, no growth at home, weakness abroad, and phony excuses about you having a malaise are the last people who should be giving sermonettes about fairness and compassion.

Now, I have to say there was one thing fair about their policies. They didn't discriminate; they made everybody miserable. And now these critics say that we can do nothing right. The spending and tax cuts were too big, all their special interests have been hurt, and the recovery can't last. If pessimism was an Olympic event, they'd win a gold medal for sure.

Those words were spoken by President Franklin Delano Roosevelt in the fall of 1934 -- which brings me to the second truth we must tell between now and November: America is better off today than we were 3 years ago. We're better off because we're through placing faith in more government programs. We're restoring our faith in the greatest resource this nation has -- the mighty spirit of free people under God.

It was you at the grassroots who reminded Washington that we are a government of and by and for the people, not the other way around. And it was you who said it is time to put earnings back in the hands of the people, time to put trust back in the hands of the people, time to put America back in the hands of the people.

And that's why America is moving forward with confidence again. We're seeing a new dawn of hope for our people. As the psalm says, ``Weeping may endure for a night, but joy cometh in the morning.'' We're still not where we want to be, but look how far we've come. We don't have 12\1/2\-percent inflation anymore; inflation is less than 4 percent and has been for 2 years. We don't have interest rates over 21 percent; the prime rate is now down to 11. We don't have taxes doubling in 5 years; we cut everyone's tax rates. And next year, your taxes will be indexed so that government can no longer use inflation to profit at your expense. And we eliminated estate taxes for spouses, so that Iowa families won't have to sell the family farm just to pay the government a tax.

But if the dream of America is to be preserved, we must not waste the genius of one mind, the strength of one body, or the spirit of one soul. We need all our people -- men and women, young and old, individuals of every race -- to be healthy, happy, and whole. And I assure your fine Governor and all of you here today, we must not and will not be satisfied until every person who wants to work can find work. This is our goal. And for each of the last 13 months, an average of 300,000 people a month have found jobs here in this land of ours.

Recovery in the farm community has been more difficult. The worldwide recession, large crops in other countries, last summer's drought, East-West tensions, and unfair trade practices have all contributed to cash flow problems for our producers, and they've made it harder for us to correct the legacy of the past. But make no mistake: We are working our way back from despair to hope.

We said we would lift the grain embargo, and we did. We said we would help restore the reputation of American farmers as reliable suppliers, and we negotiated a new long-term grain agreement with the Soviets. We promised to lift the burden of surpluses off the back of agriculture, and most surpluses have been cut. Prices are still too low, but they're stronger than they were, and this year farm costs will decline.

As proof of our commitment to expand exports, I recently approved a $1 billion increase for agricultural export credit guarantees in fiscal year 1984. The new total of $4 billion is almost twice what the previous administration made available in any year.

Economic Committee hearings on the next generation of agricultural policy were among the most important ever held in Congress. He's been a leader in controlling government spending and reducing taxes. He doesn't leave any doubt that he's Iowa's Senator. And if all of us work together, Roger Jepsen will be reelected as Iowa's Senator.

He serves his district well. He's been a strong voice in both his committees, and he's carried on the great Republican tradition begun by Senator Grassley before you elected to send Chuck to the Senate. These men, along with your other Iowa Republicans -- Jim Leach, who is with us today, and Tom Tauke, who will join me in Des Moines -- make an important contribution to the country.

We had a plan to rescue this nation in 1980, and that plan is working. Now it's time to take freedom's next step, to make sure that the progress that we've made will continue -- not just through the next election, but through the next generation. And once again we're the ones with the clear idea of what must be done. In the coming months we must build a great coalition of Republicans, Independents, and disenchanted Democrats around our bold vision of an opportunity society for the future.

Their first promise begins with taking back all the tax reductions that we were able to pass with your help. They're captives of an anti-growth, dinosaur mentality that offers nothing for the future but repeating their failures of the past. For 44 of the last 50 years they controlled both Houses of Congress. They gave us annual deficits and a national debt of nearly a trillion dollars. But far from objecting then, they said this was good for us. Well, big government wasn't good for us then, and it isn't good for us now.

We have a positive vision of our citizens and our country: America moving confidently forward, her people united by shared values of faith and, as the Governor said, family and work and neighborhood and peace and freedom. We seek to bring out the best in every person, because we know every man and woman carries the spark of greatness.

As an opportunity society begins, it begins with growth, and we know how to create it. Our tax incentives spurred this recovery, but tax increases can destroy it. We are on the side of the little taxpayers, not the big tax spenders. I consider stopping them from taking more of your earnings an economic responsibility and a moral obligation. If the big spenders get their way, they'll charge everything on your taxpayer's express card and, believe me, they never leave home without it.

We also seek a line-item veto to prevent pork barrel projects from passing just because they're attached as amendments to important legislation. And if this Congress won't pass these reforms -- and I'm excepting present company -- then let's elect men and women who will.

Greater growth will also come from simplifying the tax code. We want to make the tax system more fair and easier to understand. And we want you to have the incentives of personal tax rates coming down, not going up. Along with these reforms, we will encourage growth by continuing to modernize our industries, expand our import markets -- or export markets, I should say, and develop the new frontiers of high technology and space.

And here, too, we're the ones with courage to call for basic reforms. Overall spending on education soared by 600 percent over two decades, but the test scores -- the SAT scores -- went down, down, down. So, what do our critics want? More money for more programs. What America's schools really need are tougher standards, more homework, more discipline, merit pay for teachers, and our parents finally in charge.

Now there's one other reform that I hope you'll help us on -- an amendment making it clear that the God who loves us be welcomed back into our children's classrooms. [Applause] I thank you, because as far as I'm concerned, He never should have been expelled in the first place. And just maybe, just maybe, speaking for nationwide, if we can get God and discipline back in our schools, we could get drugs and violence out.

An opportunity society, reaching for its future with confidence, sustained by faith, fair play, and a conviction that good and courageous people will flourish when they're free -- this is our vision of a strong and prosperous America, at peace with itself and the world.

We must go beyond the control of nuclear weapons to actual reductions. And my dream is to see a day when nuclear weapons will be banished from the Earth all together. We remain flexible in our bargaining. I've repeatedly stressed this to the Soviets, and we're beginning to see some positive signs. But I must make one thing plain: As Commander in Chief, I have an obligation to protect this country, and I will never allow political expediency to influence these crucial negotiations.

I urge you: Take our message, the Republican message, to the people. Remind them where we were, what we've done, and how far, together, we can still go. You -- you have always been our greatest strength. You made the difference before; you can do it now. With your talent, your drive, and your heart, we can make history again. We can make 1984 the next great wave of a Republican renaissance. And in doing that, we can make our beloved country the source of all the dreams and opportunities she was placed on this good Earth to provide. We need only to believe in each other and in the God who has so blessed our land.

The President. Oh, my goodness. [Laughter] There are so many. It's like a film montage there of everything, the various events and the -- I remember probably one outstanding occasion -- the microphone of that kind -- out at Birdland Park, and they were having the Olympic tryouts out there, the AAU tryouts for the Olympic team. And we were feeding network -- going to feed the NBC network, and that was really tops. We had half an hour to fill. And some of the Olympic officials got in an argument, and I was on the air for 30 minutes, nationwide -- [laughter] -- and they did not run off one single swimming event.

I think I described every drop of water in the pool -- [laughter] -- everyone that was warming up, and what they were doing, and talking about, what events were going to be held. Went off the air and 2 minutes after we were off the air, they had the first event.

The President. [Laughing] Yes. It was -- you sat -- there was a window here. Curly Waddel was the operator, sat on that side with the headphones, and he would type and slip it under the window to me. And they used to keep track -- because there'd be seven or eight stations competing and broadcasting, and most of them live, right at the park -- and we were within half a pitch of right up with the live ballgame all the time.

Under the Fair Trade Practices Act back in the those depression days, radio was not allowed to do news, because it would be unfair. They thought that you could just go and put it in a microphone instead of having to have it put in print and out on the streets. And B.J. Palmer, who was then the head of the central broadcasting, decided that he was going to challenge that and we were going to have news. And only one news service would provide us with a newswire. And Charlie was the whole news department, including the writing and rewriting of the stories. And we went on the air with news, and it was a first in radio. It became a daily twice-a-day feature for his news.

Congress. It was no surprise to those of us that knew him that he would be known as the conscience of the Congress, that his colleagues would go to him because they knew he had read the bills, and they'd go to him before they voted to find out.

The President. Yes -- the chill wind coming in through the end of the stadium -- we didn't have a stadium, we had bleachers. [Laughter] And I did it for about the 15 minutes and made that winning touchdown. One thing I did put in. As a running guard, coming out and around and leading the interference -- on that play, that day, Eureka College, I missed my man, the first man in the secondary. And I don't know how Bud Cole got by and reversed the field, because I missed him. In the broadcast, I nailed him. [Laughter] It was a magnificent block -- [laughter] -- key to the whole success of the play.

President, obviously we're just thrilled and happy to have you here to reminisce about the old -- let me ask you one question, from sportscaster to sportscaster -- would you have stayed a sportscaster if the telegram had not come from Warner Brothers, do you think?

The President. Well, I don't think anything that I say has been said by any of the eight other candidates who've been running around the State. [Laughter] I might have a little different twist on things than that. But I'm going to talk about this recovery that we have going and what I think is needed to keep it going.

I thought that I was painting a word picture. If I was in the stadium over at University of Iowa broadcasting an Iowa football game, I always tried to use references like saying not just that they're on the 20-yard line, 15 yards in from the side of the field; I would say, ``They're down here to the right on their own 20-yard line, 15 yards in from this side of the field'' or place them. I always figured that he -- that viewer out there -- he or she must be able to get a picture in their minds of what it looked like.

Moines. Melba King, then a nursing student, was accosted on a sidewalk by a robber who grabbed her purse and suitcase. The President, then a sportscaster for WHO Radio, saw the attempted robbery from his second floor apartment. He pointed an automatic pistol at the would-be robber, who dropped the purse and suitcase and fled. The President then escorted Melba to the nursing school.

On the way from the airport to here, I stopped and was on the air on WHO Radio. And if I don't get going on the remarks I'd intended to make, you're going to have a warm nostalgic bath, because I am being carried away by nostalgia.

I know and appreciate the people of Iowa. I know and respect your values, your love of God and family, your belief in the dignity of work, and your honest patriotism. I learned about this when I lived and worked here many years ago. And during that time I came to know and work with an Iowan who was destined to one day be called ``the conscience of the United States Congress.'' His name was H.R. Gross. And long before either of us had any thought of a political career, H.R. and I worked at WHO Radio. And that was where I had, among other things, some lessons in the words -- or in the economy of words.

Well, in the coming election the political rhetoric is going to be pretty thick. You've had about a year of it already. Our biggest challenge as Republicans is to focus public attention on what is behind the words and promises and not get lost in the excess words.

Yes, we Republicans make promises, but not to special interest groups to be paid from the public treasury and not promises that cancel each other out, because if you keep one promise to one group you'll have to break the promise you made to another group.

Four years ago, the inflation monster was loose in this land, mangling the middle class, destroying the value of the lifelong savings of older Americans, and hitting the poor and minorities hard. A family on a fixed income of $10,000 at the beginning of 1979, by the end of 1980, he had lost $2,000 in purchasing power just because of that inflation. The experts were telling us it would take a decade to wring inflation out of the economy.

We promised to put that monster back in a cage, and that's just what we've done. We took runaway, double-digit inflation and brought it down to less than 4 percent last year, and it's been that way for 2 years now.

We have cut that more than half. To pay for that Federal growth, the tax system we inherited was siphoning off an ever-increasing share of the people's money. The Federal tax take doubled just between 1976 and 1981.

We promised an across-the-board tax rate reduction. And that's exactly what we provided. We're also indexing tax rates beginning in 1985, so that government will no longer be able to make a profit from inflation at the people's expense.

And there's one tax reform of which I'm particularly proud. The inheritance tax had gotten to the point where it was destroying the right of hard-working people to pass their family farm or family business to their children or their widows. We were restoring that right by increasing the inheritance tax exemption for the children and eliminating it altogether for surviving spouses. As far as I'm concerned, we should never have been taxing widows like that in the first place.

Now, we also inherited economic stagnation. Productivity was actually falling. Major industries were just hanging on with little hope in sight. We promised to turn this situation around, to reinvigorate the economy and get America moving again.

It's taken time to put our program in place and for it to take hold. And, my, aren't we happy we stuck to our guns? This year no Republican should hesitate asking people if they're better off than they were 4 years ago.

We're in the first phase of a recovery that has astounded the experts. The gross national product was up a healthy 6.2 percent last year. Unemployment is dropping sharply. Retail sales are soaring. Housing starts and auto sales are up. Last month, new housing starts were at the highest level since 1978. Productivity, after falling in the 2 years before we took office, rose 3\1/2\ percent last year. Venture capital, which was under a billion dollars in 1980, was $4 billion last year. Because of progress in controlling inflation and our tax cuts, real take-home pay has been rising during the past 2 years after having dropped significantly in the 4 previous years.

By creating more jobs and providing all Americans with more opportunity, we're going to benefit everyone. And those who suggest that somehow our policies are unfair are the same ones who gave this country economic stagnation and ruinous inflation. The only thing fair about their program was that they didn't discriminate; they made everybody miserable.

Listen carefully when you hear screeching accusations about fairness. Just below the surface, you'll hear an appeal to greed and envy totally inconsistent with the American spirit. I predict when given the chance, the American people will choose opportunity and economic growth over greed and envy any day of the week.

One regulation being promoted is a domestic content law, which would be interpreted by our trading partners in Japan and Europe as another restriction on international commerce. This is just the kind of tinkering that can backfire on the American farmer. We should be trying to open up markets and stimulate trade between nations, not protect special interests by throwing monkey wrenches into the works.

How many of you can remember the howls of anguish from the liberals when one of my first acts as President was to decontrol the price of oil? They ranted and raved that the consumer would be taken to the cleaners. Well, instead, by freeing the market, we unleashed a stampede of exploration. Production went up, contributing to a developing world glut of oil, and today the price of oil and gas at the pump is lower than it was 3 years ago.

Over these last 3 years we've proven that we can be trusted to keep our word. Now, we must let it be known that we're not expecting people to vote for us because of what we've done, but for what we will do. We, as Republicans, have a bold vision for the future, and unlike our opposition, it's not based on increasing government taxing, spending, regulating, or inflating. Real progress comes not from expanding the power of government, but, instead, in increasing freedom and opportunity.

Nowhere is this more clear than in one of America's biggest industries -- agriculture. I don't have to tell you how the inflationary spiral and economic uncertainty of the last decade devastated the American farmer. The interest rates, the incredible rise in the cost of doing business, and the high taxes were bad enough. Then, to add insult to injury, your own government cut your legs out from under you by making you bear the full burden of a grain embargo against the Soviet Union.

Well, during the 1980 campaign, we promised to end that ill-conceived embargo. And that's another promise we kept. We went one step further. We negotiated a new long-term grain agreement with the Soviet Union that requires the Soviets to buy 50 percent more U.S. grain than they did under the old agreement.

Sometimes progress comes step by step. But we've been doing our best to open new markets for our farmers and make certain they aren't undercut by unfair competition. Given open and free markets, along with stable economic conditions at home, I have faith that our farmers can produce more, sell more, and do it more efficiently than anyone else in the world.

Creating stable economic conditions has been the reason that we've fought so hard to get spending and taxes under control these last few years. It's been one of the pivotal economic battles of our time. And I just want you to know how proud I've been to have Congressmen Evans, Tauke, and Leach at my side. All I have to ask is, send me more like them. And on election day, don't just go out and vote for them, tell your friends and neighbors to get out and vote for them, too.

Senator, Chuck Grassley. I don't have to tell you how important Republican control of the Senate has been to the progress we've made. We couldn't have done any of it without controlling that one House. Senator Jepsen has been a mighty force for responsible government and the farmers best friend in Washington. We couldn't have accomplished what we did without him. Senator Jepsen and his lovely wife, Dee, reflect all the good qualities for which the people of Iowa are so admired. And you should all be proud of the job he's doing as your United States Senator. He deserves all our support for reelection.

When you leave here, those of you who are going to your Republican caucuses, keep in mind that in a free country like ours the future will be determined not only by what we believe but by what we do. Iowans have much of which to be proud. Together, we can keep America the decent land of freedom and opportunity that God intended it to be.

American personnel abroad are targets because they represent us. America is a target because those who commit such crimes are directing their fire at our country's most basic interests, policies, and values. Ray Hunt was a target because as head of the multinational force and observers in the Sinai, he was helping to implement the peace treaty between Egypt and Israel.

There is another message here. Ray Hunt exemplified the best in America. He represented in his career the talent, dedication, and decency of so many other men and women who do their country's work abroad -- helping others, keeping the peace, serving their country.

We remember our gallant soldiers, sailors, airmen, and marines who made the supreme sacrifice throughout our history defending freedom. We owe our gratitude as well to the thousands of Americans who serve in a civilian capacity -- in the Foreign Service or as attaches or international civil servants or in other essential jobs -- because they, too, are on the frontlines. Many of them, too, have taken the risks or paid the price of being an American.

Cochairmen, and many others to take part. It's notable that nine of the Commission members are from the Congress. You can see that by looking around. They served as members and members ex officio; joined in very strongly in the discussions.

Others on the Commission, many of whom are sitting here, are representatives of business, of labor, of private voluntary organizations, the university world, and others professionally interested in our foreign policy. And they produced a thoughtful and bipartisan statement.

The last time there was a comprehensive review of our security and economic assistance programs was in 1970. I think we all know, Mr. President, that there have been profound changes since then in the world out there that we're working with. There are countries in the family of free nations today who can point to our security assistance as a key ingredient in their struggle to remain free. And we can similarly point with pride to many countries where our assistance is promoting economic development and is essential for that end.

Revolution. Still, Mr. President, as you are only too aware, threats to the security of friendly countries are around us throughout the world. Some are military in nature; others stem from their inability to meet the aspirations of their peoples. So, it is very much in the interest of the United States -- and this report emphasizes this -- to help these countries grow into free, open, and self-sustaining societies.

Mr. President, I've reviewed this report and talked with Frank and other members of the committee a great deal about it, and I commend it to you. It's the collective insight of a most knowledgeable and distinguished group of people, and its recommendations will help us design a more effective program. In fact, they already have done that. As we were working through the budget process, as you know, we had the benefit of seeing these recommendations evolving. So we will have an improved program, grounded in our national interest, and meriting the full support of the American people.

I think among the things that they call for that's especially important and welcome -- which we've been trying to do -- is to emphasize the importance of a close integration between the security assistance and security needs that we're trying to serve, the problems of economic development, and the political aspirations of the countries that we're working with. We can see that all around the world and, most notably, it sounds like a refrain of the bipartisan Kissinger commission -- the same kind of emphasis.

A number of the recommendations in this report are already being carried out. We are asking in your fiscal '85 budget -- or you are -- for more resources. We proposed some new initiatives in Africa and in the Caribbean Basin, with particular emphasis on reform in economic policy and private sector growth. We've sought greater flexibility in the terms of military assistance where circumstances warrant, and we're increasing our emphasis on training, science, and technology and institutional development. And we want to make all of this go by working with the congressional leadership in a bipartisan spirit to put across this very important program of foreign assistance.

Mr. President, finally, I'd like to thank very much Frank Carlucci, who is one of those enduring public servants. I first knew him when he was running the poverty program. I got him to come over and help me run the Office of Management and Budget. Then he worked with Cap over in HEW and had a great hand in the CIA and then in the Defense Department. And he's no sooner in the private sector when we call him back. And when you say, ``Frank, there's something important for you to do to serve your country,'' he says, ``Yes.'' And that's the kind of public servant that we really need in the private sector or public sector.

When economic misfortune creates instability or external threats endanger our friends, our response can make the difference between peaceful development or chaos and violence. And that's why we've put such emphasis on our own defense and on foreign assistance programs.

The Commission's concern regarding the significant decline in support for foreign assistance is well-founded. Our assistance program is not an end in itself. Yes, we seek to help people build better lives economically and across the whole spectrum of human needs and aspirations.

Americans can be proud of our tradition of helping others in need. Whether it be humanitarian aid in response to natural disasters, economic support for struggling countries, or security assistance to friends threatened by external aggression, America has always been there.

When conceived and administered well, assistance programs strengthen our foreign policy and enhance the security of our nation. By promoting economic development in needy countries, we bolster the vitality and security of the free world. Well-conceived assistance programs create stronger partnerships, establish mutual confidence, and make for a safer world.

So, we must work hard to provide the right balance of both economic and military assistance. The key to success, as it is with all elements of our foreign policy, rests in our ability to forge a bipartisan consensus.

This Commission has searched for reasonable ways to better use our scarce resources and to generate greater congressional and public support for foreign assistance programs. It's now up to all of us to take advantage of what the Commission has done. We will -- if we go forward in the same spirit -- strengthen our national security and offer the promise of a safer, brighter future to millions of people all over the world.

I thank all of you very much for being here and, again, I thank the Commission for their fine work. Sometimes when the going is rough and sometimes when we wonder with our own problems whether we can keep on doing this help, maybe we should all read the words again of a former Prime Minister, some years ago, of Australia. And I can't quote him exactly, although I have the quote in a drawer upstairs, but where he said he wondered if the smaller nations of the world had ever thought where they would be if it were not for this United States, so willing to come to their aid and to help wherever help was needed. And it was a beautiful tribute, delivered very sincerely, by someone saying what maybe sometimes we forget about ourselves and something that should be a great source of pride to all of us.

For some twenty years, the Federal government has provided ``seed money'' for the type of water research that would be authorized by Title I. This Federal support has produced a number of successful State water research institutes. I believe that these State institutes are now at a point where further Federal involvement in their research activities is not necessary. They can stand and continue to succeed on their own.

Moreover, the water research that S. 684 would promote can be characterized as mostly local or in some cases regional in nature. The focus of such research will of course vary from State to State because water problems and needs often differ by region. The States and private industry should be fully responsible for financing research necessary to deal with their own particular problems and needs.

If we are to truly succeed in reducing Federal spending we must sort out those responsibilities which are appropriately Federal from those which can be more effectively and fairly implemented at the State and local level.

The Congress has returned, as you know, from its recess. Important business is pending, and I'll be commenting on much of this in the weeks ahead. But tonight I want to highlight three matters at the top of the domestic agenda for the next 10 days.

First is crime. The Senate is completing its work on the most sweeping anticrime bill in more than a decade. Our legislation provides a long overdue protection to law-abiding Americans, and it would help put an end to the era of coddling criminals. The security of our people should take precedence over partisan politics, so I ask the House to stop dragging its feet and to act promptly.

Second, prayer in schools. The Senate will begin debate shortly on whether to permit voluntary prayer again in our nation's schools, our children's schools. And a huge majority of Americans favor restoring this long-cherished tradition of religious freedom. I urge the Senate to reaffirm that voluntary prayer in school is indeed a basic right of our people, and I hope the House will follow suit.

Third are deficits. It's been almost a month since I called for negotiations to reach agreement on a downpayment on the projected deficits. We've sought to schedule meetings almost every day, but Democratic representatives have begged away from all but one meeting. It's ironic that those who demanded negotiations have been so reluctant to negotiate. Be that as it may, it's time to get down to business. If we don't act soon, we'll lose another year to fruitless political posturing and legislative stalemate.

So, I'm pleased to announce they have agreed to attend their second meeting tomorrow. We'll be prepared to comment on their suggestions on defense spending. I trust they'll be prepared to answer our specific proposal for a hundred billion dollars in deficit reduction measures over the next 3 years, so that together we can get something constructive done.

Q. Mr. President, the marines you sent to Lebanon 17 months ago are now being withdrawn on your orders. Considering their inability to achieve their peacekeeping mission and the casualties they suffered, has the United States lost credibility in the region? Has Syria won? And where do we go from here?

The President. Well, in the first place, no, I don't think, first of all, that you can say we have lost as yet. I know that things don't look bright, as bright as they have at some times in this last year and a half since they've been there, but I think it's time to review a little history here and what this mission was and is.

A year and a half or so ago, we and some of our allies -- the United Kingdom, France, and Italy -- decided on this idea of a multinational force, all of us to contribute troops to go there on a stabilizing mission, not a combat mission at all. And I would like to recall what the situation was.

We went in with the idea that as they left, then the other two countries, Syria and Israel, could withdraw. Then, as a government was put in place in Lebanon -- and we helped and intended from the beginning to help them restore their military capability not only with weapons but with training and all -- that then, as Lebanon with a government was able to move out into the areas that had been occupied by Syria and Israel and where were the factions that had been part of the internecine warfare, the force put in by ourselves and the allies would have constituted behind their advance a stabilizing force there.

Now, that was the mission. We wanted to prevent a war between Syria and Israel. It was a part and brought about by our proposal for an overall peace settlement in the Middle East, where we were going to try and bring, once and for all, the Arab nations and Israel together, to do what Egypt before them had done.

Great progress was made in the first year. First of all, the PLO did leave. The Israelis did start a phased withdrawal and evidenced their intention to move back toward their own borders. Syria then reneged -- having said that it would leave -- and refused to leave, even though they were asked by the present Government of Lebanon. The first President was the brother of this present President. He was assassinated shortly after he took office, and a number of his Cabinet officials were murdered. He was elected, this President, as was his brother, under the laws of that country.

A few months ago, late summer or early fall, because of the progress -- remember the talks that had started in Geneva about broadening the base of the government, to take in those factions that had been fighting against Lebanon and bring them in to be a part of the government, so that it was broad-based and gave every element in the country representation. Those meetings went on. I think there was progress in that.

The Government of Lebanon then arrived at an agreement with Israel for peace between them and a withdrawal of Israel and protection of the northern border so that the terrorist attacks that had prompted their invasion would no longer exist. As this much success came to be, terrorist attacks began against the members of the multinational force on the part of those who don't want a peaceful settlement and who don't want a solution to the problem. And I think this is an indication of the success that this stabilizing force was having, that the efforts were made and the great tragedy took place with our marines with the suicide attack there.

Beirut, Tel Aviv, trying to help wherever we can in bringing about a peaceful settlement. I have no hesitation in saying that I have no regret of the fact that we went in there with the idea of trying to bring peace to that troubled country.

We are redeploying, because once the terrorist attacks started, there was no way that we could really contribute to the original mission by staying there as a target just hunkering down and waiting for further attacks. So, the forces have been moved, redeployed -- ours as well as others, and ours are going to be on the vessels offshore.

But as long as there's a chance for a peaceful solution, we're going to try and see if there's any contribution we can make to achieving that. And as long as that chance exists, I'm not going to give up and say, ``Well, it's all over.'' And we're not bugging out; we're just going to a little more defensible position.

Q. If I may follow up, Mr. President, you said that the terrorist attacks were a factor in the withdrawal. Does this mean that terrorist attacks like that can succeed in the Middle East and elsewhere?

The President. No, I had said that about those who urged us to simply bug out and come all the way home, and I said that that would be an admission. But I don't think that simply redeploying to a more defensible position, because terrorist attacks -- no one has still found a truly foolproof defense against these surprise attacks, particularly when the attackers are willing to give their own lives.

So, no, we're on hand. We still will have marines there defending, as is customary of the marines, defending our Embassy and our Embassy personnel there. And we have been discussing with the Gemayel forces sending some training teams in that have been specializing in things like terrorism for further training of their forces.

Q. Mr. President, on February 2, you told the Wall Street Journal that if we pulled out of Lebanon it would be disastrous results worldwide for us. And you also said you weren't going to cut and run even though there is a widespread perception that that's what we're doing. My question, sir, is, do you think we will have now disastrous results worldwide because of this pullout? And I'd like to follow up.

The President. Helen [Helen Thomas, United Press International], I don't think so, because I think that those people who make decisions and so forth, and who have to make them based on what is going on, they're not going to see this as cutting and running, because, as I say, they are on the ships and that naval task force is going to stay where it is. And so, I don't think that they're going to view this in the disastrous way that I had -- because when I was speaking then, I was talking in reply to those who were urging us to just pick up and go home without any regard to whether our allies were going to do the same thing or not. We've stayed in consultation with them. We're acting together and in sync with them.

The President. Well, that's a hypothetical that I don't know whether I could answer. If -- let me say this -- if they could improve the possibility of carrying out their mission, then, yes, that would be a reason for sending them in.

Q. Mr. President, when our marine compound was bombed, a lot of the parents of those young men said that they wondered what was the reason for the mission, and you've tried to explain the mission tonight. But can you say to those parents, now that you've withdrawn the marines to the ships, why more than 260 young men died there?

The President. Andrea, I have talked to a great many of the families, the widows, and the parents of the men who died there in that one terrible holocaust, and I have been amazed at their attitude, which was one of complete confidence that it was a worthwhile mission. And most of them based that on the letters that they were receiving from their sons and husbands, who said they believed in the mission, that they were there, that it was a worthwhile mission. And many of them expressed a pride in being there.

I'm sure that now some of the younger men that are not really aware that this is a redeployment more than a coming home thing and have been quoted as saying that they're sorry that they were not able to complete their mission. Well, I don't see their mission as being over yet. And I don't think people knowledgeable over there with what's going on see it as over yet.

Q. Well, sir, the Secretary of State has been one of those who is said to be very discouraged and has said that in Lebanon the light at the end of the tunnel can be the train coming at you. Can you tell us whether you share that discouragement? And would you accept a resignation from George Shultz, who, some people feel, has failed in this policy?

The President. No, I wouldn't. And he has not failed. And I have seen that talk, and I think it's disgraceful, frankly. I think he has done a splendid job. And I have every confidence in the world in him. And I hope he doesn't have any thoughts about leaving us at this point.

The idea for the mission happened to be mine -- sitting in the Situation Room in a meeting with all of the people that are concerned in these affairs. And he and our Ambassadors, beginning with Phil Habib, and then Bud McFarlane, and now Don Rumsfeld -- all of these have been doing a splendid job there. And we're going to continue, as I say, as long as there is a chance.

Mr. President, our policy on naval shelling has been that it's in response to attacks against our marines on the ground. Now that the marines are being withdrawn to the safety of ships, does this mean that there will be an end to U.S. shelling of Lebanon?

The President. Well, there hasn't been some shelling for quite a while. But remember, the most recent shelling was not because of attacks on the marines at the airport; it was because of shelling of our Embassy. Now, that's United States territory. And our Embassy personnel for a number of days were living in the basement. And for whatever protection that could be -- there was one direct hit on, I think it was the residence, I'm not sure whether it was that or the Embassy headquarters -- and that's what we were responding to.

But we are behaving with restraint now. We are flying reconnaissance flights, and there have been some instances of firing on them -- without result, I'm pleased to say. And we have not responded, because we think this is a time for restraint and for hoping to cool things down.

Q. Mr. President, if I may follow up. Did you say earlier -- or suggest earlier -- that there may now be some question about whether U.S. troops will be sent in to train the Gemayel government forces?

Administration Act. One will be to lift the ban on the export of Alaskan oil, allowing it to be sold to markets in the Far East. If a change in the law were to take place, it would reduce our trade deficit with Japan; it would reduce the Federal deficit by generating new revenues from increased domestic exploration and production; provide safer and cheaper transportation instead of going through the Panama Canal -- and there are many other things. Your administration has privately supported this. Will you campaign aggressively when it's being considered by Congress?

Beirut? And what's your response to the people who have suggested, a number of critics, that it takes too long for you to hear the debate between your advisers and arrive at a consensus, and who ask, therefore, whether you are in fact really running things and whether you are a fulltime President? What do you say?

The President. Well, Bill, I think -- and I've read a little of the fiction that's been going around about that, also. I can tell you, no, there was certainly thorough discussion, and for a long time, ever since the suicide bombing, as to whether there was a way in which we could keep our forces there, not only ourselves but, again, as I say, in sync with the other nations' forces and that might reduce the possibilities of and the vulnerability from terrorist attacks.

And we were looking at everything. And from the very first, one of the alternatives was putting them on the ships. We held out for a while, because -- the very thing that Helen brought up -- we were concerned that people over there might see that as leaving, as abandoning the mission, and we didn't want that.

We finally did arrive in the belief that we could do this. We talked to the Gemayel government; we talked to our allies; and we had made a decision that this looked like the most logical thing to do, a phased withdrawal to the ships, keeping our training detachment there that has been working with the Lebanese Army and all. And so, it wasn't a case of delay; it was a case of looking at the situation and wanting to make the right decision.

That's a lack of understanding of how our system has been working here. And I will admit I don't think any administration, to my knowledge, has ever exactly worked with the Cabinet and the staff the way we have.

First of all, I think we've got one of the finest staffs and one of the finest Cabinets that has been in this city in many, many years. And I want people around me who are independent-minded. I want to hear all sides of everything. We have regular Cabinet meetings and things we call the Cabinet Council meetings, where it's a portion of the Cabinet based on the particular issue where it wouldn't particularly be of interest to the others.

Now, in those meetings, I hear all sides. It could best be compared to a board of directors or a board of regents or governors of an institution other than business. And the debate rages, and it isn't just limited to one Cabinet officer who thinks that the problem is in his particular area. I hear and get the input, and the debate sometimes rages. And many times -- it's nice if you can get a consensus, that's easy -- but many times, I have to make a decision in which I come down, obviously, against some of the advocates in the Cabinet and on the side of others. But it goes back and forth. The loser this week may be the winner next week. But this is the way the decisions are made.

The only difference between a board of directors then and our Cabinet meetings is, when it comes time for decision, we don't take a vote. The decision is mine, and I make it on the basis of the information that I have heard. And if they haven't given me enough information, I make them come back again, and we talk some more.

The President.  --  -- no, it would be unseemly if I did. But they don't know what they're talking about. I have never gone upstairs from that office once that I have not carried an entire evening full of homework with me. And I could tell you about the sniping that takes place at so-called vacations, like the 4 days I spent at the ranch, one of which was a weekend day.

Q. Mr. President, are you still confident that there will not be a clash this year between borrowing by the Federal Government and borrowing by the private sector of a type that could abort the recovery? And if so, why?

The President. Well, right now, I think that I could safely say that there won't. The amount of savings has been such -- and we know about the proportion of that, the percentage that would be the government -- but there has also been an increase in profits, and a number of companies have already gone forward with modernizing and so forth out of their own earnings. And that, of course, is one of the -- over the long term that you look at -- is one of the problems that you want to solve.

I'm not underestimating deficits. I've been talking for a quarter of a century against them. I am a little struck by these born-again budget-balancers who, for 40 out of the last 44 years, have controlled both Houses of the Congress and who have religiously had a policy of deficit spending and never raised their voices about it while others tried to talk spending within our limits. And now, suddenly, they want to discover deficits. Well, I'm as determined as they are to get them down, but I'm not going to get them down the way they want them down.

Q. Sir, Walter Mondale is one of those who's attacking you on the so-called leadership issue, but he goes beyond the things that you told Bill about. He says you're intellectually lazy and you're forgetful -- so forgetful that he says you're providing leadership by amnesia. What do you say to that?

The President. I'm surprised he knew what the word meant. I haven't any comment to make at that. If that's all he has to talk about out there on the trail to his audiences, why, let him go. I'm going to be talking about the things we're doing and the things we intend to do. And what we intend to do is build for the kind of a future that this country and the people of this country have always wanted, and we're going to try to give it to them.

The President. Well, as I say, he doesn't know what he's talking about because -- I think through the process we have of discussing all issues in the Cabinet, I probably have a better store of information on the issues confronting us than a President normally has.

Q. Mr. President, you take justifiable pride in bringing the inflation rate down, but interest rates -- real interest rates haven't really come down the way you would like them to. I wonder, as you see yourself moving into the campaign season, what steps you might take, working with the Federal Reserve, so that people who are buying homes and cars can get a better rate of interest.

The President. Well, I think that the Federal Reserve right now is on a path of the money-supply increase that is consistent with a sound recovery without inflation. To go one way in excess, they could cause more inflation, and I don't think they're planning on that. They could go the other way, tighten the strings too much and interfere with the recovery, and I don't think they're going to do that.

I think that one of the reasons the interest rates have stayed where they are is still out there in the money market. After seven previous recessions since World War II in which the artificial cure has only brought on another and worse recession each time, I think they're not quite convinced yet that we mean it and that we are going to hold inflation down. And so, they're trying to guard against getting caught again by lending their money at a lower interest rate. I think as they see that we're determined to follow the course -- stay the course, if I could coin an expression -- I think that we will see a further decline in the interest rates.

Q. Last week you said the Arab-Israeli conflict must be resolved through negotiations involving an exchange of territory for peace. Were you telling Israel to reverse its settlement activity in the West Bank?

The President. No, from the very beginning -- and the Israelis know this -- I have told them that I thought with an effort that must be made out there for an overall peace in the area, that it was not helpful to go forward with what they were doing. I think that the peace process that we envision is based on the Camp David process, the U.N. Resolutions 242 and 338. And I had never referred to them as illegal, as some did. But I did say that I thought they were not helpful, because obviously the peace process, when the negotiations come between the Arab States and Israel, it is going to have to involve territorial changes in return for secure, peaceful borders. And so, no, I just think that we would've had a better chance.

Q. Mr. President, the war between Iraq and Iran is heating up in a rather perilous way, and I'd like to ask what the depth of your concerns are about the possibility that this war would lead to the closing of the Straits of Hormuz and cut off the supply of oil to Japan, Western Europe, and ourselves, and to what lengths you're prepared to go to keep the Straits open.

The President. Jerry, what you have just suggested -- Iran, itself, had voiced that threat some time ago, that if Iraq did certain things, they would close the Straits of Hormuz. And I took a stand then and made a statement that there was no way that we -- and I'm sure this is true of our allies -- could stand by and see that sealane denied to shipping, and particularly, the tankers that are so essential to Japan, to our Western allies in Europe, and, to a lesser extent, ourselves. We're not importing as much as they require. But there's no way that we could allow that channel to be closed.

The President. Yes, and on the reports that the Vice President brought back after a very fruitful meeting there. We're very hopeful in this latest announcement that he had made that he was willing to agree to onsite inspection with regard to chemical warfare. We think this is a good sign, and we have let him know that we want better relations. We want to sit down and try to resolve some of the problems that we have.

Q. Mr. President, going back to your opening statement, with your nearly $200 billion deficit budget getting such a cool response on the Hill, would you sit still for a bipartisan budget written by Congress that, one, raised taxes, and two, made a sizable cut in the defense spending?

The President. Gary, we are trying to do a bipartisan thing that they, themselves, on the other side of the aisle first suggested. And I responded in my State of the Union address to the idea of a bipartisan group getting together to go beyond the budget that we have submitted with regard to additional savings. We've put everything on the table and said we'll discuss everything with them.

I don't mind saying that my own belief is that it would be counterproductive to talk an increase in taxes. About half your deficits are created by the recession; they're cyclical. And our recovery is reducing that part of the deficit. Raising taxes doesn't reduce a deficit. Raising taxes creates more government spending.

May I give two examples? We've not only cut down the rate of increase in spending that we inherited and that we found when we came here, but no one has added up the proposed spending increases that we have denied. For example, $3 billion program to stimulate the housing industry.

When a budget resolution was passed a year ago in defiance of mine over in the House, that budget proposal contained an increase in taxes and actually contained as many increased spending ventures as the revenue would have brought in.

You don't decide to spend a certain amount of money on defense. You look at what you believe is necessary to do in order to ensure national security, and then you add up how much that's going to cost. On the other side, these attacks that are coming on the other side of the aisle on the defense spending -- incidentally, in the figure that we've submitted in this budget, we, ourselves, and the Defense Department, under the Secretary, reduced that budget by $16 billion before it was submitted by taking things out that would have been worthwhile, would have increased our security ability, but which we believed we could do without for a time and settled on this particular thing.

Now, if the Democrats in this meeting that will take place tomorrow -- and they're constantly talking cutting defense, all they talk about is cut dollars -- well, our idea is that if they've got a plan in which they can come in and say what they would eliminate in the defense budget and how much money that would then save and we could study and see what would that do to our national security, how far would it reduce it, how far would it increase the window of vulnerability that we're trying to close, that is the way you negotiate on defense.

In the last few years, before we came here, there was a 21-percent reduction in defense spending; entire weapons systems were canceled. And I think the world is a safer and more secure place, and we're further removed from a possible war by what we have done with the defense budgets that we have introduced, than we've been in a number of years.

But whenever I get a chance to speak to a group like yours, I'm tempted to talk about the one program that is helping every American -- every ethnic group and every nationality across our nation -- and it's called ``economic recovery.'' But I know that you've been spoken to by others here this morning, including Don Regan, and all, and so maybe I'd be plowing ground that's already been plowed.

But for more than a year, I would like to say, if it hasn't been said already, an average of 300,000 people a month have found jobs for the last 13 months. Inflation is staying down. Factory orders are rising. All Americans can be proud, I think, of what we've accomplished together.

And last week's news about the continuing surge in housing starts and rise in personal income indicates confidence that the recovery will be strong and sustained. And did anyone this morning tell you that as of 8:30 this morning, they announced the figures for January in the sale of durable goods and they are up substantially?

Back in the fall of 1980 I attended a rally that I will always remember. It was held in the shadow of the Statue of Liberty. And there were many nationalities and ethnic groups there, all reminding us of America's rich and diverse heritage. They reminded us that we're all descendants from immigrants, most of whom came here looking for freedom and opportunity. And while our country had its flaws -- and we still have them -- the American dream was real.

Asian and Pacific Americans have helped preserve that dream by living up to the bedrock values that make us a good and a worthy people. I'm talking about principles that begin with the sacred worth of human life, religious faith, community spirit, and the responsibility of parents and schools to be teachers of tolerance, hard work, fiscal responsibility, cooperation, and love.

It's no wonder that the median income of Asian and Pacific American families is much higher than the total American average. After all, it is values, not programs and policies, that serve as our nation's compass. They hold us on course. They point the way to a promising future. And I'm pleased that Americans of Asian and Pacific ancestry are now eligible to receive business development assistance from the Commerce Department's Minority Business Development Agency.

And when we look toward that great and grand Pacific Basin, there's a promising future there, as well. You may not hear much about our Pacific and Asian foreign policy, but then there's a lot of good news that you don't seem to hear about. [Laughter] I think some of the things we've been doing here are very well-kept secrets, and we would rather they weren't.

But our relations with our Pacific and Asian friends and allies have never been better. First of all, it's not all foreign policy; America is part of the Pacific. There's Hawaii, American Samoa, Guam, the soon-to-be commonwealth status of the Northern Mariana Islands, and our special relationship with the Federated States of Micronesia and the Republics of Palau and the Marshall Islands. These countries are America's partners.

Partnership is also the starting point for our relations in the Far East and South Asia. From Japan and the Republic of Korea in the north to the ASEAN [Association for South East Asian Nations] countries and India in the south, our partnerships are getting stronger, and mutual trust and cooperation are increasing.

I couldn't have been more pleased with the results of our trip to Japan and Korea. We're making progress on security issues and trade and financial matters. The same is true with the ASEAN countries. Prime Minister Mahathir of Malaysia and I had a very useful meeting here at the White House just last month. And I'm pleased to note that Indo-American relations are good.

And while we're strengthening our relationship with the People's Republic, we maintain very close economic and cultural ties with the people of Taiwan. In a conversation on this subject with Premier Zhao, I told him that I thought that he would be encouraged that in making new friends, we don't discard the old. We will continue to support their needs and requirements in accordance with the 1979 Taiwan Relations Act.

America needs our Asian and Pacific American citizens. You've enriched our national culture and our heritage. You've upheld the beliefs that account for so much of our economic and social progress. You've never stopped striving for excellence, despite times not long ago when you experienced terrible discrimination. And let me add that we will continue to fight against discrimination wherever there are any vestiges of it remaining, until we've removed such bigotry from our entire land.

We need your energy, your values, your hard work, and we need them expressed at the polls and within our political system. Those who escaped oppression have a special appreciation for America's freedom, and those who fled poverty cherish America's opportunity. So I urge you to get involved, stay involved, and run for public office. That is another way of helping in this land of ours.

America provides many opportunities for economic, social, and political participation. Those who participate in the political process can reap the rewards of their hard work. If you follow your hopes and aspirations, all of us will benefit.

When an American spaceship landed on the Moon, the moment represented centuries of advances in navigation and exploration. It seemed the crowning achievement of human ingenuity and courage. And today we know that that first landing on the Moon was not just a crowning achievement but a great beginning. The dream of regular space travel, the use of space to enrich life on Earth is becoming a reality, a working part of our everyday lives.

Our approach to space has three elements. First, we're determined to put a permanently manned space station into orbit and to do so within a decade. The space station will serve as a base for a wide range of scientific research and industrial work, and it will point the way to further goals.

Second, we're committed to ongoing international cooperation, long a principle of the American space program. Last year, for example, we celebrated the tricentennial of the first German immigration to America with a joint American-German space project. And such cooperation will grow in importance as more and more activities take place in space.

Third, we're doing all we can to encourage space work by American industry. Private enterprise made America great. And if our efforts in space are to show the same energy, imagination, and daring as those in our country, we must involve private enterprise to the full. And that's where today's important event comes in.

Elizabeth Dole, when I sign this Executive order, your Department of Transportation will become the Government agency with primary responsibility for expendable launched vehicles, or ELV's, the powerful rockets that carry satellites into orbit. The Executive order directs the Department to encourage, facilitate, and coordinate the development of commercial expendable launch vehicle operations by private American enterprise.

Department will clear away what Secretary Dole has called ``the thicket of clearances, licenses, and regulations that keep industrial space vehicles tethered to their pads.'' With Elizabeth and her team in charge, private enterprises interested in space won't see redtape; they'll see blue sky.

The new space industry will foster the launching of telecommunications satellites, and there satellites will expand TV coverage and improve telephone and data transmission around the world. The space industry will help us to take the first steps toward processing materials at zero gravity, and this could open dramatic new possibilities for producing alloys and crystals. And producing compounds in zero gravity could increase their purity by 5 or 10 times and drastically reduce the cost of many pharmaceuticals, an exciting new opportunity for medicine.

Perhaps most important, the new space industry will launch satellites with capabilities for remote sensing. These satellites can look down on Earth the way a plane pilot looks down on a neighborhood. They'll help us identify the sources of water and air pollution, forecast crop growth, measure and guard against insect infestation, assist in mineral exploration and land use management, and monitor weather conditions both on land and at sea -- all saving countless dollars and untold lives.

Section 1. The Department of Transportation is designated as the lead agency within the Federal government for encouraging and facilitating commercial ELV activities by the United States private sector.

Sec. 3. An interagency group, chaired by the Secretary of Transportation and composed of representatives from the Department of State, the Department of Defense, the Department of Commerce, the Federal Communications Commission, and the National Aeronautics and Space Administration, is hereby established. This group shall meet at the call of the Chair and shall advise and assist the Department of Transportation in performing its responsibilities under this Order.

Sec. 5. The powers granted to the Secretary of Transportation to encourage, facilitate and coordinate the overall ELV commercialization process shall not diminish or abrogate any statutory or operational authority exercised by any other Federal agency.

Sec. 6.  Nothing contained in this Order or in any procedures promulgated hereunder shall confer any substantive or procedural right or privilege on any person or organization, enforceable against the United States, its agencies, its officers or any person.

The Prime Minister's thoughts on the international economic situation have been most helpful. His breadth of experience in international finance as Finance Minister and as Prime Minister is matched by very few people. And I sincerely appreciate his insights on these important international issues.

Pacific, a region which should serve as a model for the rest of the world. The South Pacific is tranquil, respects human rights, and has peacefully developed democratic institutions and self-government. These accomplishments would not have been possible without New Zealand's development assistance programs.

New Zealand's contributions to stability and security extend far beyond the South Pacific. We see them as far away as the Sinai Desert and in Singapore. And we have special appreciation for, Sir Robert, your commitment to ANZUS, an alliance which has assured our mutual security in the Pacific for more than 30 years.

I might mention that our ANZUS partners, New Zealand and Australia, are our only allies who have been at our side in all four major conflicts of this century. The strong bonds between our two nations reflect our common values, shared history, and mutual interests.

We are more than good friends. And I am especially grateful to Sir Robert for his untiring efforts to further strengthen our close ties. We will stay in close touch in the future. And, Sir Robert, I thank you for coming to Washington, and on behalf of our countrymen, wish you Godspeed during your visit to America and a safe journey home.

The friendship between our countries, as you've said, goes back a long way and, through difficult times for the West, was attested to then by the warmth of your welcome and your hospitality as it has been again today.

July 1981 was the midpoint of the first year of your administration. The economic and political tasks that you had set yourself were of global significance. Among these was a determination to place greater emphasis on consultation with America's allies by being good listeners wherever possible. New Zealand is one ally which welcomed that undertaking as a renewal of the concept which lies at the heart of the ANZUS Treaty.

Mr. President, you've been as good as your word. The period of your first term has been marked by a frequency and closeness of contact which has made New Zealand, geographically your most distant security partner, feel that its voice is listened to in your administration, whether on issues of bilateral concern or wider issues affecting regional and global security. We've not had to shout to be heard.

Much of that is due to the regularity of contact at the Cabinet level between our governments, highlighted, of course, by the visit of Vice President Bush to New Zealand in May 1982. We look forward in July to seeing our good and valued friend, George Shultz, back in the South Pacific region once again.

Political visits are not the sole measure of the relationship and its durability. Rather, it's a matter of the way our citizens relate to each other as people. You've often spoken about the desires of ordinary Americans to live free, in peace and well-being. New Zealanders share that view of the world. It is why, when we've had to, we've acted together with you to preserve such values for ourselves and other peoples. That hasn't changed.

Zealanders among those fair-weather friends who are only too ready to attack American motives and policies. In an uncertain world, you need have no doubt about where the New Zealand Government and people stand. Your citizens -- private, official, and military -- remain more than welcome in our country.

Mr. President, our discussions today have touched upon New Zealand's own trade concerns, your government's aspirations at home and abroad, and the concern of many nations for a new stability in international economic affairs. Our exchanges have been characterized by the easy give and take of ideas which is the hallmark of close friends and allies.

I thank you warmly for your hospitality and that of Mrs. Reagan for my wife. The coming year brings new challenges of government and political life for both of us and our families. I wish you and the First Lady well in all that lies ahead.

From the early days of the colonies, prayer in school was practiced and revered as an important tradition. Indeed, for nearly 200 years of our nation's history, it was considered a natural expression of our religious freedom. But in 1962 the Supreme Court handed down a controversial decision prohibiting prayer in public schools.

Sometimes I can't help but feel the first amendment is being turned on its head. Because ask yourselves: Can it really be true that the first amendment can permit Nazis and Ku Klux Klansmen to march on public property, advocate the extermination of people of the Jewish faith and the subjugation of blacks, while the same amendment forbids our children from saying a prayer in school?

When a group of students at the Guilderland High School in Albany, New York, sought to use an empty classroom for voluntary prayer meetings, the 2d Circuit of Appeals said, ``No.'' The court thought it might be dangerous because students might be coerced into praying if they saw the football captain or student body president participating in prayer meetings.

Teddy Roosevelt told us, ``The American people are slow to wrath, but when their wrath is once kindled it burns like a consuming flame.'' Up to 80 percent of the American people support voluntary prayer. They understand what the Founding Fathers intended. The first amendment of the Constitution was not written to protect the people from religion; that amendment was written to protect religion from government tyranny.

Permission for such exercises for those who want them is necessary if the schools are truly to be neutral in the matter of religion. And a refusal to permit them is seen not as the realization of state neutrality, but rather as the establishment of a religion of secularism.

The Senate will soon vote on a constitutional amendment to permit voluntary vocal prayer in public schools. If two-thirds of the Senate approve, then we must convince the House leadership to permit a vote on the issue. I am confident that if the Congress passes our amendment this year, then the State legislatures will do likewise, and we'll be able to celebrate a great victory for our children.

Our amendment would ensure that no child be forced to recite a prayer. Indeed, it explicitly states this. Nor would the state be allowed to compose the words of any prayer. But the courts could not forbid our children from voluntary vocal prayer in their schools. And by reasserting their liberty of free religious expression, we will be helping our children understand the diversity of America's religious beliefs and practices.

This room is often used for state dinners honoring visiting heads of state, and it's fitting that we, too, share this room in recognition that you are also heads of sovereign States. Our Federal system of sovereign States is today as vital to the preservation of freedom as it was in the time of Jefferson and Adams and those other farsighted individuals we revere as our Founding Fathers.

They envisioned a system that would secure the greatest degree of liberty, while at the same time be functional and efficient. They knew well that if too much power and authority were vested in the central government, even if intended for a noble purpose, not only would liberty be threatened but it just wouldn't work.

Jefferson warned, ``Were we directed from Washington when to sow and when to reap, we should soon want for bread.'' [Laughter] I think during the last decade and before, we've gotten a taste of just what it was that Jefferson was warning us about. So much power had centralized in Washington that frustration and stagnation ruled the day. The Federal Government taxed away the available revenue and set up a confusing web of regulations and bureaucratic controls to be complied with in order to get these resources back. Furthermore, the rules and restrictions, to a large degree, were coming from faraway, unelected officials. This neither worked, nor was it consistent with principles of American freedom.

Over the last 3 years, we put a stop to this ever-increasing centralization of power. Through our block grant programs, through our efforts to get control of Federal spending and taxing, we've halted what I consider to be a very ominous trend. People are no longer looking to Washington to solve every problem. As a result, we're seeing a renaissance of direct involvement -- whether in the local schools or in neighborhood-watch programs -- and the reemergence of State and local government as significant forces in determining the future of our country and the quality of life of our people.

State and local officials. I want each of you to know I deeply appreciate the responsible and, in most cases, nonpartisan way that we have worked together to ensure progress in the area of federalism. There's still much to be done, and I hope we can build on the working relationship that we've already established.

Technology today is opening up new opportunities at the State and local level. State government has some of the most competent and hard-working employees to be found in government at any level. And in the last few years, we've seen creativity and innovation as never before in the statehouses throughout the country. Today that vision of our Founding Fathers of a federal system of States is as viable, if not more so, than at any time in our history. So, let us continue working together to keep faith with that dream.

And now, would you please join me as I toast you, the Governors of the States of the Union, and you can toast each other. And we can toast also to our freedom and to strong and efficient State government.

This is our house. Every time that I come to Washington and see the lines of tourists stretched around the building with fathers and mothers, particularly young fathers and mothers, holding the hands of the children, I know they're saying, ``Be patient. Once inside, you'll see something extraordinary, and you'll remember it. You'll tell the class. You'll tell your brother and sister.

Our session went very long today, Mr. President. Tomorrow, we'll report to you formally on what we have accomplished thus far in our meeting, though we have much to do. We expended many passions today, especially in our committee -- issues involving the budget and the deficit, acid rain, and all those controversies which swirl around us in public office -- in your office, in ours, at the other end of the avenue in the legislative branch, and sometimes in the judicial branch.

Those passions have dissipated tonight. Because we're good at our jobs, they'll be back tomorrow morning full steam. And when you see us in the East Room tomorrow morning, we'll probably have some pretty good questions for you and for the members of your staff and your Cabinet.

Now you hold the position that we elected you to. And though you are formally now engaged in a contest to retain that office, we still look upon you as brother. And we're glad of the opportunity to come with you once a year in this formal setting. And I must say, in my experience and perhaps in the experience of every Governor in this room, you have extended the hospitality, the warmth and, most importantly the interest of your office to us, your brothers, on so many more occasions, whether in the Oval Office or in our States, than we might reasonably expect, for we know you have to deal with mayors -- [laughter] -- and legislators, county executives, business people and labor people, and just all sorts of people that it's somewhat remarkable how much time you spend with Governors. I think, perhaps, there's a bias there. At least, we hope so.

The issues which concern us, Mr. President, and about which even we differ among ourselves and within our States are only as good as the men and women who enliven them. There is justice or no justice, depending upon the passions and the caring of men and women, not just on the pages of a book or in the words on those pages.

There will be a better education for our children than we had for ourselves not only because that is important but because it is necessary, but only achievable if we care to make it so and invest the time and the resources to achieve it. And whether it's the infrastructure of our country -- our roads, our highways, our bridges, our dams, our buildings, sewer systems, our water systems -- or it's our responsibility for the safety and well-being of our fellow citizens through law enforcement, for public health, or care for abused or neglected children, or infant mortality rates, words are words, pages are pages, and laws are laws unless we, the Governors, infuse them with our care.

We know how hard it is to be a President and a First Lady, because all of us in this room have experienced at least a portion of that which you live. We know there are many nights where you must feel frustrated, tired, mad, but many more where you feel satisfied, glad, challenged. We do, too, or we would not be with you tonight. When we leave this city and go back to our States and try and infuse our political, governmental, and personal lives with renewed vigor and caring, in part because we were here, we will remember you and Mrs. Reagan and wish for you the same.

And so tonight, Mr. President, from your brothers -- and I am pleased to say, from one sister who has now joined the ranks -- on behalf of the Governors, I propose a toast to the lady who guides you, sustains you, passionately loves you, and to the President of the United States.

The news about cancer is getting brighter. While three out of ten Americans will develop cancer at some time in their lives, half of those who do will live five years or more and are considered curable. For some of the major cancers, more than two-thirds of patients survive beyond the five-year mark.

Physicians treating cancer patients anywhere in the United States now have access to the latest treatment information through a new computerized database. In addition, there are in 34 States new community cancer programs which are affiliated with 200 hospitals and designed to bring the latest and best treatment to cancer patients in their own communities.

We have learned more about the basic nature of cancer in the past ten years than in the entire history of science. The new technologies developed through research now give us the tools to examine the intricate steps that occur when cancer begins to form. We expect these tools to give us even better diagnosis, treatment, and prevention.

The best news of all about cancer today is that we are developing clear ideas about how to prevent it. Cancer researchers believe that two-thirds of all cancers in this country are linked with our lifestyles so we can now make daily choices that may decrease our odds of developing cancer.

The single most important step which can be taken is to avoid smoking. Evidence also shows that some dietary components may not only prevent cancer, but even act to reverse a cancer-causing process which has already begun.

Thus we are reaping important benefits from the billions of dollars and the years of work this country has invested in the all-out effort to control cancer. With the continued advance of medical science to improve treatment and prevention, it may be possible to reduce by fifty percent the national death rate from cancer by the year 2000.

Federal, State, and city income taxes for travel, transportation, and relocation expenses of employees, transferred at Government expense, furnished in kind or for which reimbursement or an allowance is provided.

Nancy and I are delighted to welcome you and your party to the United States. I take special pride in greeting you, since this is the first time an American President has had the privilege of hosting an Austrian state visit.

Americans have deep admiration for Austria, her industrious people, and her rich culture. When we think of Austria, we picture snowcapped mountains and deep, fertile valleys, and churches, museums, and monuments of cities like Salzburg and Vienna. Austria is truly a nation of breathtaking beauty and noble history. And Americans have a deep respect for Austria's part in foreign affairs.

We recognize the crucial role your nation has played in maintaining peace in central Europe and working for peace throughout the world. But we are drawn to you by more than admiration and respect. We revere shared values of democracy, personal freedom, human dignity, and the rule of law -- values as ancient as Salzburg Cathedral and as soaring and noble as the Austrian Alps.

Your reconstruction of your society from the physical and political rubble of World War II and your creative use of neutrality to create a pluralistic society and political system stand as an inspiration for the rest of the world. As a signatory of your state treaty and, therefore, a guarantor of your sovereignty, the United States salutes your accomplishments and supports your active neutrality.

Looking to the future, we want to make certain that the understanding between our two peoples is passed on to the younger generation of Austrians and Americans. And toward that end, we will begin this year a pilot program of youth exchanges with plans to expand the program in future years. Allowing young Austrians and Americans to spend time in each other's countries will multiply the ties of firsthand knowledge and friendship so important to our close and warm relations. It will mean that many young Austrians and Americans will forever carry something of the other's country in their hearts.

Keyworth, will be exchanging letters this afternoon which will give a new impetus to mutually beneficial cooperation on basic research. Scientists and researchers from both our countries will now have new reasons to increase their joint research projects, pooling their knowledge for the benefit of Austrians, Americans, and all mankind.

Your invitation was more appreciated since this is for me and for all of Austria a truly historic event. It is indeed the first official visit of an Austrian head of state to the United States since the establishing of relations between Vienna and Washington about 200 years ago.

In the heart and in the mind of the Austrian people the relations between our two countries are inviolably anchored by two facts. First, we feel closely linked through our mutual adherence to the fundamental values of democratic western pluralism. Second, we have not forgotten how much the American people have contributed through the Marshall plan to the rebuilding and to the building of our economy after World War II.

Reflecting this basic attitude of the Austrian people, I came here today, Mr. President, as a true friend, advocating the promotion of friendship between Western Europe and the United States, but also advocating the dialog between East and West. The history of my country has proven that it is only through a constructive dialog that our living with each other in peace is ensured. Recent messages from across both sides of the ideological borderlines seem to give hope for mutual understanding and coexistence.

Vice President Bush, and with Secretary Shultz, concerning the present political and economic global situation. For me, as an Austrian, it is of particular value to see the American perspectives in direct contact.

Also being a small country, Austria is situated geopolitically in a sensitive area, and her historical ties with the peoples across the borders have also a particular political importance. Consequently, Austria has a role to play in demonstrating to all of our neighbors a living and well-functioning, free democracy with all of its principles America stands for.

Mr. President, I'm truly happy to be your guest in your great country, and I'm confident that my visit will bring our two peoples even closer together. It is particularly the young people we have to turn to in our efforts to ensure our values also for the future. I am, therefore, very pleased that it is planned, as you stated today, to include Austria in the youth exchange program, which you, Mr. President, decided to intensify to the benefit of international relations in general, and of Austro-American friendship in particular.

I said this morning, and I would like to say again, how happy and proud that Nancy and I are to welcome you to the United States for the first state visit by an Austrian President. I consider your visit a celebration of our common bonds and our common purpose.

The Baroness and her family fled Austria shortly before the outbreak of World War II, and their story has become known to millions in the wonderful play and film ``The Sound of Music.'' Since arriving in the United States, the Baroness has come to stand for Austrian integrity, wit, and charm. And perhaps more than any other single American, she's contributed to the deep friendship that our two nations enjoy. So, Baroness, on behalf of the American people, I thank you.

Mr. President, as a neutral country between East and West, Austria has played a constructive role in international and human relations and earned the respect of all nations. During World War II, thousands of people like the von Trapps were forced to flee Austria, but today, your nation offers asylum to those who are fleeing tyranny and human suffering. Austria is a shining example of compassion and courage.

Our countries, united not by military alliance, but by shared beliefs, have a common conviction that there are basic values which transcend every system of government. Among these are the dignity of man, liberty and justice, and the cornerstone of all of our values, an unshakable belief in God. Mr. President, we have deep respect for your neutrality. We are proud to guarantee your sovereignty, and we take great comfort in the knowledge that Austria is a steadfast member of the community of Western democracies.

From the beginning of my tenure in office, Mr. President, I have emphasized that in our dealings with the Soviet Union, we should be guided by realism, proceed from a position of strength, and be ready at all times to engage in efforts to reach equitable and verifiable agreements. Your country's very existence as a free and independent nation proves what patient, persistent negotiations with the Soviets can produce. We welcome the wisdom of your counsel and rest assured that we will continue this policy in the hope that it will yield the results for which the world yearns.

President Bush's visit to Vienna, the reopening of our consulate in Salzburg, and the appointment of Helene von Damm to be our Ambassador to Austria have shown our commitment to build stronger and more vital links between our governments and our peoples. But the bonds of true friendship can never be too many or too strong. And we will create still more through your exchanges -- youth exchanges, I should say, and enhanced cooperation in scientific and technological research.

President Kirchschlager. Mr. President, Mrs. Reagan, distinguished ladies and gentlemen, it is indeed a great privilege, Mr. President, to be your guest today here in the White House. And believe me, it is a moving evening for all Austrians present here -- a moving evening by the words, your address to us, and by the music you offered to us.

I would like to thank you most sincerely for this gracious and warm hospitality you are extending to us and for all the friendship we felt here in Washington and in the United States. I express this thanks also in the name of my wife and on behalf of the members of the Austrian Government in my company as well as in the name of the other Austrian guests today. And I am joining you to express my real pleasure that Baroness Trapp is here with us. In Austria, too, you have a wonderful reputation. You know it, I hope.

President, that you have invited me to pay this official visit to the United States. For me and for all of Austria, this is a truly historic event. It is indeed the first official visit of an Austrian head of state to the United States since relations between Vienna and Washington were established formally 146 and informally 200 years ago.

Austrian people went out to America and the image of the United States in my country was forged by the Marshall plan, which played such a decisive part in the rebuilding of Austria and with which it has remained linked ever since. Only recently we celebrated in Vienna the 35th anniversary of the signing of the agreement on American temporary assistance to Austria and on economic cooperation, and we will never forget this event.

In those years, the trust between Austria and the United States was strengthened by 10 years of tough negotiations over the Austrian state treaty and the strong commitment of the Austrian people to democratic ideals. The conclusion of the state treaty and the recovery of Austria's full freedom in 1955 have led to a long-lasting period of excellent relations, which has continued to this day.

In the late thirties, freedom and democratic life and America's willingness to offer asylum to political and racial refugees attracted many of Austria's best sons and daughters, who have found a new home in your great country but have also helped as pioneers to build it up. Most Americans will be surprised to learn that at the middle of this century, only four countries had supplied more distinguished Americans listed in ``Who's Who in America'' than the small country of ours, Austria. It may indeed be unexpected that a land-locked country of central Europe, speaking a different language from that of America -- you see it in my speaking -- as small as the State of Maine and less populous than the city of New York should have been one of the major contributors to American life and culture. But to us, it is additional proof of our community of interests.

Mr. President, you exercise your high office at a time of global political tension and crisis, many of which are also of vital importance to my country. Austria, as a permanently neutral country, makes every effort to contribute towards the maintenance of world peace by promoting understanding in the geopolitical area in which history has placed us. And by trying to secure friendly relations with all our neighbors, we are trying to remain an element in Europe's stability and security, to be a haven for refugees as well as a clear voice in support of human rights.

As a small country we have a vested and, indeed, a vital interest in upholding the rule of law in world politics and the principle of universality in international organizations. In all these respects, the world can continue to count on us in the future.

Our two countries are and will remain closely linked through their mutual adherence to the fundamental values of democratic Western pluralism to which the Austrian people has dedicated itself in all elections since 1945. In my view, this is the best basis for a mutual interest in a long-lasting friendship. Our common pledge for an increased support to youth exchange programs will additionally promote mutual understanding and help to deepen our relations also in the next generation.

With repeated cordial thanks for your hospitality and with my sincere good wishes for the prosperity of the United States and the American people, I invite you all to join me in a toast to the President of the United Nations of America and Mrs. Reagan.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Edward Sulzberger to be a member of the Board of Directors of the National Corporation for Housing Partnerships for the term expiring October 27, 1986. This is a reappointment.

Good afternoon, and welcome to Washington. I'm delighted to have you here today, because I'm a long-time admirer of the National Alliance of Senior Citizens. Under the fine leadership of your president, Mrs. Virginia Aubrey; your national vice president, Colonel Barry Taylor; your board members, and you, the State and regional leaders. The National Alliance of Senior Citizens skillfully represents its 1.4 million members and works tirelessly to make this a better country for senior citizens and for all Americans. You've given this administration your firm support, and I want to let you know how grateful we all are.

But in our society, senior citizens play a vital role. Senior citizens provide invaluable skill, talent, and wisdom that can come only with years. I always remember that Winston Churchill was almost 65 when World War II broke out, but he carried England through all those bitter years and on to victory. And I think, if I remember correctly, that Adenauer, when he was bringing about economic recovery in West Germany after the war, was 80 or better.

Now, I know you're having a number of briefings today, but if I could take just a moment, I'd like to speak about some of our accomplishments. And maybe some of those who are going to do the briefing here will have to scratch things out if I say them first. [Laughter] Don't do it. It bears repetition.

Just 3 years ago, we inherited the worst economic mess in decades. Big taxing and spending had led to soaring inflation and interest rates. In January of 1981 inflation was in double digits, the prime rate hit its highest peak since the Civil War, and growth was disappearing.

The broken economy hit senior citizens especially hard. Many live on fixed incomes and found the purchasing power was eaten up by inflation. Like all Americans, senior citizens found jobs becoming more and more scarce. And senior homemakers found that 12\1/2\-percent inflation made it harder to buy groceries and pay bills.

Our administration went to work, as we said, to make a new beginning. We reduced the growth of Federal spending. We pruned needless regulations. We reduced personal income tax rates and passed an historic reform called tax indexing, a reform that means that government can never again use inflation to profit at the people's expense. And now, today, less than 3 years since we set our policies in place, our nation has one big program to help every American, young and old.

Inflation has plummeted by two-thirds to about 4 percent during the past year. And that lower inflation rate makes the average retired person's private pension benefits worth about a thousand dollars more in purchasing power than if inflation had stayed at the 1980 levels.

And just this morning we saw a picture of the future of our economy, and it looks good. A strong gain in January's leading economic indicators means this recovery isn't about to fizzle; it'll keep going strong -- just like America's senior citizens. The index of leading indicators is a combination of different activities in the economy, and it rose by 1.1 percent. The index shows the direction the economy is headed in future months. So, send away the handwringers, because today's good news marks the 16th rise in the last 17 months of those indicators.

Now, there are those that claim that we've cut social security and medicare benefits, and I have to tell you whenever I hear that, it sort of touches my temperature control. [Laughter] Nothing could be further from the truth. Our budget for this year provides for $238 billion in programs that affect the elderly, which averages out to $17,000 for every senior couple in America.

American foreign policy. In Grenada we've set a nation free. In Central America we're working to defend democracy and advance economic development. Events in Lebanon have been painful, but we're determined to do all we can to promote stability and peace in the Middle East. And one thing's for certain: Our presence in Lebanon has prevented far greater destruction and loss of life than would have otherwise taken place.

In Europe the NATO alliance, which was kind of trembling for a while, has held firm. And as for arms talks, we hope the Soviets will come back to the negotiating table soon. And when they do, they'll find American negotiators waiting for them, ready to come to equitable and verifiable agreements. In the meantime, we and our NATO allies will remain steadfast in the defense of our freedom and the protection of world peace.

Every American should be able to walk the streets unafraid and go to bed at night without worrying that the next sound might be the footsteps of a burglar or a rapist. But, tragically, we still can't do that. Think of all the senior citizens who don't visit their families or see a doctor because they're afraid they might get robbed or mugged on the way.

The reason crime is so bad is no mystery. For too many years the scales of criminal justice were tilted in favor of the criminals themselves. Those in charge forgot, or just plain didn't care, about protecting the rights of law-abiding citizens. We came to Washington determined to restore the proper balance to our criminal justice system. And we've begun to get results.

In 1982 the crime rate dropped by 4.3 percent, and that was the biggest decline in a decade. But we still face a tremendous challenge. One of the most important steps we've proposed is the comprehensive control act and the most sweeping anticrime bill in more than 10 years. Recently, the Senate passed the crime control act and several important related crime bills. But in the House, instead of giving those bills the priority they deserve, the leadership has bottled them up in committee.

Now, let me give you some examples of the reforms the House leadership is blocking. One reform would widen the powers of Federal prosecutors to go after mobsters and drug traffickers by seizing their profits. It could be a knockout blow against the drug syndicates that are poisoning our country. Why should any right-minded person oppose this?

Another reform involving the so-called exclusionary rule would allow evidence obtained reasonably and in good faith to be used in a criminal trial. It'd be a big step toward making sure criminals don't go free on technicalities. Who in good conscience could object to that?

Let me give you an example, because I know a great many people aren't completely familiar with the exclusionary rule and how it employs. Several years ago in California, San Bernardino, on the suspicion that a couple living in a home were peddling heroin, narcotics agents got a warrant and had enough evidence to get that, went to this house and then searched the house for the heroin, and they couldn't find any. And on the way out, just on a hunch, one of them turned back to the baby in the crib and took off its diapers, and there was the heroin. It was thrown out of court and couldn't be used, because they said the baby hadn't given its permission to be searched.

Now, the second issue is school prayer. From the early days of the American colonies, prayer in school was practiced and revered as an important tradition. Indeed, for nearly 200 years of our history, it was considered a natural expression of our religious freedom. And then in 1962, the Supreme Court expelled God from America's classrooms. Well, I happen to believe that if the Congress can begin its day with prayer, then so can our children. And along with you, all the people, or most of them, agree. Polls show that by a margin of 4 to 1 Americans want prayer back in our schools.

Strength in the economy, a firm sense of purpose in foreign affairs, the will to combat crime and seek God's help -- it all adds up to a great national renewal, a reaffirmation of the fundamental American values of hard work, family, freedom, and faith.

And I have to interject something here. You know, our generation -- and I don't think many of us realize it -- is a very unusual one in the history of man. Only occasionally back through history have there been single generations that presided over a great period of transition and saw a great change, and ours was one. We literally in our lifetimes have gone from the horse and buggy to space travel and landing on the Moon. And we've seen four wars in our lifetime. We've seen a Great Depression that certainly made us look on the recent recession with a little more ease than some of the people who had never experienced that Great Depression.

And I have to just tell you a little experience. When I was Governor, back in those days of the riots on the campus and all that was going on, I wanted more than anything to be able to go to the campus and talk to some of those young people, but if I went I started a riot. I was the establishment. And one day some of the student leaders in our university system in California demanded a meeting with me. Well, I was delighted.

The President. Good afternoon, and welcome to the White House. Nancy and I just want you to know how proud all of us -- your families, your friends, and countrymen -- how proud we are of the job that you did representing us in Sarajevo. And we were all watching and we were by your side, in spirit at least, during the entire competition. We're aware of the enormous commitment of time and effort that your participation in the winter Olympics represents.

It's said that in sports, it's not just the will to win, but the will to prepare to win that makes the difference. And it took enormous preparation for you to compete, and we're grateful for your dedication. Whether you won or lost, you're now part of that elite group of citizens who represented our country in the Olympic games. It's a distinction that will be yours for the rest of your lives.

For those of you who won medals, we have a special word of thanks. The competition was fierce and your achievement was well-deserved. You've proven that a free country like ours, where support for the Olympics is totally voluntary, can hold its own against societies which subsidize their athletes.

And Scott Hamilton, the image of you skating a victory lap waving the Red, White, and Blue is now fixed in the memory of this nation. Your battle against a childhood illness and your commitment to the years of practice and training needed to excel on the ice now -- well, they're indeed an inspiration. And now you hold three world championships and a fresh Olympic gold medal.

Kitty and Peter Carruthers, you've taken another step up from your showing at Lake Placid 4 years ago. Your silver medal in the pairs competition adds another accomplishment to a great career that's included many national titles and world team appearances for our country.

All of you here who competed and those who couldn't be with us: You gave your country thrills beyond description. Most important, you reminded us that the qualities of personal commitment -- courage, character, and heart -- are the mark of greatness in sport. You have your country's thanks and best wishes. And believe me, all Americans -- Republicans, Democrats, Independents, from whatever race, religion, or creed -- we're all on the same team in this, cheering you on.

This year's winter contests were in the finest tradition of the Olympics. I've read of the warmth and enthusiasm with which the citizens of Sarajevo greeted athletes and visitors from around the world. I'm sure that the people of our country will be equally as friendly and hospitable, particularly those in southern California, who will actively host the summer Olympic games.

I was out in California not too long ago -- you undoubtedly read that -- [laughter] -- and they're leaving no stone unturned in preparation for the games. The city of Los Angeles has rolled out the welcome mat, and I'm certain that the teams and visitors from around the world are going to feel as welcome as all of you did in Sarajevo.

In closing, I'd like to offer a special note of congratulations to two other American medal winners in winter Olympic sports -- Mike May and Ron Salviolo. Mike skis better blind than most sighted skiers. And your skill and your spirit are doing much to encourage others who might otherwise needlessly limit their own expectations. Mike, you and the other competitors here are a testimony to all young people that they should never be afraid to dream big dreams, and they should never hesitate to try to make those dreams a reality.

I participated in sports quite awhile ago. And today, I work a little bit upstairs in the gym at staying fit. Then my other favorite exercise is exercising a horse. But my experience in high school and college athletics -- I know, as the years go by and I look back, more and more I see them as providing just as much education and as much benefit for me at later life than any of the things that happen in a classroom or a lecture hall.

Olympics. So, thank you all for being such fine representatives of our country. And thank you especially for being here today. And now let's get behind the summer team for the next round of the Olympics in Los Angeles. And, again, God bless you all.

Committee. But I don't think that's enough. And I just hope I'm speaking the hearts of all the athletes here. We would like you to be a member of the Olympic team with all of us, and we have some gifts for you.

During 1984, at the request of the Congress, I forwarded two reports to the Congress on arms control compliance. The first, forwarded last January, was an in-depth analysis of seven specific issues of violations or probable violations by the Soviet Union of arms control obligations and commitments. The second report, forwarded in October, was an advisory study prepared independently by the General Advisory Committee on Arms Control and Disarmament. These reports indicate that there is cause for serious concern regarding the Soviet Union's conduct with respect to observance of arms control agreements.

In the FY-1985 Defense Authorization Act and the Conference Report on that Act, the Congress called for additional classified and unclassified reports regarding a wide range of questions concerning the Soviet Union's compliance with arms control commitments. The Administration is responding to these requests by providing both classified and unclassified reports which update theseven issues initially analyzed in the January 1984 report, and analyze a number of additional issues.

As I stated last January, Soviet noncompliance is a serious matter. It calls into question important security benefits from arms control, and could create new security risks. It undermines the confidence essential to an effective arms control process in the future. With regard to the issues analyzed in the January 1984 report, the Soviet Union has thus far not provided satisfactory explanations nor undertaken corrective actions sufficient to alleviate our concerns. The United States Government has vigorously pressed, and will continue to press, these compliance issues with the Soviet Union through diplomatic channels.

Our approach in pursuing these issues with the Soviet Union is to ensure that both the letter and intent of treaty obligations and commitments will be fulfilled. To this end the Administration is: analyzing further issues of possible noncompliance; as noted above, seeking from the Soviet Union through diplomatic channels explanations, clarifications, and, where necessary, corrective actions; reporting on such issues to the Congress; and taking into account in our defense modernization plans the security implications of arms control violations. At the same time, the United States is continuing to carry out its own obligations and commitments under relevant agreements. Our objectives in the new negotiations which begin in March are to reverse the erosion of the ABM Treaty and to seek equitable, effectively verifiable arms control agreements which will result in real reductions and enhance stability. While all of these steps can help, however, it is fundamentally important that the Soviet Union take a constructive attitude toward full compliance with all arms control obligations and commitments.

The Administration and the Congress have a shared interest in supporting the arms control process. For this reason, increased understanding of Soviet violations or probable violations, and a strong Congressional consensus on the importance of compliance to achieving effective arms control, will strengthen our efforts both in the new negotiations and in seeking corrective actions from the Soviet Union.

I've read that there are no indispensable men in politics but, during the past four years, you've come as close to being indispensable here in the White House as anyone I can imagine. In fact, I would not be inclined to let you leave at all if it weren't for the fact that you'll be just a short walk away dealing with some of the most crucial issues we will confront during the second term.

I'd like to make a list of the major decisions you've been involved in during the past four years, but what would I leave off? You've been deeply involved in the planning and presentation of all the major initiatives of my Administration, and it is due in great measure to your efforts that so many of them have been enacted into law. You've fought many battles on behalf of our principles, but even those who have opposed us offer willing testimony to your intelligence, your fairness and your integrity.

It's hard to believe -- in view of the immense respect in which you are held in Washington -- that you occupied your first high-level Federal job less than ten years ago. You have mastered the art of Washington politics, but your roots are still deep in the soil of Texas, and it was there that you learned the fundamental values that you and I share. You know that life can be hard and is always unpredictable, but you also know that Americans are a people who look forward to the future with optimism. That sense of optimism is the most important thing we have tried to restore to America during the past four years, and it has helped me more than I can say to have someone by my side who understands that bedrock faith in our nation's future as well as you do.

But this letter is starting to sound like you're leaving public service. Fortunately for me, you're just moving across the street to be Secretary of the Treasury. I'll warn you right now that I'm going to keep on asking your advice on any and every issue that comes up during the next four years. So don't plan any long vacations until you check with me.

Staff over the past four years -- years which historians will undoubtedly view as a period of much-needed and striking accomplishment. I know you are fond of saying that such achievements are a team effort, but if that is so, it is also true that rarely in our Nation's history has a team been so ably led and inspired.

In 1981, the spirit and the confidence of the American people were in decline. Our economy was stagnant, our defenses deteriorating, our values under siege at home, and our national prestige trampled abroad. Your leadership and courage have brought about a remarkable reversal of every one of those situations. Today, our economy is reinvigorated, and our defenses restored. We are also seeing new faith in our traditional values, and renewed respect for an America which again has the strength of will to uphold its interests. You have restored America's pride and confidence in itself.

Such were your tangible achievements. Yet there is one other, less tangible, but no less important point: by your success and personal example you have restored the potency, purpose and effectiveness of the Presidency. And now, by virtue of your overwhelming reelection victory last year, you are positioned to be the first President since Eisenhower to complete two successful terms.

I hope to contribute to a successful second term as your new Secretary of the Treasury. I am grateful that you saw fit to honor my desire to serve you in this capacity and I look forward to the challenges of the future with confidence and optimism.

Susan and the rest of my family agree that you have given us many fine and fond memories. In the years ahead, we will look back on this special time in our lives with a deep sense of appreciation and pride. You have my heartfelt thanks and my pledge of continued loyalty and service to you and your Administration.

Washington because they have been your trademark for many years. With such an extraordinary combination of talents, there is no question in my mind that you could have been a success in any career you chose. But, while you have been successful in both the business and academic worlds, you have chosen to devote yourself instead to a career that has chiefly been oriented toward public service. Knowing you as I do, I know that it is your deep love of America, and your strong belief in its future greatness, that has impelled you to make this choice.

Like you, I can remember well the period in the late fifties and early sixties when America's self-confidence and optimism were almost palpable. We thought then that we could do anything we set our minds to. The years that followed brought pain, national division, and an uncharacteristic pessimism. They also brought a corrosive cynicism and despair in many quarters.

But I believe that we have made great progress during the past four years in bringing America back to its traditional optimism. And one of the reasons for our progress is the success we have had in reinvigorating the Presidency and once again offering a clear banner of leadership. Yet I'm not taking credit for this because I know how many of our policy decisions and legislative victories were crafted by groups of people working long hours -- groups so many of which benefitted from your extraordinary personal contributions.

You designed and implemented the internal management systems which have helped to restore the efficiency and professionalism of the White House. That was an impressive accomplishment but you are probably better known for initiating and coordinating the White House Legislative Strategy Group, which helped achieve some of the most remarkable legislative victories of the first term. You contributed to virtually every central White House activity from communications planning and scheduling to preparing for Economic Summits; from overseeing Speechwriting and Research to coordinating the work of the Budget Review Board; from negotiating with the Congress to accompanying me on every major foreign and campaign trip of the first term. Last, but not least, you managed the seemingly endless flow of paper (alas) in and out of my office.

Administration -- and to the opportunity to try to help meet such exciting challenges as: improving the domestic tax system; strengthening the international economic system; and, in these and other ways, advancing the technological and economic growth that can contribute to creative human development. Please accept my thanks for affording me this outstanding opportunity.

But while I am grateful to have exciting new challenges, it is with an inescapable sense of at least partial regret that I resign from my current position. Like most Americans, I have a special respect for both you and the office of the Presidency. Unlike most, I have had, for the past four years, the privilege and opportunity to try to serve both you and the office directly. For that special privilege and rare opportunity I shall always be deeply grateful.

For those of us who were the first of the ``baby-boom'' generation, it was a time of hope -- and enormous confidence in both America's and humanity's potential. Yes, there was some of the naivety of youth. But even adjusting for that, it seemed entirely reasonable to think that America should reach for the stars -- indeed, that America and Americans were specially destined to do so.

At the start of my senior year, President Kennedy was shot. We did not realize it quite then, but the shots that cracked the fall air shattered more than a young President's life. They halted the flow toward America's special destiny. Vietnam and Watergate followed. Confidence plummeted.

Yet now, the words you made resonant ring true: ``America is back.'' And the sense of America is no small thing. You are right to talk again of a ``revolution of hope.'' And as important: you are believed. America is back. There is a renewed sense of her special mission -- as a beacon of hope, a land of opportunity, a protector of freedom, a pioneer of new frontiers. Millions and millions of people feel again that wonderful sense of hope and promise that I felt years ago as a seventeen year old freshman.

You have given America back the best of her youthfulness -- which in some sense we hope may be eternal. You have renewed America on the path toward her special destiny -- giving all our lives the possibility of an extra dimension of meaning.

It is inconceivable to me how we could thank you enough for your historic contribution. And yet I must find a way not only to do that, but also to thank you for your having permitted me to play a small part in this process. I do not have words which seem adequate. I can only promise to serve with renewed dedication -- and to hope that, by my actions, I may repay the debt I feel I owe, and prove to merit the trust you have reposed in me.

On Monday morning we will submit to the Congress our budget for fiscal year 1986. It is a budget that carries an enormous investment of human time and effort; indeed, I believe, the most exhaustive effort ever made to rein in government's chronic overspending. Every proposal is based on a careful review of what government should and should not do, what's worked and what hasn't, what we can and can no longer afford. Collectively, the more than 50 proposals we are making can stop the excessive growth of Federal spending in its tracks and put budget deficits on a permanent downward path.

But today I want to lay a few facts on the table, so you understand why some so-called solutions you will hear aren't solutions at all and also what all of us must do to cure government's overspending once and for all.

When your families do well, government spends and borrows. When you don't do well, government spends and borrows. Our future economic success depends on the economy growing faster than government spending. That's why raising taxes would boomerang. Economic growth would slow, revenues would decline, and the budget deficit would swell.

The second so-called solution you will hear is that lasting progress won't be made without deep cuts in defense. Wrong again. Defense spending accounts for less than 30 percent of our budget today -- far less than 20 years ago. We've cut our planned defense buildup 3 years in a row and cut it again this year -- and all this while our adversaries have raced ahead with the greatest military buildup in the history of man.

It's time everyone faced up to why government, for nearly 50 years, has been heading down a one-way street of overspending and rising public debt. Part of the spending is understandable -- improved Social Security benefits for a growing elderly population, for example. But much of it results from the combination of special interest groups and flawed budget procedures. Our system of budgetmaking in the Congress practically guarantees spending growth, and this unsettles financial markets and helps keep interest rates from falling.

When government makes redistributing income more important than producing it, people reallocate their energies from economic to political action. The growth in special interests, which many in Congress lament, parallels a pattern of government taking from some to give to others. It parallels the ability of special interests to lobby for benefits and override the national interest by concentrating great power on a small group of legislators. So, spending and taxes rise, and growth declines. That's why we have a rising national debt and a growing burden of paying interest on that debt.

Our challenge is to strive for the strongest possible level of economic growth while making sure spending by government remains well below that. To accomplish this, we're proposing three long-term reforms.

First, we want to reform the tax system, make it more fair and simple for all, so we can bring down tax rates for individuals and businesses, provide incentives for stronger growth, and thereby increase revenues to government.

Second, we want the Congress to pass a constitutional amendment mandating government spend no more than government takes in. I will urge the House of Representatives to follow the positive actions of the Senate and pass this long-overdue reform.

This past year, Red Cross volunteers aided victims of fires, tornadoes, floods, hurricanes, and other tragedies on more than 50,000 occasions. In the last six months, the American Red Cross has faced a special challenge. It mobilized its resources to help provide food and medical relief to 14 African nations suffering from a famine of mammoth proportions. By providing funds contributed by generous Americans and seeing to it that they are converted into food for the hungry, the Red Cross is fulfilling its humanitarian mission of helping those in distress.

The American Red Cross has handled this unprecedented challenge without sacrificing any of its ongoing responsibilities. Annually, Red Cross teaches millions of our fellow citizens vital lifesaving techniques in CPR, first aid, small craft operation, and water safety. Its thousands of volunteer donors provide blood to more than half of the Nation's medical facilities. Red Cross also serves the men and women of our Armed Forces and their families, furnishing financial assistance and handling emergency requests through its worldwide communications network.

What all this adds up to is an organization of Americans who have volunteered their money, their time, and their hearts to ensuring that all of us are provided with the most efficient and effective health and human services possible.

This has been an especially tragic year for hundreds of thousands of our fellow countrymen left destitute by disasters. To assist these victims, the Red Cross has spent a record amount of money for help and for disaster preparedness. As a recipient of blood voluntarily donated through the Red Cross, I know the value of its Blood Services and its efforts to ensure that we constantly have adequate supplies for the sick and injured. The Red Cross also provides help for men and women serving in our country's military forces, their families, and veterans. Millions of Americans are trained in first aid, water and boating safety, and health care through programs sponsored by the Red Cross. Our Nation's young people, through Red Cross school programs, acquire leadership skills and learn the value of giving service to their communities.

Within the Federal government, the Red Cross is part of the Combined Federal Campaign. During the month of March, more than one-half of the Red Cross chapters nationwide will raise funds, while others will use this observance to inform the public about Red Cross services and to recruit new blood donors.

As President of the United States and Honorary Chairman of the American National Red Cross, I urge all civilian employees of the Federal government and members of the Armed Forces to support in every way possible this vital voluntary effort.

Confidence in the economy has prompted business firms to expand their capital facilities. Real investment in new plant and equipment has grown 15.4% annually since the end of 1982 -- faster than in any other post-war recovery.

Inflation remains well under control. The December 1984 CPI was 4% higher than a year earlier, about a third of the rate of inflation this administration inherited. The GNP deflator, the broadest measure of inflation, increased only 3.5% last year and at only a 2.4% annual rate in the fourth quarter.

Contrast our current circumstances with the situation we faced just 4 years ago. Inflation was raging at double-digit rates. Oil prices had soared. The prime rate of interest was over 20%. The economy was stagnating. Unemployment had risen sharply and was to rise further. America's standing in world opinion was at low ebb.

Reducing the growth of overall Federal spending by eliminating activities that are beyond the proper sphere of Federal Government responsibilities and by restraining the growth of spending for other activities.

Reducing the Federal regulatory burden where the Federal Government intrudes unnecessarily into our private lives, the efficient conduct of private business, or the operations of State and local governments.

The past 4 years have also seen the beginning of a quiet but profound revolution in the conduct of our Federal Government. We have halted what seemed at the time an inexorable set of trends toward greater and greater Government intrusiveness, more and more regulation, higher and higher taxes, more and more spending, higher and higher inflation, and weaker and weaker defense. We have halted these trends in our first 4 years.

The rate of Federal spending growth was out of control at 17.4% a year in 1980. Under my budget proposals the growth of programmatic spending -- that is, total Federal spending except for debt service -- will be zero next year -- frozen at this year's levels.

The Federal tax system was changed for the better -- marginal tax rates were reduced and depreciation reform introduced. These reforms were designed to increase incentives for work, training and education, saving, business growth, and capital expansion. Tax loopholes have been closed, improving the equity of the system.

Our defense capabilities are now getting back to a level where we can protect our citizens, honor our commitments to our allies, and participate in the long-awaited arms control talks from a position of respected strength.

The rapid growth of regulations and red tape has also been halted. The number of Federal rules published by agencies has fallen by over 35% during the past 4 years, and many unnecessary old rules have been eliminated. For the first time, the Federal Register of new regulatory actions has grown shorter for 4 consecutive years; it is now 41% shorter than it was in 1980.

The proposals contained in this budget will build on the accomplishments of the last 4 years and put into action a philosophy of government that is working and that has received the overwhelming endorsement of the American people.

Last year my administration worked with Congress to come up with a downpayment on reducing the deficit. This budget commits the Government to a second installment. With comparable commitments to further reductions in the next two budgets, and, I hope, other spending reduction ideas advanced by the Congress, we can achieve our goal in an orderly fashion.

The budget proposes a 1-year freeze in total spending other than debt service. This will be achieved through a combination of freezes, reforms, terminations, cutbacks, and management improvements in individual programs. For a number of reasons, a line-by-line budget freeze is not possible or desirable. Further, such an approach would assume that all programs are of equal importance. Taken together, the specific proposals in this budget hold total Federal spending excluding debt service constant in 1986 at its 1985 level.

The budget proposals provide for substantial cost savings in the medicare program, in Federal payroll costs, in agricultural and other subsidies to business and upper-income groups, in numerous programs providing grants to State and local governments, and in credit programs. A freeze is proposed in the level of some entitlement program benefits, other than social security, means-tested programs, and programs for the disabled, that have hitherto received automatic ``cost-of-living adjustments'' every year. The budget proposes further reductions in defense spending below previously reduced mid-year levels.

Tax rates are still so high that they distort economic decisions, and this reduces economic growth from what it otherwise could be. I will propose, after further consultation with the Congress, further tax simplification and reform. The proposals will not be a scheme to raise taxes -- only to distribute their burden more fairly and to simplify the entire system. By broadening the base, we can lower rates.

There will be substantial political resistance to every deficit reduction measure proposed in this budget. Every dollar of current Federal spending benefits someone, and that person has a vested self-interest in seeing these benefits perpetuated and expanded.

We said ``no'' frequently in 1981, and real spending for discretionary domestic programs dropped sharply. But we did not accomplish enough. We now have no choice but to renew our efforts with redoubled vigor. The profusion of Federal domestic spending programs must be reduced to an acceptable, appropriate, and supportable size.

Congress, but I believe that with good faith and goodwill on all sides, we can succeed. If we fail to reduce excessive Federal benefits to special interest groups, we will be saddled either with larger budget deficits or with higher taxes -- either of which would be of greater harm to the American economy and people.

Not only must both the scope and scale of Federal spending be drastically cut back to reduce the deficit: we must also institute comprehensive management improvements and administrative reforms to make sure that we use available funds as efficiently as possible.

Tough but necessary steps are being taken throughout the Federal Government to reduce the costs of management and administration. Substantial savings in overhead costs have been achieved under provisions of the Deficit Reduction Act of 1984. A 5% Federal civilian employee salary cut has been proposed; a 10% reduction in administrative overhead has been ordered; termination of programs that have outlived their usefulness is proposed; outmoded, inefficient agency field structures that have evolved over the past half-century are being consolidated and streamlined to take advantage of efficiencies made possible by modern transportation, communication, and information technology.

Administration of Federal agencies is being made more efficient through the adoption of staffing standards, automation of manual processes, consolidation of similar functions, and reduction of administrative overhead costs. A program to increase productivity by 20% by 1992 in all appropriate Government functions is being instituted, as are improved cash and credit management systems and error rate reduction programs.

This management improvement program will result in a leaner and more efficient Federal structure and will be described in a management report that I am submitting to the Congress for the first time shortly after my annual budget submission.

We have also made a great deal of progress in reducing the costs imposed on businesses and State and local governments by Federal regulations. These savings are estimated to total $150 billion over a 10-year period. We have reduced the number of new regulations in every year of my first term and have eliminated or reduced paperwork requirements by over 300 million hours each year. In addition, the regulations are more carefully crafted to achieve the greatest protection for the least cost, and wherever possible to use market forces instead of working against them.

A recent Executive Order will strengthen the executive branch coordination that has made these accomplishments possible. For the first time, we will publish an annual program of the most significant regulatory activities, including those that precede the publication of a proposed rule.

The key elements of the program I set out 4 years ago are in place and working well. Our national security is being restored; so, I am happy to report, is our economy. Growth and investment are healthy; and inflation, interest rates, tax rates, and unemployment are down and can be reduced further. The proliferation of unnecessary regulations that stifled both economic growth and our individual freedoms has been halted. Progress has been made toward the reduction of unwarranted and excessive growth in domestic spending programs.

But we cannot rest on these accomplishments. If we are to attain a new era of sustained peace, prosperity, growth, and freedom, Federal domestic spending must be brought firmly under control. This budget presents the steps that I believe must be taken. I do not exclude other economies that Congress may devise, so long as they do not imperil my fundamental constitutional responsibilities to look after the national defense and the general welfare of the American people.

I think we can all agree that our number one priority is a growing and vibrant economy which creates jobs and offers increasing opportunity for all Americans. We've seen the remarkable potential for growth in our economy, that had for too long been held down by the heavy hand of government -- by high taxation, excessive Federal spending, and overregulation.

It's time to follow through with the policies that have brought us success. We must now build on our accomplishments to secure a more permanent and far-reaching prosperity, and that means we must work together to continue to liberate the creative energies of our nation by cutting the tax rates still further, while making our tax system fairer and simpler and less susceptible to abuse.

And it also means that we can't wait a moment longer to get our Federal budget under control. If we lose the budget battle, if we allow all the lessons of all the decades of unchecked government spending to go unheeded, then, I believe, we'll consign ourselves and our children to the tyranny of a government that respects no boundaries and knows no limits. But if we win, we'll show ourselves and the world that in America the Government is still the servant of the people, not their master.

And, thus, the budget that I'm sending to the Congress this year is $974 billion, including debt service costs -- only about 1\1/2\ percent higher than the fiscal year '85 level. The fiscal year '86 budget calls for an absolute freeze on overall government program spending. However, some programs cannot be frozen, so we must find savings in other areas. First, I'm proposing structural reforms and other economies in a wide range of programs, from entitlements to government lending. And second, there are a number of areas of discretionary spending, such as Federal overhead costs, where I'm confident the Government can get by on less next year. And the third, we're requesting cancellation of a long list of programs that, I believe, the taxpayers should not be subsidizing. I'm confident that many of these activities currently being subsidized could be efficiently provided in the private sector, without government assistance.

The defense of our nation is the one budget item which cannot be dictated solely by domestic considerations. Despite severe constraints on our budget, we must respond to the unprecedented military buildup of the Soviet Union, the largest military buildup in world history. And, unfortunately, we've had to start from a weakened position, brought on by long years of neglect and underfunding, and we still have a ways to go.

Nevertheless, I believe it's possible that working together, in a spirit of compromise and cooperation, we can bring our budget under control without damaging our economy or endangering our national security.

As we lighten government's burden on our private sector through budget control, we should remember that no amount of cutting and no paring will help if we, at the same time, add to the burden by raising taxes. All we should be doing is shifting the load from one saddlebag to another.

Raising taxes would be an admission of failure. It would announce to the country that we didn't have the political will and courage to do what we know is right to get our economic house in order. We've come to recognize an essential truth about our economy: that incentives are the key that unlocks prosperity.

When the Government takes away incentives to work and save, the economy goes flat -- millions are thrown out of work and government revenues plunge. But when we restore incentives, as we did with our cuts in personal income tax rates, the economy comes back to life and government revenues rise.

It's no accident that during fiscal year 1984, the first full year that all three installments of our income tax cuts were in place, Federal revenues actually rose 7 percent in real terms. So, we already have dramatic revenue increases, and the last thing we want to do is derail this impressive engine of economic growth.

We have a truly exciting chance to change the course of our nation's history, to return our country to the optimism and prosperity that we knew two decades ago. There's a lot of hard work before you, the Members of the 99th Congress. But in taking the positive steps necessary to keep the economy on the road to progress on the all-important issues of budget control and tax reform, you have the overwhelming support of the American people, and that's all that really matters.

Note: The President spoke at 10:32 a.m. in the East Room at the White House. Prior to the briefing, the President signed and presented copies of the budget to the bipartisan congressional leadership in the Oval Office.

I have to tell you, with the South Lawn out here alternately being white and then green -- and I'm so desperate to see it green permanently -- that if it doesn't stop snowing that way, I'm going to have the House painted green -- [laughter] -- have a different welcome here.

Well, I want to start by thanking all of you for the support that you've given us over the last 4 years. Back in the beginning of our first term, it was in large measure the support from the business community, from other groups such as yours that enabled us to pass the dramatic tax cuts of '81 and the budget cuts, which lifted the pall of malaise from our economy and put us back in the path of strong, noninflationary growth.

We need your help again. We have before us an historic opportunity to build on the achievements of our first term and secure the foundation of economic prosperity. The American economy is growing faster and stronger than many ever dreamed possible. The resilience with which we snapped back from more than a decade of overtaxation, excessive spending, and stifling regulation demonstrates the tremendous vitality of the American community -- or the American economy, I should say. I guess both are all right.

We must continue to lift the burdens of wasteful government and tap the energy that still lies dormant in our economy. We must move ahead with a comprehensive tax reform that would liberate incentives by cutting rates still further, while making the tax system fairer and simpler for every American. And we must finally, once and for all, gain control of our runaway budget.

If we deal successfully with those major tasks -- budget and tax reform -- I'm convinced that economic growth in the second half of the eighties will exceed the record of strong, sustained expansion sparked by the Kennedy tax cuts two decades ago.

Needless to say, I didn't expect immediate and unanimous approval from Congress. But I believe that working together we have what it takes to get our budget under control, without either damaging the economy or endangering the national security.

We've asked for structural reforms and other economies in a wide range of programs, from entitlements to government lending. We've requested real cuts in certain areas of discretionary spending, such as Federal overhead costs, where I'm sure the Government can get by on less next year. And there are a number of programs that we suggest canceling entirely. Some of these, such as Amtrak, could be run much more efficiently in the private sector.

The defense of our nation is the one budget item which cannot be dictated by domestic considerations. Despite severe constraints on our budget, we must respond to the unprecedented military buildup of the Soviet Union, the largest military buildup in world history. Unfortunately, we had to start from a weakened position, brought on by long years of neglect and underfunding, and we still have a ways to go.

You might be interested to know that the Scriptures are on our side in this -- Luke 14:31, in which Jesus in talking to the disciples spoke about a king who might be contemplating going to war against another king, with his 10,000 men. But he sits down and counsels how good he's going to do against the other fellow's 20,000 and then says he may have to send a delegation to talk peace terms. Well, I don't think we ever want to be in a position of only being half as strong and having to send a delegation to negotiate under those circumstances -- peace terms -- with the Soviet Union. So, ultimately, our security and our hopes for success at the arms reduction talks hinge on the determination that we show here to continue our program to rebuild and refortify our defenses.

In this session of the Congress, we'll also be presenting our bill for an historic, comprehensive reform of our tax structure. Although we'll be pursuing budget reform and tax reform separately, they're each vital and necessary complements of the other. They're the twin elements of our program to keep our economy growing, creating jobs, and spreading opportunity.

We've seen how high taxes will choke off incentive and drive the economy into a downward spiral of disinvestment and unemployment. The mirror image of that is the expanding cycle of prosperity that lowering taxes brings, where more investment brings more growth; and more growth brings more jobs, which means more people paying taxes.

We've already seen this work. It's no accident that during fiscal 1984, the first full year that all three installments of our income tax cuts were finally in place, Federal revenues actually rose 7 percent in full terms.

Now is the time to get control of our budget, cut tax rates still further, and keep the cycle of prosperity going. Budget and tax reform won't be easy, and we're going to need every ounce of support that you can give us in the months ahead to move this through the Congress. We're counting on you. And with your help, we can make the frustration, the stagnation, and the decline of only 4 years ago a distant memory.

Together, we can open the way to a bright future of continuing prosperity. Together, we can really make history. We can get back to a principle of government not spending more than government takes in.

I've been coming to this annual convention since 1982, and it's always been one of the high spots of the year. This year, with the inaugural and the State of the Union and our arms control preparations and our work on reforming the tax system, I had to discipline myself and say no to a few things that I enjoy, but I didn't like -- or learn to like my decision.

The President. The next few days, and maybe weeks, will probably be dominated, in terms of the news, by talk of economic matters -- budgets and the tax structure and so forth. But I want you to know that as we begin the great work ahead of us, I've been thinking very much about Divine Providence and turning to our Lord and asking for His guidance. I have found myself, as Abraham Lincoln did once, driven to my knees more than ever because there was no place else to go.

As a resident of 1600 Pennsylvania Avenue, I may have a special vantage point from which to judge these things. In December, when I looked north from the White House, I would see the huge menorah, celebrating the Passover [Hanukkah] season in Lafayette Park. And when I looked south from the Truman Balcony, I could see the Pageant of Peace and the creche symbolizing the birth of Christ. Showing the symbols of our beliefs in this way and what it is, for many of us, the holiest time of the year, is good -- good for all of us, for Christians and Jews and any others who wish to share the joy of our holidays.

The other day I was at the National Prayer Breakfast here in Washington, and I spoke, as so many others did, of the central place of faith in our lives and how belief in something bigger than ourselves is probably a necessary precondition to peace. And I mentioned that after 4 years in this job, I know as never before that we are all God's children, that the clerk, the king, and, yes, the Communist were made in His image.

And I've often wondered about one individual there, because when I said that, a fellow in the back of the room -- and I heard him say, ``Amen.'' There were more than 3,000 people in that room, from almost every country in the globe -- African chiefs, Central American businessmen, people from Australia and Europe and the Middle East. And the room seemed to hum with agreement that faith and belief are the key to man's salvation and the only way we'll learn to live with each other in peace.

All of you, all of the people in this room are doing your part to fill the world with God's work and make more gentle man's life on Earth. Like St. Peter and his brother, St. Andrew, you've been good and faithful fishermen, and you've fought the good fight -- for prayer in the schools and against abortion and for freedom in the world. You know, perhaps better than I, that you have never let us down.

And I'm not shy today about asking you for your continued support in many areas, including our economic program. It occurs to me that the doctrine of election means one thing to some of you and quite another to those of us who hold public office. [Laughter] When I was reelected in November, I didn't figure I was being sent back to the White House to turn back to the policies of the past.

We're trying to get government spending down, to hold down the huge cost of government, to keep it from taking the money you deserve to keep for your family and your future and for God's work. We mean to ensure greater possibility for the production of wealth by lowering tax rates through tax reform. We mean to maintain a strong defense, because only with a strong defense can we preserve the peace we cherish.

And I found myself wanting to remind you of what Jesus said in Luke 14:31: ``Oh, what king, when he sets out to meet another king in battle will not first sit down and take counsel whether he is strong enough with 10,000 men to encounter the one coming against him with 20,000. Or else, while the other is still far away, sends a delegation and asks the terms of peace.'' I don't think the Lord that blessed this country, as no other country has ever been blessed, intends for us to have to someday negotiate because of our weakness.

That's what we stand for here and everywhere. And that's what I need for your continued help in preserving and promoting. And every voice counts. These are crucial days ahead of us, in terms of the budget and taxes and keeping our commitment to rebuild our defenses.

I need all of you as never before. And we need Him as never before. And we mustn't doubt at all that He will give us help and support and encouragement and guidance. You've given me these things time and again. And for all of this, I am truly thankful.

Forty years ago this week, the leaders of the United States, Great Britain, and the Soviet Union met at Yalta, to confer on the approaching end of World War II and on the outlines of the postwar world. The agreements they reached, including the Declaration on Liberated Europe, committed all three governments to the reconstruction of a democratic continent.

Soviet Union and free nations, in a great common cause. But it also recalls the reasons that this cooperation could not continue -- the Soviet promises that were not kept, the elections that were not held, the two halves of Europe that have remained apart.

Why is Yalta important today? Not because we in the West want to reopen old disputes over boundaries; far from it. The reason Yalta remains important is that the freedom of Europe is unfinished business. Those who claim the issue is boundaries or territory are hoping that the real issues -- democracy and independence -- will somehow go away. They will not.

There is one boundary which Yalta symbolizes that can never be made legitimate, and that is the dividing line between freedom and repression. I do not hesitate to say that we wish to undo this boundary. In so doing, we seek no military advantage for ourselves or for the Western alliance.

We do not deny any nation's legitimate interest in security. But protecting the security of one nation by robbing another of its national independence and national traditions is not legitimate. In the long run, it is not even secure.

Long after Yalta, this much remains clear: The most significant way of making all Europe more secure is to make it more free. Our 40-year pledge is to the goal of a restored community of free European nations. To this work we recommit ourselves today.

The President. I think I have a few words here and a little ceremony to go through with. I'm pleased to sign this Economic Report, and I want to commend Bill Niskanen and his staff, here, for the fine job that they have done.

I think we can take pride in the very significant progress that, to our -- that it's hard work and sticking to our principles that transformed a sick economy to one of healthy growth with much lower inflation and interest rates. Now is the time for recommitment. We need the full support of the Congress to end nearly 50 years of deliberate deficit spending by the Federal Government.

Well, one sure path to a balanced budget is to keep the rate of growth spending below the growth of the economy. So, we've submitted a budget that will freeze over all government program spending, while ensuring that the funds crucial to our defense rebuilding program are there.

If the Congress cooperates and helps us reform our tax system and continue reducing unneeded regulation, we can end the burden of overspending and borrowing and leave our children a much stronger future.

Dr. Niskanen. Mr. President, the American economy is once again the envy of the world, and you deserve a lot of the credit. And only as a minor compensation for that, we'd like -- [laughter] -- to award you honorary membership in the Council of Economic Advisers and give you something to chop wood in back at the ranch.

The President. Why is it that everybody, including so many of you, continue to say that no cuts in the defense budget -- when there've been cuts in the neighborhood of around $30 billion in what was the projected budget for the Defense Department?

The President. Well, I'm quite sure that we'll be discussing this, going at this. But I think it is unfair to say that there has been no cut. As a matter of fact, the defense budget for 1986, as it's submitted now, is just about where the projected budget of President Carter was when he left office and made his 5-year projections as to what should be spent on national defense.

In 1981, when I first assumed the duties of the Presidency, our Nation was suffering from declining productivity and the highest inflation in the postwar period -- the legacy of years of government overspending, overtaxing, and overregulation.

We bent all of our efforts to correct these problems, not by unsustainable short-run measures, but by measures that would increase long-term growth without renewed inflation. We removed unnecessary regulations, cut taxes, and slowed the growth of Federal spending, freeing the private sector to develop markets, create jobs, and increase productivity. With conviction in our principles, with patience and hard work, we restored the economy to a condition of healthy growth without substantial inflation.

Although employment is now rising, business opportunities are expanding, and interest rates and inflation are under control, we cannot relax our economic vigilance. A return to the policies of excessive government spending and control that led to the economic ``malaise'' of the late seventies would quickly draw us back into that same disastrous pattern of inflation and recession.

Now is the time to recommit ourselves to the policies that broke that awful pattern: policies of reduced Federal spending, lower tax rates, and less regulation to free the creative energy of our people and lead us to an even better economic future through strong and sustained economic growth.

But the quantitative record alone does not tell the full story. Four years ago, there was a widespread and growing anxiety about the economy. Many thought that the Nation had entered a condition of permanent economic decline, and that we would have to live with permanent double-digit inflation unless we were willing to suffer massive long-term unemployment.

The creative potential of the American people, choosing their own economic futures, was more constrained than helped by the increasingly heavy hand of government. Nor did we share the negative views that a reduction of inflation would increase long-term unemployment; that economic growth, by itself, would increase inflation; and that the government had to protect a ``fragile'' market system by regulating oil prices and interest rates.

The primary economic responsibility of the Federal Government is not to make choices for people, but to provide an environment in which people can make their own choices. The performance of the economy in the past 2 years under our Program for Economic Recovery fully justifies our faith in the Nation's basic economic health. In 1983 and 1984 the economy generated about 300,000 new jobs per month without an increase in inflation. Real gross national product increased 5.6 percent during 1984, and the unemployment rate declined from 8.1 percent to 7.1 percent. Inflation was steady at its lowest level in more than a decade, and most interest rates are now lower than a year ago. Yet while the U.S. economy grew rapidly in 1984, it maintains the potential for continued strong growth. The inventory/sales ratio is low by historical standards, and capacity utilization rates in most industries are well below prior peak rates.

Economic conditions in 1984 were more favorable than during the second year of a typical recovery, and we see none of the warning signs that usually precede the end of an expansion. The temporary showing of economic growth starting in July -- reflecting the combination of a minor adjustment of consumer spending and inventories and little growth of the basic money supply -- seems to have ended in November. These conditions, plus an expectation that the Federal Reserve System will maintain sufficient money growth, support our forecast that the present recovery will continue. The thriving venture capital market is financing a new American revolution of entrepreneurship and technological change. The American economy is once again the envy of the world.

For the years 1985 through 1988, we assume real gross national product growth of 4 percent per year, slowing slightly in 1989 - 90. We know that economic recoveries have not been stable in either duration or magnitude, in part because monetary and fiscal policies have often been erratic.

We may not be able to eliminate recessions entirely, but a sustained commitment to policies that promote long-term growth and stability can reduce their frequency and severity. Our forecast that the unemployment rate, the inflation rate, and interest rates will decline gradually in the years ahead reflects this commitment to sound, sustainable, and predictable policies.

Our 1981 Program for Economic Recovery was designed for the long run with priority attention to the major problems we faced at that time. Our second-term Program for Growth and Opportunity represents a continuation and expansion of the earlier program, with priority attention to the major problems we face in 1985 and beyond. Our objectives -- economic growth, stability of the general price level, and increased individual economic opportunity -- have not changed. Federal economic policy will continue to be guided by the four key elements of the earlier program. Our progress in solving the most important economic problems we inherited in 1981, however, has allowed us to refocus our attention on the remaining problems and to shift our priorities and resources toward their solution.

Several significant problems remain to be addressed. The rate of growth of Federal spending has been substantially reduced from the rate projected in the budget we inherited in fiscal 1981, but spending growth continues to outpace the economy. Spending too much has left us with a large budget deficit that must and will be reduced. In our efforts to reduce the deficit, we must not forget that the cause of the deficit is increased spending and insufficient growth, not decreased taxes. Federal tax receipts are now almost the same share of gross national product as in the late 1970s, even after the substantial reduction in tax rates that we initiated in 1981.

Another economic problem demanding resolution is unemployment and its effects on the Nation's workers and families. Despite significant progress, much remains to be done. More than 6 million more Americans are now employed than in January 1981, but the unemployment rate is still too high. We will not be satisfied until every American who wants a job is employed at a wage that reflects the market value of his or her skills. Another aspect of this problem is that the poverty rate remains stubbornly high, despite a strong recovery and a continued increase in government assistance. Also, although the inflation rate has been reduced substantially, it is still higher than during most of our peacetime history prior to 1965. We will not be satisfied until we have totally and permanently wrung inflation out of our economy.

Work also remains to be done in the areas of regulatory and monetary policy. Many Federal regulations still impose a substantial cost to the economy. In addition, we need to strengthen the commitment to a sound monetary policy that never again retards economic growth, or reaccelerates inflation.

Investors around the world have bid up the dollar as they have become increasingly confident in our economy. That confidence is an asset and not a liability. However, the conditions that have led to the trade deficit have increased the obstacles faced by some important industries.

Agriculture, one of our most productive export sectors, has been harmed by a combination of rigid and outdated Federal agricultural policies and subsidized foreign competition as well as by the strong dollar. Some of our import-competing industries, such as steel, have also been hurt by subsidized foreign competition and the strong dollar. In one respect the trade deficit is like the budget deficit; both are too large to be sustained, but there are both beneficial and detrimental ways to reduce them. Our goal is a system of free and fair trade in goods, services, and capital.

Economic conditions during the past 4 years are best characterized as transitional -- from a period of low productivity growth to a period of high productivity growth; from a period of high inflation and interest rates to a period of much lower inflation and interest rates; from a period of economic ``malaise'' to a period of economic opportunity. Our task is to consolidate and extend these gains.

The rate of growth of Federal spending has been reduced from 14.8 percent in fiscal 1981 to an average rate of 9.1 percent in fiscal years 1982 through 1985. During this period, however, current dollar gross national product has increased at an average rate of 7.6 percent. The continued growth of the Federal spending share of gross national product and lost revenues from the recession are the main reasons we are now faced with such large Federal deficits.

The projected Federal deficits are much too large, and they must be reduced. As explained in the accompanying report, however, the economic consequences of reducing these deficits depend critically on how they are reduced. A sustained reduction of the growth of Federal spending will contribute to economic growth, while an increase in tax rates would constrain economic growth.

My fiscal 1986 budget proposal will protect the social safety net and essential programs, such as defense, for which the Federal Government has a clear constitutional responsibility, and will reform or eliminate many programs that have proven ineffective or nonessential. With no resort to a tax increase, this budget will reduce the deficit to about 4 percent of gross national product in fiscal 1986 and to a steadily lower percentage in future years. Additional spending reductions will probably be necessary in future years to achieve a balanced budget by the end of the decade.

The problems of excessive spending and deficits are not new. In the absence of fundamental reform, they may recur again and again in the future. I therefore support two important measures -- one to authorize the President to veto individual line items in comprehensive spending bills, and another to constrain the Federal authority to borrow or to increase spending in the absence of broad congressional support. These structural changes are not substitutes for the hard fiscal choices that will be necessary in 1985 and beyond, nor for the need to simplify our tax system to stimulate greater growth; but they are important to provide the mechanisms and discipline for longer term fiscal health.

The case for a line-item veto should by now be obvious. The Governors of 43 States have used this authority effectively, and such authority has only once been withdrawn, only later to be reinstated. For over a century, Presidents of both parties have requested such authority.

The proposed constitutional amendment providing for a balanced budget and a tax limitation would constrain the long-run growth of Federal spending and the national debt. In 1982 a proposed amendment to constrain Federal authority to spend and borrow was approved by more than two-thirds of the Senate and by more than a majority of the House of Representatives; a balanced budget amendment has also been endorsed by the legislatures of 32 States. Approval of the proposed balanced budget/tax limitation amendment would ensure that fiscal decisions by future Presidents and Members of Congress are more responsive to the broad interests of the American population.

The Economic Recovery Tax Act of 1981 was one of the most important accomplishments of my first term. Individual income tax rates were reduced by nearly 25 percent, effective tax rates on the income from new investment were substantially reduced, and beginning this year tax brackets are adjusted for inflation.

At my request, the Treasury Department has developed a comprehensive proposal to simplify and reform the Federal tax system, one that for expected economic conditions would yield about the same revenues as the present system. This proposal, by substantially broadening the tax base, would permit a significant further reduction of marginal tax rates. Shortly, I will be submitting my own proposal for tax simplification, and will urge the Congress to give serious sustained attention to tax simplification -- in order to enact a program that will increase fairness and stimulate future savings, investment, and growth.

We have made major efforts in the past 4 years to reduce and eliminate Federal regulation of economic activity. Executive Office review of new regulations was streamlined. Oil prices were deregulated by Executive authority early in 1981. New legislation was approved to reduce regulation of banking and to largely eliminate regulation of interstate bus travel.

Regulatory reform, however, has been painfully slow. The Congress failed to approve our proposals to further deregulate banking and natural gas prices, and to reform the regulation of private pensions. In addition, the reauthorization of several major environmental laws has been delayed for several years.

I urge the Congress to consider further deregulation efforts in several areas. The experience with deregulation of oil prices makes clear that continued regulation of natural gas prices is not appropriate. Reform of nuclear licensing requirements also deserves attention. Further deregulation of the banking system should be paired with a major reform of the deposit insurance systems. Some changes in the single-employer pension law and an increased premium are necessary to preserve the pension insurance system. We should also seriously consider eliminating the remaining Federal regulation of trucking and railroads. Finally, I remain hopeful that the Administration and the Congress can work together to reauthorize the major environmental laws in a way that serves our common environmental and economic goals.

Congress has delegated this authority to the Federal Reserve System. The role of the executive branch is restricted to advising the Congress and the Federal Reserve about the conduct of monetary policy, and to nominating members of the Board of Governors as positions become vacant.

During my first term, the Federal Reserve reduced the rate of money growth relative to the high rates of the late 1970s. This change in policy, assisted by the related strong increase in the exchange value of the dollar, helped produce a substantial reduction of inflation and market interest rates. On occasion, however, the rate of money growth has been quite volatile, contributing to instability in interest rates and a decline in economic activity. The sharp reduction in money growth through mid-1982, for example, undoubtedly added to the length and severity of the 1981 - 1982 recession. And a similar reduction in money growth in the second half of 1984 contributed to the temporary slowing of economic growth late in the year.

We reaffirm our support for a sound monetary policy that contributes to strong, steady economic growth and price stability. Moreover, we expect to cooperate closely with the Federal Reserve in defining and carrying out a prudent and predictable monetary policy.

The Federal Government has only a few important economic responsibilities. Given a proper conduct of these important roles, additional Federal intervention is more often a part of the problem than a part of the solution. We should continue to reduce the many less-important economic activities of the Federal Government so that individuals, private institutions, and State and local governments will have more resources and more freedom to pursue their own interests.

The President today announced the appointment of Frederick J. Ryan, Jr., to be Deputy Assistant to the President. He will be responsible for the White House Office of Private Sector Initiatives, as well as continuing to serve in his current position as Director of Presidential Appointments and Scheduling.

America rejoices in the energy, the imagination, and the promise of her young people. Whether in voluntary service, athletics, education, music, military service or within the family, young Americans display an enthusiasm, creativity, idealism, and dedication that have accomplished so much for our society and the world. Their patriotism and commitment to peace with freedom ensure a vigorous American democracy and a safer world in the years ahead.

In 1985 the United States joins the celebration of United Nations' International Youth Year. If we are to honor the potential of America's youth, we must remember that the most powerful force for progress comes not from governments or public programs, but from the vital traditions of a free people. Parents, youth organizations, and teachers deserve our support, encouragement, and thanks for the indispensable role they play in fostering and strengthening these traditions.

History makes clear that progress is swiftest when people are free to worship, create, and build -- when they can determine their own destiny and benefit from their own initiative. The dream of human progress through freedom is still the most revolutionary idea in the world, and it is still the most successful. It is the priceless heritage America bestows on each new generation, with the hope that succeeding generations the world over will come to better know its fruits.

America's proudest ambassadors of goodwill and our national values. One such opportunity is being offered by the people of Jamaica as they host the first-ever International Youth Conference in early April. The Conference will enable young Americans to discuss with their peers in other countries ways in which they can help shape the world of tomorrow.

Let all of us approach this year dedicated to youth by resolving to use our God-given talents and freedom to elevate our ideals, deepen our understanding, and strengthen our determination to make this world a better place for ourselves and for the generations of young people who will follow.

The President. Well, the only thing that has happened that disturbs that is the New Zealand position on our vessels there and the right of entry at the ports. But, other than that, I think our ANZUS alliance is very sound and very solid. And I think the presence here of the first head of state, in the new term, the Prime Minister of Australia, is evidence of that.

A successful west coast business executive for the past 15 years, Mr. Tuttle served as president of three automobile dealerships in Los Angeles and Tucson prior to accepting his position on the White House staff.

An active member of the California Republican Party, Mr. Tuttle served as chairman of the budget and expenditures committee and deputy finance chairman and was a member of the executive committee. In 1980 he was cochairman of the California Reagan for President Committee.

Mr. Tuttle's civic and community involvement include service as a member of the national board of directors of the Boys Clubs of America, chairman of the board of Curtis School, and a member of the board of directors of the Los Angeles Red Cross and the Los Angeles Motor Car Dealers Association.

The President. Prime Minister Bob Hawke, it was a pleasure to meet with you today, the first head of state to visit us since the inauguration. And this, I understand, is also your first trip abroad since your own reelection. We're each getting our new terms started by sitting down and talking with a good friend.

I cannot overstate the value America places on our friendship with Australia. We share a commitment to democratic ideals. In fact, at the heart of our election process is the secret ballot, which, by no coincidence, was referred to as the Australian ballot when it was first introduced into our country.

We've stood together through trials and tribulations. We've rejoiced together in triumph. And now, as Australia approaches its bicentennial in 1988, the United States Government and private sector will play an active part in that historic event.

As a key ally and a vital voice in world affairs, Australia makes a significant contribution to the way that we approach international challenges. My conversations with Prime Minister Hawke today reflected the serious consideration with which we take Australia's views in national interest.

Much of our consultation was focused on arms control. Prime Minister Hawke made clear the importance of this issue to the Australian people, and it is no less so for us. I reiterated my sincere desire to achieve deep reductions in nuclear arms, as a giant first step toward eliminating them altogether.

On regional issues, we reaffirmed our strong belief in cooperation among Pacific States to maintain secure, prosperous, and democratic societies. Prime Minister Hawke and I agreed that strength and unity of purpose will give the West the leverage it needs to achieve effective and verifiable arms reductions with the Soviet Union.

We consider that close and comprehensive interaction among ANZUS members on political, economic, and defense matters is central to the continued effectiveness of the ANZUS alliance. In particular, continued military cooperation is essential to maintenance of the alliance's integrity and strength.

We consider New Zealand a friend. It's our deepest hope that New Zealand will restore the traditional cooperation that has existed between our two countries. Allies must work together as partners to meet their shared responsibilities. The security which we derive from these arrangements is at the foundation of the growing prosperity we share.

Prime Minister Hawke and I were very pleased to discuss the economic good news coming from both our countries and many others around the world. The global economy is picking up steam, and we're happy to have played a part in that recovery.

But this is my first overseas visit since our elections, and that we have the honor to be the first official visitors here since your second inauguration point up the prime importance of our personal relationship and those between our governments and between our countries.

The timing of our talks has not just been of symbolic significance but has added greatly to their substantive value. We have again found an extensive coincidence of preoccupations and of priorities in managing our respective foreign and domestic affairs.

You have just launched a budgetary process which will have great significance for the international community. Both our governments face the task of maintaining the strong growth that both the United States and Australia have recently enjoyed. And we shall both be tackling this on a number of fronts during 1985.

One aspect -- an important one -- of the ANZUS relationship has become a matter of close concern to us both and will require continuing consultation. Let me say, first, that the relationship between Australia and the United States under the ANZUS treaty and the rights and obligations assumed by us under the treaty are undiminished by recent events. Your statement accurately reflects the position. The ANZUS treaty remains; the fundamental importance of cooperation within it has been reaffirmed here today.

Similarly, we have reaffirmed the need for solidarity and common purpose in pursuit of arms reductions. I congratulate you again on reaching agreement with the Soviet Union to enter into the forthcoming round of negotiations and on the approach you have taken to that agreement.

We will continue both nationally and in the established pattern of partnership with you to make our contribution to Western security in every way open and acceptable to us. We will do so against the basic criteria that a situation of stable deterrence, despite its defects, is necessary in order to produce progress on disarmament.

I said, Mr. President, at the outset that the timing of our talks was important. I believe we have been successful in bringing steady consideration to the issues before us. In the process, we have once more tested and proved our ability to work closely together.

One of the continuing strengths of a mature relationship is that neither seeks from the other a complete conformity of views and actions. But we have shown, once again, the capacity to respond to each other's needs in the pursuit of major objectives on which we have the widest measure of agreement.

I thank you, also, Mr. President, for the kind reception which you and Mrs. Reagan have given to me and to my wife. I look forward to continued meetings with you and members of your administration, whether up here or down under.

Q. Last night, you enthusiastically endorsed the tax simplification concept and said you've instructed the Treasury to fashion a final bill. The word from some parts of the business community is that one part of that deal has already been struck; namely, that you will change the Treasury proposals and continue favorable capital gains tax treatment and accelerated depreciation and in return that you would continue the present taxation of dividends. Is that the general direction you wish to head?

The President. Well, let me just say about that that I'm hard put to answer a specific question of that kind. We were faced with the two problems: the one of what we want, the tax reform; the other with the necessity of coming in with the budget. We have been long hours around that Cabinet table on the budget matter and, finally, have now submitted it. We have not yet begun that process on the tax program.

I think, as I've said before, I think that Treasury study was probably the finest and broadest study that's been made of the tax structure that I can ever remember. And I hesitate to give any opinion on any single thing until -- again, those of us who've sat around the table on the budget are going to sit around that same table now on the tax program and go at every facet of it. I think we recognize that in that study -- I don't think anyone has said, ``Why, buy this entirely as it is'' -- we recognize there are things in there that are options.

The President. Yes. And, so, I think that this'll be one of the points that will be very much discussed, because the whole aim of both of these things -- well, in addition to the tax reform being necessary to eliminate a lot of unfairness -- and the biggest unfairness of all is the complexity of the present tax system -- but, in addition to that, we're looking to these both as things necessary for economic growth. And, therefore, we're going to look at this tax proposal and at anything as to whether it could contribute to economic growth or whether it could set economic growth back.

Q. Well, let me ask another concept question, then. You said last night that the individual tax rates would be no higher than 35 percent, perhaps even lower. Well, the way the Treasury proposal lowers individual tax rates is by increasing corporate taxes by 37 percent. Again, as a concept, do you generally favor that approach of individual versus corporate taxes?

Q. No, but overall corporate taxes would go up about 37 percent. Not the rates, but overall corporate taxes would go up about 37 percent under the Treasury proposal while individual taxes would come down. Is that a general approach that you endorse?

The President. I, as I say, I haven't even made an attempt to study that bill in detail that much to know that. I assume that that would mean things that would be taken away from them that are present deductions. No. I would have to be convinced of the need to do that, because I'm a believer that one day we must recognize that only people pay taxes. And someday I would hope that we could arrive at a tax structure that would recognize that you can't tax things; you only tax people.

Let me turn that around and ask: If the bill is modified to meet the objections of some critics, whether it's from the business community or elsewhere, could it be that the bill would be a revenue loser? And would that be acceptable to you?

The President. Well, no. I think what we're talking about here is a tax reform, and you're striving for neutrality in this. Now, in that kind of a reform, I'm also sure that there are going to be some people, obviously, who are going to pay more tax than they're paying now.

But, then, you're talking about people who are unfairly not paying a share of the tax today. And if you -- the aim of this kind of a tax program, and I think this is true of all three of the proposals that are now before us -- the two that are up in the Congress now, plus this Treasury report -- I think it is true that one of the targets there is the large amount of tax that is not being paid, many times legally, by virtue of the complexities of the present tax laws, in which some who fairly should be paying a share are avoiding it. And with the simplification comes a straightening out of that kind of a problem.

Q. Let me try one more tax question, sir. You also spoke favorably about the notion of lowering rates and, as you just said, broadening the base by eliminating many exemptions. But right after you did that, you then called for two new exemptions; namely, enterprise zones and tuition tax credits. Doesn't that just encourage others to try to carve out their own special places for their own pet writeoffs and threaten to unravel that whole concept of lowering the base by broadening -- or lowering the rates by broadening the base?

The President. Well, if you're trying to make a tax program more fair, which is also part of this proposal -- take the issue you've raised of tuition tax credits. Here you have, I think, a very broad -- based on fairness in the country -- you've got people who are compelled to send their children to school under the law, because we believe that a democracy can only exist if you have a literate citizenry. And yet these people who, if they choose or feel they can get a better education for their children, choose a private or parochial school, independent school of some kind, they pay the full cost of sending their child to that school. But at the same time, they're paying the full cost that parents of children are paying -- they're paying that in taxes to support the public school system.

Now, if you stop and think what the additional cost to public schools would be if suddenly the independent schools closed and all those students were turned over to the educational market -- and it would not mean an increase in revenues for public education, because already they're getting the money from those parents -- you could see what a burden this would be.

Well, it seems to me that it's only fair that some parent -- as a matter of fact, the ultimate fairness would be educational vouchers. Does government properly support a school system, or does it provide the funds directly to the students to get an education? And there would be public schools available; there would be independent schools available. They could take that voucher and go where they want, and you put competition back into education.

Q. Mr. President, on the politics of tax simplification, the general idea doesn't seem to have a lot of support among the Senate Republican leadership, and the business community has its problems with some of the provisions. What can you do, personally, to turn around the opposition from these kinds of people who are normally in your corner on things?

The President. Oh. Well, I think that there are some people, simply on the basis of what was revealed of the Treasury Department study, that read into it things they thought were inimical to their interests and immediately took off. But I think in many instances, when you sat down with those people and pointed out what the change in rates did, some of their hostility disappeared.

I think the most important thing that we're going to face is, once we have settled on and agreed on a package that we believe is fair and is the reform that is needed, is then to make sure there's no misunderstanding or lack of understanding of what it will actually mean to the taxpayer.

Basically, we found that the overwhelming majority of people were going to get a sizable decrease in taxes, based roughly on this setup, and that those that weren't were going to get an increase were people who, as I say, are not presently paying their fair share.

Q. More generally on the economy, you've made it pretty clear that you believe that we're on the brink of a sustained economic boom. Are you worried that this might be cut short by the Federal Reserve? And would you like to have a greater say in Federal Reserve policy?

The President. Well, we try to work very closely, as closely as we can, with the Federal Reserve on this. And they know what it is that we feel is the sound policy. And so far, I must say, right now they're on target -- and that is we need a money supply that is commensurate to the growth in the economy and to continue that growth without inflation. And that provides two lines between which you must stay. And so far, as I say, right now they're right on target with that.

The President. I think there were some times when it fluctuated widely and when they got well below their target and all. But, as I say, we're trying to stay in close touch with them. And I think we've made it plain what we believe.

Q. If we could shift to foreign policy for a moment. Your administration is obviously headed into a battle with Congress over the aid to the contra forces in Nicaragua. Last night, you said that aid was necessary to our own self-defense. What I keep wondering is, would you like to see the contras actually overthrow the Sandinista government? And, if not, what's the purpose of aiding them?

The President. The purpose of aiding them is to aid literally the people of Nicaragua, who are striving to get the government that the revolution promised them. If you'll recall during the revolution, the revolutionary forces appealed to the Organization of American States for help.

And they asked the Organization if they would please try to persuade Somoza to step down and, thus, end the bloodshed. And, in return for this, they gave the Organization of American States the declaration of principles of what it was they were seeking in the revolution. And this was pure democracy. This was all the civil rights and human rights, freedom of speech, freedom of labor unions, freedom of religion, and all of these things.

Now, what happened we saw happen once before with Castro's coming to power in Cuba. He had other allies that wanted a democracy, and he never admitted to his true leanings until that revolution was over.

Well, what happened was the faction known as the Sandinistas took over. They ousted a number of other revolutionary leaders; some of them were exiled; some, I think, were done away with; some imprisoned.

The President. Well, when you answer a question that simply, though, and you come back, then, you see, you get into the thing -- well, are you talking about individuals or are you talking -- you're talking about the governmental form. Now, if that governmental form can come by way of the people who are presently in that government and who then will be willing to stand for elections at appropriate times, that's fine. But that's what it's really all about, is getting the revolution the people fought for.

The President. Well, I think you're putting some apples and oranges together there. The Carter situation was not dealing with unknown, hidden terrorists. They were dealing with a legitimate government, and not a very good government, but -- [laughter] -- at least it was the government of the nation. You knew who you were dealing with; you were dealing with a national entity.

The problem with terrorism so far and why, as I've said, much of the answer lies in what we're going forward with now, and that is better relationships with all the other democracies to where we'll make extradition easy, we'll exchange intelligence information. There are two ways you could deal with terrorism, and one of them is terrorism itself.

Suppose in revenge, just on the basis that you think some people of a certain group or sect or belief did this, and then you strike back and perform the same kind of brutal crimes against some of those people, without any knowledge or assurance that you're getting the people who perpetrated the first crime. Well, that's no way to fight, and we don't believe in that.

The thing is, you have to find an ability to locate the source, if possible; obviously, the best way is if you can infiltrate and then get some advanced information on when they're going to strike -- be prepared for them.

Embassy, was nothing but some suspicion of a certain locale in Lebanon, and yet there was no way to sort that out or separate it out from a community of other people and no way to strike back without causing a lot of innocents to die.

And what we now, I think, are looking at is the possibility that some terrorists actually do have national support and backing. Then, with that established, then you can let that government know that there is going to be redress against that government if these acts continue.

Q. On the broad question of arms control and the U.S.-Soviet relationship, you talk about arms control agreements with deep cuts and offensive weapons and extensive verification. When you do that -- aren't you really asking the Soviet Union to become an entirely different kind of country? And can we really expect that in our lifetimes?

The President. Well, I'm not going to be euphoric about this, but I do think that one of the things we have going for us at this time, that hasn't been present in much of our previous negotiations, is that we go to the table now in a situation in which you're not going there looking at the Soviets as if, ``Well, they're people just like us, and maybe if we talk sweetly enough, why they will be conned into being nice, too.'' No. The only way you're ever going to succeed in negotiations is if you can go there with a situation in which it is to their practical interest also, that their interests are served by coming to an agreement.

The President. Sort of -- all right. But a cartoon one day and it -- right back early on in our military rebuilding -- and it was two Russian generals, and one of them was saying to the other, ``I liked the arms race better when we were the only ones in it.'' And I think that's been the situation over a number of years.

Q. On the military buildup, one of the prominent things is the Strategic Defense Initiative. And would you continue to favor this, even if your own scientists concluded that it could never be leak-proof and that even a few missiles would always get through and destroy cities?

The President. Oh, I've never asked for 100 percent. That would be a fine goal, but you can have a most effective defensive weapon even if it isn't 100 percent, because what you would have is the knowledge that -- or that the other fellow would have the knowledge that if they launched a first strike, that it might be such that not enough of their missiles could get through, and in return we could launch the retaliatory strike.

Now, that isn't really the goal of the Strategic Defense Initiative. I tie that to what I think is the goal of these arms negotiations. The Soviet Union -- Chernenko and Gromyko both have publicly stated that they would like to see the elimination, ultimately, of nuclear weapons. All right, they've said it. That's what our goal is.

If we come up with such a weapon, we're not going to stand there and say: ``Okay, now we've got you. We can launch the first attack.'' I don't think this country is ever in a position where it wants to do that. We don't start wars. We have no intention of starting one now. But what we would then be able to say to them is: ``Look, we're willing to join you. We'll do away with ours.

Q. Just a quick one. Leaving aside David Stockman's indelicate remarks about the military caring more about their pensions than the security, for which he's apologized, do you agree with the substance of his remarks that the system of military retirement benefits is bloated and the taxpayers shouldn't be bailing out farmers who took out bad loans?

The President. Well, right now, we're offering a program in which we're hopeful that we can salvage some of those farmers. The situation we're facing today with those farmers is one other people in other lines of work have faced, and it's the result of ending an era of building your business on expected inflation. And farmland, unfortunately, was one of those things that, in an inflationary world, zoomed in value. And then they borrowed on the basis of that as security. And when we were successful in bringing down inflation, one of the first things that happened was the nose-diving of that land.

The President. No. I have to think this is a little different than any other pension program you want to name -- the military. They go into a profession or a business -- profession is the word; I guess it should be used -- in which they know that, say, in a matter of a certain number of years, even though in any other line of activity they would be literally at their prime -- your business or mine or anything else -- but they know that the physical requirements are such that they're going to be out.

The President. I think just one of the most wonderful things to see and to hear is to hear my own words coming back at me from over those years by a few Democrats right now, who suddenly have discovered deficits. And yet for 50 years, with the exception of about 4 years in that 50, they have controlled the Congress of the United States.

The President. No, what they can do is get to a point in which the total debt -- and remember, with all their moaning and crying, the national debt was about a trillion dollars when I came into office. And the first of those major big deficit increases occurred after I was in office. However, it was not my responsibility, because your first 8 months in office, you're on the other fellow's budget. I don't come into office and declare how much we can spend. The budget is there until the following October. In fact, when the bottom fell out of the economy in July of '81, not one facet of my economic program had been passed as yet. So, it couldn't have had anything to do with that deficit.

But what is happening now indicates the danger that over the 50 years, the situation keeps getting worse. And let me give you one. When we put into effect the War on Poverty, which started in the last half of the sixties and ran through the seventies -- and poverty won, because the rate of increase in people in poverty increased in spite of the War on Poverty and all those great programs -- but in the 15 years from 1965 to 1980, the budgets multiplied to 5 times what they were; the deficit went to 38 times what it had been.

So, you've got a built-in, structural deficit. And the President -- to call it the President's budget -- the President is responsible for submitting to the Congress what they have required in the programs they have legislated. And the Congress, in turn, when the President -- and this is the situation a President's in -- when the President submits and says, ``We can run this program for this amount of money,'' and it's less than what the Congress thinks you should, the Congress insists that you spend more money. And they even tell you that if at the end of the year there's any money left, you're going to have to spend it before the end of the year. This is a structural problem.

And, of course, it's multiplied, and it's gotten worse. And a large part of this had to do with the great fall into recession that occurred in '81 and through '82. And so, there's no question that we're going to be better off and there's not going to be inflation on the things that bother us if we get government back to where 43 States or so have it, and that is that you can't spend more than government takes in.

I'm delighted to be able to help celebrate the 75th anniversary of the Boy Scouts of America. I'm delighted to celebrate anything that's older than I am -- [laughter] -- but 75 years of unparalleled service to the youth and the families and the communities of our nation.

On Inauguration Day I spoke of the American sound -- those symbols of our democracy and echoes of our past that give us purpose and guide us forward. And I said that sound -- our heritage, our song -- is hopeful, big-hearted, idealistic, daring, decent, and fair. And you know, come to think of it, I could have added trustworthy, loyal, helpful, friendly, courteous, kind, and the rest of the Scout law, because the Boy Scouts of America and the values that you hold close are an important part of the American sound and have been for 75 proud years.

But this particular youngster from the Lower East Side found the Boy Scouts. He was challenged to learn positive values -- leadership, camping, fitness. Aaron took up the challenge and gained in moral strength, confidence, and ambition. He became a successful attorney. And his son became the second Eagle Scout in the family.

You know, America sure turns out winners. And much of the credit belongs to organizations like the Boy Scouts. And so it's not surprising that yesterday's Scouts have helped to shape our today -- in business, government, the media, science, medicine, education, show business, and -- well, the list goes on and on.

But you can be certain that today's Scouts will help shape America. And when they do, I'll bet there'll be Scouts like the ones who are with us today, like Randy Reed of nearby Vienna, Virginia. Two days ago Randy received the Boy Scouts highest and rarest award -- the Honor Medal for Lifesaving with Crossed Palms for extraordinary heroism.

And he's not alone. I've just been sitting beside a young man here, Freddie Hill, who also is wearing that medal very proudly. But Randy, also, at the extreme risk of his own life, rescued a young man who had slipped, who had struck his head and fell unconscious, wedged between rocks in 14 feet of murky water. With great bravery and skill, Randy did everything his Scout training would tell him to do and more. And, Randy, congratulations and God bless you.

Thank you. Well, it's easy to understand why the Boy Scout badge, the American eagle superimposed on the north sign of the mariners compass, means Follow me, I know the way. The Boy Scouts of America do know the way, the way to set high standards and how to live by them, and the way to build character, train in citizenship, and foster fitness of mind and body.

And here's one last thought: Without the thousands of adult leaders, corporate sponsors, and other caring Americans, it would not be possible for young Americans to capture the Scouting spirit and the special joys of camping, fellowship, service, and love of country.

The President today announced his intention to nominate the following individuals to be members of the Board of Directors of the National Institute of Building Sciences for terms expiring September 7, 1987. These are reappointments.

Last Wednesday night I spoke to you about the great days that lie ahead for America if we do what we must to continue our economic expansion, creating new freedom and opportunities for people and uniting across party lines to keep bringing government spending growth down.

Since the beginning of 1983, when all the elements of our tax program were finally in place, our economy has burst ahead with 2 straight years of economic growth, leaving inflation and all the experts' pessimistic predictions in the dust. America did not win such a dramatic victory just to declare defeat.

Today we're poised on the launching pad of the future. We can make these next 4 years the greatest victories for growth, opportunity, and freedom America has ever known. Let me repeat what you know in your hearts and what has been the great guiding force of our philosophy from the very beginning: There are no limits to growth, no constraints on how strong America can become if all of you are set free.

You elected us to get results, and we, as leaders, must show courage and imagination worthy of you: leadership for a growth economy that provides new and greater incentives and keeps inflation and interest rates heading down; leadership to bring forth economic opportunity in the inner cities, resurgence in our industrial heartland, new productivity and technological breakthroughs, and help for farmers in distress from past government failures in this time of transition to a market-oriented economy.

Already we're hearing old, familiar voices telling us to slow down, prepare to slash the defense budget, and raise taxes -- all in the name of reducing projected budget deficits. Well, those arguments were rejected on November 6th. The single best deficit program is an all-out push for economic growth.

So, let's make one thing plain at the outset of the new term. We're raring to go. We have no intention of sitting at the starting gate. We're going to begin working now and pushing hard, in the Congress and across the country, for initiatives like tax simplification, enterprise zones, and the youth employment opportunity wage to help America reach her full potential.

As we lift America onto a stronger growth path, with more businesses starting up, more investments made, and more people employed and paying taxes, we will reduce the need for government spending on many of today's support programs.

The budget I've sent to the Congress this year calls for an absolute freeze on overall government program spending at the fiscal 1985 level of approximately $804 billion, excluding debt service costs. Now, I know that there'll be differences of opinion on how to achieve this freeze. But if the Congress will work with us in a spirit of cooperation and compromise, then together we can bring our budget under control without damaging the economy or endangering national security. I urge the Congress to move quickly on a spending cut package that will reduce overall government spending growth. I hope our energies will be spent finding ways that we can reduce spending, rather than finding reasons why we cannot.

Other reforms are needed. I've often mentioned a constitutional amendment mandating a balanced budget and a line-item veto to cut individual items in overall appropriation bills. But elsewhere, our efforts to reduce bureaucracy through efficiencies and reductions in unnecessary personnel have been thwarted by congressionally mandated employment levels for certain programs. Our managers could get the job done just as well with fewer employees, but their hands are tied.

The executive branch has also been thwarted by legislative restraints from having its commercial-type activities -- cafeterias and the like -- handled by private businesses, which can run them less expensively than government.

And a President's power to limit spending himself is also restricted to the Congress. Once an appropriations bill has been signed into law, the President must spend all that money, even if he believes certain items are unnecessary. I continue to urge the Congress to give me the authority for line-item vetoes.

King Fahd's visit is in keeping with the warm, personal relations enjoyed between the leaders of our two countries, a tradition which began 40 years ago this week when King Fahd's father and President Franklin Roosevelt met to exchange views. The good will that emerged from that meeting of two great men has enormously benefited both our peoples in the last four decades.

The friendship and cooperation between our governments and people are precious jewels whose value we should never underestimate. The positive nature of our relations demonstrates that cultural differences, as distinct as our own, need not separate or alienate peoples from one another.

As the guardians of Mecca and the protectors of your faith, you rightfully exert a strong moral influence in the world of Islam, and the people of the United States are proud of their leadership role among the democratic nations.

King Fahd, I hope that we can work together to seek a new rapprochement between the Islamic world and the Western democracies. Destiny has given us different political and social systems, yet with respect and good will, as our two countries have demonstrated, so much can be accomplished.

I firmly believe that in the years ahead, there should be and will be a more powerful recognition of the common interests shared by these two significant world forces. Already, the bonds of commerce are strong, especially between our two countries. Petroleum from Saudi wells helps drive the engines of progress in the United States, while at the same moment, American technology and know-how help in the construction of Saudi roads, hospitals, and communications systems.

Their many humanitarian contributions touch us deeply, as well. Saudi aid to refugees uprooted from their homes in Afghanistan has not gone unnoticed here, Your Majesty. The people of the United States share with the people of Saudi Arabia a deep moral outrage over the continuing aggression and butchery taking place in Afghanistan. The citizens of the Western democracies and the Muslim world, by all that they believe to be true and just, should stand together in opposition to those who would impose dictatorship on all of mankind.

Marxist tyranny already has its grip on the religious freedom of the world's fifth largest Muslim population. This same grip strangles the prayers of Christians, Jews, and Muslims alike. We all worship the same God. Standing up to this onslaught, the people of Afghanistan, with their blood, courage, and faith, are an inspiration to the cause of freedom everywhere.

Afghanistan, of course, is not the only conflict in the region. We're also concerned about the tragic war between two of Saudi Arabia's neighbors -- Iran and Iraq -- a conflict that is raging only a few minutes by air from Saudi territory. This bloodshed has dragged on far too long and threatens peace throughout the region. The United States will do what we can, diplomatically, to end the fighting. And we will cooperate with Saudi Arabia to ensure the integrity of your borders.

Your Majesty, I look forward to our discussions about these and other serious problems which continue to plague the Middle East. Together, our considerable influence and our moral suasion can, at the very least, decrease the threat of war.

Resolution 242, is within reach. The security of Israel and other nations of the region and the legitimate rights of the Palestinian people can and should be addressed in direct negotiations. It is time to put this tragedy to rest and turn the page to a new and happier chapter.

Sa`ud and the late President Franklin Roosevelt 40 years ago this month, the leaders of our two countries have continued to meet from time to time to discuss ways of promoting friendship and cooperation between our two countries and to consult and exchange views on international matters of mutual interest. This visit to your friendly country takes place in this same context.

World War, to the time when the majority of the Arab countries were suffering under the yoke of colonialism; when your country affirmed the principles that advocated the right of peoples to freedom, independence, and self-determination.

At that time, when the name of the United States stood for freedom, justice, and independence, the aspirations of the Arab peoples were directed toward your country as the defender of truth and justice. Now we are in a new era in which the United States reaffirms those principles, this time under your leadership, Mr. President.

Mr. President, the majority of the Arab countries gained their freedom and independence, with the exception of one people -- the Palestinian people, who committed no wrong that could justify what has befallen them. The Palestinians, who were never aggressors or invaders, found themselves, through no fault of their own, the victims of unjust aggression.

The Palestinian question is the single problem that is of paramount concern to the whole Arab nation and affects the relations of its peoples and countries with the outside world. It is the one problem that is the root cause of instability and turmoil in the region. I hope, Mr. President, that your administration will support the just cause of the Palestinian people.

We only ask for a just position that conforms with the history and ideals of your great country, a position that is consonant with its role of leadership in the international community. Such a position will earn the United States the respect and appreciation not only of the Arab and Muslim worlds but also of freedom-loving peoples everywhere.

Similarly, the problem of Lebanon needs to be addressed in such a way that would guarantee the withdrawal of Israel from Lebanese territory and the achievement of Lebanon's sovereignty, territorial integrity, and full independence.

Mr. President, I do not wish to be long, but I would like to say in conclusion that it is, indeed, a pleasure to have this opportunity to congratulate you on the full confidence that your people have placed in you by supporting your Presidency for a second term. This clearly demonstrates the extent of the confidence your people have in your wise leadership and your farsightedness.

The security of our people, the primary responsibility of the Federal government, is accomplished through the complementary objectives of a strong defense capability and unambiguous and credible arms control agreements. While we have made substantial progress in rebuilding our defenses during the past four years, progress in arms control has not kept pace.

It is my intention in the next four years to do everything possible to find practical arrangements with the Soviet Union that will sharply reduce nuclear weapons. Arms control negotiations are surely the best way for pursuing such important objectives, and thus, I view with the utmost seriousness the negotiating commitments made with the Soviet Union four weeks ago in Geneva.

In addition to these new bilateral arms control efforts, a number of multilateral activities play significant roles in our comprehensive arms control program. For example, discussions are being directed to banning chemical weapons and to reaching agreement on measures that will build confidence in understanding the activities and intentions of adversaries. This 24th Annual Report of the United States Arms Control and Disarmament Agency describes these and all the many facets of the Administration's 1984 program. I am pleased to forward it to the Congress.

It was my honor today to renew my friendship with King Fahd. And when we last met in Cancun, it was a bit warmer, but, Your Majesty, I only hope the warmth of our hospitality helps make up for the coldness outside.

King Fahd and the Saudi Royal Family, reflecting the values at the heart of their society, have been sharing and generous leaders. In addition to their humanitarian aid throughout the world, they contribute to such cultural and educational institutions as the American University in Beirut, for example. And closer to home, when fire destroyed a major cultural facility at Wolf Trap here in Washington, threatening to short-circuit an entire theatrical season, the Saudi Embassy quickly located a huge tent and had it flown to Washington, and the show went on. In 1977 Terraset Elementary School in Reston, Virginia, received a solar heating system dedicated by none other than our guest of honor this evening.

King Fahd's exuberance for getting involved is well known. He's maintained the rich tradition of the majlis [council], meeting directly with his people, listening to their ideas as often as not to their problems.

Arabia's soccer team. And, Your Majesty, I understand that you have, on occasion, gone so far as to call the coach and offer suggestions. [Laughter] Being a former radio sportscaster, I'd love to do that. However, in this country, they only permit me to call them after the game is over.

But there's an Arab saying: The sands are blowing. And I submit to you, King Fahd, that if the sands of time give us any hint of the future, it is that in the days ahead the friendship between the Saudi Arabian and American people will be a strong and vital force in the world and that the future of the Middle East is one of peace.

Saudi Arabia. [Laughter] As a matter of fact, just exactly as the President said, this is true, because I follow the news of sports in my country, and, therefore, the Saudi soccer team was first among all the Asian countries and became the only candidate as far as a candidate for the Olympics in Los Angeles this past summer. The Saudi soccer team came to Los Angeles, but it was not lucky enough in order to win any medals. But the most important thing is that the team participated in Los Angeles, and it showed the world that Saudi Arabia cares about athletics and sports. And the team found all kinds of reception and greetings from this good people in the United States.

We did not claim that we were going to win the cup, but the Saudi team won two cups instead of one -- [laughter] -- the African Cup and also the goalie won the cup for the most valuable player or the best goalie in those games and tournaments.

Of course, in the past, only 5 years ago, we were defeated. As a matter of fact, I have adopted sports in my country, not only soccer but many other sports and athletics. Now we have 125 athletic clubs. Those clubs practice all kinds of sports, including soccer. And we also hope that we will be able to participate in many international tournaments in the future.

Furthermore, there is another soccer team for those who are 18- or 19-year-olds. It has won all the tournaments, and there are only four countries left that it is going to face. And we believe that we are going to defeat those also. [Laughter] When this takes place in Abu Dhabi, in the United Arab Emirates, and faces those four countries, it will go to Moscow. We don't know whether the members of the team will come back as Communists to us or not. [Laughter] But I believe that our team will meet millions of Muslims there in the Soviet Union, so I don't know whether the Soviets will allow the Saudi flag to flutter and to be raised, because the wordings on the flag says, ``There is no God but the God and Mohammed is His only Prophet.'' What is important, that we are going to have matches in China and in Moscow. If this proves anything, it proves that the level of sports in Saudi Arabia is rather good.

And in conclusion, before I finish what I have to say with these limited remarks, I would like to thank His Excellency, my friend, President Reagan, and Mrs. Reagan and all my dear friends assembled here.

Therefore, what I would like to say, that there are many levels of relationships between our two countries. Be they political, economic, or social, they all indicate the strong ties of friendship between our two countries.

When we are in need of any product that is produced by the United States, be it in the field of technology or otherwise, that means we are in need of this, and we will work to get it. The reason we try to acquire these things, because we consider ourselves as friends of the United States. Our aim, of course, is we want peace and stability for our region in the Middle East, and we want for all people to live in peace.

I forgot to mention something important earlier, and that is that we have about 13,000 of our sons that are studying in American colleges and universities. And they all find very good treatment. I am sure that some of them are probably -- who have study in the United States, and they are here this evening. My sons studied in the United States, four of them. And they received their B.A. degrees from American universities. And I have now my young Aziz, Prince `Abd al `Aziz. When he is older, he will go to a university. Therefore, I have an interest here in the United States, because my sons graduated from American colleges and universities.

And in conclusion, I would like to thank President Reagan and Mrs. Reagan, again, and all my friends here. And I would like for anybody who wishes to visit Saudi Arabia -- you are all welcome to come and see my country. And at this moment, I would like to invite President Reagan and Mrs. Reagan. For any time they wish to come and visit Saudi Arabia, they will find a friendly people there to welcome them.

The President. Oh, I don't think there's any question of that, and we have been for quite some time. We have fewer -- for example, in nuclear weapons -- we have fewer warheads than we had in 1967. But I think, in one way, we're going in in a stronger sense than we have in recent years, because over recent years, we followed a policy of kind of unilaterally disarming and the idea that maybe the others would follow suit.

This time, with the refurbishing of our military defenses that we've been undergoing for these 4 years, we're going to the table, and they have the knowledge that not only are we stronger than we were, even though we have not caught up with them as yet, but they have the awareness that we're determined to not allow them to have a superiority over us to the extent that our forces wouldn't be a deterrent. And I think in that regard, we sit down to the table with a little more realism than there's been in the past.

The President. Well, I was trying to be completely accurate here that, obviously, we have not completely caught up with the imbalance between us. For example, we have in uniform in the military 17 divisions. Well, they've got more than that on the Chinese border. So, we have not caught up with the naval buildup. But the fact that we are doing that, the fact that we have 24 more ships, I believe, out there scheduled for addition to the fleet; that is what I think brings us to the table. They know our industrial power. They know what we've been able to achieve when we set our minds to it.

So, they know that there's been a change of attitude, that we are not canceling weapons systems without getting anything in return. And, from that standpoint, I think this is what they mean -- that our whole attitude is different now, and they can look down the road and see that there's a point at which they won't have any margin of superiority.

Q. On the subject of arms control treaty violations, you and your administration have said for several years that the Soviets are violating these treaties. A, what do you intend to do about that, and B, would you sign treaties in the future without clearing up those matters?

The President. Well, I think all of that is part of what has to be negotiated and probably under the cap of -- or the part of the negotiations that'll deal with verifiability. In other words, it's not enough to have an agreement; it's got to be a verifiable agreement.

And some of the violations that they're doing are violations of what had previously been negotiated as the right of each one of us to know about the other. The encrypting of the signals that some of their nuclear tests -- ordinarily that we would be able, simply electronically, to have the facts that it was agreed upon we should have, both sides should have. But then they have been encrypting so that we don't get that full information from a test. And all of these will be part of the negotiations.

The President. Now we get into the area of the actual negotiating, and I don't think that I should be discussing those particular facets of what are we going to do, what are we going to offer, what are we going to trade. I don't think that should be voiced in advance.

Q. Mr. President, to shift to another subject, there are people in Congress who are talking about the situation in the Philippines with the opposition parties in turmoil there, with the Communist insurrection. They're saying that the Philippines is our next Iran. Do you see the Philippines that way? Do you agree?

Now, we realize there is an opposition party that, we believe, is also pledged to democracy. We also are aware that there is another element in the Philippines that has Communist support and backing. What we're hopeful of is that the democratic processes will take place and, even if there is a change of party there, it would be that opposition faction which is still democratic in its principles. I think it would be a disaster for all of us if, out of the friction between those two parties, the third element, the Communist element, should get in, because we know their result is always totalitarian.

The President. Well, I hope that both parties are aware of this over there and are going to, neither one of them, look to that third element for any kind of help or alliance. And, as I say, we're going to do, continue to do, everything we can as a longtime friend to see that the Philippines remain a democracy.

Korea, South Korea, has made great strides in democracy, that they have a prosperity that is far above that of a great many of their neighbors in that part of the world. Their democracy is working. And I think there was some bad judgment there on both sides.

Q. Could we talk about Nicaragua, I guess, Mr. President? There seems to be a real stalemate there. You're not providing aid to the contras now. There are no negotiations that are going on now. What are you planning to do in the way of policy to try to get something going that might bring about the kind of Nicaragua that you would like?

The President. Well, I'm going to continue to ask the Congress to let us, in all of Latin America, go forward with the kind of program that was born of the Kissinger-led commission down there in which 75 percent of the help we offer is going to be in social and economic aid to try and make these countries more self-sufficient, to eliminate the great poverty in so many of those countries by simply helping them become more viable economically and, at the same time, giving them help for security, so that they're not victims of subversion, particularly from outside their own countries.

That revolution was supposed to result in democracy. And assurances were given by the people who were fighting the revolution and leading it. Then the Sandinistas did what Castro before them had done in Cuba. Once the revolution was successful, they ousted from the government, or any participation in government, all the other factions that were dedicated to democracy and have instituted a totalitarian regime.

The President. Well, they certainly are part of the people, and they were part of the revolution in many instances. The thing that so many people that are arguing against this don't seem to be aware of a difference between, for example, Nicaragua and El Salvador. El Salvador now, after several elections, is a government that is striving for democracy, that was chosen by the people.

In Nicaragua, the so-called Sandinista government is a government that seized power out of the barrel of a gun; it's never been chosen by the people. And it has directly contravened the principles of the revolution that they were fighting. And I think there's every reason for the contras to be representing those who continue to strive for the democracy that they fought a revolution to get.

Q. Well, are you talking about a fundamental change in the Nicaraguan Government, or can they do things incrementally? Can they, for example, ease up on press freedom, or can they provide more press freedom, or can they provide certain steps that you might think would be acceptable without making a fundamental change in their government?

The President. Well, Jerry, I don't know what -- when we talk about this, are we talking about the people that are in the government or the form of government? If it's the people, obviously those who have grabbed power are not going to want to give it up; that's typical of totalitarianism. But as to the other part -- all the Sandinistas would have to do is go back to what they, themselves, participated in promising to the Organization of American States -- that they wanted democracy, they wanted free voting, they wanted free labor unions, they wanted a free press and all -- and subject themselves -- or submit themselves, I should say, and anyone else who chooses to, to the will of the people by way of the elections and voting.

Defense Initiative -- if, in the Geneva negotiations, the Soviets were to agree to go along with the deep reductions in offensive weapons that you've proposed, would you still want to proceed with this Strategic Defense Initiative, or would you be ready to call it off in return for that?

The President. No. I would want to proceed with what we're doing, which is research to discover whether there is such a weapon and whether it is practical and feasible. And then I, myself, have said that my own view would be that if that is determined and we can produce such a weapon, that then before deployment I'd be willing to sit down and, in a sense, internationalize.

In other words, to negotiate then, before there would be any deployment or anything, to make sure that they understood that we weren't trying to create the ability of a first strike ourselves, that our goal was still the elimination of nuclear weapons; and that I would see that defensive weapon as another step in attaining that goal; that if we could say that this virtually makes those weapons, if not obsolete, certainly most ineffective -- the nuclear weapons -- then we've got a real reason for saying, ``Now, let's all do away with them, because we've come up with this defensive weapon.'' That would eliminate any of the protests that some of the people on the Soviet side have made that we're seeking a first-strike capability.

Q. Sir, just -- excuse me -- back on Latin America -- Fidel Castro said recently that he saw possibilities for improving relations with the U.S. Do you see any possibility of you or the Government improving relations with Castro?

The President. Well, I'm not greatly optimistic, because we've heard this before. Early in my administration there were signals sent of this kind, and we took them up on it. And we tried to have some meetings with them, and nothing came of it. Their words are never backed by deeds.

The President. I'm still dedicated to that September 1st, 1982, provision of a negotiated peace. I don't believe it can be achieved without King Hussein of Jordan and with -- or at least with the permission of the Palestinians, representing them in direct negotiations with the Israelis. And we are prepared to be of whatever help we can be. We're not seeking to impose a settlement on anyone; we haven't got some plan of how it must be worked out.

But I feel that we have to make the moderate Arab States recognize that we can be their friend as well as the friend of Israel and that this could be helpful in our trying to be of help in peace negotiations. And part of this would be -- because they're under threat -- there's a war going on just minutes away from them by air. The Soviet Union, with its invasion of Afghanistan, has made it evident that the Middle East can't rule out the possibility of expansionism on the part of the Soviets there. And, therefore, we think that they're entitled to some defensive weapons also.

The President. We have another meeting coming tomorrow morning. I'm going to talk to him, definitely, so that he knows that we haven't retreated. The events in Lebanon and so forth kind of put the plan on ice.

It was not only that. If you'll remember, there was a very definite breaking off of relations between the PLO and King Hussein. Hussein was going forward, trying to work with them, and then suddenly they parted company.

Now, there have been talks resumed, because anyone who talks for the Arab side is going to have to be able to represent the Palestinian problem in those negotiations. You can't write them off or ignore their right to some claims. And so what we're trying to talk about is hoping that this can now come to the point that there can be direct negotiations.

The President. Well, we have -- you know, there have been -- we have made some arms sales in a number of instances. Actually, what I feel is necessary is -- this is a part of convincing the Arabs that we do sincerely intend to be their friends also, that we're not in any way an opponent.

Q. Mr. President, on the question of black leaders -- you've criticized black leaders, recently, as representing a special interest and being concerned about their own jobs and positions. Assuming that that might be true, how do you then plan to keep in touch with the black community in general, if you're not doing it through these black leaders?

The President. Very willing to do it through those, and tried. And there were meetings here, and they came to naught. What I said there is a general thing that I was saying -- not about all -- because there are leaders of quite prominent black groups, like Roy Innis of CORE [Congress of Racial Equality], who agrees completely with what I said.

But I think it's something that happens even in government bureaucracies that are set up to solve a certain problem. But once the bureaucracy is set up, it never quite wants to admit that the problem has been solved, because there's no longer any need for the bureaucracy. And I think that there is some element of this. See, I've just lived longer than the rest of you. [Laughter] I remember when things were very much different -- not from reading about them, from seeing them. And I think that there is an unwillingness on the part of some leaders to bring to the attention or remind the people they represent how much progress has been made, because -- and again, as I say, because if you do, they might then say, well, then, what are we still organized for?

Now, granted, we have not totally eliminated all the problems. There are a lot of us that are still heart and soul for continuing. But the progress that we've made is such that there is no reason anymore to try to keep a group in existence on the basis of animus, anger, and others.

I'm perfectly willing to try and say these same things to the people that are in the organizations where a few of the leaders have seemed to be, well, very frankly, more interested in some political differences than they are in resolving the problem.

Q. Mr. President, shift to a totally different area -- Poland. Does the trial and the conviction of those four police officers and the murder of that Catholic priest constitute any kind of a step on the part of the Polish Government that justified, in your mind, relaxing any of our sanctions or making any moves towards Poland to ease the situation, improve it?

The President. I honestly don't think that it reflects any change. I think it reflects something that went wrong. And the Government doesn't mind throwing somebody to the wolves in order to keep the sleigh going ahead of the wolfpack.

Q. Mr. President, taking it back to the question of your Strategic Defense Initiative. Throughout history there's always been a question of offensive being able to overcome defense, and it always has in the past. Here we're about to embark on the expenditure of a lot of money to test this proposition again. Why do you think this time the defense might be able to prevail over the offense?

The President. Well, all right, let me give you a parallel that I've used here among our own people. World War I -- poison gas came into being for the first time, and it was horrible. Nineteen twenty-five -- all the nations of the world met in Geneva and ruled out poison gas in the future for war. But by that time the gas mask had been developed, and gas mask has been standard soldier equipment in just about every army in the world ever since 1925. We haven't thrown the masks away.

Now, we're talking about a weapon that has been developed for which there is no defense whatsoever. The only program we have is MAD, mutual assured destruction. Why don't we have MAS instead, mutual assured security?

Now, we all know how to make that weapon. Suppose that we were so successful at the arms talks that we all agreed to do away with them, just as we agreed to do away with poison gas. And the years go by, but we all know how to make them. You can't take out of your mind the knowledge that we now have. And sometime, in a time of stress and, whether it's the two great countries or some other countries, somebody is going to say, just as they have in recent years, maybe it would be handy for us to produce a few of these things. And you wouldn't be able to tell if they had or not. But at least your security would be your own kind of gas mask -- that if somebody does cheat after you've tried to eliminate them, and comes up with those, you'd have a weapon in which you could knock them down, just as today, you could put on the gas mask if somebody cheats and decides to use poison gas.

So, I think it would be well worth having. And then, of course, there's the possibility that you can't get everybody to eliminate those weapons as we're seeking to do, and, therefore, you have made it through defense. You've changed the whole ratio -- the opponent that might want to be expansionist and resort to war has to say in the face of that defensive weapon: How many of these things do I have to have before I can be sure that enough get through that they won't be able to blow me out of the water?

The President. I want a defense that simply says that if somebody starts pushing the button on those weapons, we've got a good chance of keeping all or at least the bulk of them from getting to the target. Because, even if it's around missile sites, that's the type of weapon anymore in which there's no way to restrain that from killing any number of people, or now, as a great many reputable scientists are telling us, that such a war could just end up in no victory for anyone, because we would wipe out the Earth as we know it. And if you think back to a couple of natural calamities, back in the last century, in the 1800's, just natural phenomena from earthquakes -- or, I mean, volcanoes, we saw the weather so changed that there was snow in July in many temperate countries. And they've called it the year in which there was no summer. Well, if one volcano can do that, what are we talking about with a whole nuclear exchange: the nuclear winter that scientists have been talking about? It's possible.

So, I think if you have a defensive weapon, I don't think of it in terms of let's put it around this place or that place. Let's put it in such a way that those missiles aren't going to get to their target.

The President. Well, now, you have me between a rock and a hard place here, because I have to tell you I think that -- as I have said -- he has been the finest Vice President that I ever have any recollection of. He has been an integral part of everything that we're doing.

Governor -- that the Vice President shouldn't be just someone standing by waiting to be called off the bench. He should be like an executive vice president in the corporation or business; you use him. And he's been all of those things.

But, at the same time, in this job, you are titular head of the party and as such you've kind of got a responsibility to let the party function and make its decisions. Now, it's not an easy thing for me to think about, but I have to keep that in mind.

No task is more important to the future of our society than raising the next generation. And few volunteer organizations have done more over the years to help our Nation perform that task successfully than the Big Brothers and Big Sisters of America. These are men and women who take time from their own responsibilities and families to offer a helping hand to young people in need. Big Brothers and Big Sisters offer youngsters support, counseling, and -- most important of all -- friendship.

Americans have always been a compassionate and decent people, and they have never waited for directions from government before devoting their time and energy to helping their neighbors. The Big Brothers and Big Sisters of America are adding new luster to this old tradition.

February 23, 1985, as a time to recognize the contributions of volunteers who give their time to become Big Brothers and Big Sisters to youths in need of adult companionship and authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of this week.

In Witness Whereof,  I have hereunto set my hand this eleventh day of February, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-five, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

It is my firm conviction that preventing the spread of nuclear explosives to additional countries is essential to world peace and stability. It forms an indispensable complement to the efforts we have undertaken to bring about deep reductions in strategic and intermediate-range nuclear weapons. It is no exaggeration to say that the future of mankind may well depend on the achievement of these goals, and I intend to pursue them with unflagging determination and a deep sense of personal commitment.

The treaty would establish a bilateral commission with coastwide responsibilities for management of ``intercepting'' salmon fisheries, fisheries of one Party that harvest fish which spawn in the waters of the other Party. These responsibilities would include management of the fisheries on Fraser River sockeye and pink salmon, now governed by the Convention for the Protection, Preservation, and Extension of the Salmon Fishery of the Fraser River System, signed at Washington May 26, 1930, entered into force July 28, 1937, as amended. That convention would be superseded by this treaty. An annex to this treaty would prescribe specific fishery regimes, establishing allocations, annual catch levels, and broad regulations by time, area, or gear for (1) transboundary rivers, (2) the northern boundary area, (3) chinook, (4) Fraser River pink and sockeye, (5) southern coho, and (6) southern chum.

This treaty represents the culmination of fourteen years of negotiations on this issue. It establishes a basis for bilateral cooperation on management, research, and enhancement of salmon stocks throughout the west coast of North America. This treaty provides a framework that will enable us to conserve this precious resource. The increases in salmon production made possible by this treaty will inure to the benefit of fishermen of both the United States and Canada.

This was an occasion when three gentlemen arrived at the gates of heaven, and St. Peter told them that there were certain limitations on who could get in, due to crowding. And he said they had decided that whichever one of the three practiced the oldest profession or avocation would be admitted.

I sometimes feel that the journalists who cover our everyday political affairs here in Washington have a tendency to miss the real news, the transforming discoveries and achievements that you and your colleagues are making every day. I remember just a little over 4 years ago, all the headlines were of shortages. Every morning it seemed that we read that there was some new scare story telling us that the Earth's resources were about to run out for good, leaving our world poorer and shrinking our hopes for the future.

But at the same time, largely unheralded, scientists, inventors, and entrepreneurs in the computer field were molding silicon chips from sand -- one of the commonest substances known to man -- and in the process revolutionizing our lives.

You understand that freedom is not a luxury, but a necessity; not a privilege, but the source of our life's bread. In science, just as in our economy, our object must be to maximize freedom, to open up new avenues of inquiry and new areas of experimentation.

I've asked Congress to approve funding for a permanently funded, manned space station. Despite the constraints of a freeze in program spending, there are few genuine cuts in our budget for basic science items. We're requesting a 6.7-percent increase for basic research in the physical sciences for fiscal year '86. And we're asking for increased funding for science and technology and basic research through the end of the decade.

I believe that our nuclear dilemma presents us with some of the major unfinished business of science. And we have begun research on a nonnuclear defense against nuclear attack. You, on the cutting edge of technology, have already made yesterday's impossibilities the commonplace realities of today. Why should we start thinking small now? In protecting mankind from the peril of nuclear destruction, I think we must be ambitious. We can't lock ourselves into a fatalistic acceptance of a world held in jeopardy.

The value of the free enterprise system in America is confirmed when the products of our research, our industry, and our agriculture improve the quality of people's lives not only in America, but throughout the world. And the genius of American business has been to make the wealth of its factories and farms accessible to all.

States, the District of Columbia, and Puerto Rico, the Distributive Education Clubs of America are helping to prepare a cadre of professionals with the spirit of enterprise, the civic responsibility, and the complex skills needed to assure that America's strength in marketing keeps pace with the vast expansion of technology and the increasingly sophisticated needs of people in all parts of the world.

Sec. 2. If the Director determines not to convert an employee's appointment to career or career-conditional status under the preceding Section, the employee shall be separated not later than the date of expiration of the current appointment.

Sec. 3. Employees whose appointments are converted under this Order shall become career-conditional employees, or career employees if they have completed the service requirements for career tenure, and all converted employees shall acquire a competitive status.

The President. I don't know exactly what the schedule is of visitors now, but he's coming here on issues that have to do between them -- and I don't know whether there'd be a reason for another visit.

The President. The main problem is not the strength of the American dollar; it's the weakness of foreign currency, because our recovery has progressed beyond theirs. We hope that we can help their recovery to where their currency comes up in relation to ours.

The State visit of His Majesty King Fahd bin `Abd al-`Aziz Al Sa`ud has reaffirmed the long-standing bonds of friendship and mutually beneficial cooperation that have existed between the United States and Saudi Arabia for over fifty years. In their meetings on February 11 and 12, President Reagan and King Fahd concentrated on the search for a just, stable and lasting solution to the Arab-Israel conflict, which the two leaders agreed was their primary concern.

President expressed his appreciation for the Fez consensus, positive elements of which have been recognized by the United States. He reaffirmed his continuing commitment to the positions for peace which he announced on September 1, 1982, and renewed his pledge that the United States will support those positions in direct negotiations involving the parties most concerned.

In their discussions, the President and the King stressed that a stable peace must provide security for all states in the area and for the exercise of the legitimate rights of the Palestinian people. Both agreed to maintain their dialogue on this urgent issue.

The President and the King discussed the continuing war between Iran and Iraq. They deplored the tragic loss of life and destruction it has brought and the threat to regional stability and peace which it poses. They pledged to continue to support efforts to bring the fighting to a speedy end.

The discussions between the President and the King, to which cabinet members and ministers contributed, charted the course for continued development of U.S.-Saudi relations. In this regard, Saudi Arabia's emergence as an exporter of industrial goods, as well as of crude oil, was examined in the light of the United States' traditional commitment to open markets for goods and investment. The delegations of the two countries foresaw growth and rising mutual benefit from a sustained partnership in trade, development and regional cooperation that joins Saudi resources and aspirations with American technological leadership.

The President today announced his intention to appoint Gertrude Catherine McDonald to be a member of the National Commission for Employment Policy for a term of 1 year. This is a new position. Upon her appointment, she will be designated Chairman.

So, now that you've got the houses built for your guests and for Lee Clearwater, and I guess the irrigation ditch is either finished or almost done, what's your next big project at the ranch? Or is there one?

The President. Well, it's been quite a time since the last one. Yes, we finished the irrigation project, and right now I can't think of anything else to fence in. There are always some little things to do around there. But there's always firewood. And the last 2 years there has been, I must say, an ongoing project which can fill in any time that we don't have a special thing like the irrigation to do.

The President. And that was about an 8-inch wet snowfall at our ranch. And during the night, Lee told me that it sounded like an artillery barrage -- with those live oak trees, the limbs breaking off.

So, wherever you go in the woods, to this day, I think we could spend the rest of our lives -- there are these downed limbs all over. And so when there's nothing else to do, why, we pick another spot -- go in, clear it out, and cut the brush off, stack that for burning in the winter; and then whatever's usable, make into firewood.

The President. Not only downed, but then there's some that, you know, that the lumberjacks call widow makers -- and that's the limbs that have broken off, and they're still hanging up there. We never know when one of them is going to come in.

The President. Well now, remember though, the environmentalists, I am sure, will be happy to know we don't cut down trees for firewood. We have to cut the firewood, because the only heat we have are -- come from firewood and such. But, no, we don't cut down trees. We've done it by things that are down, and there's always -- in as much woods as we have -- there's always trees that come down by themselves, that nature takes care of. And those we cut up, and sometimes some judicious pruning, where we think we can improve the tree with a little pruning.

The President. No, it's a real change. And it isn't always that; I think part of it also is that there's always a kick into building something. And we did a lot of work -- all those wood fences that we put in that weren't there, a lot of work on the house itself. It was a little, old adobe that was built in 1872, and we did most of the work ourselves there, fixing it up -- the fences. You get a good feeling out of what you've accomplished there. But the riding, of course, we like.

But I'll tell you, I think that particular place casts a spell on you. Maybe it's the fact that you have to turn into a kind of private road that just serves a few ranches; unlike the previous ranch we had down south where the highway went within 250 feet of the house.

Secret Service, and there was a big -- one station up on the hill above the house, looking down the pasture to where they could survey everything. And the fellows would take turns up there -- and with a camp stool -- sitting and watching.

Q. Someone told me that I ought to ask you about snakes, because they heard that awhile back, maybe right after you bought it, you and Lee Clearwater bagged, I guess, some rattlesnakes and dumped them in some place called Snake Lake?

The President.  --  -- that used to be temporary. It would go dry in the summer, and we fixed it so that now it catches the drainage, and we have a year-round pond. And all of a sudden, there must have been a hatch of snake eggs of the kind that -- I don't know what you call them -- it was a kind of a gray snake with black and red vertical stripes on it, and it seemed to be a water snake.

But this hatch -- they were all about 12, 14 inches long. And if you'd come out the door, they'd scatter across the lawn; you'd see them going. And to the women on the place, that was not very attractive.

But I headed down -- I got some big paper bags like they use, the markets use -- and we put on gloves, and then we went out. We started catching them, putting them in the bags. Well, pretty soon -- we missed too many. We'd grab, and with those clumsy work gloves on -- so I peeled off the gloves, and I found out the herpetologists were right. After picking up a few, well, we'd pick them up and stuff them in; we had a bagful. And then I didn't want to go around, you know, slaughtering them and -- bloody, awful bloody to do that.

So, we put them in a jeep, and down we'd go. Way back down the back corner, there is a pond just off the -- our border, the ranch of our border. So, we dumped these snakes there -- and kept wanting to get the big ones, because I figured they have to do this every year if we didn't -- and eventually came upon the two adults. And we captured them the same way and dumped them down there.

But one day when we were getting them pretty well, we kept count. It was over 120, 120-odd snakes that we picked up and dumped. But the last half-sackful, we were -- this was before the helicopter, still had agents -- I had a half a sackful and no time -- we were leaving the ranch that day -- to go down to Snake Lake. It was the wrong direction. So, I just put it in the car.

And he had started to get down on his side, the side where the snake was. And all of a sudden, he was backing up right onto the jeep. [Laughter] And he says, ``Kill it! Kill it!'' And sure enough, it was about 4 feet long, and it was a rattler. And it was trying to get up the bank.

I looked and I couldn't find anything to get it. And there was a rock about the size of a lime -- nice, oval, smooth rock -- there in the road. And I picked it up, and just desperately I let go. I hit it right on the head, and it was -- just squashed. I never said a word. I just came back around, got in the jeep. We started back down.

The President. But on the other side, not gone, is a cross, and then some notches. And Ray thought it was a clue to some kind of treasure. And he used to go down there trying to figure out these notches -- what do they mean?

The President. No. Well, I did run -- when we got up there, it was what they had done before me, and they had grazers. Bring them in at the beginning of the grazing season -- yearlings -- keep them, and then sell them for the increase in weight. And, naturally, that would not meet the cost of the ranch. And then something in the Treasury Department happened where they began naming ranches ``hobby ranches,'' and they were no longer deductible. And -- [laughter] -- but, also, this move -- why there was just no way to keep on doing that, being away as much as we are. So, I quit.

The President. Well, that's the only break we have. But that was on there 10 years before we came there -- from the time that the act went in. The County Board of Supervisors in California can designate certain land, that if you will sign a contract -- I think they're in 10-year stretches -- sign a contract that you will not develop that land, you will not, you know, sell it for tracts and that sort of thing, and keep it in its present condition, then it will be taxed on that basis, not on its best potential value.

The President. It was very wonderful to get in that size house. It is -- you've said it; I think I heard you say -- it's about 1,500 square feet. Well, this is one of the benefits of going up to Camp David. There you go to a -- and you spend a weekend in a normal size house, where you can open a door and go out in the backyard and things of that kind.

Q. I assume that you and Mrs. Reagan have given some thought to what happens in that glorious day when you return to California after the second term. What are your current plans about retirement? I remember you told Barbara Walters that you didn't think the ranch would be your full-time retirement home.

This plane -- now it's been many, many weeks since we've been on this plane -- but this plane doesn't just sit there. This plane has to get so many hours that it's put in flying. And this just takes the place of those. The salaries of the people and so forth, those would go on -- the staff who're going along -- whether they do that or not. Yes, there is some cost of -- while they're away, out there -- living expense and all.

Q. When you see those, obviously, you must think about this business of the drilling in the channel. Some people in Santa Barbara, including some businessmen, say, ``Well, let's explore -- find out where the oil is, but not drill, not actually put it out. Let's hold it in reserve, because of the danger to the economy if there were another spill.'' Obviously, do you think that's possible, or realistic?

The President. I think they're ignoring one thing we found out at the time of the spill, because I was Governor at that time. And we sent -- incidentally, that was a Federal lease that leaked. And we found out at that time and they, themselves, told us that had they known the regulations on State leases, had followed the same regulations, there never would have been a spill. So, the Federal Government at that time -- the Nixon administration -- they adopted for Federal leasing -- we still do -- the same standards and requirements the State imposes.

Now the Federal Government has about 16 platforms off the coast of California, as increasing by some -- and they seem, we seem now, the Federal Government, to be getting all the attention and abuse. But there are several hundred wells that are State leases that have been there for quite some time. But when we sent the experts in -- and they weren't buddies of ours -- we sent scientists from the university campuses of California in to study this whole area and the problem.

And they came back with one unanimous recommendation -- drill, get the oil out. They said the bottom of the channel is badly fractured. There are 16 permanent oil slicks that have been there as long as the memory of man.

The President. And they said the safest thing you can do is get that oil pumped out of there because there could be a natural disaster -- I'm sure they were speaking of an earthquake at that fractured bottom -- that would create a disaster of such dimensions that you could never get a -- the previous oil strike, or leak, as far as I can learn, was only about 790 barrels of oil. Now we're taking out tens of thousands of barrels. But their recommendation was drill, get it out, and remove that permanent threat that lies off the coast.

Now, wouldn't it make more sense for us -- we've already reduced considerably the amount of oil that we have to import, making ourselves closer to self-sufficient. But from a security standpoint, from even the balance in trade, it would make much more sense for us to be producing the oil ourselves than having to go out and buy it.

The President. I have to say, you know, I think this is really reaching to say that some structure out there that far out in the ocean -- when you've got that whole expanse of ocean -- it isn't as if you were looking at the ocean through a little frame, and now somebody put something in the way.

The President. Well, you come in that private road. And now, you come down about a half a mile or so, and then you turn in the entrance road that was built before we got the ranch. But when we first looked at it, the entrance was way up here, right near that -- after you go through that gate.

The President. And I was kind of thinking, gee, you know, maybe somebody's got a house up here on the mountain with a view and calls it a ranch. But it doesn't look like there's any space up here for a ranch. And Betty had never been up the road before. And Betty was saying, ``Bill, turn around. There can't be anything up here.'' He just silently kept driving.

And all of a sudden, as we came up close to the gate, suddenly here is a kind of a meadow of smoke trees beside the road -- and I think, well, then, maybe he does know what he's doing. And then we came to the gate where we turned in at the private road. And we came in through that second gate, now, and we're winding on this little gravel road through all of these trees. But it is, you know, kind of looking like rolling land and heavily wooded -- and suddenly you come out of those trees, and there is this saucer.

Note: The interview began at 11 a.m. on board Air Force One en route to California. A tape was not available for verification of the content of this interview, which was released by the Office of the Press Secretary on February 17.

Mrs. Vierra is currently a broker associate for the Devonshire Co. Additionally, she is executive vice president of Introducing Denver, Inc., which assists spouses being moved with the problems of becoming acclimated in a new environment. In 1970 she founded Retardates Unlimited, Inc., an organization designed to establish business ventures owned and operated by the mentally retarded.

Brotherhood/Sisterhood Week affords us the opportunity to celebrate the rich diversity of cultures that comprise our great Republic. This year's theme, ``America is many, count me in,'' reminds us that ours is a nation of immigrants built by men and women who came here seeking liberty, opportunity and equality.

Those who arrived on our shores soon learned that enjoyment of these rights entailed the responsibilities of citizenship. Above all, they learned that we remain free only for so long as we remain tolerant of the rights of others.

This spirit of tolerance has helped make America an open society, a nation whose strength is derived from its tapestry of cultures. Our ability to meet the complex challenges of an uncertain future depends on our willingness to nurture the spirit of brotherhood and sisterhood that for so long has been characteristic of our people. Working together in that spirit, we can build an opportunity society in which every American is encouraged to attain his or her fullest potential.

One of the most inspiring developments of recent years is the move against communism and toward freedom that is sweeping the world. In the Soviet Union and Eastern Europe, we see the dissidents; in Poland, the Solidarity movement. We see freedom fighters in Afghanistan, Ethiopia, Cambodia, and Angola. These brave men and women are fighting to undo the infamous Brezhnev doctrine, which says that once a nation falls into the darkness of Communist tyranny, it can never again see the light of freedom.

Marxist-Leninist clique that broke the hearts of the freedom-loving people of their country by imposing a brutal dictatorship soon after taking control in 1979. Functioning as a satellite of the Soviet Union and Cuba, they moved quickly to suppress internal dissent, clamp down on a free press, persecute the church and labor unions, and betray their pledge to hold free elections. Now they're exporting drugs to poison our youth and linking up with the terrorists of Iran, Libya, the Red Brigades, and the PLO. The Sandinistas aren't democrats, but Communists; not lovers of freedom, but of power; not builders of a peaceful nation, but creators of a fortress Nicaragua that intends to export communism beyond its borders.

These brave men and women deserve our help. They do not ask for troops, but only for our technical and financial support and supplies. We cannot turn from them in their moment of need; to do so would be to betray our centuries-old dedication to supporting those who struggle for freedom. This is not only legal, it's totally consistent with our history.

Time and again in the course of our history, we've aided those around the world struggling for freedom, democracy, independence, and liberation from tyranny. In the 19th century, we supported Simon Bolivar, the Great Liberator. We supported the Polish patriots, the French Resistance, and others seeking freedom. We well remembered how other nations, like France, had come to our aid during our own Revolution. It's not in the American tradition to turn away. And lucky for us that those who loved democracy 200 years ago didn't turn away from us.

American independence. But he did more than fight in the field for the Continental Army. He went to France during the war and pleaded with his government for financial aid for the American rebels. And he returned to General Washington with a promise that France would send support, including a large contingent of troops to help in the crucial last campaign. It was those French troops and Lafayette, himself, who helped defeat General Cornwallis and assure the British surrender at Yorktown.

And now the free people of El Salvador, Honduras, and, yes, of Nicaragua ask for our help. There are over 15,000 freedom fighters struggling for liberty and democracy in Nicaragua and helping to stem subversion in El Salvador. They're fighting for an end to tyranny and its only reliable product: cruelty. They are our brothers. How can we ignore them? How can we refuse them assistance when we know that, ultimately, their fight is our fight? We must remember that if the Sandinistas are not stopped now, they will, as they have sworn, attempt to spread communism to El Salvador, Costa Rica, Honduras, and elsewhere.

Underground publications such as the sixty-fourth issue of the ``Chronicle of the Catholic Church in Lithuania'' and forty-first issue of ``The Dawn,'' which have recently come to the West, continue to inform the world of ongoing persecutions.

States has refused to recognize the forcible incorporation of Lithuania into the Soviet Union. We must be vigilant in the protection of this ideal because we know that as long as freedom is denied to others, it is not truly secure here.

But in those days, most Americans were tied to the land. And the most familiar means of transportation were the sailing ship and the horse. Then, advances like the telephone and the electric light, the internal combustion engine, transformed our nation, enabling us to achieve the highest standard of living in the world; to lead longer, richer, and fuller lives; and to share our bounty with millions beyond our borders.

Today we see all around us the beginnings of a second transformation, a quantum technological leap that's making possible still greater prosperity and individual fulfillment than we've ever known. This new technology is affecting every aspect of our lives. In manufacturing, lightweight and inexpensive materials like fiber composites and ceramics are taking the place of costly metals.

In transportation, cars and airplanes are being equipped with inexpensive microchips that keep track of maintenance needs and enable engines to run better on less fuel. In the home, computers are putting art, literature, and vast sums of information at families' fingertips.

Perhaps the most exciting advances are taking place in medicine. A diagnostic process, for example, has been made faster, safer, and more accurate by the advent of technologies like cat scanning and the use of soundwaves. Biotechnology is enabling us to produce human growth hormones more easily and inexpensively -- a godsend to children whose growth might otherwise be impaired. Research is advancing against cancer, and new drugs are combating high blood pressure, diabetes, and heart disease. Countless medical breakthroughs have meant that, for the past decade, the life expectancy of Americans has gone up.

As technology goes on providing new goods, services, and techniques of production, our entire economy is expanding and worker productivity is up. At one semiconductor plant in Pennsylvania in 1957, workers produced five transistors a day for $7.50 apiece. And they now produce over a million for less than a penny apiece.

Perhaps the best news of all concerns new job formation. Employment in the computer industry has skyrocketed. Computers and robotics are also bringing new efficiency to our older industries, helping them modernize their plants and compete better. And today American cars are once again as advanced as those built anywhere on Earth.

Economic growth is our most powerful tool for reducing poverty and fostering vigor and self-esteem among the millions in America's work force. I expect today's burgeoning technology to work hand in hand with the incentives in our tax reform plan to keep our economy growing and creating ever-wider opportunities for all Americans.

Our administration has made a firm commitment to technological progress. Both of them are probably true, but one we view as nothing less than a commitment to human creativity and imagination. While we're cutting back, wherever possible, unnecessary government spending, we're continuing our strong commitment to basic research and development.

We have cut personal income tax rates; we plan to cut them again. This could spur savings, and higher savings could, in turn, boost the capital formation so important in funding new high-technology ventures. And we've rolled back needless government regulations to help provide the freedom needed by those at the frontiers of technology to experiment with new hypotheses and techniques.

In space, we're opening the way to private enterprise; the space shuttle program is already working closely with private industry. And in 1985 NASA is scheduled to deploy eight commercial communications satellites. Space technology will continue to grow even more rapidly as we pursue our plans to launch a permanently manned space station -- and to do so within a decade.

In defense, we're putting technology at the service of a decade's old dream: the elimination of nuclear weapons. Our Strategic Defense Initiative represents, perhaps, the most dramatic and wide-reaching research effort to explore the means for making nuclear weapons obsolete.

Let me make one thing plain: The Strategic Defense Initiative is not a bargaining chip. It's an historic effort on behalf of our national defense and peace throughout the world, and we intend to see it through.

The story of American technology is long and proud. It might be said to have begun with a blacksmith at his bellows, hammering out fine tools, and the Yankee craftsman using simple wood planes, saws, and mallets to fashion the fastest sailing ships on the ocean. And then came the railroad men, driving spikes across our country.

And today the story continues with the workers who built the computer in a child's room; the engineers who designed the communications satellite that silently rotates with the Earth, shining in the sunlight against the blackness of space; and the men and women of skill and determination who helped to put American footprints on the Moon.

Alexander Graham Bell. You sing the songs of a people using their hands and minds in freedom, the songs of Americans at work making their lives even more full. And it's only fitting that our nation should pay you honor. And on behalf of the American people, I congratulate you.

No one, not even you, the marines and the Navy corpsmen who stepped ashore from the Amtracs at 2 minutes after 9, knew that what you were about to do would forever enshrine the island, Iwo Jima, and the volcano, Mount Suribachi, in American history.

Today Iwo Jima is remembered with other names like Saratoga, the Alamo, Gettysburg -- remembered, not simply because Americans were again conspicuously gallant in battle, but because our sons were called upon to endure unspeakable hardship for the sake of freedom.

Every one of you present today, and all of you 40 years ago, have a special place in our nation's heart, reserved only for the few in every generation called upon to sacrifice themselves so that a great nation's ideals of freedom and peace may live and prosper and endure. The manner of your performance -- as captured in Joe Rosenthal's photo of your flag-raising at Mount Suribachi -- remains a beacon, indeed a birthright, for America's young people and for every future American.

The Prime Minister. I have a text always -- yes, of course. I went into one speech -- it was a speech to young Conservatives, as a matter of fact -- intending to use the teleprompter, and the lights behind it were so strong that you could not see a word on the teleprompter itself.

The Prime Minister. Well, obviously, we will talk about East-West matters, with the arms control things coming up. I hope we'll have a word about Middle East, and I hope we'll have a word about general economic matters. And then there are lots of other particular things as well.

The Prime Minister. Yes, I think we agree on most matters. But more than agree, I think we discuss things through, because even though you agree on your fundamental approach -- we're often in the same summit meetings. It may be an economic forum, it may be various other summits, but you've got to discuss how you handle things. Your strategy may be the same, but the tactics require a great deal of discussion. And the way of achieving your goals require a great deal of discussion.

The President. It's always a pleasure to exchange views with Prime Minister Thatcher, a dear friend and the respected leader of one of America's closest allies. We've had a cordial discussion on a wide range of matters. Our conversations reflected the excellent relationship which exists between our two countries, as well as the warm friendship between Mrs. Thatcher and myself.

We discussed East-West relations, and in particular the preparations for the upcoming Geneva talks with the Soviets. We fully agree that the unity, patience, and determination of the North Atlantic alliance are essential if arms control negotiations are to succeed.

What we're seeking are significant reductions in the numbers of nuclear weapons through fair and verifiable agreements. Prime Minister Thatcher and I agree that it's absolutely necessary to continue NATO's INF deployments on schedule, in accord with the alliance's 1979 decision.

We're both hopeful that the dialog opening in Geneva will result in progress. And while that progress continues, however, we will be steadfast in the modernization of our forces and in our determination to promote full adherence to existing arms control agreements. These are crucial incentives to any real progress.

We also discussed the threat of international terrorism, and we agreed that increased international cooperation is called for to combat this evil. We expressed our willingness to work together and with other governments to fight terrorism and deter those who give support to terrorists.

Over the years these relations have taken on a very special quality. In fact, they're quite extraordinary. We, as Americans, are proud of our relations with our allies the British. And I am personally proud of my close collaboration with my friend Margaret Thatcher.

The Prime Minister. Mr. President, may I say how very grateful I am to you for inviting me for this brief visit, the first official one in your second term, although I paid an unofficial working visit to Camp David in December. Our talks are always particularly valuable, because we see so many things in the same way, and you can speak of a real meeting of minds.

As the President pointed out, this meeting is a special one because 1985 marks the 200th anniversary of diplomatic relations between Britain and the United States. And I think I can safely say that our relations now are better than when John Adams presented his credentials to King George III. Indeed, I feel no inhibitions about describing the relations as very, very special.

The President has given you an account of the discussions we had today. We had some very thorough ones, especially about the prospects for arms control negotiations. Those negotiations carry our hopes with them. They will, as I indicated this morning, be complex, but those who are negotiating on the part of the West know of our fundamental, sincere wish to get down the number of nuclear weapons in the world in a way which is still balanced and which still keeps our security. We believe our negotiators will strive to that end, and they will carry our good wishes with them.

We also spent some time discussing the Middle East, and both agreed that the moment is propitious for a fresh effort to achieve progress towards a Middle Eastern settlement. And I told the President of my support for the statement issued following King Fahd's recent visit to Washington. And we both endorsed King Hussein's efforts to arrive at a joint Arab position, which would allow direct negotiations with Israel to take place.

We discussed how important it is to keep down public spending. We have a different problem with the deficit, but we both share similar problems of how to keep down public spending so that people may be able to keep a bigger proportion of their own money in their own pockets. And I think we're at one in resisting any moves towards protectionism.

Northern Irish and Republic of Ireland talks -- always to try to secure an agreement which will respect both communities in Northern Ireland and always recognizing that any change must come about by consent of the people concerned.

It was, as always, Mr. President, a very friendly visit. You always make them friendly and warm by your own very welcome reception of us. But we do have just a very special ease in talking about these things, an ease which comes because we share common goals and common political philosophies. A very happy and successful visit.

Americans increasingly look to the water for recreation and relaxation. This year, approximately one-quarter of us will enjoy boating in one or more of its many and varied forms. Therefore, it is important that all those involved in recreational boating observe proper safety practices, know and obey rules of safe boating, and show courtesy and consideration on the water.

In addition, all boaters should wear personal flotation devices while on the water. According to the United States Coast Guard, seventy-five percent of those who died in boating accidents last year might have been saved had they worn these devices.

The theme of this year's National Safe Boating Week emphasizes the dangers of combining alcohol consumption with operating a boat. The use of alcohol and other intoxicating substances is a major factor in boating accidents and fatalities. Boat operators who drink often cannot react promptly to hazards and thereby endanger not only themselves but also others on the water. The use of even small amounts of alcohol can significantly impair an operator's judgment and boat-handling skills. This is particularly true as fatigue caused by sun, glare, noise, wind, and boat motion intensifies the effects of alcohol. Through the observance of National Safe Boating Week, 1985, all Americans should be alerted to these dangers.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twentieth day of February, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-five, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

There is attached a draft of a Joint Resolution to approve the ``Compact of Free Association,'' the negotiated instrument setting forth the future political relationship between the United States and two political jurisdictions of the Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands.

The Compact of Free Association is the result of more than fourteen years of continuous and comprehensive negotiations, spanning the administrations of four Presidents. The transmission of the proposed Joint Resolution today, and Congressional enactment of it, marks the last step in the Compact approval process.

The full text of the Compact is part of the draft Joint Resolution, which I request be introduced, referred to the appropriate committees, and enacted. I also request that the Congress note the agreements subsidiary to the Compact. Also attached is a section-by-section analysis to facilitate your consideration of the Compact.

States to foreclose access to the area to third countries for military purposes. These provisions are of great importance to our strategic position in the Pacific and enable us to continue preserving regional security and peace.

Association with the governments of the Marshall Islands and the Federated States of Micronesia would fulfill our commitment under that Agreement to bring about self-government in accordance with the freely expressed wishes of the peoples concerned. Upon termination of the Trusteeship Agreement, another political jurisdiction of the Trust Territory -- the Northern Mariana Islands -- will become a commonwealth of the United States.

In 1983, United Nations-observed plebiscites produced high voter participation, and the Compact was approved by impressive majorities. In addition to approval in the plebiscites, the Compact has been approved by the governments of the Marshall Islands and the Federated States of Micronesia in accordance with their constitutional processes.

Williamsburg summit, with all its pageantry and history; your powerful and moving address to the assembled Lords and Commons in London in the Royal Gallery; your visit to us last year for the London Economic Summit; and most recently, my expedition to Camp David.

Mr. President, over the 200 years that our countries have dealt with each other, it's not always been plain sailing. But one thing has not changed: The joint common sense, which is an essential part of our common heritage, has led the two Governments to resolve their differences and to work constructively together for our common purpose. Our joint interests prevailed, and I know they will continue to prevail.

There's a union of mind and purpose between our peoples, which is remarkable and which makes our relationship truly a special one. I'm often asked if it's special and why. And I say it is special -- it just is -- and that's that. As Winston once said -- Winston Churchill -- ``The experience of a long life and the promptings of my blood have wrought in me the conviction that there is nothing more important for the future of the world than the fraternal association of our two peoples in righteous work both in war and peace.'' No one could put it better than that.

For two centuries, we've been trading partners. We've stood together through two great world conflicts. Forty years ago last summer, Americans and Englishmen joined together in an invasion launched from Britain, the greatest invasion in all of man's history; together, we fought on the sands of Normandy. And together we reclaimed a continent to liberty.

Prime Minister, the United States and the United Kingdom are bound together by inseparable ties of ancient history and present friendship. Our language, our law -- even though you do use our language with an accent -- [laughter] -- our law, our democratic system of government, and our fierce belief in the God-given right of all men to be free -- all of these the United States shares with your proud island.

In our discussions, I have, as always, been delighted by the vigor, the clarity, and the directness of your views. And I've wanted to tell you that when I ran for office in 1980 I was greatly encouraged by the victory that you won in 1979. And it was very thoughtful of you to set me another good example in 1983. [Laughter] We've been inspired by your leadership.

Sir Oliver and Lady Wright, thank you for hosting this splendid event. Nancy and I are honored to be here. We celebrate tonight our past and our future. Great challenges loom ahead, and we must do all that we can to expand human freedom and unleash the great potential for economic growth both in our countries and throughout the world.

In our own countries we've already done much to free our economies from the dead hand of government control. But we can do more. Here in America, we're determined to reduce spending growth and significantly reduce tax rates further by simplifying our entire tax structure. In international commerce, our task is to knock down barriers to trade and foreign investment and to the free movement of capital. And I look forward to working with you on these matters, as we prepare for the 11th Economic Summit of Industrialized Nations in Bonn.

In foreign affairs we and our NATO allies have stayed strong, while demonstrating our openness to genuine arms reductions. And Prime Minister Thatcher, I know you share my satisfaction that the Soviets have agreed to return to the bargaining table. And now we must press on together for success in mutual and verifiable arms reductions and a more secure peace.

We believe that our Strategic Defense Initiative represents the most hopeful possibility of the nuclear age. And we greatly appreciate your support. In many areas of this research, technical progress appears very promising. And we're eager to be joined in this research by our allies and look forward to collaborating with you.

It's hard to be here on this candlelit evening and your stately Embassy without thinking of the great men and women -- British and American -- who've gone before us and who've worked together as we do today. I think of F.D.R. and Churchill conferring in the rain. Roosevelt deeply admired his friend, Winston. And many of us remember the warmth John Kennedy felt for Harold Macmillan and Macmillan's grief after Kennedy's tragic death. There's been something very special about the friendships between the leaders of our two countries. And may I say to my friend the Prime Minister, I'd like to add two more names to this list of affection -- Thatcher and Reagan.

Prime Minister, ladies and gentlemen, mindful of the two centuries of diplomatic relations that our two nations have enjoyed and grateful for our common heritage of liberty and in a spirit of celebration, please join me in a toast to your gracious Sovereign, to Her Majesty the Queen.

I am delighted by today's report that the gross national product increased at a 4.9-percent rate in the fourth quarter. The great American expansion is rolling forward, carrying us from a banner year in 1984 toward continued success of high growth, more jobs, and low inflation in 1985.

The United States economy grew by 6.9 percent in 1984, exceeding by better than half the consensus of leading blue chip forecasters. This strength, together with inflation, as measured by the price deflator, of only 3.8 percent, gave us our best economic performance since 1951. And growth of real final sales at an 8.5-percent rate in the fourth quarter indicates that this will be an excellent spring for the American economy.

Today's harvest of good news sprang from the seeds of new policies for greater economic freedom -- lower spending growth by government and greater incentives for individuals -- that we planted in our first term. Now is the time to ensure that our future harvests will be even more bountiful. I ask the Congress to move quickly to pass a package of urgently needed spending restraints and to begin working with us to draft and pass legislation for tax simplification this year.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Dr. Beryl W. Sprinkel to be a member of the Council of Economic Advisers. Upon his appointment the President intends to designate him Chairman of the Council. He will be economic adviser to the President. Dr. Sprinkel will succeed Dr. Martin Feldstein, who returned to his tenured position at Harvard University.

Bank in Chicago, IL, where he worked for 28 years. He was director of Harris Economics, an economic and financial forecasting service published by the bank; a member of Time magazine's board of economists; chairman of the economic advisory committee of the American Bankers Association; and member of the board of directors of the U.S. Chamber of Commerce. He also served as a consultant to various government agencies and congressional committees.

Good vision is a priceless treasure. Our ability to see the print in a book, the beauty of a sunset, and the faces of our loved ones is a gift that should be cherished and protected. Yet each year many Americans lose vision that could have been saved. To halt this tragic waste, we must make more people aware of the steps that all of us can take to safeguard our vision.

Of all sight-saving precautions, the most important is to have regular eye examinations by an eye care professional. Such check-ups are more valuable today than ever before. Thanks to vision research, effective treatment is now available to many people whose sight is threatened by eye disorders. But the greatest medical benefits generally go to those who get the earliest warning of serious eye disease. For them, there may be an opportunity to stop the disease before it has caused significant visual loss.

Middle age is a particularly good time for a person to take advantage of the protection that regular eye examinations can offer. This is because glaucoma, diabetic retinal disease, and several other disorders that are major causes of blindness tend to strike during the middle years of life.

Older Americans, too, should have regular eye check-ups. Cataract, macular disease, and a number of other age-related conditions that can rob elderly people of their vision are detectable by means of a routine eye examination. For many older Americans, learning of the existence of a visual problem is the first step toward obtaining the medical treatment or special visual aids that will allow them to go on leading active, independent lives.

An important concern for people of all ages in protecting the eye from injury. By wearing safety glasses, goggles, or face shields in all hazardous work situations and recreational activities, we can dramatically reduce the toll of visual loss caused by injuries.

There is yet another way for citizens to help improve the eye health of our Nation. Each of us can sign an organ donation card and carry it all times to insure that after death our eyes are used for vision research and for people who must have a cornea transplant in order to see again.

Also, I invite eye care professionals, the communications media, and all public and private organizations committed to the goal of sight conservation to join in activities that will make Americans more aware of the steps they can take to protect their vision.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-first day of February, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-five, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

The final economic figures are in for 1984 and the news is even better than anticipated. The U.S. economy grew at a rate of almost 5 percent in the fourth quarter, and final sales increased at a rate of 8\1/2\ percent. Economic growth for calendar year 1984 measured just a shade under 7 percent. It was the strongest performance in a single year by the American economy since 1951.

Our recovery is now well into its 27th month. It's the strongest expansion since the Korean war, and ours is a peacetime expansion, rooted not in a military buildup for overseas conflict but in a broadening prosperity when America is at peace.

We intend to prolong and to protect this expansion, and we'll work with Congress for a sweeping program of tax simplification and reform, and we're convinced this historic legislation can and should be passed this year. America has rediscovered that the key to greater economic growth, opportunity, and prosperity for all is to unharness the energies of free enterprise.

The American miracle of which the world now speaks is a triumph of free people and their private institutions, not government. It was individual workers, business people, entrepreneurs, not government, who created virtually every one of our 7 million new jobs over the past 2 years.

To cite one example: revenue sharing. It doesn't make sense for a Federal Government running a deficit to be borrowing money to be spent by State and local governments that are now running surpluses, thanks to our economic recovery. As for those who tell us that growth and expansion are not enough, that spending restraint is politically impossible, that higher taxes are necessary, our answer is simple: That issue was debated and decided on November 6th. We intend to proceed with the mandate that we've been given by the people.

Q. Mr. President, budget director David Stockman says the taxpayers of this country shouldn't be responsible for the bad debts of farmers. Do you agree with Mr. Stockman? And if you do, why use Federal funds to extend emergency credits to family farmers?

The President. I think that Mr. Stockman's made it plain that -- in fact, has apologized for some of his remarks, because after 3 hours of what was an appearance before a committee in which, I think, there was a certain amount of harassment and heckling going on, he himself has said that he got a little upset.

No, I think the farm problem is the result of things that have been done in the past. It's the result of the inflationary economy that we had for some time. There are a number of farmers now who -- their main problem is they borrowed on the basis of inflated land values, and then when we brought inflation down, that left them with loans, and the collateral did not have the same value.

And we have -- making a proposal, and we'll be talking tomorrow with the Congressmen about a proposal for this short-term problem that will include loans and loan guarantees -- some $650 million in that -- and then, subsequently, we will be taking up proposals for, hopefully, getting the farm economy back into the free marketplace and government out of the agricultural business.

Q. May I follow up, Mr. President? Do you see a contradiction between giving farmers emergency aid now, while proposing to phase out price supports and crop restrictions that they've lived with for half a century?

The President. And that's the problem. We won't pull the rug out from under anyone instantly who has geared themselves to these government programs, but the Government programs didn't succeed. Many of the problems they face today are the result of government's involvement. And I think you'll find that a great majority of farmers believe that the answer to their problems is out in the free market. And then if government is to help, then we should help by opening up world markets for them, by holding trade negotiations, because much of the farming elsewhere in the world is government subsidized. And we intend to do all that we can. In fact, that was one of the things I talked to the Prime Minister about, and we both agreed that we should be discussing, in the coming months, with our trading partners and friends, the reopening of trade negotiations as much as we can to have free trade, and both ways, in the world at large.

Both countries had been involved with obeying the restraints or staying within the restraints mainly because of our efforts toward what we're now approaching, arms reduction talks; that we felt that if we were going to engage in those talks, it would be even better if we did abide by an agreement -- one that had been signed, but never been ratified by our government.

And I don't recall that at all. And I have to say that we know that the Soviet Union, we're sure, has violated some of the restraints now. And we know that we're coming to a point at which we have, up until now, been biding by it. And as we replace older weapons with new, we have destroyed the older ones.

Q. Mr. President, you have said that you would need to be convinced of shifting the tax burden from individuals to corporations, as the Treasury tax plan suggests doing. But in the State of the Union speech, you committed yourself to lowering individual tax rates to 35 percent or lower.

The President. Well, Andrea, where we're going with reducing the rates and where we're going to achieve what we call tax neutrality, or revenue neutrality, will be in the elimination of a number of exemptions that have existed and that sometimes have -- well, they've been unfair in the sense that some are entitled to them and others are not. When I answered that question the other day, I misunderstood. I thought they were telling me that the plan was actually going to get a great higher percentage from business. And I mentioned the fact that I did not want to do something that would interfere with our recovery or keep business from being able to expand. And then I found out that, no, there'd been a misunderstanding about that question.

What we're talking about, as to more revenue from business, is from those elements of business that have not been paying taxes. Now, it hasn't been cheating. It's been legal in that that's just the way some of the exemptions had worked out. And we want to change that so there will be a reduction in rates for everyone. And where the difference will be made up is some who are not now paying taxes at all, or paying very low taxes, will be paying their fair share.

Q. But are you saying, sir, that there would be no increase in the corporate share for those businesses that are now paying taxes, that only those corporations that are not paying their fair share would be affected? And, again, how would you make up the difference, since just the things that you committed yourself to in the State of the Union would amount to $132 billion under the Treasury plan by 1990, when they are phased in?

The President. Well, the Treasury plan as it is now, and while we're still going to have to review that plan, and there are some options in there that we may find aren't suitable to put into operation, but the plan works out to revenue neutral and with a reduction in rates and the, you know, the business rate and the corporation rate is going to come down from 46 percent to 33 percent under that plan.

Middle East, apparently their most intensive on this issue for 7 years. Can you tell us anything about them? And, also, Mr. President, do these talks fit into any other recent development, such as King Hussein's recent move and your talks with King Fahd last week?

The President. No, Ralph. These talks had nothing to do with negotiations or anything of that kind. We simply felt that it was time to exchange views with each other and make sure that there couldn't be any miscalculations that could lead to some kind of confrontation or problem.

We don't believe that there should be that many hands in the pot, just as we're not envisioning any participation in negotiations. We have said we'll stand by and we'll help in any way we can, but these negotiations must be between the Arabs and the Palestinians and the Israelis.

The President. Well, remove in the sense of its present structure, in which it is a Communist totalitarian state, and it is not a government chosen by the people. So, you wonder sometimes about those who make such claims as to its legitimacy. We believe, just as I said Saturday morning, that we have an obligation to be of help where we can to freedom fighters and lovers of freedom and democracy, from Afghanistan to Nicaragua and wherever there are people of that kind who are striving for that freedom.

And we're going to try to persuade the Congress that we can legitimately go forward and, hopefully, go forward on a multiyear basis with the Scoop Jackson plan for trying to bring development and help to all of Central America.

The President. Well, what I'm saying is that this present government was one element of the revolution against Somoza. The freedom fighters are other elements of that revolution. And once victory was attained, the Sandinistas did what Castro had done, prior to their time, in Cuba. They ousted and managed to rid themselves of the other elements of the revolution and violated their own promise to the Organization of American States -- as a result of which they had received support from the Organization -- that their revolutionary goal was for democracy, free press, free speech, free labor unions, and elections, and so forth, and they have violated that.

Q. Mr. President, theologians recently criticized you for saying, in defending your military budget, that the Scriptures are on our side. I wonder, do you think it's appropriate to use the Bible in defending a political argument?

The President. Well, I was actually speaking to some clergymen, and I checked that with a few theologians -- if it was appropriate and -- well, what I meant about appropriate, was I interpreting it correctly? Was it a warning that you should be prepared and otherwise ask for peace because you were outnumbered and out -- well, now, we would say outgunned -- on the other side. And they seemed to think that it was perfectly fitting, yes. It was a caution to those people in our own country who would, if given the opportunity, unilaterally disarm us.

The President. Well, I don't think I've ever used the Bible to further political ends or not, but I've found that the Bible contains an answer to just about everything and every problem that confronts us, and I wonder sometimes why we don't recognize that one book could solve a lot of problems for us.

Q. Mr. President, I'd like to come back to the problem of the farmers. You met with some State legislators today. Afterwards they said you're not really doing enough for the farmers; in fact, you're cutting back too much too soon. You mentioned $650 million in aid. Up on Capitol Hill they're trying to provide another billion. Where does the compromise lie, in your mind?

The President. Well, I think that what we're doing can go a long way toward meeting this problem. I think we've been encouraging some of the banks, and if you've noticed lately some of the banks, themselves, out in the farming area have voluntarily reduced the interest rates on some of those outstanding loans because they want to contribute and want to help.

We have spent over $50 billion on agriculture in the last 3 years. We have in the budget for this year some $15 billion, and it'll be a pretty sizable amount -- close to that next year. And that is in the long-range thing of the type of permanent programs that we're trying to phase out over a period of time.

But I think that we are proposing measures and guarantees of loans and so forth that will meet this present crisis. And I think, because I didn't explain that this morning in my remarks -- they weren't on that subject -- I think maybe they're looking at the news and they don't exactly know what we have in mind and what we're going to do.

The President. The only tax break that applies to my ranch was in effect a long time before I bought the ranch. It is a law in California, and it is a law brought about in environmental interests, and that is that formerly property tax -- and that's a local tax -- property tax on agricultural land or just open land was based on the highest potential use of that land. And it was literally driving some farmers into sale of land, giving up farming, because they could no longer afford to use as farm land, or maintain as open space, land that was being taxed as if it were a subdivision.

And this was in place, as I say, when we bought that ranch. It is still in place. California has found that program very successful. It taxes it on that use as long as you sign a contract that you are not going to subdivide, that you are going to maintain that open land. I get no income tax deductions whatsoever with regard to the ranch because the Treasury Department decided that, since I couldn't be there to run cattle or anything, that it was a hobby ranch, and I couldn't argue with them on that.

Charter and within the OAS Charter and the right of people to do what the freedom fighters are doing. You can say it's like saying, is the glass half full or half empty? You can say we're trying to oust the Sandinistas by what we're saying.

We're saying we're trying to give those who fought a revolution to escape a dictatorship, to have democracy, and then had it taken away from them by some of their fellow revolutionaries -- we're saying we want them to have a chance to have that democracy that they fought for. And I don't think the Sandinistas have a decent leg to stand on.

Q. Mr. President, you will soon be making a decision on how to handle the March 31st expiration of Japanese auto import quotas. If Japanese auto sales do increase in this country, will you demand that the Japanese allow more American-made goods to be sold in their country?

The President. Let me just say that -- commenting on anything of that kind -- we have been in communication with the Japanese, we have discussions going forward now on open markets both ways, in improving the situation between our two countries.

A deal of progress has been made. We've got a long way to go yet. But everything that we're going to decide is going to be in that context of the two of us as trading partners having fair trade and free trade between us.

Q. Let me just follow up. With no restraints, your special trade representatives predicted a sales increase of 750,000 vehicles in this country. Will the benefits of that for consumers outweigh the adverse or the presumed adverse effects on the U.S. auto industry?

Japanese themselves instituted. And we've had a Cabinet Council that has -- I know some of you've gotten information before I did on this -- that is going to be coming to me with a recommendation. They have not done so as yet. But I will hear all their arguments, and I will consider them in the context of the negotiations and the communication -- or discussion that is going on between us and the Japanese.

Q. Mr. President, back, if I may, to David Stockman for a moment, even his mother thought that his comments on farmers were a bit heartless. He managed to alienate in almost the next breath almost every veterans group in the country. Admittedly, his is kind of a thankless job. But some have suggested that you could find someone who could accomplish that job with a little less rancor. What do you think, sir?

The President. Well, as I told you, I think he's expressed some regret. And at the same time, I know the circumstances at the time that he made some of those statements. And I know also that under the guise of a committee hearing -- some of the harassment that he'd been subjected to. And I could understand a fellow blowing his cool.

I think he feels, as we all do, and I certainly feel myself, yes, the farmers have a very real problem, and a lot of it has to do with policies that led to the runaway double-digit inflation that we had, in which their land became a haven for those who were seeking hedges against inflation. All of these, plus the government programs, have left them with a very real problem. And we're going to do our utmost to help them find a solution to it.

Q. Mr. President, a number of the questions have been on our economic problems abroad. The farmers' problem, part of it is, sir, that they're priced out of the market in the international trade because of the over-valued dollar. I think that's part of our problem in the auto sales abroad, and in this country -- we're at a disadvantage because our dollar is so valuable compared to other currencies. I wonder, sir, if you have discussed this with Mr. Baker and some of your other economic advisers, and if you have studied the possibility of taking any action by this country to try to reduce the value of the dollar against other currencies, both in Europe and in Asia?

The President. Jim, I think that the problem -- I can remember when our dollar was devalued, and there weren't very many people happy about that. I think the problem of the dollar today is that our trading partners in the world have not caught up with us in economic recovery.

I think they have a ways to go in changing some rigidities in their customs and their methods of doing business and in industry. And what we really need is their recovery to bring their money up in value comparable to ours.

There are two sides to this problem, as we find with the trade deficit, for example, because of our inability, with the price of our dollar, to sell some of our goods abroad -- they are too high priced.

But at the same time, you turn to the other hand and see the people in this country that are benefitting by the purchase of products which are cheap by our standards -- cheap in price, not quality -- in our imports, and how that has managed to hold down inflation.

The President. We have no plans about any moves of any kind. But all I can say about the other, and I don't think I should go farther than this, is to say that, yes, we're very concerned about some of the bilateral problems between countries there at our southern flank of NATO and the effect that they can have on the whole security of the alliance.

Q. Mr. President, if you and Mrs. Thatcher are correct that the Soviets plan to hold hostage any progress on intermediate-range and strategic weapons in the talks in Geneva in return for concessions on your part on your space defense program, how far are you willing to go in getting concessions to get an arms agreement?

The President. We believe if the Soviets are sincere in the statements they've made about actually wanting a reduction and even the elimination of nuclear weapons, they'll stay at the table and negotiate with us. All that we have proposed and all that we're doing is engaging in research, which is legal within the ABM treaty -- we're not violating that treaty.

And I have said repeatedly, and Prime Minister Thatcher is aware of this, that if our research does produce the possibility of such a weapon, a defensive weapon that could alter the balance, then I would be willing to come forth before any deployment and negotiate and discuss the deployment and the use of that weapon in such a way that it would be used to rid the world of the nuclear threat, not to give us any particular advantage over anyone else.

We just think that the ABM treaty itself -- this is one part that has been violated -- the ABM treaty in being passed, being a defensive weapon treaty, expressed the belief that this should then be accompanied by realistic reductions of nuclear weapons. And all there has been since the treaty was passed was a tremendous increase in those weapons.

The President. Well, I would have great difficulty accepting such a proposal. I imagine that he's talking about a tax in the nature of a value-added tax. First of all, this appears to be increasing taxes, which I've said we wouldn't do. But a value-added tax actually gives a government a chance to blindfold the people and grow in stature and size. First of all, you are kind of interfering with one of the principal sources of local government levels and State governments in their use of the sales tax, since the Federal Government had so -- you might say, confiscated the area of the income tax. But the other thing with that tax is, it's hidden in the price of a product. And that tax can quietly be increased, and all the people know is that the price went up, and they don't know whether the price went up because somebody got a raise, or whether the company wanted to increase profits, or whether it was government.

Well, shortly after that meeting ``Dear Abby'' wrote a column in which she suggested that just as in 1938, Franklin Delano Roosevelt had asked people to send him dimes for the March of Dimes that he would turn over to that program -- now that a dollar is worth only what a dime was then, ``Dear Abby'' wrote a column and suggested that on my birthday people might do the same thing with a dollar instead of a dime.

The Superfund was enacted in 1980 to provide for the cleanup of abandoned hazardous waste sites, which pose a threat to the public health and the environment. EPA currently has an inventory of 18,000 potential sites that require investigation. Additionally, the National Priorities List, which includes those sites requiring long-term cleanup, has already been expanded from the statutorily mandated minimum of 400 sites to 756 sites. Ultimately, EPA estimates that the number of sites requiring long-term cleanup could total between 1,500 and 2,000. These sites represent the legacy of decades of neglect. We, as a society, must address these serious health threats.

This legislation will more than triple the size of the existing Superfund program, from $1.6 billion to $5.3 billion, which will allow us to substantially increase the size and pace of the Superfund program. In order to fund this threefold increase, we will ask the Congress to extend for another 5 years the existing tax imposed on the manufacture of certain chemicals and to enact a fee, which will go into a dedicated trust fund, on the disposal and treatment of hazardous waste. These taxes and fees will raise approximately $1 billion per year over the next 5 years. I strongly believe that the funds used to pay for the program should be generated entirely through these dedicated sources, not the general Treasury. In addition to the expansion of the Superfund, we have requested increased enforcement authority to ensure that responsible parties either conduct or pay for the cleanup of hazardous waste sites that endanger public health or the environment. We will also seek to guarantee a larger role for affected citizens and the States, and expand authority to respond to emergencies.

In my 1984 and 1985 State of the Union Addresses and in the campaign, I promised that this administration would seek reauthorization of Superfund. This bill fulfills our commitment to the American people to address the legacy of abandoned hazardous waste sites in an expeditious manner. It will allow us to move aggressively forward to eliminate the health and environmental risks associated with past waste disposal practices.

My Administration has been moving forcefully to implement the Superfund program, expanding the national priorities list from the statutorily mandated minimum of 400 sites to 756 sites, greatly augmenting the money available for the program, and, most importantly, beginning the cleanup process at an ever increasing number of sites. The danger to public health and the environment presented by releases and threatened releases of hazardous substances from inactive waste sites persists, however, and we must not lose the momentum we have achieved.

The Administration's proposed legislation will more than triple the size of the existing program, from $1.6 billion to $5.3 billion. In order to fund this three-fold increase, we are requesting the Congress to extend for another five years the existing tax imposed on the manufacture of certain chemicals and to enact a fee, which will go into the dedicated trust fund, on the disposal and treatment of hazardous waste. These taxes and fees will raise approximately $1 billion per year over the next five years, which should provide adequate, stable, and equitable financing for the program. I strongly believe that funds used to pay for the program should be generated entirely through these dedicated sources, not the general treasury.

It's important to note that about two-thirds of today's farmers have no debt problems and only a minority of the remainder are in severe financial distress. Now, that's not to minimize one bit the difficulties all farmers face following the shocks of the 1970's: two grain embargoes, double-digit inflation, and record interest rates at 21 percent.

As farmers' land values shot up, some borrowed large sums of money and, yes, sometimes exorbitant sums, based on that inflated land value. Then, as we brought inflation down -- and believe me, we're determined to keep it down -- those farmers have been left with declining land values to cover their loans, making them harder to repay.

For example, between 1973 and 1983, the Federal Government went from purchasing 1.9 percent to 12 percent of all dairy products -- the equivalent of 17 billion pounds of butter, cheese, and dried milk piled up in cold storage. The cost to taxpayers soared from $117 million to well over $2 billion. Other programs leading to surpluses in corn and wheat depressed prices, sent false signals to the markets, and drove more farmers toward bankruptcy.

The same government which played a part in this unhappy drama must not turn away from those who are the backbone of our nation, who gave America the highest standard of living in the world, and who preserved the blessing of life for millions of the world's hungry.

Secretary Block announced a modification of Federal regulations so that banks will have an incentive to work out lower payments for farmers having trouble paying off their loans. We're providing loan guarantees for eligible farmers whose local banks fail and who can't find a new private lender without such a guarantee. Our program will ease further the farmers' requirement for participation in it, so more of them can take advantage of our credit offer. This administration is moving forward with its credit program because spring planting cannot wait.

American taxpayers must not be asked to bail out every farmer hopelessly in debt, some by hundreds of thousands of dollars, or be asked to bail out the banks who also bet on higher inflation. We have already extended a tremendous amount of assistance. It's time for others to pitch in and do more, from officials at the State level to banks, private groups, and individuals in our communities -- all joining in partnership to help farmers.

Over the long haul, there's only one sure solution. We have the ability to change, the opportunity to act, and we're going to begin now working our way back to a free market economy. What farmers need and we're determined to provide is less dependence on politicians to supply their incomes and greater independence to supply their own incomes.

Our package will be market-oriented, enabling farmers during a transition period to become more independent and make their own decisions in the marketplace again. Government will stop purchasing commodities, stop trying to manipulate supply and demand, refrain from quick fixes and extravagant new farm legislation, and move aggressively to expand markets for American farm products.

The time is now for a fresh start for American agriculture. And if we combine passage of our farm legislation with spending restraints to reduce Federal borrowing so interest rates can come down further and tax simplification to lower tax rates so we can reach greater growth, then farmers can finally reap a real prosperity every bit as bountiful as their own harvests.

In the early days of the Republic, those holding our jobs weren't so certain of what our relationship should be. They knew that every decision they made would set precedents, especially concerning the sovereignty of State government in relation to the Federal Government. And Frank Chodorov, a man of liberating insight, wrote of the time when George Washington was to make his first visit as President to Massachusetts. And according to Chodorov, Governor Hancock of Massachusetts was beside himself over a matter of protocol. Would it be proper to meet President Washington on his arrival? Or would it be more appropriate for the President to call at the State capitol? What Hancock did, he thought, might be taken as an acknowledgment of the supremacy of the Federal Government or simply as a matter of courtesy.

It was a difficult decision, and finally the day of Washington's arrival was at hand. And Hancock boldly made the decision: He pleaded illness. [Laughter] Wouldn't it be nice if feigning illness would substitute for making some of the hard decisions that we face?

Today, of course, that's not an alternative. The challenges before us, especially concerning tax simplification and spending restraint, will require great courage and effort and extraordinary cooperation between us. I hope that I can count on you to continue to work with me in a spirit of good will in the months ahead. I've sought and appreciated your advice and will continue to do so.

The Federal-State relationship should strive to maximize the benefits of limited resources, to eliminate waste, to further reduce the Federal regulatory burden, and to preserve the strength and vitality of our nation's economy. A vigorous and expanding economy must be priority number one. As Governors you know that better than most. Low inflation and high growth have cut your costs and increased your tax base. No Federal program is more important to the viability of State government than economic expansion.

Today the people no longer look to Washington as an Emerald City with magic solutions to every problem. I've been here going on 5 years now, and I can tell you it's more like the Twilight Zone than the Land of Oz. [Laughter] But this new view of the Federal Government, a more realistic understanding of its limitations as well as its potentials, has been a great boon to our country.

Now, all over America we hear stories of the success of innovative and creative State and local enterprises. Only a few years ago people were waiting for the Federal Government to act. Well, today they're taking the initiative, taking the future in their hands, and in doing so, accomplishing things that would never have happened if encumbered by Federal redtape and another layer of bureaucratic entanglement.

We in this room, as chief executives, are lucky to be holding office during a period of great change. It's a difficult time, and what we do will lay the foundation for a better future. Let us not be afraid to make these historic decisions -- consulting openly and honestly, one with another.

Thank you all for coming today. I want you to know I can sympathize with what you're thinking. I was once a Governor visiting the White House. And I can remember sitting where you're sitting and looking around and thinking I could be happy here. [Laughter] But it isn't always roses.

Really now, I do want to be serious. I noted last week in my press conference that we're enjoying the strongest economic expansion since the Korean war and that our first duty now is to prolong and protect this expansion. We intend to do this by carrying out the mandate delivered November 6th by the American people, the terms of which I think were quite clear. We seek the full cooperation of the Congress in moving forward now on this agenda and keeping our promises.

First, our administration proposes to freeze overall Federal program spending at last year's level, to cut $51 billion out of programs in need of restraint, to reduce spending by half a trillion dollars over the next 5 years.

And these proposals are rooted both in economic necessity and common sense. There's simply no justification, for example, for the Federal Government, which is running a deficit, to be borrowing money to be spent by State and local governments, some of which are now running surpluses -- surpluses resulting from your leadership and a recovery that was brought on by this administration -- its recovery plan, I should say.

I was Governor of a State with a huge agricultural industry, not to mention the fact that I was born in farm country and got my first job in a farm State. I know what you're going through; things are very tough for you and your farmers. And together, we have to do something about that.

But it's also true that many of your States are in better fiscal shape today because of the courage that you showed and the hard decisions you made during the recent recession. I hope you can understand that these tough calls have to be made now at the Federal level.

Second, we want to solidify the gains we've already made by institutionalizing reforms against government excess, reforms that will prevent the burden of government from falling so heavily on future generations. We want to take a lesson in federalism and give the Presidency that same powerful tool that 43 of you Governors use to fight pork-barrel items in catchall appropriations -- the line-item veto.

We also want to do what 49 States have done in some form. We want to adopt the wisdom understood in every American household: that government shouldn't live beyond its means, that it shouldn't spend more than it takes in. We need that balanced budget amendment. And I'm pleased to see that your executive committee yesterday included language calling for both a balanced budget amendment and a line-item veto authority.

Third is tax simplification. We want it this year; so do the American people. The present tax code burdens some of our citizens too heavily while permitting others to avoid paying their fair share. It makes honest people feel like cheats, and it makes cheats pose as honest citizens. It allows the underground economy to thrive and wastes millions of man-hours on needless paperwork and regulations. It drives money needed for growth, investment, and jobs into unproductive tax shelters. It acts as the single biggest obstacle to enterprise and economic expansion.

To put it simply, our tax system is unfair, inequitable, counterproductive, and all but incomprehensible. I've mentioned before, and this is absolutely a fact, that even Albert Einstein had to write to the IRS for help with his Form 1040. We want to end the trauma and tangle of April 15th, and let's do it this year.

Something else to keep in mind: In 1981, during the debate over our tax bill, we pointed out that the most important effects of reducing tax rates were sometimes not easily quantified or immediately apparent; that its very passage could send out a subtle message and create long-term changes in a political or economic culture that are infinitely more important. So, we have before us a tremendous opportunity to further the spirit of enterprise and growth, to accomplish the greatest deregulatory task of them all, and to haul ourselves out of the morass that is the Federal tax code. Let's get started.

Well, all of you know how much truth there was to that. Growth begets growth; hope begets hope. If we can get on with phase two -- those budget cuts, so we can steadily shrink the deficit; the line-item veto and constitutional amendment on balancing the budget; and that tax simplification plan -- we will be sending out a message of hope and growth, whose potential for good is incalculable.

And let me conclude with an aside about another subject that's very dear to my heart -- that of private sector initiatives. We've seen a real surge in them during the last few years. Businessmen are adopting schools, corporations are supporting nonprofit organizations, and record numbers of volunteers are providing for community needs. This growing public-private partnership strengthens our State-Federal partnership.

Well, as you know, we have our share of meetings and visitors in this room, but believe me, there's no group that I'd rather see coming my way than all of you; no subject more dear to my heart than the one to which you've so generously dedicated your time and talent during the past few years.

I hope you'll let me reminisce here for a moment. I remember back during the campaign of 1980, I used to bring up the subject of waste, fraud, and abuse in the National Government and even mentioned the idea of a commission such as yours. Out there on the campaign trail, it was an issue that really hit home. But somehow back here in Washington, it didn't play as well. To the permanent establishment, waste and fraud are a little bit like the issue of higher taxes. It was all okay for politicians to talk about it now and then, but it was never really considered proper to go out and talk about it as if you meant it. And come to think of it, we did do something about higher taxes, also.

I'm sure they must have been kidding. I mean, anybody who knows Peter Grace for more than 5 minutes knows that he is not a man who -- let me see how I can phrase this -- he's not a man who dislikes taking things to their logical conclusion. [Laughter] And that's exactly what Peter and all of you have done. With dedication and selflessness, you've succeeded where others failed. You provided clear, concise, and practical recommendations to enormously complicated problems.

Recently, I know you've participated in the House Budget Committee hearings held at various points around the country. You must have been quite a disappointment to some of them in those commissions. They didn't go out there to hear the kind of things you were saying.

And now, Peter Grace and Jack Anderson [Nationally syndicated newspaper columnist]  -- and if that isn't an unusual, but high octane team -- [laughter] -- you've created a group called Citizens Against Waste. It's a group that will be a focus for citizens action, a truly bipartisan organization whose only loyalty is to the one special interest group that we should all support, because we all belong to it -- the 77 million United States taxpayers who, with their work, patriotism, and, may I say, immense patience, finance the Federal Government.

I think this kind of grassroots, educational program will, like the Grace commission itself, focus on the abuse of taxpayer dollars and hold elected and appointed officials accountable. In doing this, Citizens Against Waste will not just help reduce our national deficit, without increasing taxes, but spark a much needed increase in citizen involvement in the workings of government and a long-overdue renewal of confidence in our democratic system.

But in addition to congratulating and thanking you today for this and other efforts, I also want to give you a progress report on where we stand with the Grace commission recommendations. The statistics are impressive. Already 1,148 of your recommendations are being implemented or have been proposed for implementation. And the dollar savings are impressive: $112 billion over 3 years in prior budgets and $56 billion proposed in the budget that I have just sent to the Hill. And I'm proud to say that we discussed these fine results in our first-ever management report to the Congress that we sent to the Hill last week.

We've come a long way together, this far. That's a record to be proud of, but something else needs to be said here. Some people have the odd idea that it's fine while you're a political candidate or during the first year or so in office to talk about waste and fraud. You may remember, in my first speech to the Congress, I called waste and fraud an unrelenting national scandal. But they warned that after a certain period of time, the political danger tends to grow.

After all, if the headlines about government boondoggles like $400 hammers or millions in benefits to the ineligible recipients start appearing on your watch, the public might just decide to start blaming you.

Federal expenditures increased 400 percent. Now, thanks to you and others like you, we've worked hard on this problem for 4 years, and we've made progress in reducing the growth in spending. But we know no problem of this size could ever have been solved in one year or one term of office.

And no matter what some of the political pros might say, I think the public knows this. And I think they know we're trying and succeeding. And I think they're smart enough to understand that all those stories about waste and fraud are a direct result of a fight that we're proud to say we started in the first place.

Beyond this, the impact of your work is incalculable. Even if nothing else gets done -- and I can assure you a lot more is going to get done -- you have permanently changed the mood of the country. From frustration and despair over a spendthrift, irresponsible bureaucracy, the public now knows some hope and optimism that government can at last be made lean, cost-effective, and responsive to the people. That's why they're behind the Grace commission's work, and that's why they're behind our plan for deficit reduction.

Another project I know you'll be out there helping us fight for -- I speak for myself when I say I owe you all a personal debt of thanks, but I also speak for the Nation and for many future generations of Americans when I say that, in making government more responsive to the wishes of the people, you have reached back to make contact with the very principle of government that began this nation: the belief that government is here to serve the people and not the other way around.

God bless you all, and thank you for what you've done and the tools that you have given us that are going to rewrite an awful lot of economic textbooks in the next few years; some have been rewritten already. Thank you very much.

The Convention, in general, follows the pattern of other United States income tax treaties and the current draft United States Model Income Tax Convention, but deviates from the model in certain respects to reflect Barbados' status as a developing country.

Among the principal features of the Convention are provisions to prevent third-country residents from taking unwarranted advantage of the treaty. The Convention also establishes maximum rates of tax at source on payments of dividends, interest, and royalties.

The exchange of notes indicates the willingness of the United States Government to reopen discussions, should circumstances change, which would permit the inclusion of additional provisions to create incentives to promote the flow of United States investment to Barbados.

I'm delighted to welcome all of you here today. In a few minutes, it'll be my privilege to present the National Medal of Science to 19 Americans who have made outstanding contributions to our way of life and to our future.

Well, we're not here to take up a collection. [Laughter] In fact, despite the constraints in Federal spending, our budget for the next fiscal year calls for a 6.7-percent increase for basic research in the physical sciences. I should add that we're also planning for increased funding for science and technology and basic research through the end of the decade, and that's because what you do is that important. The ultimate source of innovation, of new technology, of human progress itself, is knowledge; and that's the business of science.

Now, there's no nation on Earth that can match our scientific capability, but, of course, no nation depends as much as we do on the science base. Our enviable standard of living, our national security, our ability to create millions of new jobs -- more than 7 million over the last 2 years, in what the Europeans are calling an American miracle -- all depend on new talent, knowledge, and our talent for making use of it.

And there's no doubt that the measure of America's future safety, progress, and greatness depends on how well scientists keep pushing back new frontiers. That's why I'm so pleased that today's ceremony is the third White House event this month honoring the people whose work will determine that future.

Science are a tribute from your fellow -- well, from a group of -- why should I pause right here when it's right in front of me and all I have to do is look at it? -- from your fellow scientists. I started to say just from your fellow Americans, but I think that would have been proper, too, because I'm sure they share our gratitude and appreciation for all you do.

Each of you has devoted your energies not to truth as understood, but to the search for truth not yet understood. You had faith that you'd come to understand the unknown, and you did. You had faith that your discoveries would bring progress, and they did. And because of your achievements and those of your colleagues, we stand on the verge of greater advances than mankind has ever known.

Your work is proof that there are no limits to discovery and human progress when men and women are free to follow their dreams. You've proven time and again that freedom plus science equals opportunity and progress and that America's future can be determined by our dreams and our visions.

On behalf of the American people in whose names these medals are presented, I extend my congratulations to all of you, to your families, and your coworkers. We deeply appreciate what you've done, and we thank you. And God bless you all.

Department of Transportation (DOT), is designated to coordinate and monitor implementation of the Act, and consult periodically with State and local governments and other organizations and interest groups affected by administration of the Act.

Such regulations shall be consistent with the model policy promulgated by DOT, in consultation and coordination with other affected agencies, and published in final form in the Federal Register simultaneously with this Memorandum.

America has a long heritage of educational diversity, of public schools working along- side our independent schools, and this tradition has done much to contribute to our nation's greatness. You and the schools you represent have helped keep our educational standards high. You've earned the deep respect and appreciation of the American people, and I thank you.

Bennett. Whether as a student in his undergraduate days or studying for his doctorate or, later, as a teacher, author, or Chairman for the National Endowment for the Humanities, Bill Bennett has spent a lifetime taking serious ideas seriously.

As Prime Minister Thatcher told the Congress this month, it wasn't Soviet good will that brought the Soviets back to the bargaining table; it was American strength. So it is that, as we begin this second term, I believe we face an historic challenge. We have the chance to prepare America, not just for the next 4 years or the next decade, but for the 21st century. And together, we can keep America moving toward that first shining vision -- a land of golden opportunity, where achievement is limited only by how big we dream, how hard we work, and how well we learn.

And we know the path to that vision is through economic growth and new technologies and renewed excellence in American education. Today we're making history with the most sustained, far-reaching economic expansion since the end of World War II. More than 7 million jobs have been created over the last 2 years, and more Americans are now working than ever before in our history. And we're determined to go on creating more jobs until every American can share in the self-esteem that comes from the honest work of hands and mind.

A stronger economy is leading us into a technological revolution that's offering dazzling progress for the future. During the past couple of weeks, it so happens that I have presented the first National Technology Awards, awarded the National Medals of Science, and had lunch with a group of futurists. I've heard about the fiber composites and ceramics that are taking the place of costly metals in manufacturing, about new medical techniques like the use of lasers and sound waves. And I've learned more about the miracles of microchips, about the practical benefits of the space station that we plan to have in orbit by the mid-1990's, and the home computers that are putting our literature and vast sums of information at families' fingertips.

Albert Einstein once said that science is nothing but everyday thinking carefully applied. Well, that's easy for him to say. [Laughter] Yet, even laymen like us can see that in coming decades technology promises to make life in America longer, healthier, and fuller.

Without education, we could even lose our most fundamental values -- our beliefs in a just and loving God, in freedom, in hard work. Yet if we do educate our children well, grounding them in our values, sharpening their minds, teaching them greatness of spirit, then the coming decades will be the best that America has ever seen.

And so Americans decided to put an end to educational decline. Across the land, parents, teachers, school officials, and State and local officeholders began to improve the fundamentals of American education. I don't mean they went to work on budget-busting proposals of new frills in the curriculum. They went to work as you have -- on teaching and learning.

Since 1981, 43 States have raised their graduation requirements; 5 more have higher requirements under consideration. Perhaps the most telling figure is this: scholastic aptitude test scores have risen in 2 of the last 3 years, the best record in the last 20 years. And we've only begun.

States and localities, which quite properly bear the main responsibility for our schools, have taken an active part in this movement for educational reform. But we've made certain that the Federal Government has also played a leading role. Our administration has replaced 28 narrow educational programs with one block grant to give State and local officials greater leeway in spending Federal aid.

We've rolled back regulations that were hampering educators with needless paperwork. We've taken steps to promote discipline in our schools, including the establishment of the National School Safety Center. And we've launched Partnerships in Education, a program in which businesses, labor unions, and other groups of working people are pitching in to help schools in their communities. Today there are more than 40,000 such partnerships in operation. In Philadelphia, for example, business leaders have raised $26 million to support the Catholic schools that educqte one-third of the city's children. I should add that one of the most effective Federal actions has been the growth of the economy, that I mentioned a moment ago.

Private contributions to schools, especially colleges and universities, are up. Indeed, in 1983 the colleges and universities that responded to a survey conducted by the Council for Financial Aid to Education reported endowments totaling some $29.6 billion, the largest 1-year figure since the council began conducting its surveys in 1966.

Under the previous administration, even though Federal education budgets soared, overall spending on education throughout America, adjusted for inflation, actually declined by $17 billion, dragged down by the weakening economy. But with inflation down and the economy now growing again, education spending throughout the country, despite restraint at the Federal level, has actually gone up by almost $18 billion. And today many States are running a surplus and are in a better position to help fund our public schools and universities.

From the State university that has new funds for research to the community that can afford a new school bus, economic growth is giving education throughout America a powerful lift. Continuing this economic growth will prove invaluable during the 4 years to come. And that's why we intend to provide more incentives, cut personal income tax rates further, and keep America the investment capital of the world. And that's why we can and must bring Federal spending under control.

Now, in recent weeks, there's been a certain amount of confusion regarding our budget proposals on education. Let me take this opportunity to make matters clear. In our proposal, we have recommended reserving aid for the needy, limiting aid per student to a level we can afford, closing loopholes that lead to abuse and error, and cutting excessive subsidies to banks and others.

Regarding student loans, as things stand now, our nation provides some aid to college students from the highest income families; some to students who come from families with incomes higher than $100,000. This defies common sense, insults simple justice, and must stop. Government has no right to force the least affluent to subsidize the sons and daughters of the wealthy. And under our proposal, this will change. Those whose family incomes are too high to qualify for guaranteed loans with heavy interest subsidies will still have access to guaranteed, but unsubsidized loans of up to $4,000. And every qualified student who wants to go to college will still be able to do so.

Yes, our proposal may cause some families to make difficult adjustments. But by bringing the budget under control, we will avoid the far more painful adjustment of living in a wrecked economy. And that's what we're absolutely determined to do.

State task forces on education, college entrance scores growing -- or edging up, a growing economy providing schools with more resources -- yes, education has taken its first steps on the long, hard road to excellence. And as we continue our journey during the next 4 years and beyond, Secretary Bennett and I believe there are five aspects of education to which we must give our full attention, five guideposts, if you will, to lead us on our way: choice, teachers, curriculum, setting, and parents. And let me touch briefly on each of them for you now.

The first, choice: Parents should have greater freedom to send their children to the schools they desire and to do so without interference by local, State, or Federal levels of government. Diversity and competition among schools should be encouraged, not discouraged.

At the State level, efforts to encourage parental choice might involve both legislation to permit parents to choose from any public schools within their districts and efforts to eliminate redtape surrounding within-district transfers.

Tuition tax credits would provide some support to middle and lower income parents with children in independent schools. And this would be only fair, since these parents are also paying their full share of taxes to support our public schools.

Education vouchers would deliver aid for educationally disadvantaged children, not to schools but directly to the parents. And under our plan, each year, selected parents would receive one voucher worth several hundred dollars per child. These parents would then be free to use their vouchers at any schools they chose.

Tuition tax credits and education vouchers would foster greater diversity and, hence, higher standards throughout our system of education. These proposals have the support of the American people. And make no mistake, Secretary Bennett and I intend to see them through to their enactment.

Our second guidepost, teachers: Studies indicate that by the end of this decade America will need more than a million new teachers and that by 1990 almost two-thirds of our teachers will have been hired since 1980. Today America boasts thousands of fine teachers, but in too many cases teaching has become a resting place for the unmotivated and the unqualified. And this we can no longer allow.

We must give our teachers greater honor and respect. We must sweep away laws and regulations, such as unduly restrictive certification requirements, that prevent good people from entering this profession, and we must pay and promote our teachers according to merit. Hard-earned tax dollars have no business rewarding mediocrity; they must be used to encourage excellence.

And third, curriculum: deciding what we want our children to learn. This is, to be sure, a difficult question. But this much we already know: We cannot allow our curricula to be divided by narrow interest groups. They must be determined by the intellectual, moral, and civic needs of our students themselves.

We must also know certain basic subjects must not be neglected. Too many students today are allowed to abandon vocational and college prep courses for courses of doubtful value, that prepare them neither for work nor higher education. Compared to other industrialized countries, moreover, we have fallen behind in the sciences and math.

In Japan advanced coursework in mathematics and science starts in elementary school. So Japan, with a population only about half the size of ours, graduates about as many engineers as we do. In the Soviet Union students learn the basic concepts of algebra and geometry in elementary school.

Compared to the United States, the Soviet Union graduates from college more than three times as many specialists in engineering. It's time to put an end to this learning gap by insisting that all American students become fully conversant with science and math, as well as history, reading, and writing.

But students should not only learn basic subjects but basic values. We must teach the importance of justice, equality, religion, liberty, and standards of right and wrong. And we must give them a picture of America that is balanced and full, containing our virtues along with our faults.

Our children should know that because Americans abhor discrimination, the number of black families living in our suburbs has grown more than three times the rate of white families living in suburbs and that between 1960 and 1982, the number of black Americans in our colleges more than quadrupled.

You know, our fourth guidepost is setting in schools throughout -- in setting, I should say: In schools throughout America, learning has been crowded out by alcohol, drugs, and crime. In 1983, for example, a distinguished panel reported on one of our major urban school systems and found that during the prior year fully one-half of the high school teachers who responded to the survey had fallen victim to robbery, larceny, or assault on school property. Of the high school students surveyed, nearly four-tenths had likewise been victimized. And the panel found, moreover, that during the prior year 17 percent of the female students and 37 percent of the male students surveyed had carried weapons to school. In the name of our children, this must stop. In the courts, for too long, we've concentrated on the rights of the few disruptive students and allowed simple matters of discipline to become major legal proceedings.

Supreme Court Justice Powell has criticized the ``indiscriminate reliance upon the judiciary and the adversary process as the means of resolving many of the most routine problems arising in the classroom.'' It's high time we return common sense to the process and paid attention to the rights of the great majority of students who want to learn.

I'm proud to say that our Justice Department participated in the recent Supreme Court case that restored the authority of school officials to conduct reasonable searches. There's no need to call in a grand jury every time a principal needs to check a student locker. And today I'm directing our outstanding new Attorney General, Ed Meese, to work with Secretary Bennett in examining possible modifications of Federal law to avoid undercutting the authority of State and local school officials to maintain effective discipline.

Discipline is important, not for its own sake, but as a way of instilling a virtue that is central to life in our democracy -- self-discipline. And if it is sometimes difficult to assert rightful authority, we must ask: Who better to correct the student's arithmetic -- his math teacher or, years later, his boss? Who better to teach the student respect for rules -- his principal or, someday, the police?

Let's teach our sons and daughters to view academic standards, codes of civilized behavior, and knowledge itself with reverence. And let us do so not for the sake of those standards, those codes, or that knowledge, but for the sake of those young human beings.

Well, the answer is to restore State and local governments and, above all, parents to their rightful place in the educational process. Parents know that they cannot educate their children on their own. We must recognize, in turn, that schools cannot educate students without the personal involvement of parents.

Choice, teachers, curriculum, setting, parents -- if we concentrate on these five guideposts, then I know American education will enjoy a great renaissance of excellence and enable us to achieve new strength, freedom, and prosperity in the century to come.

They seemed to have an adventure every time they drift ashore. And they become entangled with townsfolk, two colorful con artists, and members of feuding clans. Huck works hard to keep Jim free, and in the end he succeeds.

In this work, Mark Twain presents the humor, the openness, and purity of hearts so characteristic of the American spirit. I believe the book says much about the moral aims of education, about the qualities of heart that we seek to impart to our children.

At one point in the book, Huck talks about evenings on the raft. He says: ``We catched fish and talked, and we took a swim now and then to keep off sleepiness. It was kind of solemn, drifting down the big, still river, laying on our backs looking up at the stars, and we didn't ever feel like talking loud, and it warn't often that we laughed -- only a low kind of chuckle . . .

Well, in the decades to come, may our schools give to our children the skills to navigate through life as gracefully as Huck navigated the Mississippi. And may they teach our students the same hatred of bigotry and love of their fellow men that Huck showed on every page, and especially in his love for his big friend, Jim. And may they equip them to be as thankful for the gift of life in America in the 21st century as was one Huckleberry Finn in the 19th.

And may I just say something also, too, about getting a little overboard and using something -- prestige -- or getting it out of education. It's a story about the author of Huckleberry Finn, Mark Twain. He was on an ocean voyage. And one day in the dining salon on the ship, one of his tablemates asked him if he would pass the sugar. And then, knowing that he was speaking to Mark Twain, he thought he would impress him a little bit with his knowledge. And he said, ``Mr.

Henry Cabot Lodge was celebrated for his eloquence on behalf of the American cause. At a crisis point in the cold war, he spoke for honesty and human freedom in the United Nations; as a Senator and Vice Presidential candidate, he often inspired his countrymen with words of vision and uplift. Yet perhaps the best measure of his dedication to this nation and the ideals for which it stands was his willingness to forsake high political office to defend his country in time of war. His service in uniform was like that of his public career: long, valorous, dedicated.

Massachusetts has lost a loyal son, and America has lost a distinguished public servant and symbol of America's quest for decency in a tumultuous era. On behalf of all Americans, Nancy and I extend our deepest sympathy to the Lodge family.

This has been a difficult week for the United States. I know we've all been deeply shaken by the tragedy of the space shuttle Challenger. America has suffered a great national loss, and we mourn as one people united in our grief. Yet as I said to young Americans last Tuesday, we must also find courage to push on. The future does not belong to the fainthearted; it belongs to the brave. The Challenger crew was pulling us into the future, and we'll continue to follow them. Nothing ends here. Our hopes and our journeys continue. Great challenges demand heroic struggles. We tend to forget, it being 19 years since our last space program setback, that progress often does not come without great cost or daunting risks.

Nowhere is that lesson clearer than here in Washington, DC. The Federal Government has been living beyond its means for 24 of the last 25 years. Government has been taxing and spending your earnings as though they are inexhaustible, as though there need never be the kind of struggle to make ends meet that families undergo each week. And this is why we have nearly a $2 trillion debt hanging over our future. All of us were told by our parents, ``You've got to face reality.'' Well, today we as a nation must face the reality that deficit spending, if permitted to continue, could eat away the economic gains we've made these last few years and undermine the well-being of our children.

Recent passage of the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings amendment was an admission by the Congress that zero hour is upon us, that America must make decisions we've never been willing to make before. Gramm-Rudman-Hollings will force the Congress to meet a deficit target by steadily reducing the growth in Federal spending. Each year the deficit must be cut by a fixed amount until it is brought down to zero in fiscal year 1991. If the Congress fails to make the necessary cuts, the law provides for across-the-board cuts to assure the deficit target is met. Today I have ordered Federal agencies to carry out the first round of across-the-board cuts required under the law -- $11.7 billion.

I'm confident we can achieve these reductions while maintaining government services. Nevertheless, these budget savings make no distinction between high priority programs and those of little merit. Our administration's 1987 budget takes a different and better approach to meeting the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings deficit targets. We propose to reform or eliminate the programs and activities that are either too big or that shouldn't exist at all. And we propose to transfer programs that should be handled by State and local governments or private enterprise consistent with their traditional responsibilities. At the same time, we'll keep faith with the fundamental commitments we made to the American people.

Second, we will insist on modest but steady growth to sustain the defense program set in motion 5 years ago. When we came to Washington in 1981, U.S. military security had been shamefully neglected. We hadn't built a new land-based strategic missile system since the 1960's, and we'd been dismantling our nuclear warheads even as the Soviet Union was racing forward with the most awesome military buildup in history. The morale and training of our Armed Forces was sinking. An alarming percentage of our planes and ships couldn't take off or leave port. And the supply of basic munitions, like bullets and artillery shells, had fallen to an unacceptably low level. The Soviets want nothing more than to see America flinch and forsake the rebuilding program we've worked so hard to get started. We've spent 5 years making our military more competitive and America secure again. We must not permit this vital work to be undone in the second term.

Third, let me make it plain that our budget will not increase taxes on the American people, because any tax increase the Congress sends me will be DOA, dead on arrival. We haven't built 37 months of economic expansion and created over 9 million jobs by raising taxes on the people; we've done it by increasing opportunity. And building an American opportunity society for tomorrow is the vision that must continue to unite and inspire us in the days ahead.

In accordance with the Balanced Budget and Emergency Deficit Control Act of 1985, I herewith report the issuance of the Order to affected agencies to suspend automatic spending increases and sequester or reduce budgetary resources consistent with the Comptroller General's January 21 sequestration or reduction determinations required by the Act, to eliminate the $11.7 billion deficit excess for Fiscal Year 1986. This Order is effective March 1, 1986, unless modified by enacted alternative deficit reduction legislation. A copy of the Order is enclosed.

Heads of Executive, Legislative, and Judicial branch agencies have further calculated and are sending to the Congress detailed reports of the base and reduction or sequestration amount by programs, projects, and activities. These calculations are in compliance with the Comptroller General's report.

Also, the head of each Department or agency shall report the programs, projects, and activities information required by section 252(a)(5)(A) and (B) to the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget, and the Comptroller General, as instructed by the Director of the Office of Management and Budget in Bulletin No. 86 - 7. For those programs in the National Defense function that have already been reported by program, project, and activity, no additional report is necessary. The reports of the Departments and agencies are hereby incorporated in this Order.

I further direct the Director of Central Intelligence to report the programs, projects, and activities information required by section 252(a)(5)(A) and (B) on a classified basis to the appropriate committees of the Congress for the National Foreign Intelligence Program consistent with paragraphs 1 through 3 of this Order and to so advise the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget, and the Comptroller General, as instructed by the Director of the Office of Management and Budget.

In accordance with section 252(a)(6)(A), amounts suspended, sequestered or reduced under this Order shall be withheld from obligation and amounts suspended or sequestered shall be permanently cancelled as of March 1, 1986, unless alternative legislation is enacted prior to that date.

Black history is a book filled with rich and unexplored pages. It reached a memorable milestone this very year when the birthday of Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr., became a Federal holiday. This new Federal holiday celebrates more than the faith, leadership, and heroism of one man. It does more than celebrate his splendid achievements or the trail he blazed for others. It symbolizes the struggle of many Americans for full and unfettered recognition of the Constitutional rights of all Americans regardless of race or color.

Black history in the United States has been a proving ground for America's ideals. The first great test of our political good faith came with the Civil War and the rooting out of slavery as an institution. The second came a century later, in the struggle for the recognition of the rights already won in principle -- the abolition of second-class citizenship. To make Americans aware of these struggles, and of all that preceded and followed them, is a foremost purpose of Black History Month. It is also a time to celebrate the achievements of blacks in every field from science and the arts to politics and religion.

It not only offers black Americans an occasion to explore their heritage, but it also offers all Americans an occasion and an opportunity to gain a fuller perspective of the contributions of black Americans to our nation. Let us appreciate this opportunity and build on it.

Sec. 3. Administration. (a) The heads of Executive departments and agencies shall, to the extent permitted by law, provide the Commission with such information as it may require for purposes of carrying out its functions.

It's been almost a week since our nation and families stood together as we watched Challenger slip beyond our grasp. The memories of that moment will be with us always, as will the memories of those brave Americans who were aboard. The death of the astronauts and the destruction of the space shuttle Challenger will forever be a reminder of the risks involved with space exploration, and we will always remember the Challenger Seven.

As we move away from that terrible day, we must devote our energies to finding out how it happened and how it can be prevented from happening again. It's time now to assemble a group of distinguished Americans to take a hard look at the accident, to make a calm and deliberate assessment of the facts and ways to avoid repetition. So, I am today announcing the formation of a Presidential Commission on the Space Shuttle Challenger Accident. The Commission will review the circumstances surrounding the accident, determine the probable cause or causes, and develop recommendations for corrective action. And this Commission will report back to me within 120 days.

William P. Rogers, former Secretary of State and former Attorney General, will serve as Chairman of the Commission; and Neil Armstrong, former astronaut, will serve as its Vice Chairman. In addition, today we're announcing 10 of its members drawn from distinguished leaders of the government, scientific, technical, and management communities.

The crew of the Challenger took the risks and paid the ultimate price because they believed in the space program. They were excited by the mystery of what is beyond the Earth and by the limitless possibilities of space exploration. They knew of the dangers they faced. Yet despite those dangers, they chose to go forward, not reluctantly but eagerly and with a thumbs up. And we owe it to them to conduct this investigation so that future space travelers can approach the conquest of space with confidence and America can go forward with enthusiasm and optimism, which has sparked and marked all of our great undertakings.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this third day of February, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

It is with regret that I accept your resignation as Director of Public Liaison effective as of February 4, 1986. You were always willing to take on challenging assignments and able to succeed brilliantly. I am grateful for the truly outstanding job you have done for my Administration and for America.

As Staff Director for the U.S. Commission on Civil Rights, you demonstrated your wholehearted commitment to the cause of equal rights for all Americans and your unyielding opposition to all forms of discrimination based on race, religion, sex, or ethnic background. More than that, you demonstrated your ability to deal effectively and persuasively with people of differing views and backgrounds.

Those same exceptional qualities of character and intellect were the secret of your great success as Director of the White House Office of Public Liaison. There you served as an able and eloquent advocate -- explaining our policies to a wide range of diverse groups and winning their understanding and support. But you were also keenly aware that communication with government must be a two-way street. I'm especially proud of the way you were able to elicit the views of diverse constituencies and bring them to my attention so they could be given proper consideration in the creation and carrying out of policy.

I vividly recall a meeting you arranged in the cabinet room shortly before my departure for Geneva. It gave me the opportunity for a stimulating dialogue with a number of religious leaders on how best to achieve our shared goal of peace and justice in the world.

On many other occasions you set up opportunities for me to meet across the table and discuss the major issues with leaders from business, labor, civic and fraternal organizations -- as well as a host of trade, professional, ethnic, and religious groups. I can assure you that this dialogue has been very helpful to us in developing policy proposals and improving the way government programs work. In your own, calm, thoughtful and efficient way you also provided us with a model of how government officials should work.

The members of the White House Staff and the Cabinet will all miss you. I certainly know I will. But I know that your decision to leave was prompted by the same desire to serve your country that led you to come and work in my Administration. Let me assure you, Linda, that my high regard for your good judgment persuades me that you have made the right decision.

You have made all Americans proud once again of this country as you made us stronger and safer. You have brought prosperity and offered hope to millions of us. You have restored our sense of values and have given us a new vision of what will keep this country great and free. I have been proud to serve you and my country, but now I think I can do so better by seeking elected office.

I will never forget your kindness and genuine affection for people. It is, I am sure, the source of your seemingly limitless strength. Perhaps most of all, I will remember your words to the nation last week when you consoled us in the aftermath of national tragedy. Your greatness as President was never more evident than the way in which you reminded us that those seven young men and women died for their country, willingly sacrificing themselves for our futures. Your words and your manner transformed sorrow into hope and comforted us all. Thank you, Mr. President.

These discussions were to review the positions of the parties, elicit their views on outstanding issues, and help him prepare a framework agreement for a Cyprus settlement which he plans to submit to both sides for their consideration. The Secretary General subsequently termed these meetings useful and said both parties had agreed to continue these discussions.

U.S. officials have continued to consult closely with the interested parties. In December Deputy Assistant Secretary James Wilkinson, the Department of State's Cyprus Coordinator, visited Turkey, Greece, and Cyprus and held discussions on bilateral questions and on the Cyprus issue. In Cyprus he met with Greek and Turkish Cypriot leaders. During his trip, Mr. Wilkinson expressed our support for the U.N. Secretary General's initiative as the most realistic and productive approach to achieving a Cyprus settlement and urged all concerned to cooperate with the Secretary General's efforts.

The President. Well, I'm glad you could all join -- and you especially could all join for what I believe is a truly momentous occasion. I'm sending up my budget for fiscal year 1987, which I think makes some commonsense reductions in Federal spending. And it reduces the deficit by $38 billion to meet the requirements of Gramm-Rudman-Hollings -- as you know, that passed Congress overwhelmingly last year -- and it does so without reducing our commitment to the poor and the elderly, and it does so without weakening our national security, and it does so without increasing taxes to pay for more spending. So, I am pleased to sign these copies of the budget for all of you and the management report which accompanies it. And I hope we can work together on this important step toward a balanced budget. And I'm not going to try to sort these out protocol-wise. I'm just going to hope I can get them signed straight.

Congressman Michel. It was a nice touch because I think it gets us off, started on the right foot, hopefully to get cooperation between the legislative and executive branch and between the two parties. It's the only way we're going to get the job done.

The President. I don't know. I said that this is one thing that I'm willing to look at. The whole idea, however, is that, as you know, that the end result must be revenue neutral, that it does not increase the amount of money we're taking from the private sector for government in that tax reform. And this means that the discussion is going to be what are the things -- the tax privileges and so forth -- with regard to deductions that can be taken out to simplify it and yet still maintain the same level of revenue. So, I've said that I'm willing to look at that on that basis.

The President. Well, I'm most hopeful that we can, because I think that we're living in a very dangerous world, and we're still playing catchup. We are still far behind in both conventional and strategic weapons of the Soviet Union.

The economic expansion we are now enjoying is one of the most vigorous in 35 years. Family income is at an all-time high; production and productivity are increasing; employment gains have been extraordinary; and inflation, which raged at double-digit rates when I took office, has been reduced dramatically. Defense capabilities, which had been dangerously weakened during the 1970s, are being rebuilt, restoring an adequate level of national security and deterrence to war. Moreover, an insupportable growth in tax burdens and Federal regulations has been halted.

Employment has grown by 9.2 million in the past three years, while the unemployment rate has fallen by 3.8 percentage points; during the three years preceding my administration, employment grew by only 5.5 million and the unemployment rate rose 0.8 percentage points.

Conditions are now in place for a sustained era of national prosperity. But, there is a major threat looming on the horizon: the Federal deficit. If this deficit is not brought under control, we risk losing all we've achieved -- and more.

This budget shows, moreover, that eliminating the deficit is possible without raising taxes, without sacrificing our defense preparedness, and without cutting into legitimate programs for the poor and the elderly. A tax increase would jeopardize our economic expansion and might well prove counterproductive in terms of its effect on the deficit. We can hardly back away from our defense build-up without creating confusion among friends and adversaries alike about our determination to maintain our commitments and without jeopardizing our prospects for meaningful arms control talks. And frankly we must not break faith with those poor and elderly who depend on Federal programs for their security.

Until the Second World War, the Federal budget was kept in balance or ran a surplus during peacetime as a matter of course. But in the early 1960s this traditional fiscal discipline and political rectitude began to break down. We have run deficits during 24 of the last 25 years. In the past ten years, they have averaged 2.5% of GNP. But last year the deficit was over 5% of GNP. This trend is clearly in the wrong direction and must be reversed.

Last year's deficit amounted to nearly $1,000 for every man, woman, and child in the United States. To eliminate the deficit solely by increasing taxes would mean imposing an extra $2,400 burden on each American household. But taxes are already higher relative to GNP than they were during the 1960s and early 1970s -- before inflation pushed them to levels that proved insupportable. The American people have made it clear they will not tolerate a higher tax burden. Spending is the problem -- not taxes -- and spending must be cut.

The program of spending cuts and other reforms contained in my budget will lead to a balanced budget at the end of five years and will thus remove a serious impediment to the continuation of our economic expansion. As this budget shows, such reforms can be accomplished in an orderly manner, without resorting to desperate measures.

Inappropriate and outmoded programs, and activities that cannot be made cost effective, must be ended. Activities that are essential, but that need not be carried out by the Federal Government, can be placed in the private sector or, if they are properly public in nature, turned over to State and local governments. As explained in the Management Report I am also submitting today, efficiencies can be realized through improved management techniques, increased productivity, and program consolidations.

The need to cut unnecessary Federal spending and improve management of necessary programs must be made a compelling guide to our policy choices. The result will be a leaner, better integrated, more streamlined Federal Government -- stripped of marginal, nonessential and inappropriate functions and activities, and focusing its energies and resources entirely on its proper tasks and constitutional responsibilities. That way, resources will be allocated more efficiently -- those things best done by government will be done by government; those things best done by the private sector will be directed by the marketplace.

The Balanced Budget and Emergency Deficit Control Act (Gramm-Rudman-Hollings) requires that spending be reduced in accord with a prescribed formula if projected deficits exceed the predetermined targets. This mechanism will operate in a limited fashion during the current fiscal year. However, we should avoid such across-the-board cuts in the future, and they will not be necessary if Congress adopts this budget. Achieving budget savings by taking into account relative priorities among programs is a much better way than resorting to an arbitrary formula. The latter could dangerously weaken vital programs involving the national security or public health and safety, while leaving marginal programs substantially intact.

If the spending cuts and other reforms proposed in this budget are approved, the Federal deficit will be reduced by $166 billion over the next three years. This represents about $700 for every individual American and about $1,900 for every household. I believe this is the appropriate way to deal with the deficit: cut excessive Federal spending rather than attack the family budget by increasing taxes, or risk a deterioration in our national security posture, or break faith with the dependent poor and elderly.

High priority programs should be adequately funded. -- Despite the very tight fiscal environment, this budget provides funds for maintaining -- and in some cases expanding -- high priority programs in crucial areas of national interest. Necessary services and income support for the dependent poor and the elderly receive significant funding in this budget. So do other programs of national interest, including drug enforcement, AIDS research, the space program, nonmilitary research, and national security.

While national security programs continue to be one of my highest priorities, they have not been exempt from general budgetary stringency. Last summer I reluctantly agreed with Congress to scale back the planned growth of defense appropriations to a zero real increase for 1986 and only a 3% real increase each year thereafter. Congressional action on 1986 appropriations and the subsequent sequestration for 1986 under Gramm-Rudman-Hollings have cut defense budget authority well below last year's level. The budget I am submitting would return defense funding to a steady, well-managed growth pattern consistent with the program levels agreed to in last year's budget resolution and consistent with what the country needs in order to provide for our national security.

During the past 5 years, we have reversed the decline in defense spending and have made significant progress in restoring our military capabilities. The moderate increases that are now requested are necessary to maintain this progress and enable us to move forward with meaningful arms reduction negotiations with the Soviet Union.

Unnecessary programs are no longer affordable. -- Some government programs have become outmoded, have accomplished their original purpose, represent an inappropriate area for Federal involvement in the first place, or are marginal in the current tight budgetary environment. If it would not be appropriate or feasible for the private sector or for State or local governments to assume such functions, this budget proposes that programs of this variety be terminated immediately, phased out in an orderly manner, or eliminated when their legal authority expires. Examples include Small Business Administration credit programs, Amtrak grants, Urban Development Action Grants, the Appalachian Regional Commission, the Economic Development Administration, the Interstate Commerce Commission, Maritime Administration loan guarantees, education subsidies for health professionals, the work incentives program, and subsidies for air carriers.

Many other programs should be reduced to a more appropriate scale. -- Some Federal programs have become overextended, misdirected, or operate on too expansive a scale given the current tight budgetary environment. This budget proposes reforms to limit the costs and future growth of medicare and medicaid, subsidized housing, Civil Service pensions and health benefits, postal subsidies, interstate highway grants, the Forest Service, and many other programs.

The Government should not compete with the private sector. -- Traditionally, governments supply the type of needed services that would not be provided by the private marketplace. Over the years, however, the Federal Government has acquired many commercial-type operations. In most cases, it would be better for the Government to get out of the business and stop competing with the private sector, and in this budget I propose that we begin that process. Examples of such ``privatization'' initiatives in this budget include sale of the power marketing administrations and the naval petroleum reserves; and implementation of housing and education voucher programs. I am also proposing the sale of unneeded assets, such as loan portfolios and surplus real estate, and contracting out appropriate Federal services.

Many services can be provided better by State and local governments. -- Over the years, the Federal Government has preempted many functions that properly ought to be operated at the State or local level. This budget contemplates an end to unwarranted Federal intrusion into the State and local sphere and restoration of a more balanced, constitutionally appropriate, federalism with more clearly delineated roles for the various levels of government. Examples include new consolidations of restrictive small categorical grant programs into block grants for transportation and environmental protection, at reduced Federal costs. Continued funding is maintained for existing block grants for social services, health, education, job training, and community development.

Administration of the agricultural extension service should be turned over to State and local governments. Also, the Federal Government should get out of the business of paying for local sewage treatment systems, local airports, local law enforcement, subsidies to State maritime schools, and local coastal management.

Remaining Federal activities should be better managed. -- As we proceed with the deficit reduction process over the next several years, it is important that all remaining Federal operations be well managed and coordinated to avoid duplication, reduce costs, and minimize regulatory burdens imposed on the private sector. Management efficiencies must accompany the process of developing a leaner, more carefully focused Federal role. We can no longer afford unnecessary overhead and inefficiencies when we are scaling back the role and cost of the Federal Government.

Substantial savings in overhead costs have been achieved under provisions of the Deficit Reduction Act of 1984. As described in my Management Report, more savings are possible, and these effects are incorporated in this budget. Outmoded, inefficient systems of agency cash and credit management are being replaced; administrative policies and procedures, approaches to automatic data processing, and agency field structures will be streamlined and upgraded; and waste, fraud, and abuse will be further reduced. All these initiatives, part of our Reform '88 program, will take advantage of efficiencies made possible by modern management techniques, improved communications, and new information technology. We shall run the Federal Government on a business-like basis -- improving service delivery and reducing taxpayer costs.

Administration of Federal agencies will be made more efficient through the adoption of staffing standards, automation of manual processes, consolidation of similar functions, and reduction of administrative overhead costs. A program to increase productivity by 20% by 1992 in all appropriate Government functions is being instituted, and a major effort is proposed to revamp our outmoded management of a $250 billion Federal credit portfolio. This effort will include establishing prescreening, origination fees, administration and penalty charges, use of collection agencies, charging appropriate interest rates, and the sale of loan portfolios.

Our management improvement program will result in a leaner and more efficient Federal structure and is described in greater detail in my separate Management Report. Improving the management of the Government must be accorded a crucial role and the priority it deserves.

We must also reduce unnecessary costs and burdens on the nonfederal sector and have already made considerable progress in reducing the costs imposed on businesses and State and local governments by Federal regulations. These savings are estimated to total $150 billion over a 10-year period. We have reduced the number of new regulations in every year I have been in office and have eliminated or reduced paperwork requirements by over 500 million hours. In addition, regulations are now more carefully crafted to achieve the greatest public protection for the least cost, and wherever possible to use market forces instead of working against them.

Finally, user fees should be charged for services where appropriate. -- Those who receive special benefits and services from the Federal Government should be the ones to bear the costs of those services, not the general taxpayer. Accordingly, this budget imposes fees and premiums for Federal guarantees of loans, and imposes user fees and charges for Federal cost recovery for meat and poultry inspection, National park and forest facilities, harbor and inland waterway use, Coast Guard and Customs inspections, and for many other services.

Over the years, Federal spending constituencies have become increasingly powerful. In part because of their strong and effective advocacy, Congress has become less and less able to face up to its budgetary responsibilities. The Congressional budget process is foundering; last year it fell apart time and time again. The budget resolution and appropriations bills were months late in passing, and few real deficit reductions were achieved.

Gramm-Rudman-Hollings offers a significant opportunity to avoid many of these problems in the future. That act not only sets deficit targets leading to a balanced budget by 1991, it provides a mechanism for automatic spending cuts and incorporates certain reforms in the budget process itself. But Gramm-Rudman-Hollings does not go far enough in this regard. To meet the clear need for a greatly strengthened budget process, I propose a number of additional reform measures.

As before, I ask Congress to pass a balanced budget amendment to the Constitution. In addition, I continue to seek passage of a line item veto -- authority now possessed by 43 of the Nation's governors. I also urge, for 1988 and beyond, changing the budget resolution to a joint resolution subject to Presidential signature and establishing binding expenditure subcategories within the resolution budget totals. Moreover, I urge that serious study be given to proposals for multiyear appropriations and to the development of a capital budget.

Congress has recognized this threat. It has mandated a gradual, orderly movement to a balanced budget over the next five years. The proposals in this budget are a blueprint for achieving those targets while preserving legitimate programs for the aged and needy, providing for our national security, and doing this without raising taxes.

I realize it will be difficult for elected officials to make the hard choices envisioned in this budget. But we must find the political will to face up to our responsibilities and resist the pleadings of special interests whose "era of power" in Washington must be brought to an end -- for taxpayers as a whole can no longer be expected to carry them on their backs. All this will call for statesmanship of a high order. We must all realize that the deficit problem is also an opportunity -- an opportunity to construct a new, leaner, better focused, and better managed Federal structure. Let's do it.

The budget I am submitting offers a blueprint for reducing the deficit by curbing the growth of Federal spending without weakening our ability to carry out essential Federal responsibilities. One means of furthering this goal is to increase the cost-effectiveness of essential programs through improved management, enhanced productivity, and consolidations or diversion of activities now provided by the Federal Government.

My administration has devoted particular attention to improving the way the Federal Government's vast resources are managed. Of course, good management does not always yield immediate benefits, tends to be complex to define and implement, and does not easily capture the imagination of the public. Nevertheless, its pursuit is vital, and we shall be unfailing in our efforts.

Installation of the first comprehensive system to manage the Government's $10 trillion annual cash flow. One impressive result is that 99% of all payments to firms doing business with the Government are made on time. Previously, 30% were made too late and 45% too early. Another result is the replacement of cardboard checks by multicolored paper checks that are lighter in weight, easier to store, and more difficult to counterfeit.

The initial thrust of Reform '88 was to fix the most obvious problems first -- controlling administrative costs, checking the spread of waste and fraud, reducing essential service backlogs, and installing modern financial management systems to control the cash flow and assets of the world's largest spender and lender. We have now embarked upon the tougher challenge that is the principal focus of this report: extending those ideas to a broader range of services the Government provides to the public. Accordingly, we expect significant additional improvements in service delivery and cost savings as time goes on.

Information Resources Management. A broad policy framework was established for more effectively managing the Federal Government's information resources, which amount to over $15 billion in cost and involve over 100,000 employees.

The PCIE was created in 1981 and charged with spearheading the attack on fraud, waste, and abuse. This effort has been a special priority from the very beginning of my administration. Not only do fraud, waste, and abuse drain scarce resources, but their frequently exaggerated representation plays to the worst suspicions of the public. Since its creation, the PCIE and the agency Inspectors General who comprise it have reported over $63 billion in improved use of funds; moreover, they have reported 14,291 successful prosecutions and 14,146 administrative actions against Federal and contractor employees who have taken unlawful advantage of the Government. While fraud, waste, and abuse have not been eliminated entirely, we have made great strides toward winning the battle.

The PCMI is composed of the key management officials in large agencies and is leading the implementation of management improvements as well as looking ahead to identify possible problems and opportunities for the future. The Council also has overseen such major management initiatives as reducing the number of payroll and personnel systems, and is currently focusing on improved financial systems and implementation of my productivity improvement program.

Our management emphasis has also been geared toward improving the efficiency of Government at all levels. One of the principal goals of my administration has been to streamline and restore the proper balance between Federal, State, and local roles. Initially undertaken in 1981 and greeted with skepticism, this program of ``Federalism'' has since garnered praise from the General Accounting Office, various professional and academic organizations, and, most importantly, from the States themselves. Since 1981, when 58 categorical programs were consolidated into 9 block grants, Federal paperwork burdens have been reduced from about 6.5 million hours annually to less than 600 thousand.

In part because of this success, I am recommending in this year's budget that additional specific Federal endeavors be turned over to State or local authorities. Provisions are made for additional block grants, especially in the areas of transportation and environmental protection; further relief from regulatory burdens; and simplification of requirements common to all agencies.

Last year we stated that support of Congress would be critical to full implementation of the administration's management improvement program. That support grows more necessary with each passing year. Congress now has before it 18 legislative proposals which fall into five categories: (a) reorganization, (b) prevention of fraud, (c) payment integrity and improved financial procedures, (d) procurement, and (e) reduction in regulatory and paperwork burdens.

I urge the Congress to enact these proposals, as well as those submitted in 1985. In addition, I urge the removal of other barriers to better management, such as employment floors, prohibitions on the reform of field structures, and obstructions to cost comparisons with the private sector. These and other impediments make management reforms more difficult to effect and cost taxpayers and service recipients very dearly.

Of course, Congress already has enacted many key pieces of legislation contributing to effective management -- particularly the Debt Collection Act, the Deficit Reduction Act, and the Federal Managers' Financial Integrity Act. We look forward to more progress in the immediate future.

Reform '88 is an ambitious management improvement program. Already it has had much success. But many items on its long-term agenda have not been achieved, and we must not rest until these reforms have been fully implemented.

The pressing need to reduce the deficit, and hence Federal spending, lends impetus to the pursuit of good management. But even absent the present fiscal difficulties, improved management would be a high priority for this administration. The Constitution is rooted in certain fundamental ideas, among which is the people's right to presume a capable, efficient Federal Government in return for taxes duly paid. It is their birthright, and affirming it will be one of my legacies.

Mr. Sinclair is president of the Sinclair Corp., a mechanical, utility, and pipeline construction company based in Gardena, CA. Prior to founding his own company he worked for various construction companies, including Chicago Bridge and Iron, Bechtel, and Fluor Corp.

It's great to be here with you. Jim, it feels like old times except I keep thinking I should have brought something to give to somebody. [Laughter] And for you, Don, it must be like coming home again. And you've already -- it's kind of been touched upon here that -- speaking of old times, you may have heard that tomorrow is my birthday. Now, you know about that. I prefer to think of it as the 36th anniversary of my 39th. [Laughter] A few more of these and I'll be just about due for a midlife crisis. [Laughter] In fact, I'm thinking about a career change. [Laughter] Drop this political business and see if I can't do something different like radio or the movies. [Laughter] Maybe I'll give politics another 3 years.

Now, the first thing I want to do today is to thank you for all the time and effort that you've put into reforming our nation's tax code. The work has been complicated and hard and seemingly endless; some might even say you've been overtaxed. But unfortunately, we didn't get tax reform in time for this April 15th, but I am confident that the next time Americans have to sit down and pay their taxes, they're going to see a dramatic change for the better.

We'll still be needing your help in the months ahead keeping tax reform on track. As I outlined last night in the State of the Union, we'll be looking for several specific improvements to ensure that the final bill is profairness, profamily, and profuture. We'll want to see return of the full $2,000 personal exemption for itemizers as well as nonitemizers -- at least for those individuals in the lower and the middle-income brackets. Young families starting out in new homes beset with mortgage payments and all the costs of raising children urgently need the full exemption, and we're going to make sure they get it. Decades of inflation seriously eroded the value of the personal exemption and thrust an increasing share of the tax burden onto the shoulders of families with children. You might say that tax policy has made raising a family uneconomical, discouraging couples from having children or, if they do, forcing spouses, who might otherwise wish to stay at home, into the work force simply to maintain their standard of living.

We think it's about time the Federal Government stopped putting the squeeze on families. You know, if anyone gives you an argument on that $2,000 -- that's, you know, up from $600 to $2,000 -- it's kind of interesting to note how the Government has been dishonestly getting tax increases without doing anything openly, because if we really made the personal exemption today equal in purchasing power to when it was 600, the exemption would be $2,700. We're not even catching up with inflation in what we're asking. As far as the top rate is concerned, in our minds 35 percent is the right number -- just exactly half of the 70 percent we started with 5 years ago.

A final bill must also include basic tax incentives for American industry. And effective dates should be ironed out so that investment decisions aren't disrupted or delayed due to uncertainty. A minimum tax should make sure no corporations or individuals avoid paying their fair share. And finally, tax brackets must be fully consistent with our desire to reduce taxes for middle-income working Americans. True tax reform must give real tax relief to low-wage earners and the middle class. And we want to give all Americans a leg up on the ladder of success. We should all reflect on the dramatic, even revolutionary, change that tax reform represents. A consensus is forming in both parties that we must lower marginal tax rates in order to increase incentives and spur economic growth. Nothing succeeds like success, of course. And no one can any longer deny the success of marginal tax rate cuts and incentives in revitalizing the American economy and giving us 37 months of growth with low inflation.

One of Secretary Baker's great contributions is his emphasis on the global economy. He realizes that America's economy can't continue to race forward if our friends and allies are lagging behind. Many of the trade problems that we're experiencing today are caused by the imbalance between our dynamic low-tax economy and the sluggish high-tax economies of so many of our trading partners. Trade, the lifeblood of the world economy, is also hampered by wild and unpredictable fluctuations in exchange rates. We must work to promote the expansion of world trade and growth in the global economy by strengthening economic policy coordination among our industrialized trading partners.

As I mentioned in the State of the Union, I've directed Treasury Secretary James Baker to determine if the nations of the world should convene to discuss the role and relationship of our currencies. Many developing countries with large debts are in particularly dire straits, and we in the industrial world must assist them in dealing with their difficulties. We have championed free markets at home and have observed their success here and in many developing countries. We must encourage other countries to pursue these market-oriented, progrowth policies, rather than going the route of central planning -- huge government projects and denial of property rights. In particular, we must encourage them to avoid high tax rates that only choke off incentives and slow growth. The plight of many developing countries is desperate and the call to action is urgent. So, let's begin now to spread hope and opportunity across the world by encouraging lower taxes, freer and fairer trade, and a sound monetary system.

I'm asking you to vigorously pursue implementation of our proposed program for sustained growth, to address problems of debt and declining growth in the developing countries. This program calls for increased lending by commercial banks and an expansion of loans by multinational banks conditioned on structural reforms, including tax reforms in the debtor countries. A healthy, expanding world economy is the best environment for a strong, secure, and growing America.

So, between tax reform, initiatives on the global economy, and your traditional and essential enforcement activities, you're going to have your hands full here at Treasury. Working together, we can make 1986 the year that tax rate cuts opened wide the doors of opportunity at home and our program for sustained growth helped bring jobs, growth, and hope to many in the developing world. Working together, we can make 1986 a banner year for growth, stability, and prosperity.

And, again, I just want to say, I thank you all for the help that you've given and the part that you've played in the great economic recovery that we're having and the fact that we stand virtually alone in the world in having achieved these particular results. So, thank you all, and God bless you.

Thank you very much, and I thank you for inviting me here today. It's very good to see all of you. I've tried over the years to make it a point to visit various executive agencies at the beginning of each year to talk about the future, and this is my first trip to HHS. I wanted to wait until my second term because the last two Presidents that visited here in their first term weren't reelected. [Laughter] We've just entered year 6 of an 8-year Presidency, and it's amazing to realize so much time has passed and so much work has been done. It seems like only yesterday that Nancy and I walked into the Executive Mansion for the first time after the 1981 inaugural. But there's so much left to do, so much before us; and that's what I wanted to talk to you about today.

Now, of all the executive agencies, it's possible that Health and Human Services is going to have the most challenging year ahead. What you do has such a direct impact on the American family, and it's the family that is at the center of many of our initiatives this year. I've just asked the White House Domestic Policy Council to present to me by the end of the year a total evaluation of all the Federal programs that we have to help poor families. We'll be looking at everything, the financial programs, educational programs, social and the safety concerns of these families. As you know, the current collection of programs designed to assist the needy spends nearly $120 billion a year. But you also know how uncoordinated it's all become with many who are not poor receiving benefits intended for the poor. We're going to look at the entire process in an effort to bolster the family by putting it at the center where it belongs.

We have a lot of major initiatives ahead of us. We're going to move toward a more efficient health care system. And we're going to try to see if we can't help those who become victims of the terrible costs of catastrophic illnesses. Such a problem can deplete the life savings of many Americans, which would destroy the financial security of their families. As you know, I've asked Dr. Bowen to study how the private sector and government can work together on this problem and report to me by the end of the year. We continue to support the concept of prepaid health care. And we will seek legislation that emphasizes competition and broadening the type of health care plans that qualify as alternatives to traditional Medicare coverage. We will encourage private health care providers to develop less costly programs directed at maintaining health rather than treating the illness. And that's just part of what we'll be doing.

These are just a few of our plans, but I want to mention one more. One of our highest public health priorities is going to continue to be finding a cure for AIDS. We're going to continue to try to develop and test vaccines, and we're going to focus also on prevention. In this regard, I'm asking the Surgeon General to prepare a major report to the American people on AIDS.

I'm very happy to be here. And I'd like to begin the remarks that I have with something that I did mention last year, so those of you who are here forgive me, because I'd like to touch on it again. It has to do with the history of this breakfast and the groups associated with it. The story begins in 1942, at the height of World War II. In those days there were a handful of Senators and Congressmen who'd get together now and then to talk about their lives and their jobs and how things were going for them. And one day they talked about how they might be of greater personal and spiritual support to one another. They decided it would be a real help if they could occasionally gather and pray together. And so they began to pray together.

In time, in both the House group and the Senate group, some very important informal rules evolved. The Members would meet in the spirit of peace and in the spirit of Christ. All Members would be welcome, regardless of their political or religious affiliation. There was room enough for sincere seekers and the deeply devout. They'd never publicize the meetings, and they'd never use them for political gain. But most important, the Members would be able to talk about any problem on which they needed guidance, any sadness for which they needed prayers. And everything would be off the record, so no one would have to worry about the betrayal of a confidence. Well, the two groups, one in the House and one in the Senate, met quietly like this for 10 years.

And then President Eisenhower came into the story. One night in 1952 during the Presidential campaign, Dwight Eisenhower confided something to one of his advisers, a close friend, Senator Frank Carlson. And Eisenhower told him that during the war when he was commanding the allied forces in Europe, he'd had a startling and vivid spiritual experience -- he had actually felt the hand of God guiding him, felt the presence of God. And the general told the Senator that this experience and the support of his friends had given him real spiritual strength in the hard days before D-day. Senator Carlson said he understood. He, himself, was getting spiritual help from the Members of a little prayer group in the Senate. And a few months later, the general, who was now the President, asked Frank Carlson over to the White House. And he told him, ``Frank, this is the loneliest house I've ever been in.'' Carlson said, ``Mr. President, I think this may be the right time for you to come and meet with our prayer group.'' And Eisenhower did just that. In 1953 he attended the first combined prayer breakfast.

Wheeled and soared and swung high in the sunlit silence, hovering there I've chased the shouting wind along and flung my eager craft through footless halls of air -- up, up to the long, delirious burning blue I've topped the windswept heights with easy grace, where never lark or even eagle flew.

I used to think it was a poem about the joy of escaping gravity, but even more, it's a poem about joy. And God gave us joy; that was His gift to us. We've all been sad the past week, and yet there was something good about the way we wept together as we said goodbye and suddenly re-remembered that we are a family. And now the time has come to remember the words of the Bible, ``Weeping may endure for a night, but joy cometh in the morning.'' A minister who spoke at the memorial service the other day said he hoped we all remembered not just the grief but the grandeur and the grace of life. Much of that grandeur comes from the joy that God gave us.

Mother Teresa shines with joy in spite of the fact that she spends so much of her time in the unhappiest places on this Earth. If you look at the world stage, you don't see a lot to make you glad, but in the midst of hellish circumstances -- in Mexico after the earthquake, in Ethiopia during a famine, in South Africa and Angola and Nicaragua -- in all those painful places we still see joy, God's gift, and the energy that it gives.

There are perhaps 3,000 of us here in this room. The wealthy and the powerful, those who've known neither wealth nor power. We have teachers here and diplomats, inmates from a local reformatory, captains of industry are here and so are just moms and dads and insurance salesmen and people that do things like that -- such diverse lives. And yet we all have in common the usual problems of life, the usual difficulties. And we're trying to achieve some kind of happiness while, in the process, causing as little pain to others as possible. We have so much in common -- we share an anchor that roots us in the heavy seas, and that anchor is the joy that God gave us. Let our thoughts today be of how man harnesses his sadness and turns it into triumphant work. And that's what I wish for all of us in this room -- that in our individual work this year, we will fight on for what's right and good and resist the badness that is in us and that we'll do it with joy, because God gave that as a gift to be used.

If I had a prayer for you today, among those that have all been uttered, it is that one we're so familiar with: The Lord bless you and keep you; the Lord make His face to shine upon you and be gracious unto you; the Lord lift up His countenance upon you and give you peace.

The President. Thank you all for coming in. Tuesday night, as you know, I spoke to the Nation in the State of the Union Address on our plans and hopes for the future. A document I'm about to sign here that -- in a sense, a blueprint of those plans. Taken together, this message and the fiscal '87 budget that I submitted yesterday constitute a detailed declaration of our legislative and administrative agenda, an agenda for the future.

I believe this document and the plans it contains reflect the basic and unchanging intentions of our administration to ensure the growth of an expanding economy, to see to it that every American who wants a job can get a job, and to keep in the hands of our citizens as much of their own earnings as we can. It repeats our intention to cut the growth of Federal spending and thereby reduce the Federal deficit. We'll continue to work with the Congress to produce tax reform that is really reform, and we'll also continue to pursue reform of our welfare system.

In the area of foreign relations, we've made our goals clear: continued harmony with our allies, renewed progress toward a more stable peace with our adversaries, and increased respect for human rights everywhere. We've also made it clear, and I'm eager to stress today, that our desire to cut the budget will not be allowed to collide with our need for a strong defense. Gramm-Rudman-Hollings will be used as a shovel to dig us out of the results of deficit spending. But we will not allow it to be used as a cannon pointed on our real and legitimate defense needs. We've also made it clear that our commitment to help freedom fighters throughout the world continues unabated. We know what's happening in Afghanistan, Cambodia, Angola, and Nicaragua; and we support the efforts of those who continue, with little help from the world, to fight a lonely struggle against the enemies of freedom and human rights.

Our commitments and our desires remain essentially unchanged from 1981. We expect our economic progress to continue, and we expect a similar progress in a number of areas, from the search for a security shield to protect us from nuclear missiles to encouraging real effort at increasing economic freedom in the less advanced countries of the world.

The President. That isn't a top priority; that is just another evidence that I've given that we are continuing with the progress that we've made in space and moving forward in fields of that kind in technology. And I don't see anything disgraceful about a budget that is spending almost a trillion dollars, and yet at the same time is starting to move under the laws they adopted to balance the budget.

The President. Well, I'm always happy to meet with Tip, and I'm looking forward to keeping in communication with Members of the Congress at the House and the Senate on this. We've submitted the budget; it is there. The next step is theirs to see whether they -- what they want or don't want. But as I say, we've worked long months on this, and we believe it's a budget that will do what the law is asking us to do finally. And I think it'll behoove some who, for a quarter of a century or more, have been admittedly running deficits with no effort or intention at all to ever eliminate deficit spending.

The President. Well, I don't know. Looking back on it, I'm a little amazed at our generation, and I make no apologies for them, because I can well remember in my own mind that our generation has seen us move from the horse and buggy to a plane; that we think can get to Tokyo in 2 hours in a single lifetime.

The President. The only thing I know is a party. [Laughing] No, we've -- as I say, I've -- we sit down and talk about things that maybe we both mutually want when our birthdays and such events come along anymore. So, we haven't figured anything out yet.

The President. I can't tell you. That package they gave me this morning, that gift, was 100 letters from heads of state throughout the world, and very obviously I haven't had time to go through the 100 letters yet.

The President. Just -- only that the Philippines and the United States have had an historic friendship for many years, and we want it to continue. And when they have made their decision, which is theirs to make, as to the future government, why, we will seek to go along with their decision and to maintain our relationship with the Philippines.

Q. Mr. President, when you ran for office, you certainly made a lot of -- you were very successful, in large measure because you were so successful on television. I wonder how you feel about Mrs. Aquino not having the kind of access to Filipino television that you had to American television. Could you have won your election in 1980 without being able to get on television as frequently as you were?

The President. Yes, and as I say, when they've made their decision as to their government, the people of the Philippines, we would hope to have the continuing friendship and relationship that we've had for so many years.

On Tuesday night, I came personally before the Congress to review with you the progress of our Nation, to speak of unfinished work, and to set our sights on the future. In that address, I spoke of an America on the move -- stronger than a year ago and growing stronger every day.

Almost 5 years ago I addressed a previous Congress and spoke of the need for policies that would promote economic growth and expansion, reduce the intrusion of government in areas where its role had grown too large, and strengthen our defense capabilities in order to protect the peace and fully meet our global commitments. These goals and that agenda have not changed, and although we have made significant progress, the work is not yet finished.

In addition to the proposals contained in my budget for FY 1987, this message -- an Agenda for the Future -- spells out in greater detail how we as Americans can continue to make progress in each of these areas and successfully meet the challenges of the next decade, the year 2000, and beyond.

Today, we see an American economic renaissance. Tax cuts, deregulation, and low inflation have freed the entrepreneurial genius of the American people, returned incentives to our economy, and powered 37 months of economic expansion. Sunrise firms light our horizons, while technology modernizes our factories and makes America more competitive in the international marketplace.

But this is only the beginning. Now is the time to build a solid foundation for a decade of economic growth -- growth that will give us a full employment economy, with real jobs for all Americans from the sidewalks of Harlem to the shores of Hawaii. Now is the time to lay the groundwork for an ever-expanding economy that leads the world in innovation, performance, and productivity.

The future beckons; we cannot let ourselves be held back by the growing burden of out-of-control Federal spending. Our FY 1987 budget meets the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings deficit targets while still fulfilling essential Federal responsibilities to Social Security, the truly less fortunate, and our national defense, without a tax increase.

Gramm-Rudman-Hollings can make a dramatic improvement. But experience shows that simply setting deficit targets does not assure they will be met. We must begin now to put the budget process itself back in working order. An executive line-item veto will restore balance to the budget process and ensure that wasteful spending does not occur under the cover of appropriations bills.

Once we have made the hard decisions and gotten our budget down to size, we should lock in our gains with a balanced budget amendment to the Constitution -- so that Government spending can never again grow out of control, threatening our economic well being and dreams for the future.

It is clear that the budget process is not working well. I hope to be able to work with the Congress, on a bipartisan basis, to make it both more efficient and less time consuming. For FY 1988 and beyond, I suggest changing the budget resolution to a joint resolution subject to Presidential signature and establishing binding expenditure subcategories within the resolution budget totals. In addition, serious study should be given to proposals for multi-year appropriations and to the development of a capital budget.

We will continue to improve the quality and efficiency of Federal management, and will work with the Congress to obtain legislation to fully implement our management improvement program. We have proposed legislation to extend the President's executive branch reorganization authority; improve Federal productivity; streamline financial management; prevent fraud; reduce error rates in benefit programs; and reduce regulations. We will also continue to work with the Congress on supplemental retirement system legislation for newer Federal employees and certain elected and appointed officials now covered only by Social Security.

Our first tax cuts opened the way to prosperity; now is the time to fire the engines of growth with tax reform that is pro-fairness, pro-family, and pro-future. The House of Representatives has taken an historic first step; let us join together and go the distance. First, we must promise the American people never to betray their hopes for tax reform with a tax increase in disguise. True tax reform must be truly fair and make us more productive and competitive internationally, and that means raising the personal exemption to $2,000 for both itemizers and non-itemizers, at least for those individuals in the lower and middle income brackets; basic tax incentives for American industries, including those which depend upon heavy capital investment in equipment and machinery; effective dates which erase doubt and apprehension in the minds of those who must begin to plan for investments; a minimum tax which allows no individual or business to escape paying a fair share of the overall tax burden; a rate structure with a maximum no higher than the 35 percent I proposed; and tax brackets that are fully consistent with our desire to reduce taxes for middle income working Americans. I look forward to continuing our work with the Congress to enact this most important measure.

If America hopes to compete successfully abroad, we cannot bind the hands of American business and industry at home. Therefore, we are asking the Congress to remove unreasonable constraints on U.S. competitiveness by reforming our Federal antitrust statutory framework to reflect the global nature of our markets. These changes will enhance the vigor and competitiveness of American businesses, while continuing to protect American consumers and businesses from adverse effects of practices such as monopolies, cartels, and price-fixing.

The need for reform in the area of product liability is an important matter that affects businesses, including some who might no longer be able to afford product liability insurance, and consumers, who may pay higher prices for products or lose the availability of certain products altogether. We will continue to work with the Congress to establish a uniform standard of product liability that is fair to consumers and manufacturers alike.

As we knock down barriers to growth, we must redouble our efforts for freer and fairer trade. We have already taken actions to counter unfair trading practices and to open closed markets abroad. We will continue to do so. We will also oppose legislation touted as providing ``protection'' that in reality pits one American worker against another, one industry against another, one community against another, and that raises prices for us all. I believe that if the United States can trade with other nations on a level playing field, we can out-produce, out-compete, and out-sell anybody, anywhere in the world.

Trade is the life blood of the global economy. Growing world markets mean greater prosperity for America and a stronger, safer, and more secure world for the family of free nations. We will continue to work to promote a free, fair, and expanding world trading system by continuing to seek legislation authorizing a $300 million fund for combating predatory tied aid credits by other countries. In addition, we will propose legislation to strengthen and broaden protection of intellectual property. We will continue to work with the Congress to put into place other changes that reflect the principles and policies of free and fair trade.

We will continue to enforce vigorously the laws that protect against unfair trade, in particular Section 301 of the Trade Act of 1974 and the anti-dumping and countervailing duty laws. The Strike Force on Trade will continue its efforts to identify unfair foreign practices.

We will aggressively renegotiate the Multi-Fiber Arrangement (MFA), currently scheduled to expire July 1, 1986, on terms no less favorable than present. We are consulting with the U.S. textile and apparel industries to ensure that their views will be represented during these negotiations.

We will continue the market-oriented sector-selective (MOSS) talks, working with the Japanese to identify all the trade barriers in specific sectors and encouraging the Japanese to remove them. The talks are making progress and markets are opening up in telecommunications, pharmaceuticals, and other sectors. We will continue to press for the removal of barriers in these and additional sectors. We also welcome Prime Minister Nakasone's expressed determination to move toward the restructuring of Japan's export oriented economy.

Our Administration is also working vigorously to launch a new round of multilateral trade negotiations through the Preparatory Committee established last November by the GATT. Under the leadership of the U.S., the Preparatory Committee is developing the framework for negotiations that would strengthen the international trading system, eliminate unfair trade practices, and address major new problem areas in international trade such as services, intellectual property protection, and investment.

Our Administration hopes to begin discussions with Canada, our largest trading partner, to enhance freedom of trade between our two countries. We will work with the Congress to assure that a mutually beneficial agreement can be achieved.

In addition, we will engage some of our major trading partners in discussing the idea of establishing a multinational or regional patent office. Such an office could provide a higher level of common patent protection, including coverage and terms, and establish a more efficient system for gaining patent protection beyond United States borders.

Further, we will work to correct the deficiencies in the new farm bill, including: the provision mandating a reduction in the amount of sugar permitted to enter the United States; the 3-year payment-in-kind bonus export program; and the new dairy program, which taxes milk producers to fund a program that obligates the Government to pay farmers to liquidate their dairy herds and to buy the meat in order to support prices.

Today, America is part of a global economy. The constant expansion of our economy and exports demands a sound and stable dollar at home and reliable exchange rates around the world. It also demands that our trading partners grow along with us.

We cannot race forward to the future if our friends and allies are lagging behind. Many of the trade problems we are experiencing today are caused by the imbalance between our low-tax, high-growth economy and the high-tax, low-growth economies of so many of our trading partners. Our dynamic, expanding economy is hungry for goods from abroad; but economies still suffering under excessive taxation, over-regulation, and top-heavy government simply cannot afford to buy from us.

Our Administration is working to promote growth in the world economy by strengthening economic policy coordination among our industrialized trading partners. I have directed Treasury Secretary James A. Baker III to determine if the nations of the world should convene to discuss the role and relationship of our currencies.

Many of the developing countries, where large debts further oppress struggling economies, are in particularly dire straits. Our Administration will vigorously pursue implementation of our proposed ``Program for Sustained Growth'' to address problems of debt and declining growth in the developing countries. This program calls for increased lending by commercial banks and an expansion of loans by multilateral development banks conditioned on structural reforms, including tax reforms, in the debtor countries.

I am looking forward to meeting with the other leaders of the industrialized nations at the Economic Summit this spring in Japan to discuss ideas and policies that can make the global economy stronger. These policies include removing structural rigidities in our economies that impede the capital and labor markets and improving the working of the free trade system, while resisting protectionism.

The Departments of Labor and Education have joined forces to more closely coordinate between the job training and education programs administered by the two departments. Our objective is to eliminate duplication and, at the same time, provide a broader range of assistance to individuals. We have already achieved progress in linking job training and apprenticeship with vocational education. Plans are underway to extend this partnership to many training and educational services in the community.

We will work with the Congress to use the Jobs Training Partnership Act to help American workers displaced by imports, adjust, develop new skills, and find new jobs through job search, training, and relocation assistance.

Over the past 50 years, the public sector has assumed many activities that are similar to, or even the same as, those done by the private sector. But when the private sector can deliver service more efficiently than the public sector, as it can with Conrail, then the Government must step aside. State and local governments have been in the lead in contracting out such public services as garbage collection, street cleaning, and even prison services to the private sector. Not surprisingly the result has been reduced costs and better service. The FY 87 budget proposes to return some Federal activities to the private sector. We will also be considering other new opportunities to take advantage of the incentives for efficiency available in the private sector.

As we work to make the American dream real for all, we must adhere to traditional values, keep our faith in God, and put our trust in people, rather than in the Government, to solve the problems before us. We must continue to advance the education of our youth and provide for a safe, secure, and prosperous future for American families. Through a recommitment to our fundamental values, we can achieve a collective vision for a rising America -- now, and for the future.

Parents have a natural and inalienable right to educate their children, publicly and privately, as they see fit, and that right should be recognized and encouraged. If education reform is to be lasting and effective, we must rededicate ourselves to the viability of education administered at the local and State level. It is with this in mind that I am supporting the legislative and administrative recommendations outlined below.

Our Administration has advanced The Equity and Choice (TEACH) legislative proposal aimed at expanding opportunities for educationally disadvantaged children. It will increase opportunities for parents to choose a school that best meets the needs of their children; foster diversity and encourage innovation by introducing the element of competition among schools; and increase private sector involvement in providing education to disadvantaged children.

Our Administration will again seek Federal tuition tax credits for parents who send their children to private elementary and secondary schools. These credits will foster more choice, improve the quality of both private and public schools, and treat more fairly parents exercising educational choice.

Our Administration seeks to expand State and local flexibility to use Bilingual Education Act funds for whatever instructional approaches will best meet the needs of children with limited proficiency in English. The Education Department has already proposed new regulations to give localities the full degree of flexibility allowed under the current law. We will also propose legislation to remove the remaining statutory impediment -- the 4 percent limitation on funding for special alternative programs.

We will ask the Congress for amendments to the Higher Education Act to restructure Federal student aid. This program must be made more cost effective. It should be structured to give needy students greater flexibility and choice in financing their post secondary education. We again propose establishing an Education Savings Account that will exclude from taxable income the earnings on any savings deposited in a special account for post-secondary education. Such a provision would increase the self-sufficiency of parents and students and strengthen our higher education system.

Our Administration will seek legislative amendments retargeting teacher development and retraining funds. The focus of this funding should be on improving the quality of our Nation's elementary and secondary school teachers.

There is currently a staggering and wholly unacceptable number of illiterate Americans. Much illiteracy can be traced to poor methods of teaching reading. Education Secretary Bennett will cooperate with other Cabinet officers to improve the administration of the more than 70 Federal programs aimed at improving literacy in our country. They will make sure that the most cost effective methods of teaching reading are used where Federal programs are involved. This will lead to reduced costs and improved literacy.

The Federal Government has a significant role in providing useful and reliable information to the American people about education. Armed with such information, our citizens can be trusted to improve the education of their children. Secretary Bennett will soon release a report, What Works, that will be a notable landmark in this effort.

I have charged the White House Domestic Policy Council to present me by December 1, 1986, an evaluation of programs and a strategy for immediate action to meet the financial, educational, social, and safety concerns of poor families -- a strategy for real and lasting emancipation.

As we work to make the American Dream real for all, we must also look to the condition of America's families. Struggling parents today worry how they will provide their children the advantages their parents gave them. In the welfare culture, the breakdown of the family, the most basic support system, has reached crisis proportions -- in female and child poverty, child abandonment, horrible crimes and deteriorating schools. After hundreds of billions of dollars in poverty programs, the plight of the poor grows more painful. But the waste in dollars and cents pales before the most tragic loss -- the sinful waste of human spirit and potential.

An effective pro-family anti-poverty program must both meet the legitimate subsistence needs of the poor and create an environment leading to less poverty and less dependence on Government support. The current collection of programs designed to assist the needy costs nearly $120 billion annually. Yet we have almost 30 million people still in poverty and these programs are run in such an uncoordinated fashion that many who are not poor receive benefits intended for the poor. Moreover, by failing to promote self, family, and community responsibility, these programs encourage dependency and entrench the very poverty they were intended to alleviate.

We can ignore this terrible truth no longer. As Franklin Roosevelt warned 51 years ago: Welfare is ``. . . a narcotic, a subtle destroyer of the human spirit.'' And we must now escape the spider's web of dependency.

America's health care system is the finest in the world. More people receive better health care services here than anywhere else in the world. Further improvements should build upon the fundamental strengths of this system, leaving the provision and financing of most health care services in the private sector.

Our health care system, however excellent, is also extremely expensive, and costs continue to rise rapidly. A primary reason for the escalating cost of health care is that adequate incentives for keeping costs down were not built into the system, and there has been a lack of competition in the field of health services. We made a significant improvement with the Prospective Payment System for hospitals under Medicare, implemented in 1984. As a result, health care spending increases have slowed.

Appropriate Federal Government action can lead to a more efficient health care system. To accomplish this we must rely on market forces to produce the level of services the consumers desire to buy, at the quality and cost they will accept. In a time of overall budget restraint, health care spending is not and should not be exempt. Therefore, any new programs should be fully financed and should not increase the budget deficit.

After seeing how devastating illness can destroy the financial security of a family, I am directing Secretary of Health and Human Services, Dr. Otis Bowen, to report to me by year-end with recommendations on how the private sector and Government can work together to address the problems of affordable insurance for those whose life savings would otherwise be threatened when catastrophic illness strikes.

Our Administration will continue to support the concept of prepaid health care, and will seek legislation emphasizing competition and broadening the types of health plans that qualify as alternatives to traditional Medicare coverage. Our Administration will encourage private health care providers to develop less costly plans and programs directed at maintaining health rather than treating illness, including those that call for a fixed annual payment for a given benefit package.

Our Administration will initiate a major study of high malpractice insurance premiums paid by health care providers and practices that minimize malpractice exposure. We will look for ways to reduce the impact of medical liability on health care costs while retaining quality care.

We will continue, as a high priority, the fight against Acquired Immune Deficiency Syndrome (AIDS). An unprecedented research effort is underway to deal with this major epidemic public health threat. The number of AIDS cases is expected to increase. While there are hopes for drugs and vaccines against AIDS, none is immediately at hand. Consequently, efforts should focus on prevention, to inform and to lower risks of further transmission of the AIDS virus. To this end, I am asking the Surgeon General to prepare a report to the American people on AIDS.

Our Administration will accelerate the processes for bringing safe and effective new drug therapies and new medical devices to ease pain and suffering of millions of Americans while providing consumers with more choice at less cost. We will continue nationwide protection programs to ensure that approved food, drug, and device supplies are safe. Education and other forms of prevention will be stressed.

Our system of justice is dedicated to and guided by the belief that the Constitution creates a government that is both limited and energetic. The Constitution carefully enumerates the powers the Federal Government may wield. But where the power is legitimately given, the Constitution also provides the means for a forceful and energetic execution of the law. We are committed to bring the full force of the law to bear on those who transgress its prohibitions or ignore its commands.

In carrying out our laws, we have four priorities. First, to protect the law abiding from the lawless with due and careful deference to the constitutional rights of all citizens. Second, to safeguard individual privacy from improper governmental intrusion. Third, to defend vigilantly and energetically the civil rights of all Americans. And fourth, to promote legal and regulatory structures designed to conserve and expand economic freedom.

The workload of the Federal courts has skyrocketed in recent years. To ensure fairness and consistency in the administration of justice, our Administration will continue to appoint highly qualified judges who support the limited policy making role of the Federal courts envisioned by the Constitution. The Founding Fathers did not want our judiciary system to be first among equals. They wanted it to be one of the co-equal branches of government.

Our Administration considers improvements to the Federal drug law enforcement program to be one of its top domestic priorities. Thus, we will continue efforts to eradicate illegal drugs before they can be harvested, and to reduce demand for these narcotics by opening the eyes of our Nation's young people to the damage drugs do to the health and lives of anyone who uses them. The Vice President will continue to provide strong leadership in demonstrating the importance of coordinated effort by all the Nation's law enforcement agencies to reduce the flow of narcotics in this country. Through our Organized Crime Drug Enforcement Task Force Program, we will strike at organized criminal elements who profit from drug trafficking.

Our Administration will be calling for the help of all Americans in our battle to eliminate organized crime's extensive influence in American society. Every Government agency will be mobilized and will cooperate with local and State police to wipe out all types of organized crime. The forfeiture provisions already enacted in the Administration's comprehensive crime control package will allow us to stem the life blood of organized crime by impounding some of their illicit proceeds. However, further reform and toughening of these procedures is in order.

Our Administration is completely and totally dedicated to the safety of air travel and the security of our airports. In the United States each day, 14,000 flights carry 1 million passengers. To further guarantee their safety we will continue to increase the number of air traffic controllers and inspectors. We have improved safety regulations and in-depth inspection of air carriers and equipment. We are modernizing our airspace system to make the safest system in the world even safer and more efficient. We have expanded the Federal air marshall program, increased security training of flight crews, and required background checks for all persons with access to aircraft or secure airport areas -- all measures that will enhance the security of the traveling public.

The protection of personal freedoms is one of the primary responsibilities of our constitutional form of government. Whether it is the right to worship, the right of free speech or the right to life, it is essential that we reaffirm our commitment to the defense of these fundamental freedoms. These rights and responsibilities must be constantly protected if America is to remain at the forefront of advancing personal freedom throughout the world. The constitutional guarantee of our individual rights will strengthen the family and make the future bright for generations to come.

We will continue to prosecute those who violate anti-discrimination laws. Instead of schemes that impose arbitrary numerical requirements, which really help no one and insult all who have worked hard to qualify for the jobs they seek, we need to focus instead on providing true opportunity to compete for employment in the marketplace.

Our Administration continues to support strengthening the Federal fair housing laws and efforts to create free and open housing opportunities for all Americans. The amendments we have proposed will stimulate voluntary efforts in support of fair housing and provide stronger penalties for those who break the law.

From the early days of the colonies, the right of school children to pray voluntarily has been a revered and important tradition. In 1984, I signed the equal access legislation which allows students in public secondary schools to meet voluntarily for religious purposes during non-instructional periods. But there is more to be done. The right to pray in school is a fundamental American liberty. I again ask the Congress to pass a constitutional amendment to restore the right of students to voluntarily pray in our public schools.

Our Administration will continue seeking to restore a proper balance between protecting the free exercise of religion and preventing establishment of religion as provided by the First Amendment. We will do this by filing amicus briefs in court actions where the Attorney General determines that government is improperly interfering with the constitutional guarantees of religious freedom, and will protect the American public against any form of persecution or religious intolerance.

By most conventional measures of environmental quality, the air and the waters of the United States continue to improve as a result of the enormous national commitment to these goals that has come about since 1970. Likewise, we continue to be ever more careful stewards of our lands and their abundant natural resources -- wildlife, soils, minerals, fuels, and forests. We are moving aggressively to eliminate serious contamination of valuable land and ground water from the past mismanagement of hazardous wastes.

Human institutions can encourage or constrain the ability of people to make the best use of their resources and to solve environmental problems. Rational policies that recognize and make effective use of economic incentives should help to improve the management of our environment and natural resources by stimulating new achievements on the part of the American people. Efficient use of the Nation's resources, guided whenever possible by free markets rather than centralized controls, will work to promote environmental health, economic productivity, and fiscal responsibility.

Environmental protection regulations should be fashioned so that innovation and the substitution of progressively safer new products and technologies for old ones are not inhibited, especially where risk reduction or increased benefits will be the likely result. We must be alert lest government restrictions, however benevolently aimed at protecting the public as a whole, begin to hamper the creativity and productivity of entrepreneurs and other individuals who also can bring about social advances.

Consistent with these thoughts, our Administration continues to support reauthorization of the Comprehensive Environmental Response Compensation and Liability Act -- Superfund -- for another 5 years. While we are firmly opposed to funding this through a value-added tax, we urge the Congress to keep the clean-up of hazardous waste a high priority.

We will continue to work with the Congress to closely examine the Nation's major environmental laws and will pay close attention to balancing tradeoffs among social costs, risk, and environmental protection. We will encourage market-oriented strategies throughout this process.

All Americans should take pride in their outstanding public lands and historic sites that belong to everyone. The Departments of Interior, Agriculture, Education, and Army (Corps of Engineers) and the Environmental Protection Agency will work together on a ``Take Pride in America'' campaign. We must all work for a renewed awareness that these lands are our lands.

Recognizing that environmental problems do not stop at national boundaries we will continue to collaborate closely with other nations, on issues such as acid rain, to maintain the quality of the global environment and improve the management of natural resources of common interest. The United States has long been the world leader in making its scientific talent, data and information, and financial resources available to the international community for these purposes, and we intend to maintain such a role.

The United States is, and was intended to be, governed by a Federal system. State and local governments play a significant role in the life of our country. During the 1970's, State and local governments were often bypassed as the Federal establishment grasped more and more authority. As Government became farther and farther removed from the people, it became less efficient and less responsive.

Today, we have reversed the trend toward centralization. State and local governments are again assuming their rightful role. This is a trend we must encourage. We must see to it that State and local governments are able to do those jobs that they can do best.

Through block grants, we have been able to cut through Federal red tape and allow State and local officials to design and administer programs that make sense to them and their taxpayers. Accordingly, the budget I submitted contains proposals for new block grants, and maintains healthy funding levels for the ones already in place.

We are working with State and local government officials and organizations to compile a roster of major Federal regulations for revision or elimination. We will also seek to standardize agency grant management practices that will reduce administrative costs, and confusion.

In recent years, many municipal governments have expressed great concern over the dramatic increase in exposure to lawsuits for damages arising out of their performance of vital governmental functions. As a result of this increased liability, many municipalities cannot even obtain insurance coverage. A substantial portion of this liability is imposed under various Federal statutes and programs. We will work closely with State and local governments in 1986 to address this problem.

Our Administration will continue working with State and local governments to ensure that environmental statutes are properly enforced and managed. Such activities have already fostered an atmosphere of mutual cooperation leading to stronger and more efficient enforcement of our environmental laws.

As we move from basic research to development of new products, it becomes more difficult to justify Government's role. The most effective role of the Federal Government is supporting basic research. Recognizing this, the Administration has shifted resources toward this end, and our FY 1987 budget proposes an increase in funding in this area. We are also seeking to renew the tax credit for additional private sector research and development, and will encourage commercial application of federally sponsored research and development.

Our Administration will continue to support basic research in the promising new field of biotechnology. We will seek to provide for protection of intellectual property in biotechnology in order to promote innovation, and will ensure that health and safety regulations are adequate to ensure that new products are safe.

Our Nation remains fully committed to America's space program that includes our shuttle flights, a Space Station, space transportation, assured access to space, and programs required to protect the right to operate in space. We also seek a strong space science program that will exploit space as a research laboratory for development of aerospace flight, Earth sensing and advanced technology programs required in the 1990's and into the 21st century. Research has already begun on an aerospace plane that could, by the end of the next decade, take off from Dulles Airport and accelerate up to 25 times the speed of sound, attaining low-earth orbit or flying to Tokyo within 2 hours.

We will continue to look for appropriate initiatives to benefit the civil and commercial communities that will encourage private sector investment and involvement in civil space activities and promote greater international cooperation in pursuing opportunities in space. We must remain a leader in conquering new frontiers or we, as a people, will surely fall behind.

In the area of foreign affairs, America will continue to encourage democracy, freedom, and respect for human rights around the world. We will be a strong and reliable ally to our friends, and a firm but hopeful adversary for those who, for now, choose not to be our friends. With the former we hope for continued harmony; with the latter, for progress toward that most elusive of goals, peace.

And so the tensions between us reflect differences that cannot be wished away. But the future is not predetermined. Knowing this, and truly desiring to make the differences between us smaller and more manageable, the United States continues to pursue progress in all aspects of our relationship with the Soviet Union.

Our Administration seeks to ensure that this relationship remains peaceful. We want restraint to be the Soviet leadership's most realistic option and will see to it that our freedoms and those of our Allies are protected.

We seek a secure future at lower levels of arms, particularly nuclear forces, through agreements that are equitable and verifiable. The soundness of our proposals, our renewed military strength and our bipartisan determination to assure a strong deterrent create incentives for the Soviet Union to negotiate seriously.

We can move toward a better, more cooperative working relationship with the Soviet Union if the Soviet leadership is willing. This will require full Soviet compliance with the letter and spirit of both past and future agreements.

There is much work to be done. I will meet General Secretary Gorbachev later this year, and in preparation my Administration will pursue discussions with the Soviet government at all levels. I also hope to see greater communication and broader contact between our peoples. I am optimistic that if the Soviet leadership is willing to meet us halfway, we will be able to put our relations on a more cooperative footing in 1986.

In spite of our current discussions, the Soviet leaders are continuing a massive military buildup that threatens the United States and our free world allies. Real arms reductions are possible only if the Soviets and others do not doubt our strength and ability to counter aggression.

Keeping America strong, free, and at peace is solely the responsibility of the Federal Government; it is Government's prime responsibility. We have devoted 5 years trying to narrow a dangerous gap born of illusion and neglect. And we have made important gains.

In the past 5 years, our Administration has reversed the decline in defense funding that occurred during the 1970's and has made significant progress in strengthening our military capabilities. Last year the Congress and I reached a deficit reduction agreement. We pledged together to hold real growth in defense funding to the bare minimum. My 1987 budget honors that pledge. It proposes defense levels that are essential simply to maintain the defense capability that we have achieved in the face of the continuing Soviet military buildup. I am now asking Congress to keep its end of the bargain. With the additional cuts under Gramm-Rudman-Hollings, FY 1986 budget authority for defense corresponds to more than a 5 percent real decline. This simply cannot continue. I am proposing 1987 - 1991 defense levels which provide the real program growth agreed to in last year's Budget Resolution. It is critical that these levels be supported. The world must know that if America reduces her defenses, it will be because of a reduced threat, not a reduced resolve.

We will continue vigorously to pursue our strategic modernization program in my 1987 budget -- to modernize our bomber, ICBM, and missile-submarine forces so as to assure effective and stable deterrence.

Our Administration will also actively continue research into new technologies in search of secure strategic defense systems. The Strategic Defense Initiative offers the prospect of finding such systems, which threaten no one, to keep the peace, protect the United States and our allies in greater safety, and ultimately to eliminate the threat of nuclear weapons by making nuclear-armed missiles obsolete. We have invited allies to join us in this research effort. We have already agreed with Great Britain to undertake cooperative research and are laying the groundwork for cooperation with others.

We have witnessed in the past 5 years a remarkable improvement in personnel quality and retention throughout all components of the Military Services. My 1987 budget continues to ensure that the high quality of our forces is maintained.

Our Administration is strongly committed to improving management of our defense programs. I look forward to receiving the recommendations of my Blue Ribbon Commission, chaired by David Packard, which has been reviewing this issue. The Department of Defense will continue to root out waste and inefficiency and will aggressively initiate any new improvements necessary to assure that taxpayer dollars are well spent. We will also pursue organizational changes, where appropriate, to ensure the continued effectiveness of our Armed Forces.

While acknowledging the importance of the free flow of knowledge and information for commercial purposes, our Administration will not sacrifice our strategic technological advantages in the area of national security. We will forcefully administer the Export Administration Act.

Our Administration has pressed the governments of Indochina for the fullest possible accounting of the POW/MIA question. These efforts have shown significant progress and will continue. We will continue to pursue, with all resources available to us, reports of Americans who could still be held captive.

We will continue to support the nearly 28 million veterans who have given faithful service in defense of our Nation. We will provide quality medical care, fair and compassionate disability compensation, and other benefits for eligible veterans.

The United States continues to pursue a world of hope where people are free to choose the political system by which they will be governed. We seek to roll back the tide of tyranny; we seek to increase freedom across the face of this planet, for serving the cause of freedom also serves the cause of peace. It is for this reason that Americans have always supported the struggle of freedom fighters. It is also why I put forward my ``regional initiative'' at the United Nations last fall -- a three-stage plan for ending a series of dangerous wars that have pitted a series of governments against their own people and their neighbors.

As we have in the past, America must actively wage the competition of political ideas -- between free government and its opponents -- and lend our support to those who are building the infrastructure of democracy. Failure to sustain other democracies will be very costly in the long run, both materially and spiritually.

In Afghanistan we must continue to help the forces fighting a Soviet invasion and an oppressive Communist regime. As a result of the Soviet Union's military presence and vicious campaign against the freedom fighters, a quarter of the Afghan population has been killed or has fled to refugee camps. The Afghan people will have our support as long as the Soviet Union continues its war against them.

In Latin America the trend toward elected civilian governments continues, with Guatemala as the latest new entry. Over 90 percent of the people of Latin America and the Caribbean now enjoy democratic rule. That compares to less than one-third only 5 years ago. However, Communist subversion and the insidious spread of narcotics trafficking continue to menace the region. In fact, they sometimes work hand in hand, as in Colombia, where insurgents are increasingly linked to drug traffickers and narcotics growers.

The Central American democracies need our help. Our assistance is crucial, as demonstrated by the success of El Salvador in preserving democratic institutions in the face of a Communist insurgency. The levels of economic and security assistance we will request for Central America are the absolute minimum needed to maintain progress toward the objectives set out in the report of the Bipartisan Commission on Central America.

For moral and strategic reasons, we must continue to support those seeking democracy in Nicaragua. The Nicaraguan resistance is fighting not only the Sandinistas, but Cubans armed with Soviet weapons. I will be asking the Congress to provide the Nicaraguan freedom fighters with the moral and material support they require to continue and expand their struggle. We will continue to press the Sandinistas to negotiate with their own people and to fulfill the promises made to them of genuine democracy. Reconciliation in Nicaragua, based on democratic elections, remains the key to peace in Central America.

In Africa, many countries have experienced deep economic distress and starvation in the past year, brought about in part by the drought and in some cases -- particularly Ethiopia -- by the brutal policies of a Communist regime. As the human cost of such policies mounts, we encourage African governments to take the lead in moving toward economic and political freedoms.

We are moved by the efforts of freedom fighters such as Jonas Savimbi and the members of UNITA. They deserve our support in their brave struggle against Soviet-Cuban imperialism in Angola. We will work with the Congress to determine the most effective way of providing support.

In South Africa, we stand forthrightly on the principle that the government must achieve freedom and justice for all its citizens. Apartheid, in our view, is doomed. We have a major stake -- as elsewhere, both moral and strategic -- in encouraging a peaceful transition and avoiding a terrible civil war. This is why we reject the approach of those on both sides who pursue violence and oppression. Our ability to affect the ultimate outcome is limited, but we will continue to employ our good offices -- both official and private -- to pursue dialogue and negotiation as the best way to change the system while protecting the future of all South Africans.

In Southeast Asia, the United States supports ASEAN in its efforts to aid the struggle of the Cambodian people to free their country from foreign occupation while aiding Thailand, the ASEAN front-line state. As in other regions, we are prepared to contribute to a negotiated settlement of this war, in the context of the proposals I put forward at the U.N. General Assembly last year. We are implementing humanitarian measures in response to the refugee problems in the region.

We are concerned by developments in the Philippines, our long-time ally, and will work to encourage political moderation, fair play, and the strengthening of democratic institutions. Only on this basis can the people of the Philippines check and ultimately defeat an insurgency whose goal is to end democracy.

No discussion of peace and freedom can be complete without a reference to Europe's great and just hope: an end to the artificial division of the continent. The dividing line between freedom and oppression is one boundary that can never be made legitimate. The most significant way of making all Europe more secure is to make it more free.

We stand for the principles of freedom, democracy, the rule of law, unconditional human rights, and government with the consent of the governed. The cause of Poland's Solidarity continues to arouse the conscience of mankind. Solidarity will not die because its heartbeat is an indestructible truth that resonates in every human heart.

We can help those seeking democracy not only by economic and military aid, but with ideas and the active involvement of democratic parties and institutions. The National Endowment for Democracy has a creative role to play in fostering the ideals that make democracy work.

America's strength and staying power are the essential prerequisites for strengthening our alliances and friendships and for protecting the values and interests that bind us together. In Europe we have launched, together with our NATO allies, a Conventional Defense Initiative to find more effective means to improve our conventional deterrent; we are also seeking ways, with congressional support, to stimulate armaments cooperation. The alliance remains firmly on course in deploying NATO intermediate-range weapons to counter Soviet SS - 20 missiles. We are also continuing alliance implementation of the decision to reduce by 1,400 the number of nuclear warheads available to NATO, bringing our theater-nuclear inventory to its lowest level in 20 years; this decision is being carried out despite the absence of reductions by the Soviet Union.

In our relations with Japan, we will expand our efforts to resolve bilateral trade issues through trade liberalizing solutions that open Japanese markets to American goods. We continue to rely on the United States-Japanese Mutual Security treaty as a pillar of Asian peace and stability.

Our commitment to the security of the Republic of Korea has never been stronger. We have a number of differences on trade issues but believe the market-opening steps being taken or under consideration by the Republic of Korea will alleviate these difficulties.

Elsewhere in Asia I will continue to expand and deepen cooperation with China, and improve our relationships in Southeast Asia and the dynamic Pacific Basin as a whole. Termination of United States Trusteeship over the Micronesian Territories, which I hope we can achieve this year, will be a landmark in our relations with the emerging Pacific Island nations and a symbol of our support for democracy and freedom everywhere.

One of the areas most critical to our security is the Middle East. Security assistance to the countries of the region is important to maintaining United States influence, to preventing Soviet intimidation and exploitation, and to giving friendly governments the confidence to move toward peace in the face of often violent opposition. We are helping Israel and Jordan to narrow their differences in the peace process. We will continue our efforts to facilitate direct negotiations between Israel and her Arab neighbors. We must also enlarge the gains already made between Israel and Egypt.

In South Asia major strides have been taken in the past year to advance regional peace and prosperity. A new regional association was inaugurated to grapple with the twin killers of narcotics and terrorism. The leaders of India and Pakistan have met frequently to address outstanding differences. The United States stands ready to promote regional peace and reduce the risk of a South Asian nuclear arms race in any way we can.

In terms of our legislative intentions, let me be clear: in all these regions of the world, a strong security assistance program is one of the most effective, and least costly, ways of protecting interests we share with allies and friends. I will work with the Congress to preserve this invaluable policy tool. I will also seek congressional approval of our requests to sell arms to Jordan and other pro-Western governments in the Mideast.

Terrorism is a growing threat, as evidenced by the increased targeting of innocent civilians engaged in innocent pursuits. We are taking several measures to increase our capability to deal with this scourge. We are aware that it thrives with the support of nations such as Libya that provide funding, logistics, direction, and safehavens.

The Vice President's Task Force on Combating Terrorism, formed at my direction last July, has submitted its report to me with a series of recommendations. Our Administration has already begun to implement those recommendations that are within the purview of the Executive Branch. We will increase our intelligence cooperation with friendly nations to share information on terrorist plans and intentions. Our intelligence community will place greater emphasis on collecting information on terrorist groups and their state supporters. And we will increase our readiness to strike back at terrorists where they have been identified and their responsibility for actions against Americans has been determined. Those countries that support and direct the terrorists should know there is no refuge, there is no hiding place, there is no sanctuary that will keep them safe forever.

Our Administration will continue, on its own and in cooperation with allies, with private sector transportation companies, and with international organizations, to take preventive and response measures to counter the brutal, savage terrorist attacks on innocent people. Through the Federal Bureau of Investigation here at home and intelligence services abroad, we will act to head off terrorist incidents before they can occur. Our tightened security measures already include new regulations for checked baggage, cargo, and access to aircraft. We are working with the International Civil Aviation Organization and the International Maritime Organization to enhance security standards worldwide.

Our Administration will ask the Congress for legislation to further improve security measures, enhance anti-terrorism assistance programs and in general enable us to meet our counter-terrorism responsibilities. We are requesting additional funds to improve the security of our diplomatic missions abroad and of foreign diplomats here in the United States. We are also asking the Senate to approve the Supplementary Extradition Treaty with the United Kingdom to allow the return of international terrorists for trial. This treaty will assure that our own courts cannot become a sanctuary for certain terrorists and will serve as a model for cooperation between nations.

Our Administration will continue to counter the threat posed by the worldwide activity of hostile intelligence services such as the KGB and GRU. We will follow a realistic approach to countering illegal technology acquisition, espionage, and the attempt to manipulate public opinion through active measures and disinformation. We will enhance our world effort to identify and neutralize the activity of intelligence services working against American interests or threatening our security.

The major economic objectives of my Administration from its beginning have been strong, sustainable, noninflationary economic growth and expanding economic opportunities for all Americans. To achieve these goals, we have pursued policies that are in the long-term best interest of the Nation.

The benefits of this approach are now clear. The economy has entered the fourth year of a robust expansion that has dramatically increased opportunities for all Americans. Millions of new jobs have been created. Investment opportunities have increased. Standards of living have risen. Moreover, this success has been accomplished without rekindling inflation.

We are committed to continuing and extending policies that encourage the private investment and innovation that are the foundation of this expansion. We continue to resist unnecessary increases in government spending and unwarranted interference in private markets. Sustained, strong economic growth depends critically on allowing the market system to function as freely as possible. Free markets provide proper incentives to work, save, and invest, and they ensure that the interests of consumers are served.

The success of our policies is now apparent. Even though economic growth slowed a bit in 1985 compared with its strong performance in 1983 and 1984, the expansion has nonetheless proceeded at an encouraging pace. It is already 4 months longer in duration than the average peacetime expansion since World War II. If the expansion continues as expected throughout 1986, it will be the third longest in the postwar period.

This expansion has been characterized by unusually strong real business investment in plant and equipment due to our successful attack on inflation and to our tax policy, which stimulated investment. Real business investment has contributed nearly twice as much to real gross national product (GNP) growth in this expansion as it typically has in previous postwar expansions; as a share of real GNP, it is higher than at any other time in the postwar period. Stronger U.S. investment means not only a stronger economy today, but also higher productivity and the potential for faster growth in the future.

Strong employment growth is another outstanding feature of this recovery. Since the end of the last recession in November 1982, the U.S. economy has employed more than 9 million new workers. Furthermore, the unemployment rate fell from 10.6 percent in November 1982 to 6.9 percent in December 1985. Despite this dramatic improvement, however, we will not be satisfied until all American workers can find jobs at wages commensurate with their skills.

When we initiated our Program for Economic Recovery, we were confident that a resourceful, flexible economy, unencumbered by excessive governmental intervention, would create jobs. At the same time, we believed that restrained monetary growth would reduce inflation. Our optimism was justified. The rate of inflation is now less than one-third of the rate in 1980. During this expansion, inflation has maintained its lowest level in more than a decade despite the tremendous employment growth that the economy has generated. Reflecting in part the reduction in inflation, interest rates -- especially long-term rates -- have declined throughout 1985 and by the end of the year were at their lowest levels in 6 years.

Our success in reducing inflation came as a surprise to some. As inflation rose in the 1970s, some businesses and individuals incurred debt in order to purchase assets, expecting the income generated by these assets to rise with inflation while the real burden of servicing the debt decreased. With the decline in inflation, the real burden of debt servicing rose and the income generated by many assets fell. This combination of events has strained some U.S. financial institutions. Falling farm incomes have hampered the ability of some farmers to pay interest on their debt. Similarly, many less developed countries have had difficulty repaying loans from U.S. financial institutions. The stress that the undesirable rise in inflation and its desirable but unexpectedly rapid decline have imposed on the U.S. financial system emphasizes the importance of achieving and maintaining long-term price stability.

America's optimism concerning continued growth in economic opportunities is shared by businesses and individuals throughout the world. The United States has been and remains one of the few major immigrant-receiving countries, reflecting in part the economy's ability to generate economic opportunities. During the current expansion, profitable investment opportunities in the United States have also attracted foreign capital, helping to finance the rapid growth in investment. The inflow of foreign capital indicates a strong economy. As other nations continue to move toward market-oriented policies and reduce excessive government spending, taxation, and structural rigidities, they too will generate increased investment opportunities, resulting in increased growth and stronger currencies as more capital flows into their economies.

Many factors point to continuation of the current expansion. Economic conditions at the end of 1985 were more favorable than they were at the beginning of the year and are expected to improve further. Monetary growth during the past year has been sufficient to accommodate growth in the economy. The leading economic indicators have risen in 11 of the past 12 months. Inventories are relatively low, and as sales continue to expand, production should increase to replenish depleted inventories. Interest rates have continued their decline, promising to spur additional capital spending. Furthermore, the warning signals that typically precede the end of expansions have not been observed. Thus, we feel confident that the current expansion will continue through 1986.

We expect increased growth in real GNP of 4 percent in 1986, continuing throughout 1987 and 1988 and declining gradually in 1989 - 91 as the economy approaches its long-run real growth trend. Given the monetary and exchange rate developments during the past year, we anticipate a slight rise in inflation in 1986 - 87. However, if the Federal Reserve reaffirms its resolve to achieve price stability, a goal that I support without reservation, the downturn in inflation should resume in later years.

Changing events, including erratic monetary and fiscal policies, can bring any expansion to an abrupt and unexpected halt. Our projections for the longer term are premised on the assumption that stable economic policies will foster continued economic growth and will also provide the needed flexibility for the economy to respond to external disturbances. Our policy goals reflect this commitment to economic stability as the key contribution to sustained growth, stable prices, declining interest rates, and falling unemployment. The American people have a right to expect such results and, with the cooperation of the Congress and the Federal Reserve, we expect to continue to deliver them.

In formulating our program for healthy and continued economic expansion, we recognized the limited role that government properly plays. The Federal Government cannot provide prosperity or generate economic growth; it can only encourage private initiative, innovation, and entrepreneurial activity that produce economic opportunities. An overly active government actually hinders economic progress. Federal spending absorbs resources, many of which could be better used by the private sector. Excessive taxation distorts relative prices and relative rates of return. By arbitrarily reallocating resources, it inhibits the economy's ability to grow. Thus, the best way for government to promote economic growth is to provide a foundation of stable, predictable economic policies, and then to stand back and let the creative potential of the American people flourish.

The Federal Government has several definite responsibilities that my Administration continues to uphold. The first is to provide an adequate national defense. World peace and security require the United States, as the leader of the free world, to demonstrate its willingness and ability to defend its own national security and to contribute to the defense of its allies.

Furthermore, we will not ignore the less fortunate in this society. My Administration continues to provide an appropriate safety net to aid those individuals who need help. At the same time, we have worked to develop a strong, vibrant, opportunity-generating economy that can offer meaningful jobs to all who are able to work. The economic expansion has done much more to reduce poverty than any government transfer program. The significant decline in the percentage of the population in poverty in 1984 reflects both the success of our programs and the strength of the economy. Moreover, tax reform will benefit the working poor. My proposed tax reforms eliminate the Federal income tax burden of most working poor.

Finally, even though we believe that markets generally allocate resources most efficiently, there are a few special cases, such as air and water pollution, in which the market mechanism alone may be inadequate. In these instances, government intervention is necessary, but even here, it should be based on market principles. For example, the Environmental Protection Agency has approved arrangements that enable firms to earn credits for reducing emissions below the required limit, which they can sell to other firms facing higher costs of emission control. In this way, environmental quality is maintained and improved while the costs of compliance decline.

Control Federal Spending. -- Fulfillment of these limited responsibilities, however, does not require the level or the rate of growth of Federal spending that the Nation has been experiencing. In spite of our efforts, spending remains excessive and has been the primary cause of the large budget deficit. Tax rate cuts did not generate this deficit; in fact, current tax receipts are as large a share of GNP as they were in the late 1970s, even after the reduction in tax rates that we initiated in 1981. The key to resolving the Federal budget deficit is to restrain unneeded spending. Spending, not the deficit, is the true indicator of the cost of government, because it measures the total economic resources diverted from the private sector. Excessive spending affects the economy in deleterious ways regardless of whether it is financed through taxation, borrowing, or even inflation. Private capital formation is reduced, resources are inefficiently allocated, and economic growth is slowed.

I applaud and support the newly enacted Balanced Budget and Emergency Deficit Control Act of 1985, known commonly as Gramm-Rudman-Hollings, as a way to work with the Congress to reduce Federal spending and the deficit. I intend to submit budgets in each of the coming years that satisfy the act's deficit targets, not by sacrificing the programs essential to the Nation, but by reforming or eliminating those programs that are ineffective or nonessential. I reject the notion of increased taxes. Higher taxes would only encourage more Federal spending and limit the economy's ability to grow.

Gramm-Rudman-Hollings accomplishes only part of our long-term objective of Federal fiscal responsibility. Properly applied, it will produce a balanced budget by 1991, but it does not guarantee a continued balanced budget thereafter. We must now direct our attention to a constitutional amendment providing for a permanently balanced budget. Together, these two measures will provide an orderly transition to a balanced budget, restrain future spending, and ensure that future fiscal decisions are prudent and responsive to the national interests. Accordingly, I continue to support strongly and to urge the adoption of a balanced-budget constitutional amendment. I also seek legislation that would authorize the President to veto individual line items in appropriations measures. Such authority is essential to ensure that only effective and essential government programs are funded.

Reform Taxes. -- Over the years, successive modifications of the Federal tax code have resulted in a complex tax system that contains many loopholes and artificially encourages some types of activities at the expense of others. Furthermore, the inflation of the 1970s distorted the overall pattern of capital taxation and pushed personal incomes into ever-higher tax brackets, discouraging saving and investment. Our actions to reduce tax rates have corrected many of these distortions and inequities. Individual income tax rates have been reduced and indexed to the inflation rate; effective tax rates on new investment have been lowered substantially. Still, more must be done.

In May 1985, I submitted to the Congress a comprehensive reform of the tax code to make it simpler, fairer, and more conducive to economic growth. I proposed reducing marginal tax rates for individuals and businesses, broadening the tax base by eliminating the majority of existing loopholes, taxing different activities consistently so that resources are allocated on the basis of economic merit and not tax considerations, and compensating for or eliminating much of the remaining influence of inflation on effective tax rates on capital. Just before it recessed, the House of Representatives passed a tax reform bill that incorporated some of these principles. Despite substantive differences between my proposal and the House bill, I urged its passage to move the legislative process forward. We will now work with the Senate to generate a fair and simple tax code that is truly pro-family, pro-jobs, and pro-growth.

Eliminate Counterproductive Regulation. -- Tax reform is only one part of our goal to enable markets to function more efficiently in allocating resources. We have also worked hard to identify and remove government regulations that impede the operation of markets, inhibit competition, or impose unnecessary costs on firms and unnecessarily high prices on consumers. The regulation of domestic oil prices provides a good example of the deleterious economic effects that regulation can have as it distorts relative prices and prevents necessary adjustments. The results of my accelerating the deregulation of oil prices in January 1981 are now apparent. Oil imports have declined, and the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries has found it impossible to sustain its previous levels of high prices. In contrast, the natural gas market is still plagued by distortions induced by price controls. In 1983, we unsuccessfully urged the Congress to deregulate natural gas prices. We will again pursue legislation that would completely deregulate natural gas prices. In addition, we are proposing further deregulation of the trucking industry.

We will continue efforts to reduce government involvement in two particular sectors of the economy. First, the banking and credit system remains rife with regulations and loan guarantees that arbitrarily allocate credit and hamper the system's ability to adapt to changing economic conditions. While we must continue to protect the public against severe economic disturbances, we should allow financial institutions greater freedom in determining the composition of their assets and liabilities so that they can respond more flexibly to the changes they encounter.

Second, heavy government involvement also persists in many agricultural markets. Government policies, intended as solutions, have so distorted incentives that they have actually caused some of agriculture's current problems. The legislation that I proposed in 1985 was designed to return American agriculture gradually to a free market. The bill passed by the Congress in late 1985 contained some of my proposed reforms, but preserved some of the policies that now hamper agriculture. In particular, it maintained counterproductive government intervention in the dairy industry, mandated export subsidies, and continued costly distortions of the sugar market. We will continue to pursue further agricultural reform that lessens government involvement in these areas and increases opportunities for farmers to compete successfully in world markets.

Transfer Some Services to the Private Sector. -- The Federal Government has increasingly sought to provide services that can be more efficiently provided by the private sector. To address this problem, I have established a working group to investigate which government functions could be effectively returned to the private sector. I have also included several initiatives in this area in the recently released budget. This strategy does not necessarily require eliminating services now provided by the government. Rather, it would make private alternatives available. Such a strategy ensures production of services that are demanded by consumers, not those chosen by government bureaucrats. It also leads to more efficient and lower cost production of those services, and often removes government-imposed restraints on competition.

Maintain Free and Fair Trade. -- Our pursuit of unencumbered markets is not confined to the domestic economy. Our international trade policy rests firmly on the foundation of free and open markets. The benefits of free trade are well known: it generates more jobs, a more productive use of a nation's resources, more rapid innovation, and higher standards of living both for this Nation and its trading partners. While a unilateral commitment to free trade benefits the Nation, Americans gain even more when U.S. trading partners also open their markets. My Administration will actively pursue this goal. An important part of our trade program is to begin a new round of multilateral trade negotiations. Under the auspices of the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade, we are seeking to engage U.S. trading partners in comprehensive negotiations that will generate freer trade, increased access for U.S. exports, and a stronger international trading system. To complement this initiative, we are continuing to explore the possibility of establishing bilateral free trade zones with some U.S. trading partners.

We do not blindly pursue free trade. We also strive to ensure that trade is fair by vigilantly enforcing current trade laws. Unfair trade practices abroad harm U.S. exporters as well as reduce standards of living worldwide; this is unacceptable. In an unprecedented move, I have asked the U.S. Trade Representative to initiate unfair trade practice investigations under Section 301 of the Trade Act of 1974. Such investigations are not intended to produce retaliatory action by the United States, but rather to achieve more open markets internationally. In this way, we hope to convey the message that a commitment to free and fair trade is a reciprocal obligation in this increasingly interrelated world trading community.

The large trade deficit that has evolved during the current expansion has subjected our free and fair trade policy to much criticism, especially from the Congress. During the past year, more than 300 pieces of protectionist legislation have been considered or proposed. While the conditions that have led to the trade deficit have adversely affected some U.S. industries, increased protectionism is not the solution. Protectionist measures will have little effect on the trade balance and will only decrease standards of living and inefficiently redistribute resources within the economy.

Our agreement with four other major industrialized nations in September 1985 was an important recognition that economic policy changes across countries (not only in the United States) are essential to correct trade imbalances worldwide and to realign currency values. To this end, we reaffirmed our commitment to continue efforts to reduce the Federal Government deficit by lowering spending as a share of GNP. We urged the Congress to enact Gramm-Rudman-Hollings to achieve that goal. America's trading partners, in turn, committed themselves to policies designed to foster increased internally generated economic growth and, hence, increased demand for U.S. exports. These policy objectives are important for less developed countries as well. Indeed, a central facet of the Secretary of the Treasury's recent initiatives to assist in resolving the debt-servicing problems of these countries is that they pursue policies to promote growth, reduce inflation, and secure balance of payments adjustment.

My Administration recognizes the responsibility of the Federal Government to promote economic growth and individual opportunity through policies that lead to maximum employment, production, and purchasing power. We intend to maintain this course with policies that continue to promote strong, sustainable, noninflationary growth and provide expanding economic opportunities for all. We shall continue to resist additional government involvement as a solution to short-term problems. Such involvement has been unsuccessful in the past and ultimately becomes part of the problem rather than part of the solution. With the cooperation and support of the Congress and the independent agencies, we will pursue the appropriate policies necessary to sustain the current expansion and to stabilize prices.

Another memory I'll have is of the many dedicated people who have given so much of themselves to accomplish what we have in these last 5 years. I'm talking about the Cabinet officers that are here on the stage, and I'm talking about each and every one of you. How far we've come can be traced back to your skill and commitment, to the long hours, to the professionalism you've put into your individual tasks. So, before I go any further, let me just say from the bottom of my heart, I'm proud of you, and I'll always be very grateful to you.

There's a rule against singling people out, because all of you've done so much. But there's a member of the team who's back with us today. We've prayed for her while she was in the hospital. And, Susan Borchard [Associate Director of Presidential Personnel], I couldn't have a better birthday present than your being here.

Well, you know, the Democrats have taken special note of every candle I add to my birthday cake. [Laughter] They keep hoping that I won't be able to blow them all out. [Laughter] Because, you know, your wish comes true then; and they know what I'm wishing for. [Laughter] Well, Nancy brought in my cake this morning, and I blew out every candle. So, there'll be no tax increase this year.

I think there's every reason to be optimistic about the time ahead. We've already proven how much we can accomplish. Remember during the 1980 campaign when certain experts were saying it would take 10 years to wring inflation out of the economy? Well, in 1982, as our program began to come on line, inflation dropped to under 4 percent. Last year it was 3.8, and we're not going to be satisfied until we get it down to 0.0. And as you set goals for your departments and agencies, don't be afraid to try what the experts say can't be done. I've found that an expert is usually an individual who knows every reason in the book why not to try. Our motto is: ``It can be done.'' You'd be surprised how much gets done when you find out you could do all those things they said can't be done.

We didn't come to Washington for business as usual. We came here to rewrite the rule book and to extend the boundaries of the possible. And, together with the American people, we've transformed economic decline and national pessimism into 37 months of economic growth and confidence. Productivity is up; 9 million new jobs have been created in just over 3 years. We've got a higher percentage of our citizens working today than have ever worked before in our history. In the last 3 years, real business fixed investment has risen to a whopping 38 percent -- or by a whopping 38 percent. And the stock market has climbed right through the roof.

Both the spirit and material well-being of the American people have improved dramatically. I don't know if any of you caught the speech a couple of nights ago -- in the State of the Union -- [laughter] -- but, well, I tried to make it clear that our success has been based on our deep and abiding trust in the American people. Consistent with this, we've focused our attention on returning decisionmaking to State and local government and to the people themselves. Between 1979 - 1981, the year we got to Washington, Federal tax revenues doubled, and the Federal Government was looked to for solutions to every problem. Do you know something? If government controls and central planning were the way to a better future, we'd be importing our grain from the Soviet Union and not the other way around.

Nowhere has that failed philosophy been more apparent than in our schools. Looking to Washington for easy answers and free money did nothing to improve the quality of our children's education. In fact, test scores and other indicators plummeted. The liberal answer would have been more spending and more Federal involvement. Instead, we set out to mobilize the people. We focused their attention on the issues that mattered, and we called for higher standards, for merit pay, for more discipline, and for more parental involvement and choice. And the results have been spectacular. All 50 States have put their own educational task forces to work, looking for ways to improve their systems; 34 States have raised graduation requirements; 33 require teacher competency tests; 31 now reward teachers on the basis of performance. On the local level, school districts and communities in all 50 States have raised their academic standards. What does all this mean to America's children? Well, last year we enjoyed the largest gain in Scholastic Aptitude Test scores in over 20 years.

And while we're talking about education, last week our country experienced a tragedy that touched each and every citizen, especially our children. In the Congress, in city halls and statehouses throughout the land, men and women stopped and bowed their heads in prayer, seeking solace from our Heavenly Father, and I still wish children in our public schools had been able to do the same thing.

In the coming year, we face challenges as important as any we've seen so far. Now, I know you've heard the uproar over Gramm-Rudman-Hollings. Well, contrary to what the gloom and doomers are saying, Gramm-Rudman-Hollings is no threat; it's an opportunity. We at last have a tool with which to deal with Federal deficit spending, and we're going to make the best of it. Jim Miller and his crew at OMB have been working with many of you in developing a budget that meets the GRH targets. And all of you have done a terrific job. To those on Capitol Hill who say it can't be done, we say it already has been done. We've offered a reasonable and a fair alternative. And in these next few weeks, I hope all of you will put out the maximum effort to support our budget proposal. Can I count on you? [Applause] You just made my day. [Laughter] In fact, you've made it several times already.

The budget battle does, of course, pose some risks. There are, for example, those who believe the way to handle the problem of deficit spending is to increase taxes. Well, during the last campaign, one candidate took his case for higher taxes to the American people and he was -- [laughter] -- he was victorious in one State and in the District of Columbia. [Laughter] Even liberal economists should be able to add up the score. The American people don't want higher taxes. Furthermore, higher taxes won't translate into higher revenue and lower deficit spending. This has been clear ever since the time of Adam Smith back in 1776. ``High taxes,'' that great economist noted, ``frequently afford a smaller revenue to government than what might be drawn from more moderate taxes.'' Now, you know, it made sense the first time he told me that. [Laughter] It doesn't take a genius to understand that increasing the Federal tax could well lead to higher spending, higher tax rates, and a new recession. We didn't come to Washington to preside over such a scenario.

The second threat comes from those who would irresponsibly gut our defense budget. Let me just say, I'm proud of how much those of you working in national security areas have done to ensure that the taxpayers get maximum value for every dollar spent. Even if the press doesn't give you the credit for finding flaws and correcting them, I do. So, keep up the good work. National defense, however, continues to be an expensive proposition. But let us never forget, keeping our country safe and secure is the foremost responsibility of the Federal Government. Let me pledge to you: We'll continue to trim wherever possible, but we'll never send those brave individuals who defend this country out in second-rate equipment. They'll have the weapons they need to do their vital jobs and to come home -- please God -- safely.

Now, if the Members of Congress cannot bring themselves to cut those areas of the budget that can be pruned without risking the safety of our country, let me do it. If they're afraid of the special interests, let me take the heat. We all know there are savings to be made if the political courage is there. As I requested in the State of the Union, let the Congress give me the line-item veto, and I'll make the cuts, I'll take the responsibility and the heat.

We're now entering a crucial time for our administration and for the future of our country. America's ingenuity and technological know-how is creating tremendous new potential. I'm proud, for example, that we have some of America's top scientific minds researching defensive systems that might someday help mankind leave behind the threat of nuclear devastation. Now, and for all their howling, the Soviets have been pursuing such research for years. We're not about to abandon the Strategic Defense Initiative.

And finally, there's one issue we will face in coming months which touches on both our ideals as free people and the security of our country. Today there are brave men and women fighting for their freedom and independence against great odds. In Afghanistan, in Angola, and in Nicaragua, lightly armed freedom fighters face Soviet tanks, artillery, and helicopter gunships. Edmund Burke, that great British statesman who championed the cause of American independence, once wrote, ``When bad men combine, the good must associate; else they may fall one by one . . . .'' Well, today, we cannot sit back and idly watch as the new imperialism grinds down courageous people fighting for their liberty. We must give those heroes what they need, not just to fight and die for freedom but to win for freedom.

And nowhere is this challenge more vital to our own security than in Central America. The Soviet Union has armed the Sandinista dictatorship to the teeth. The regime in Managua, almost immediately upon seizing power, started undermining its neighbors and suppressing the rights of its people at home. Those who've taken up arms against the Communists are fighting for the rights to speak and pray, to organize labor unions, to own land, and to direct the course of government through free elections. The choice is helping these freedom fighters or seeing a Communistic dictatorship established in the heart of Central America, another Cuba. The stakes are high. We must provide the Nicaraguan freedom fighters with what they need to bring democracy to their country.

Earlier, I quoted Adam Smith. Well, another great economist, Ludwig von Mises, once wrote, ``People must fight for something that they want to achieve, not simply reject an evil, however bad it may be.'' Well, today, we've captured the high ground because we have a plan for freer and a more prosperous tomorrow. All of us in this room are part of an historic tide that is rolling back statism and tyranny and expanding the boundaries of human freedom. Let us have the courage to live up to our ideals, the energy to reach our potential, and the commitment to do the job that has to be done.

As I stated in my message to the third Non-Proliferation Treaty Review Conference, my central arms control objective has been to reduce substantially, and ultimately to eliminate, nuclear weapons and rid the world of the nuclear threat. The prevention of the spread of nuclear explosives to additional countries is an indispensable part of our efforts to meet this objective. I intend to continue my pursuit of this goal with untiring determination and a profound sense of personal commitment.

Sec. 2. (a) Departments and agencies outside of the Executive Office of the President shall raise only matters of national defense or foreign relations in the course of the Presidential review established by this Order. All other matters, including those related to regulatory policy, shall be presented to the DOT in accordance with the procedures of the DOT.

Sec. 4. (a) In advising the President with respect to his review of a decision submitted to him pursuant to Section 801, departments and agencies outside of the Executive Office of the President shall identify with particularity the defense or foreign policy implications of the DOT decision which are deemed appropriate for the President's consideration.

Sec. 5. Individuals within the Executive Office of the President shall follow a policy of: (a) refusing to discuss matters relating to the disposition of a case subject to the review of the President under Section 801 with any interested private party, or an attorney or agent for any such party, prior to the President's decision; and (b) referring any written communication from an interested private party, or an attorney or agent for any such party, to the appropriate department or agency outside of the Executive Office of the President. Exceptions to this policy may be made only when the head of an appropriate department or agency outside of the Executive Office of the President personally finds, on a nondelegable basis, that direct written or oral communication between a private party and a person within the Executive Office of the President is needed for reasons of defense or foreign policy.

Sec. 7. This Order is intended solely for the internal guidance of the departments and agencies in order to facilitate the Presidential review process. This Order does not confer rights on any private parties.

Well, I hope that maybe some of you got a chance to see the State of the Union Address to the Congress Tuesday night. My message was that the state of the Union is good and getting better all the time. And I am really convinced of that after what I have seen in your laboratories and classrooms here this morning before I came in here. America is the ``A-Team'' among nations, bursting with energy, courage, and determination. We went through some bad times back in the 1970's, times when big government policies threatened to derail our country and our elected leaders seemed to have lost the way. The American people brought us back with pride and patriotism and with the bedrock American values of freedom, faith, and family. They put this country back on track, and we're charging full speed ahead. America holds the future in its grasp. And we're not letting go because the future belongs to the free. To paraphrase Tom Jefferson, we hold this truth to be self-evident, there never was a better time to be young, alive, and American.

On the way here today, I was thinking of the changes I've seen in my lifetime and how they'll be dwarfed by the advances that you'll see in yours. Believe it or not, I can remember my first ride in an automobile. Most of the time, it'd been horse and buggy. The horse was very fuel-efficient but kind of slow. [Laughter] If you wanted to supercharge one, you fed him an extra bag of oats. [Laughter] But I can remember back when I heard my first sound over radio, and I was just entering high school. And down by the river, where a young man with some of the same qualifications that you have, an experimenter, had built himself a little crystal radio set. There were no such things as factory-built radio sets. There was a station in Pittsburgh, the oldest in the Nation -- KDKA. And there we were out in Illinois, and finally, we'd walked all over town, several of us with him, while he fished around in the air with a hand-held aerial. And finally, we began to hear music, and it was this station in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania. And yet, you know, it was just about 8 or 9 years later that that industry progressed to the point that I got a job as a radio sports broadcaster. And there were institutions and programs and people known nationwide because of the tremendous impact and growth of radio -- and all in those few years.

Since then, the evolution of technology has become evermore rapid -- each step of the way -- making a better life for man on Earth. Medical technology is conquering one by one the diseases that have plagued mankind for centuries; biotechnology has invented new grains that are a winning weapon in the war against hunger. And as radio was to my youth, so computers and the information revolution will be to yours, opening up a seeming infinity of possibilities in your lives -- possibilities your parents never would have even dreamt of.

So, I was thinking of how far we've come in this journey and the future. And, at the same time, my thoughts returned to the tragic events of last week -- to our Challenger Seven who gave their lives so that we might reach for the stars. For all Americans, young and old, the loss of our astronauts was felt as a personal loss. We mourn their passing, and we'll continue to honor their memories in the way our astronauts would have wished -- by pressing on with their heroic example in our minds and perhaps a new appreciation of the sacrifice, courage, and faith that are the cornerstones of our free nation.

The truth is, uncommon valor is often a common virtue in this country of ours. America's the land of the free because she is the home of the brave. These United States are built on heroism and sustained and protected by it. We see it in the bravery of those defending our nation on the frontiers of freedom; the pilot landing high-performance fighter planes on the heaving deck of an aircraft carrier; the soldier on patrol on the Korean border, in Europe, or on a peacekeeping mission in the Middle East. We see heroism everyday here at home -- the policeman answering a call, not knowing what danger awaits him behind a closed door; the fireman pulling lives from the flames of a raging inferno; the doctors and nurses laboring late into the night under hospital lights; the social worker battling drugs and despair.

Not all of us are called upon in our daily professions to face danger and hardship. But each of us has the same responsibility as the hero to live our lives with honor and dedication, to give a hundred percent to the tasks before us, and to know that every day our efforts are building the edifice of freedom and powering the engines of human progress. And don't ever underrate yourself. Someone has said, ``Truly, the hero isn't braver than anyone else; he's just brave 5 minutes longer.'' So, whatever path you choose in life, whatever your calling, pursue it with your heart and soul. If you become an artist, disdain cynicism and have the courage to proclaim your faith. If you become an entrepreneur -- that's a French word for being in business on your own -- hold on tight to your vision, knowing that each setback is really one more step on the road to success. If you become a scientist, find joy in the process of discovery. Whatever path you choose, if it follows the light of hope, it will lead you confidently into the future.

You know, Tom Jefferson was a forward-looking fellow, and I'm sure he'd be proud of this school. Assistant Superintendent David Sawyer took me on a fascinating tour of your computer systems laboratory. He tells me you're thinking of building an artificial intelligence lab here. I sometimes thought we could use a little of that in Washington. [Laughter] He also told me about the other labs where many of you'll be learning the skills of this new technological era: biotechnology, optics, and telecommunications. Let's take a moment, too, to thank the businesses and private individuals who have worked as partners in education with Thomas Jefferson High School. Many of those businesses involved in building the technology laboratories will be sending their scientists, engineers, and technicians to help teach in the labs, making the students of Thomas Jefferson some of the best trained leaders of the 21st century.

A new universe of possibilities is opening up before your generation. And one of the most hopeful is that science may become the ally of peace. Advancing technology, which originally gave us nuclear weapons, may one day make them obsolete. The currents of progress are sweeping us on to safety. The technology to create a high-tech shield against nuclear missiles is advancing far more rapidly than we even dared hope 3 years ago when we first announced the program called the Strategic Defense Initiative. I promise you I'll do everything within my power to move forward with research and testing of a high-tech, nonnuclear defense system so that the world you raise your children in will be safe and secure and free from fear. Let's use the wonders of technology not to make war but to protect the peace.

It's no accident that America is blazing the trail of progress through the 20th century and leading the race to the future. We live in a country that encourages enterprise and rewards initiative, a country where everyone is free to contribute and all can benefit from the success of others. Our society is inventive because we're free, and prosperous because each individual is secure to gather and keep the fruits of his labor. If we're ever mindful of our enduring principles -- the natural rights to life, liberty, and property, spoken of in your Virginia Bill of Rights -- then America will always be the shining star among nations, leading the world on to a better tomorrow.

In my State of the Union Address, I mentioned another coming miracle of modern technology, a new hypersonic aerospace plane. I brought a model of that aerospace plane with me. This is truly the shape of things to come. I don't suppose that you could all see that very well, so I'll try to describe it for you. It looks a lot like the pictures of rocket ships that my 7-year-old grandson draws. For those more advanced in years, it'll remind you of something out of a Buck Rogers. And you might say it resembles a Concorde that's been straightened out and had its wings clipped. [Laughter] But it will make the Concorde seem slow. Taking off from a standing runway, it will cruise in the atmosphere at speeds of up to 25 times the speed of sound or fly into low-Earth orbit. The aerospace plane will be able to fly anywhere on the Earth in 3 hours or commute up to the space station that we will soon be building. And we should be conducting the preliminary test flights about the time the freshmen here graduate from college, toward the middle of the next decade.

Ms. Garcia. Thank you, Mr. President. I'd like to take just a moment here, if I may, to commend you for your farsighted leadership as demonstrated by your continued support of the space program. And, also, I would like to express my appreciation for your concern that you share with teachers all over America to provide the finest education possible for our young people.

It is a great honor for me to accept this model of the aerospace plane on behalf of Thomas Jefferson High School and School for Science and Technology. This model symbolizes the new and exciting challenges of the future which impact heavily on our present. Never before has science and technology evolved at such a pace, sometimes revealing answers to longstanding questions, but more often presenting us with ever greater mysteries to be solved and new worlds to be explored. For example, on January 24th, 1986, spacecraft Voyager passed by the planet Uranus, and in less than one-half a day we had learned more than astronomers had learned over a period of 200 years before.

The realm of human knowledge is expanding so rapidly that often our textbooks become obsolete before they leave the press. Never before in human history has the challenge to educators and students been greater or more critical. We, as a nation, are facing a serious dilemma. For although science and technology have progressed rapidly, the youth of our nation has slipped behind the young of other nations in preparing themselves in the areas of math and science.

We are now making conscientious efforts to remedy this very serious situation. But, as we do so, we must maintain a clear perspective of ourselves. We should encourage the study of science and math without neglecting the humanities. [Applause] Thank you. Our future in space and on the planet Earth will require ever-greater international understanding and cooperation. Already, other nations, such as Germany and Japan, are working with NASA as partners on the space station. On Earth, our aerospace plane will enable us to cross continents and oceans in just a couple of hours, bringing faraway countries ever closer to us. Indeed, teachers are being challenged as never before as our nation entrusts our most precious resource, our children, to our tutelage.

But the burden of education does not rest solely on the teacher. Christa McAuliffe often stated with great pride, ``I touch the future, I teach.'' I would like to leave the students here with this thought: As you learn, you build the future. Education is a partnership requiring responsibility, cooperation, and diligence from both the instructor and the student. And we must certainly not neglect the vital role parents play in the learning process as well.

The frontier of space beckons irresistibly to us to explore its planets and moons, to search for life in other solar systems, and to marvel as the secrets of the universe are revealed to us. The courage and the dedication of the Challenger crew of seven will serve to inspire and guide us as we continue their journey to the stars.

The President. I don't think that it is going to have any effect with regard to, for example, withdrawing of funds or not; and certainly, I will oppose and fight any effort to do that. I think you might all be interested to know that on the day of the tragedy, I phoned the families, all of them that were present on there. And without exception, all of those grief-stricken people that I talked to said to me: ``You must continue the program. This is the way they would have wanted it.'' And we are going -- it will be delayed for a while because of the investigation to make sure we don't have the same thing happen again, while we try to find out the cause of the accident. But, no, I'm going to continue to fight for funding our space program and going forward with the space station.

Q. Good afternoon, Mr. President. From your boyhood on into manhood, did you ever have dreams or ambitions of becoming President of the United States, or was your decision to go into politics a response to world affairs?

The President. I have to tell you that, no, I never thought about politics or anything. In those years, when I went from radio sports announcing to Hollywood and to motion pictures, I was very happy in my work. And if anyone had ever suggested to me that I would do this, I would have bet the house and farm I wouldn't. But I did always believe that you had to pay your way. And I've been blessed in a number of ways, and so -- in Hollywood, if you don't sing or dance, you wind up as an after-dinner speaker. [Laughter] And so I did that, and I always tried to campaign for candidates and causes that I believed in.

And I made a speech in behalf of a Presidential candidate [Barry Goldwater] that was broadcast nationwide in 1964. And the next thing I knew I was being assailed by people to run for Governor of California. And I thought they were wrong. And I told them over and over again, I'll campaign for someone else. And they kept insisting that I was the only one that could win for our party in that election. And finally, I began to think, well, if they're right and I'm wrong, will I ever be able to sleep again if I don't do it? So, Nancy and I spent some sleepless nights, and finally I said all right.

And, you know, looking back, I think that I said all right, thinking all I had to do was win the election and then that would be all over, and I'd go back to doing what I was doing. [Laughter] I found out I got the job. But I must say, after several months of that, we both looked at each other and said that this was the most exciting thing we'd ever done in our lives -- to not just be making an after-dinner speech about it, but to be dealing with the problems themselves. And so, I am most grateful that my course changed.

Q. Good afternoon, Mr. President. My name is Dawn Lee. The Constitution calls for the separation of church and state. In your State of the Union Address you proposed making prayer in schools legal. With so many different cultures and religions in our nation's public schools, how can you make prayer in schools legal?

The President. All right. Let me just say, and let me give you just an example that I happened to mention the other day. On that tragedy that happened last week, and that I mentioned, all over this country -- in city halls, in statehouses, in the offices of the Nation's Capital here -- people stopped and prayed for the seven who had lost their lives. And yet you, the young people in schools, were denied that privilege to do that in your own schools. I have never asked for a doctrinaire prayer or a school to dictate a prayer or how anyone would worship. I have simply said that I believe that students should have the right and privilege to voluntarily pray within school if they want to. And that's up to them, and no one that doesn't care to or whose religion is different -- they can pursue their own courses. But I don't think there should be anyplace in this nation where anyone is denied the right to appeal to whatever God they worship.

The President. Yes. I don't believe that this tragedy in any way should affect the policy that we had that space, if it is the last frontier, and it should not just be left to individuals -- scientists or career people who are going up there simply to explore in space.

Mr. Rumberger. Thank you, Mr. President, for your time. We realize you are running a little late and you have a State Department luncheon to attend. We have just two further presentations for you, sir.

Mr. Rumberger. Mr. President, you've honored us here today, and we thank you for coming to visit with us. On behalf of our students and our faculty, we have a gift to you. And Mr. Murphy and I would like to present that to you. And I'd like to read this to the audience so you'll know what we're giving the President. And it's a framed, inscribed quote from one of his old friends. It's Thomas Jefferson. And it says, ``I have long entertained the hope that this, our native state, would make an establishment where every branch of science deemed useful of this day should be taught in its highest degree.'' Presented to Ronald W. Reagan on the occasion of his visit to the Thomas Jefferson High School and the Thomas Jefferson High School for Science and Technology, February 7, 1986.

The President. May I just say a goodbye, and I know I'm late and I'm going to have to run, but I just want to tell you what this morning has meant to me in meeting all of you and seeing what you're accomplishing here. I am so much more optimistic about the 21st century than I was when I came here this morning -- and I was pretty optimistic then. And you have done that. And you've convinced me -- I'm going to stick around for a good part of that century. [Laughter] Thank you.

The business of America begins with small business -- millions of men and women, bold and imaginative self-starters, seizing opportunities and providing the jobs that help to ensure that our Nation will remain economically strong and free.

The flexibility of small business people is exemplified by their willingness to adapt to change, their determination to test untapped markets for new products and services, and their ability to contribute to the competitive marketplace in such a way as to improve efficiency, thus benefitting the consumer and spurring economic growth. Nothing characterizes the American economy better than our 14 million small businesses. They should be a source of pride for all Americans.

It is especially gratifying that in recent years greater numbers of young Americans are preparing for careers in independent business. Their innovative entrepreneurial spirit has brought a new excitement to the campus and to the marketplace. All Americans can take hope from their optimism, their creativity, and their impressive achievements.

This year, thousands of business owners will express their views at State preparatory sessions for the National White House Conference on Small Business -- an example of free enterprise at its best. The recommendations prepared by the delegates to the National White House Conference in August will help us in formulating a small business agenda designed to make sure that our economy continues to grow and to prosper. All Americans benefit when small business is the force behind a vigorous and expanding economy.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this seventh day of February, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

Today a three-judge panel of the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia upheld the validity of the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings act. As we had expected, however, the court found the sequester mechanism of Gramm-Rudman-Hollings unconstitutional. When I signed the bill last December, I expressed concern over the constitutional questions raised by this provision, which gave the Comptroller General power to exercise executive authority in calculating the deficits that trigger sequestration.

This court decision does not invalidate Gramm-Rudman-Hollings, nor does it diminish the determination of this administration -- or the responsibility of Congress -- to meet the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings targets for deficit reduction, targets set by Congress and agreed to by our administration. If the Supreme Court affirms this decision, there is a valid fallback provision in place whereby Congress is empowered to affirm the $11.7 billion automatic cut already agreed to in the FY 1986 sequester, and we would expect the Congress to live up to its responsibility. I also urge the Congress to go forward to meet the schedule and deficit targets for fiscal year 1987 and beyond.

No matter what the outcome of the current court arguments, I will continue, until the day I leave this office, to submit budgets that meet the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings targets. All we need to honor both the spirit and letter of Gramm-Rudman-Hollings is congressional action. This court ruling is no excuse for walking away from our responsibility to bring Federal spending under control. We made an agreement; let's live up to it. We've given the American people our word. We cannot let them down.

If you listened to my State of the Union Address this week, you heard what will be my number-one priority in the budget debate this year: to cut the fat out of the Federal budget and to stop anyone trying to cut the heart of your family budgets. As a matter of fact, I want the Federal Government to leave the family budget alone. As you may know, a law recently passed by Congress, Gramm-Rudman-Hollings, mandates steadily declining deficits each year. Currently, this law is being challenged in the courts. But whatever the outcome, we intend to go forward with our plan to bring the budget into balance by 1991 without undercutting the progress we've made in defense, without cutting Social Security or essential support programs, and without raising your taxes.

But a funny thing happened on the way to Capitol Hill. Those who've carped loudest about the need to cut deficits suddenly cried ``foul'' when confronted with real proposals to cut deficit spending and eliminate government waste. Think of it -- self-proclaimed deficit warriors saying that a nearly trillion-dollar budget, a sum too staggering to comprehend, more than double what government spent only 10 years ago, is so inadequate it would wreak havoc throughout the Nation.

So, once again, as they do year in and year out, they trot out their tired old litany: Tax increases are unavoidable. Well, is that so? Let me give you some facts about how a little cooperation and common sense can put us on a glide path to a balanced Federal budget without harming your family budgets or hurting any American truly in need of assistance. We begin with the projected deficit for fiscal year 1987 -- $182 billion. Under Gramm-Rudman-Hollings, we must reach a deficit target of 144 billion. So, that means we need to cut the deficit by $38 billion to get down to the 144 billion target.

Where will we get the 38 billion? Well, we're going to raise a portion by holding a little garage sale to get rid of some of our business ventures operating under government subsidies that are better left to the private sector. We're going to sell our train set, better known as Conrail. It's high time government got out of the railroad business, and that includes subsidies to Amtrak. We can no longer justify paying subsidies of about $33 for every passenger who boards an Amtrak train, or funding a system in which three-quarters of the stations board fewer than 50 passengers a day, or asking taxpayers to pay 25,000 employees who provide Amtrak services for only an average of 57,000 riders per day.

We're also going to raise some $2 billion in user fees, making sure government gets paid for government services when those services benefit special interests. For example, the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers spends almost $3 million every day to operate and improve our harbors and inland waterways, yet commercial cargo carriers pay only 10 percent of that cost. Contrary to what you've heard, defense is not off-limits. We're cutting $3 billion there; that's $3 billion below the level Congress agreed to in August.

The balance of deficit reductions we need to make to get down to $144 billion will come from $22 billion in program cuts. Now, 22 billion is a lot of money, but it's only about 2 percent of our total budget. Take out items we won't touch, such as Social Security and interest on the debt, and the cuts we're proposing come to about 5 percent of the remaining budget -- 5 cents on the dollar. That's what we're asking Congress to cut. If Congress can't cut 5 cents on a dollar, they should never again utter a word about budget deficits.

Let's face it, there's a ton of fat in this trillion-dollar government. I'm talking about government spending over $2 billion for a Los Angeles mass transit system, about as much as government could collect in revenue from all the individual income taxes paid in the State of Mississippi this year; or government spending $230 million a year for a job placement program that duplicates other programs and has failed to help workers adapt to a changing economic environment.

My fellow Americans, we're poised for an historic reversal against rising deficits. The collapse we're witnessing in oil prices will give America's economy a tremendous boost -- stretching your take-home pay further, reducing cost to industry, and making it easier for all to invest for our future. So, toss out conventional wisdom and get ready for a banner year. Already, unemployment is down to 6.6 percent, below our own projections for 1986. We're going to reach our deficit targets. We're going to preserve essential services and keep America strong. And we're not going to let anyone raise your taxes -- period.

Our nation has been richly blessed by its citizens of Chinese, Korean, and Indo-Chinese ancestry. Their contributions, in every field of endeavor, are playing a major, constructive role in the development and preservation of America's greatness. With one of the most ancient, venerable, and rich cultural legacies, Asian Americans preserve the wisdom of their forefathers, while working for the goals we all share for this great land.

America's true strength lies with its people, and the diverse origins of our citizens form a major part of that national asset. Liberty is rooted in tolerance and appreciation for the customs and values of others. Asian Americans uphold that creed by safeguarding a noble past rich in moral and cultural treasures. This year, in which heaven smiles on the builders, let us work together to build a better society for all Americans.

But age represents a certain fullness of human experience and brings its own advantages. In the office I hold, it helps to put into perspective not just the issues of the day but the march of the decades. When we first came to Washington in 1981, debate had been conditioned by the long, liberal experiment that began in the 1930's, the New Deal, the Great Society, the so-called War on Poverty -- which we lost. It had become a working assumption in this town that nothing of lasting value could be achieved without a further expansion of government, a further subsuming of the private lives of individuals and families into the vast programs of the social and economic planners. And I have often said that a government program once launched is the nearest thing to eternal life we'll ever see on this Earth.

But I happen to have been around too long to become enthusiastic about government growth. Of course I remember the government of the New Deal, but I remember an earlier America as well, an America in which the essentially private values of the individual, the family, and the community commanded the day. Taxes during my formative years were low. Indeed, the 1920's saw dramatic tax cuts, and government regulation of the economy was slight. As a result, through much of that period, the Nation experienced buoyant, good health; and throughout most of the twenties, the economy grew. Astonishing technological progress took place, including advances in the automobile, radio, and remarkable materials like plastics. Although the period is sometimes caricatured as a time of cultural intolerance, immigrants actually made tremendous advances in all walks of American life. Joseph Kennedy, son of an Irishman, founded his family's fortune. Sam Goldwyn, a Jew from Eastern Europe, started MGM; and, incidentally, all the stories about his malaprops are true, but he was a great producer and organizer.

And of course, it would be undesirable to go back to that era. Life then was simpler, but it was harder. And yet, when in the late seventies the liberal entertainment -- or experiment, I should say, had last wound down, when the ceaseless expansion of economic growth and weakness had ended -- or eroded our foreign policy, I believed it was time to return government to its few and legitimate duties, time to reassert private values and the importance of the family. In our first term, we cut taxes, and we started to rebuild our defenses. Today the economy has seen 38 months of growth, and as freedom movements in Nicaragua and elsewhere attest, there is new hope for the cause of liberty around the world. Now we must take the next steps, steps which I outlined in my State of the Union Address.

To end deficit spending, we must meet the limits set forth in the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings legislation. As you know, this legislation is being challenged in the courts. But whatever the outcome, we intend to go forward with our plan to bring the budget into balance by fiscal 1991. We must also give to the Presidency a line-item veto and pass a balanced budget amendment to the Constitution.

In defense, we must remain strong, refusing to undo all the progress that we've made during the past 5 years. And we must push forward with research and testing on the Strategic Defense Initiative. This initiative holds out perhaps the brightest hope of my lifetime -- the hope of making nuclear missiles obsolete.

A progrowth tax reform must be passed. And in view of the plight of the poor, especially the breakdown of the poor family, we must engage in a thorough reform of our welfare system. In our country today there are neighborhoods where the American trait of self-reliance has been blotted out by government dependency. There are city blocks where families have virtually no experience of fathers, just of mothers struggling alone in poverty to raise their children. As I said in the State of the Union Address, we must reform welfare to provide real and lasting emancipation, because the success of welfare should be judged by how many of its recipients become independent of welfare.

I know I've got only a few minutes left, but I can take a few questions. And if you don't mind, before your hands, there's one someplace over there in the room that I'm going to call on. There's a young man from Clearwater High School who had a date with me for an interview last July, and then, I don't know, they started doing some cutting up over at Bethesda, and we had to cancel it. I think if Scott McQuigg is here we'll give him the first question. Scott?

Q. Thank you, Mr. President. I'm from the Nickelodeon Kid's Network. And you spoke quite a bit about the future in your State of the Union Address. We were wondering what your thoughts were when you were a teenager growing up in the 1920's, what your thoughts were about the future, and what advice you would give to young people today about the future that could possibly hold nuclear war, living in outer space, and the loss of natural resources. What would your thoughts and advice be to young people?

The President. Well, my advice would be that you stick to your dreams and determine that you're going to make them come true. Yes, when I was growing up back in that period -- and I have to tell you, I make no apology for our generation. Very few generations in all history have presided over a transition, and the generation of which I am a member has been one of those generations. I can remember my first automobile ride; up until then it was horse and buggy. And I can remember when radio first came into being and things of this kind. But from that, within a single lifetime, all the way to a man on the Moon and the other things that we're doing out there -- you will see things in your lifetime greater than we've ever seen that we can't imagine, but I don't think you will span quite a change that we did.

No, when we were young and growing up in the twenties, everything was going great. It was in the aftermath of World War I. I was young enough to remember that war. We remembered it and all and the horror of it, and we believed the thing that there must never be another such war, that we'd fought the war to end wars. So, your dreams and your ambitions centered on where you wanted to go and what you wanted to do with your life. Then, of course, came that black October Friday, 1929, and I was just entering college at the time. And as I said here at our own table, no one who didn't live through it can ever quite imagine the experience of the Great Depression and what it was like: 25 percent of your work force unemployed, and at that time there had never been any such things as unemployment insurance or welfare programs or anything. The Nation was caught in an era where suddenly they had these great problems thrust upon them and had to do something almost of an emergency nature to take care of it.

The Department of Energy has decided that a way station for spent nuclear fuel elements would be very helpful toward solving these waste problems. They picked our community as a location for it. A citizens group of our community and our city government is all in favor of this facility, but the Governor of our State says that we can't have it because it will blight our area. Now, the Congress will ultimately decide, but I wonder what your position might be relative to this facility?

The President. Well, we have a necessary problem, and I know that, you know, everyone is going to say, ``Do it in somebody else's backyard, not ours.'' And I know that part of this is because in the beginning we didn't understand all the ramifications, so we did things carelessly -- not knowing we were being careless -- that resulted in ultimate tragedy. Those who had to do with the beginning of the x ray later died of the effects that they did not know, things that were being done to them.

But I would think today we know we have this problem; we know we have a technology that we've never had before. And I think that we can guarantee that every precaution will be taken so that this will not become a hazard to anyone. And we have to recognize that this must be disposed of, and at the same time that I think our high technology goes forward that we will probably develop ways in which we can do better than just throwing it away in a wastepile. But I would have to say that we've got to have the confidence someplace along the line that we know enough now that we're not going to make this hazardous threat to any section of the country. But some places are the ones that we're going to have to pick.

Q. And I want to ask you a question relating to the Coast Guard, which is very important to our area -- [inaudible]. Under Gramm-Rudman the Coast Guard is going to suffer major cutbacks, under your budget as well. And, now, when the shuttle exploded, it was the Coast Guard that went out there and did the work. Where the Trident submarine is manufactured -- [inaudible] -- in our hometown, also the Coast Guard is the one that sweeps the harbor for mines. If you're going to cut back on their budget, they are going to cut back on boats, and they're not going to be able to protect our harbors the way that boaters, which still need -- [inaudible] -- the way that our submarines and our commercial harbors need to be protected. I'd like to know your opinion on perhaps maintaining the Coast Guard budget where we can keep them?

The President. We're not going to let that kind of a setback or cutback come to the Coast Guard. Remember that part of the budget that we're presenting is based on not only cutting of costs where we can but also in some additional revenue by way of -- not taxes -- but by way of things that we believe where there should be fees, rather than the taxpayers bearing a certain thing -- the beneficiaries of certain services -- fees. And I can assure you, we have no intention of gutting the Coast Guard.

And I have to tell you that there is, among my military aides now, is a Coast Guard Commander; and she is not only the first member of the Coast Guard that's ever been a Presidential military aide, she's also the first woman that has ever been a military aide. And the other day I was teasing her a little bit about something to do with the Navy and my having come from a meeting with an admiral, and I loved her answer. She said, ``In the Coast Guard, we consider we're the unit around which the Navy gathers in times of emergency.'' [Laughter] We're not going to do that. And a lot of this that you're hearing about the budget -- people are saying it who haven't even read the budget yet.

The President. Well, I think any of us would be concerned. On the other hand, all we can do -- and I'm not going to really comment in detail on the evidence of that, because we do have our observers who are coming back, Senator Lugar and his aides, and I will be meeting with them -- they should be getting in sometime tonight -- as soon as I can for whatever evidence they have. But I think that what we have to watch for is that, in spite of all these charges, there is, at the same time, the evidence of a strong two-party system now in the islands, and we certainly are accustomed to that. We want to help in any way we can. That, once the election is over, that the results of the election then go forward and that the two parties can come together to make sure the government works, and that we can retain the historic relationship that we've had with the Philippine people and the Philippine Islands. But actually, the election -- that is for the people of the Philippines to decide and not for us to interfere.

The President. Well, I'm not technologically gifted in that way. I haven't even been able to learn to use a pocket calculator yet. [Laughter] But I do know that there are some things in high technology that we must guard and that we cannot allow to be revealed where they would have a military use and could be put to work that way. And as long as we're still trying to reduce arms in the world, and when we get to the point that -- if we can get to it where we have an agreement and we begin to eliminate arms and know that this might be some evidence that we can continue to exist in the world peacefully, then we might be able to change our attitude. But right now we've seen the results of some thievery of our high-tech secrets. I think we have to use restraint in how available we make them.

The President. No. There are simple answers to a great many things that we've made unnecessarily complicated, but they're not easy, as our effort to get this present budget indicates. Right now with this budget and all the abuse that it's receiving and having signed it -- and I know how thick it is -- I have to believe that a lot of the people that are criticizing it haven't read it. But here is a budget that is almost a trillion dollars. And the total cut of that budget that we're asking for is about 2\3/4\ percent. Now, don't tell me that there isn't any business or household budget or anything else that can't find 2\3/4\ percent fat that can be done away with.

But I do believe that, for example, we've complicated the whole field of social reforms for the needy -- complicated it by a variety of programs, tried to keep too much management in the hands of Washington over this whole vast diversified country, instead of giving much more ability to determine how the programs run at the local and State level. And the result is that we've created problems -- when I made the crack in my remarks that poverty lost -- or poverty won in our programs. The whole system seems to have resulted now in people into the third and fourth generation of being on welfare.

And to me, it is a simple answer to say let's evolve a welfare plan that is aimed at salvaging people and making it unnecessary for them to be on welfare, and then be able to boast at the end of each year how successful the program had been by how many fewer people had to be there. And I think of that as a simple answer. Any one of us, if we had a neighbor and had fallen on hard times or something, yes, we'd help them. We'd probably help with food and whatever was necessary. But at the same time, our main effort would be directed at how can we get them back on their feet so we don't have to continue doing this. And I think that most of the people on welfare want just that. They would like nothing better than to be independent and out on their own.

The President. Well, I am quite sure that -- I don't know about you -- but, knowing about the White House press corps, I'm quite sure nobody would ever let me forget it. So -- [laughter] -- but, yes, if we can come up with a system that does that, if we can come up with a system -- we tried an experiment when I was Governor in California -- I know this is my last go-round, and I know you're getting impatient here and -- and finally all we could get was permission from Washington for an experiment, and that in only part of our State. They wouldn't let us do it in the two big cities, San Francisco and Los Angeles, but we could do it -- 35 of our counties. And it was a program simply to let able-bodied -- or make able-bodied welfare recipients work in return for their welfare grant. Now, it didn't cost an extra penny.

We then sent to these 35 counties and to the communities therein a request; and we said, submit to us a list of the things that you would be doing if you had the money and the manpower. No boondoggles. So, we got back from each one of them lists of things that sounded pretty sensible that would be nice if somebody could do this for the government or the community. And we okayed these and said, ``The money's already there in welfare, and you're going to have the manpower.'' And then we ordered these welfare recipients in each county to report for work at these various projects. So we wouldn't conflict with minimum wage, they only had to work 24 -- or 20 hours a week, not 40. But the other 20 hours had to be spent in either looking for private employment or taking job training and improvement.

Then we assigned some people from our Labor Department, gave them each a list of these people. And they were to watch them and what they were doing and see how fast they could move them out of those jobs into private enterprise jobs. And in the midst of the 1973 - 74 recession, we put 76,000 welfare recipients into private enterprise jobs through that program. Didn't cost an extra penny to anyone.

And the other gain that we made was we did find that in any great government program -- you know, as Milton Friedman, the economist, said, if you start paying people to be poor, you're going to have a lot of poor people. And we found that thousands of people who'd gotten the order to report for work never showed up, and we stopped their welfare checks. And we never had a single complaint. And the only thing I can conclude is that some people were collecting under more than one name, and when they had to show up in person, they couldn't do it. And they didn't dare complain then, when we cut off their checks. So, the savings was double.

The President. I know, and I think maybe from the tone of your voice I feel that -- [laughter] -- I feel the same way. I was kind of sorry when I saw California do that. It was talked about when I was there and was Governor. And call me a prude if you want to, but I just think that there's something a little bit undignified in appealing to people's desire to gamble of a State to raise its revenues, and it ought to be able to raise them the legitimate way. I have to tell you I don't exactly like the idea of government engaging in gambling.

Q. Yes, mine's very short, mine's very short. I come from Spokane, Washington. There's a significant gypsy population in our area. They understand that you have 10 appointments to make to the Holocaust Council, and they're asking if a gypsy, who's never been on the Holocaust Council before, if a gypsy might be appointed among one of the 10 appointments that you have now?

The President. Let me look into that. I never thought of it, because you're absolutely right that the gypsies were as persecuted as any people were by the Nazis in World War II. They were almost totally victims of the Holocaust. Let me look into that. I will.

Well, I want to thank Secretary Shultz and Assistant Secretary Keyes for hosting this reception and all of you for coming by this evening. And I can't tell you how much fun it is to spring this little surprise on Maureen. [Laughter] Some of you may think it a little unfair to catch her off guard like this, but I can assure you I'm only returning a favor she's been doing for me all my life. [Laughter] The truth is, Maureen's been surprising me and making me very proud for a very long time.

Well, those of us here today do know Maureen. At State, you know her by the wonderful job she did do in Nairobi. You know how effectively she worked to get agreement on the consensus document that would make the conference the success that it was and bring the American delegation the credit it deserved. And you know, too, that she'll do a fine job as our Representative to the U.N. Commission on the Status of Women.

And, of course, for Nancy and me, Maureen is someone we love dearly and yet someone whom we also recognize as the extraordinary individual that she is. And that isn't all that easy. As I said, it's always a little bit of a surprise for a father, just as it was that night in Detroit, to realize that that's your daughter up there on the TV screen, not only a grown woman -- and I'm not that old yet -- [laughter] -- but a leader, a mover, someone who is making the world a whole lot better place to live.

But all these things Maureen is, and that's why Nancy and I and all of you love her for it. So, I want to thank Maureen today as her father for making me so proud of her on this occasion and so many others. But also as her President, I want to thank her on behalf of the American people for distinguished service to her country and the cause of human freedom and dignity.

Q. Mr. President, thank you for this interview. In view of what Mr. Gorbachev said to Senator Kennedy, as it's been reported, what do you think the prospects are this year for an agreement with the Soviets on an intermediate-range missile agreement?

The President. Well, I'm very hopeful that we can come to some agreement. This idea of separating out the intermediate-range weapons is, we think, a hopeful sign. And now he has not made the SDI any condition with regard to that. There are some other things in that that are, well, that are going to cause us to negotiate that we hope can be eliminated. One, he's kind of made the French and the English an element, and we don't think that we're in a position to negotiate for somebody else. And also, the problem of the same kind of intermediate-range weapons being stationed east of the Urals, targeted on Asian targets. And these are the points that have to be worked out, but I'm just optimistic that since we've opened that subject and have made some progress on it that we can achieve that.

Q. The suggestion of that story was that Gorbachev seemed to be saying that he didn't want to have a summit this year unless there was a prospect for a tangible agreement. What's your assessment of that? Is he trying to get out of a summit some way?

The President. I can't believe that about him. He was so willing for it, and even then he made the proposal that we have one in '87 in his country, which we agreed to. So, no, I just -- I have to believe that he's expressing the hope -- and we are, too. I would hope that we could make some progress without waiting for the next summit.

The President. Well, we hope that it can be one of those dates -- the earlier date -- because of our election. It's going to be, I think, not too easy for us if we get closer to and get into the campaigning season and so forth and are trying to have a summit. They made one suggestion of a later date, but they haven't pursued it at all. And we've told them why we didn't feel we could do that.

The President. Well, whether he dropped it or whether he never intended it to be there -- because you'll remember the language that they agreed to in the agreement was something about seeking an interim agreement while we go forward with the other interim agreement on the intermediate range. So, maybe he's just now confirming that he meant this all the time. But it is progress in our eyes.

The President. I don't see how they could go on permanently without having some aid, particularly in the face of the extensive aid that they're getting from the Soviet Union and Cuba with regard to advanced weapons systems and so forth. They've got to be able to protect themselves.

Q. Some of your own allies in Congress say that it would be better to take the military aid question up or down rather than just let the freedom fighters wither on the vine with just nonlethal aid. Do you share that view, and are you going to go all out in this?

The President. No, I don't think it has to at all. I think -- and this is what the Contadora process is aiming at -- is what we suggested a year ago, just about a year ago now. And that is that the Sandinista government and their former allies, who are now the contras, who fought the revolution against Somoza, that they come together with the church acting as a mediator; they have an armistice and come together and negotiate out how they can arrive at a consensus government that will be what they actually fought the revolution for.

Remember that they appealed to the Organization of American States for help back when they were fighting against Somoza. And they got the help they asked for, which was a request for Somoza to step down so the killing could stop -- and he did. But in return for that, they had given a program to the OAS of what their goals were, and it was democracy; it was a pluralistic government and human rights taken care of and freedom of the press and speech and labor unions and so forth. The Sandinistas then seized the revolution and took it away from the others. And they have turned it into the totalitarian state that it is. But I think that the Sandinistas also are being hard pressed because this thing that has been going on has given them great economic problems. And they are totally dependent on the Communist bloc for their survival.

Q. Mr. President, on Haiti -- your spokesman -- there's been some talk about what's happened down there. Do you have any ideas about how to better bring across a democratic transformation, and do you plan to resume aid to Haiti that was withheld because of human rights violations?

The President. Well, this group that now -- this council that has stepped in has made it plain that they -- what they want to do is make it possible now to have a government. In other words, they don't view themselves as the government. They're an interim force, and they want to now establish democracy and a government that represents the will of the people. And we're perfectly willing and ready to help in any way we can to bring that about. And, as I say, we're ready to work with them and do what we can to be of help.

Q. On the question of the Philippines, officials in your government have called for both sides in the Philippine Government to work together now after the election. And you just said a few minutes ago in your response to a question that this validates the two-party system there. How do you want them to work together? Do you want them to form a coalition government? And what do you have in mind?

The President. Oh, no, I would think we have the same thing in our own country. We have a strong two-party system here, and the people make their decision at the ballot box on which of the -- which party or members of the party get elected or not. And I would foresee that, now that there really is a two-party system -- obviously proven with millions of people going to the polls and voting on both sides, that this is the beginning of what could be the answer to their form of government.

The President. Well, I'm going to wait until I have a chance to talk to our observers who are over there. I haven't as yet. Whether there is enough evidence that you can really keep on pointing the finger or not, I don't know. I'm sure, you know, even elections in our own country -- there are some evidences of fraud in places and areas. And I don't know the extent of this over there -- but also do we have any evidence that it's all been one-sided, or has this been sort of the election tactics that have been followed there? But what we want is -- once the Filipino people have made their decision and a government has been chosen, then we would like to have the same relationship, the historic relationship we've had with the people of the Philippines and with their government.

Q. If I could turn to domestic subjects -- the budget. Your former Budget Director, David Stockman, said recently that the deficit wasn't only caused by big-spending liberal Democrats but by Republicans as well, including yourself. Now, you've been President for 5 years, and under you the deficit has doubled. What's your response to Stockman's comment?

The President. Well, my memory doesn't track with his; because every year that I've been here, we have tried to get the elimination of some programs, reduction of others, putting together of programs. If we had gotten what we asked for in 1981 with regard to the domestic budget, the deficit would be $50 billion less than it is right now.

So, all this talk that we did this -- and all those years back over the last half-century when I was making speeches about deficit spending and all -- the truth of the matter is, deficit spending was a deliberate practice of the party in power. And the party in power, which has been there for all of those years, was -- only here and there, one and two terms out -- was the Democratic Party. And beginning with the War on Poverty in the middle sixties and on, this was where the runaway that we'd always talked about -- I've always said that it couldn't -- that and inflation. You couldn't let them go on without having them break the bounds and start running away.

Q. With all due respect, sir, every year you've been in office, you've proposed a plan -- 5-year plans. I recall the first one in your speech in Chicago in 1980, in September, saying we'd get to zero, and we haven't. Why should people be any more confident we're going to get there now after 5 years in office when the situation has gotten worse?

The President. I know you gentlemen have delighted in writing in that ever since, frequently. The truth of the matter is, long before the election, I had made public the fact that the plan would not work at the time that I said it would because of the rapid change here, in the economic situation, in Washington -- the runaway inflation, the runaway interest rates, all of those things starting. And suddenly the economists, who had helped me and given me this plan, said, ``No, it can't do it now, it's got to take longer than that.'' But we stuck to the same plan, and now for 38 months we have had the greatest recovery that we've ever had in the last 50 years. And so, I have to think that the plan wasn't at fault.

Q. But, Mr. President, during this period Congress has repeatedly not done what you've asked on domestic spending, and we -- as a result, we have this very big deficit. Why is there any reason to think that Congress is going to do something differently this time when for 5 years, when you've been a popular President, they haven't?

The President. Because they realize now that the explosion has occurred, that the deficit has been institutionalized. It is a part of the whole system of the way the Government was set up, as is explained by those figures of a 5-times increase in the budget but 38-times increase in the deficit. Now I think they are aware. There isn't anyone up there that is advocating deficit spending. They are all talking that the deficit must be curbed.

The only argument now is, which way? And they would like to do it in two ways that I think are ducking their responsibility, and that is to eliminate our defense buildup -- and the buildup wouldn't have been necessary if they had been doing what they should have been doing in the years before we got here -- eliminating that, and increasing taxes -- and they refuse to look at the fact that every time in modern history here that we have reduced the rates, government revenues and prosperity have increased. And every time you raise the taxes, you threaten another recession and the end of our recovery. And this is the only -- main arguments they are giving us against our proposal for the budget.

Q. If I can take up on that, your own polls show on defense that a majority of Americans think Pentagon spending is about where it should be. How do you plan to overcome public skepticism and some on Capitol Hill to win approval of this defense budget request at the same time you say that defense spending has brought the Soviets to the bargaining table?

The President. Because the people have been hearing a drumbeat, a constant drumbeat of propaganda about defense scandals and defense spending and that it is all wasted and so forth. And there's only one way left. We're going to go direct to the people and tell them them the truth.

There wasn't any $600 toilet seat. And all those cartoons that run every other week in the paper with [Secretary of Defense] Cap Weinberger and a toilet seat around his neck -- that's the same price that TWA and Delta and United pay. It is a molded cover for the entire toilet system. And, yes, it does cost about that much.

But there's the third one, the $6,000 coffeemaker. Again, that's the same thing that is in all the great commercial transports. And we're having it made for our planes that would carry 365 servicemen. They might be up there for 10 hours in flight, and it's an entire hot-cooking system. And actually we're getting it for a little bit less than the commercial airlines are paying.

Q. Well, even if that's been -- those have been exaggerated, do you think that Secretary Weinberger has done all that he could do to cut inefficiency at the Pentagon? You've got a commission that you appointed. Apparently, you must think there's something more to be done than what Cap's done.

The President. No, for one thing -- one of the reasons that we appointed that commission was -- yes, Cap has been busy and has known there are reorganizing things that have to be done. And he's been working at that and made great progress. You'd be amazed at ships that are coming in -- and planes and so forth -- ahead of schedule and under budget, rather than having an overlay. But we decided that in the face of this propaganda there was only one answer: Bring in an outside commission and let them look at the whole thing and then come back and tell us, and tell publicly, what they have found. Now, I'm quite sure that they will come in with some recommendations of changes that could be made, maybe organizationally. But I'm also confident that they will help us in trying to make the people understand. I'm sure that they will come in with an honest account of what has been accomplished.

Now, right now, the budget we're asking for in defense for '87, that budget is below the projection that President Carter had made as to what the military budget would require in 1987. And we're below that level. We have made -- over a 5-year period, the savings that we are making will result in $295 billion less than the bill would be if the things hadn't been done that Secretary Weinberger has done already.

The President. No, I don't. I think that whatever he does is being viewed by many as all a part of that. Many of the things that he's done, he's done every year for the last 5 years -- like certain annual things where he has appeared. And then suddenly, for the first time he gets hailed and that this he's doing, and how come he is going to speak to this group and so forth. And as I say, he's been speaking to them every year.

The President. You see, that's what's wrong with having a 22d amendment. Everybody automatically, the minute the '84 election is over, everybody starts saying what are we going to do in '88, and focusing a spotlight on them. No, I think that it's almost forced on anyone if they're interested in that direction, but I don't know what we can do to change it.

The President. No. No President can ever come out for -- with himself in mind. I think it's got to be held for whoever's going to be the next President. But I do think this: that we ought to take a serious look and see if we haven't interfered with the democratic rights of the people. They can elect a Senator for 40 years or a Congressman -- something of this kind -- for as long as they want to. Why don't they have the right to vote for whoever they want to vote for?

The President today spoke by telephone with Prime Minister Shimon Peres [of Israel], Anatoly Shcharanskiy, and Mrs. Shcharanskiy, who had just arrived at the airport in Tel Aviv. The call lasted 8 minutes, 1:08 p.m. to 1:16 p.m. The President told Prime Minister Peres he was very pleased over the releases, noting that Chancellor Kohl [of the Federal Republic of Germany] played a key role in putting together this exchange. He added that we will not stop pressing for improvements in the situation of Soviet Jews, including emigration rights.

On behalf of the American people, the President expressed to Dr. Shcharanskiy delight over the release and that he had joined his wife in Israel. The President commended his courage and fortitude as symbols of the human will for freedom, adding that his many long years of imprisonment and suffering had been painful for all who care about human rights. The President concluded by saying he would continue his own efforts and those of the Government to support human rights in the Soviet Union and elsewhere.

The Philippine elections have captured the attention of the American public. At times we need to remind ourselves that this is a Philippine election, not an American election. Yet our interests are deeply affected by these elections -- by the results, by the deficiencies of the process, and by what all this means for the future.

The political process in the Philippines continues; further, it does not end with this election. Our task for the future is to help nurture the hopes and possibilities of democracy, to help the people of the Philippines overcome the grave problems their country faces, and to continue to work for essential reforms. To help advise me on how the United States can best pursue that task and to assess the desires and needs of the Filipino people, I am asking Ambassador Philip Habib to travel to the Philippines to meet with the leaders of both political parties, with church and government officials, and with representatives of private sector groups.

Americans can never be indifferent to events in the Philippines. Our two countries have too much at stake for that. Our national interests converge. Our peoples bear genuine affection toward each other. Most important, our peoples share democratic aspirations. Those ties between our peoples will endure.

Burn injuries are one of the leading causes of accidental death in the United States. Every year, approximately two million people in this country are victims of burn injury and about twelve thousand of these victims die.

It is estimated that approximately 75 percent of all burns could be prevented by proper education of children and adults. Therefore, it is appropriate that all Americans have called to their attention the risks from burn accidents and the importance of burn prevention programs.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this eleventh day of February, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

In 1986, the United States celebrates the twentieth anniversary of the establishment of the National Endowment for the Humanities. The overriding goal of this small but important Federal agency is the promotion of humanities scholarship and programming.

The study of the humanities increases our understanding of the great traditions of civilization and of the intellectual heritage of mankind. In partnerships with State and local governments, private foundations, and corporations, the National Endowment for the Humanities, over the past two decades, has provided critical leadership and direction for both individuals and institutions seeking to improve our understanding of the humanities.

As a Nation, we have benefitted from the fruits of this humanities programming in a variety of ways: through improvements in humanities education at all levels; through scholarly research at the cutting edge of contemporary issues in the humanities; and through programs and projects in museums, libraries, and the media that foster a heightened understanding of the humanities across America.

The President. I have a brief statement here. We have, as you know, sent our budget to the Congress, and it's a fair and responsible budget and clearly does the job of putting America on course to a balanced budget through steadily declining deficits as mandated by the new Gramm-Rudman-Hollings law. Now, last Friday a three-judge panel of the Federal District Court issued a ruling against a portion of Gramm-Rudman-Hollings. We await a final Supreme Court decision, but nothing the Court says should or will remove our obligation to bring overspending under control. Congress shares that obligation. It must meet its responsibility to reduce deficit spending and pass a budget resolution by April 15th.

For our part, we have met the targets for lower deficits, but not by cutting Social Security or essential support for low-income persons and not by gutting defense or raising taxes on the American people. We mean to cut unessential spending out of the Federal budget, and we mean to leave family budgets alone. All told, our budget meets the deficit targets in part by cutting about 5 percent from domestic programs. That's 5 cents on the dollar, and that's what we're asking Congress to cut. If Congress can't do that much, well, then they should at least give me a line-item veto, because I'll make the cuts and get the job done. Let's be frank: Those who say that our budget is DOA, dead on arrival, are really saying, ``Brace yourself for a tax increase.'' I think taxpayers want Congress to get its own house in order. I do, too. So, rest assured that any tax increase sent to me will be VOA, veto on arrival.

Q. Mr. President, the observers you sent to the Philippines have just returned with reports that they witnessed fraud and violence. Doesn't this undermine the credibility of the election and strengthen the hand of Communist insurgence on the island?

The President. Well, Mike [Mike Putzel, Associated Press], I am not going to comment on this process, just as they are not going to render an official report, until the counting has finally been finished. I don't think it would be proper to do so. Yes, they told me in just an interim few remarks and made it plain that they're not going to issue the official report yet. But they told me that there was the appearance of fraud and yet, at the same time, said that they didn't have any hard evidence beyond that general appearance. So, we're going to wait. We're neutral. And we then hope to have the same relationship with the people of the Philippines that we've had for all these historic years.

The President. Well, I think that we're concerned about the violence that was evident there and the possibility of fraud, although it could have been that all of that was occurring on both sides. But at the same time, we're encouraged by the fact that it is evident that there is a two-party system in the Philippines and a pluralism that I think would benefit their people. And we're glad to see that particular thing happen, and we'll wait until we hear the outcome.

Q. Mr. President, in the sixties you opposed all civil rights legislation, but more recently you said that you were a part of the Martin Luther King revolution. If that is the case, why is your administration so bent on wiping out the flexible hiring goals for blacks, minorities, and women? And I'd like to follow up.

The President. Helen, we're not wanting to do that. But we have seen in administering these programs, we've seen that the affirmative action program was becoming a quota system. Now, I've lived long enough to have seen quotas when they were employed long before there was a civil rights movement, when they were employed in my youth to definitely discriminate and use the quota as a means of discrimination. And, therefore, we feel that, yes, we want affirmative action to continue. We want what I think Martin Luther King asked for: We want a colorblind society. The ideal will be when we have achieved the moment when no one -- or when nothing is done to or for anyone because of race, differences, or religion, or ethnic origin; and it's done not because of those things but in spite of them.

The President. I didn't think I'd be President today when I was born or for a great many years afterward. But, Helen, no, whatever the law may say -- and I know what Hubert Humphrey said about it, and this is what we're talking about -- we were talking about the practice.

The President. Not individually and personally, no. But we find down there at the bureaucracy level and out there actually in personnel offices and so forth, they choose the easy course -- set down a system of numbers and say, ``Well, we'll go by that.'' And this is what we're trying to correct.

So, now wait a minute. If you'll let me, please, do something I haven't done before. But just recently a group of newcomers to your ranks came into the Oval Office, and I met them. And I thought that since they are newcomers, at least just as a representative here to start with, let me call on a couple of those. I don't even know where you're sitting. Maybe you didn't have your hands up or not. But just two of them, and then we'll go on with the regular hands up.

The President. Well, I have to admit that -- and, you know, it isn't an easy -- the tools aren't that sharp that you can maintain the money supply exactly where you want it all the time. And it is true that recently it got above their own bracket, their own line of where they wanted to keep the increase. And, sure enough, you saw a couple of percentage points on the low side of the period added to what has been well under 4 percent inflation rate. So, I think this is what they were referring to; we've got to keep our eye on that and keep it there as much as we can.

Q. Mr. President, in your State of the Union Message last week, you said that we need welfare reform and that the true test of a welfare system is one in which people get off of welfare. And the day after you said that, the Governor of Massachusetts was in town to talk about a program in his State which has taken 23,000 people, trained them in jobs, and taken them off welfare. That program and others like it in other States have been made possible by a Federal program: Work Incentive. Now, the next day, on Wednesday, your budget recommended abolishing this program. And I'd like to ask you why that is.

The President. Well, I don't think that that program was really the manner -- or the way by which the States were doing that. You see, what those States are doing, and what [Massachusetts] Governor Dukakis is doing in his State, is what we did in California as part of our welfare reforms way back when I was Governor there. And when I got here, I had our people start informing the States of this.

We were allowed an experiment at that time. We could only do it in 35 counties. And the Department, then, in Washington refused to allow us to do it in San Francisco and Los Angeles Counties. But what we did was submit a questionnaire to these 35 counties, to the communities in the counties; and we said, would they send us a list of the things that they would be doing if they had the manpower and the money -- useful things? And we got quite a list and few, if any, boondoggles. We crossed them out when there were some. And then we said okay, you've got the manpower and the money. We are going to order able-bodied welfare recipients to report for these useful jobs. No more money to be spent; it was the same money. They're doing it in return for their welfare grants. And then at the same time, well, we only had them work 20 hours a week so we wouldn't be violating any minimum wage requirements. We said the other 20 must be spent either in job training or job hunting. And we assigned job agents to these people. Each one of them had a list of names to watch these people, and they were doing these community chores.

And we funneled through that program and into private enterprise jobs, not 23,000 -- 76,000 people. And this was during the recession of '73 and '74. And when we got here to Washington, we said it worked so well there, and let's see if there aren't going to be other States that would be interested in it. But it's just the plain welfare grant that makes this possible for others to do.

Q. Mr. President, if I could follow up. This program, which is administered by the Labor Department, provides job training funds. And the Massachusetts program has found that for every dollar that's spent, the Government gets $2 back in welfare savings. And it seems to have been a success. The Labor Department says it has been, and yet you've recommended it be canceled. And it seems to fly in the face of your stated purpose in your State of the Union Message.

The President. But we are keeping the program, the partnership program in partnership with local governments and the private sector train for jobs that are going begging in that particular area. There's not much point in going into an area and training people for jobs that aren't available. But you only have to look at the Sunday papers -- and I've mentioned it before -- the help wanted ads to find out that there are employers that are having trouble finding employees. And so we're training for that specific thing. And it has the highest job placement record of any of the employment programs the Government has ever tried.

Q.  --  -- but I will ask you, if I can, about your statement on taxes. Your budget calls for cuts in domestic programs. You call them nonessential, but, well, a lot of people don't agree with you. You're calling for cuts in education, in school lunches, other nutrition programs. You're calling for cuts in student aid. The question is: Why won't you accept something like an oil import tax -- or an oil import fee, that would not disturb your basic tax cut for the individual, in order to save some of these programs that so many Americans do consider essential?

The President. Well, I don't think that we're cutting the essential parts. No one looks far enough to see that the small amount of the cuts is in what could be called the area of fat that's in administration. No level of government has the high-cost administration than the Federal Government. At every echelon of government, where they perform a program for the people, the percentage of the dollar that goes to administer that program is less at the community level, a little higher at the county level, a little higher at the State level, and tremendously higher at the Federal level. Now, if we can eliminate some fat; we can handle this. But, also, you don't bat a thousand percent in making sure that everyone is deserving. For example, in programs such as the aid to college students, we find students that are getting this aid and their families are in an income tax bracket that -- or a tax bracket -- income bracket that, really, there's no reason or excuse for them to be getting Federal help.

Q. But, sir, you know that many people refute you. Black college enrollment is way down. A lot of middle-class families with many children find it much harder to send their children to college. And why won't you accept that oil import fee to offset that?

The President. Because it's historic that when you go above a certain percentage in taking revenue from the private sector -- government taking revenue from the private sector -- you find that you slow the economy. And this is why the latest evidence of this is that our tax program, once instituted, I think is the principal reason for the 38 straight months of economic recovery that we have had.

Q. Mr. President, 2 weeks ago your Chief of Staff, Donald Regan, said that if Ferdinand Marcos was reelected and certified as such, we would have to do business with him even if he were reelected through fraud. Is that your policy?

The President. What we have to say is that the determination of the government in the Philippines is going to be the business of the Philippine people, not the United States. And we are going to try and continue, as I said before, the relationship regardless of what government is instituted there by the choice of the people. And that is all I can answer.

Q. If I may, sir, it is argued that there is a Communist insurgency there; that the best way to play into the hands of the Communists is to back someone, a dictator, who has been reelected by fraud; that the best way, it is argued, to oppose the Communist insurgency is to back the forces of democracy. What about that?

The President. Well, we're backing the forces of democracy, and the people there are voting, and they're holding their own election, and the only party in the Philippines that boycotted the election was the Communist Party. So, there's very great evidence that whatever takes place -- you've got two parties and the evidence that a sizable percentage of each party has voted for a different candidate for the -- of the two candidates. So, there is a solid support for both candidates there. Now, as I said before, I'm not going to comment on any of these other things while this vote count is still going forward.

Q. Mr. President, the Soviets today released dissident Anatoly Shcharanskiy, but of course there are thousands of other Soviets who would like to leave that country that the Soviets won't let leave. Do you regard today's release as a propaganda move, or do you see any real change in the human rights situation in the Soviet Union?

The President. Chris, I don't have any way to determine what their motives are in doing this. I only know that since the Geneva meeting there have been not only this but others released, more so than in a great many years. I am encouraged by this because I did talk at great length about the matter of human rights with the General Secretary. And all we can do is hope that this is a beginning, a sign for what is going to continue to take place.

Q. If I may follow up, sir, Mr. Gorbachev says that he cannot release another leading dissident, Andrei Sakharov, because of his knowledge of Soviet nuclear secrets. Do you see any legitimacy to that argument?

The President. Well, it's an argument they've used for a number of people -- people who have, in their estimation, been close to some things that they feel are secrets for their own security and that they have said that they cannot let people go that have access to those secrets. Now, I have no way of judging how valid that is. But as I say, they've made a start, and I hope it is just a start and that they'll continue.

The President. Ralph, we are just faced now with what we can do. I can only tell you we hope we can be of help as this interim government goes forward to try to institute democracy there in Haiti. Our participation in Duvalier's leaving was that of providing an airplane to fly him to France.

Q. Mr. President, you spoke last week about one of the great fears of the American people: as they grow older that their lifetime of savings will be wiped out by catastrophic illness. And government, in private studies, suggests that the real risk of being wiped out by catastrophic illness lies not in the hospital and the doctors' bills, but in long-term chronic care like nursing homes. Are you willing to open the Social Security system, the Medicare system, to pay for nursing home care for the chronically ill elderly?

The President. I can't answer your question yet because I've asked simply for a study as to how we can meet the total catastrophic thing for people who have need. And as I say, we had a program that we thought would have worked successfully in California. And we couldn't get any public interest in it, and it would have provided unlimited care and through a private insurance coverage so that there wouldn't have been any governmental, administrative overhead in the program.

The President. Well, the plan that we had in California, the cost was low that the individuals could meet the premium costs of that. Now, if there was some people that couldn't, why, I'm quite sure, as we help in anything else, we would help in that, too.

Q. Mr. President, the United States, as you know, is beginning to resume the flight operations in the Mediterranean near Libya. And it's also designed to reassert our rights to patrol international waters. Why then haven't we crossed that line that Qadhafi calls the death line?

The President. Well, I don't know the nature of the operations that have been conducted. They conduct them in various parts of the Mediterranean. I don't know that they're all through yet. We have conducted operations there very early on in my administration in which I was informed, because they thought I should be, that he had ordered that that was their waters -- which was akin to us claiming all of the waters from the tip of Florida over to the border of Mexico and Texas -- and that some of the maneuvers would entail some planes and some ships in crossing that line but not getting into what are actually their waters. And I gave the go-ahead on that. And I would again. If they didn't cross it in any way this time, it must have been because the maneuvers did not call for it.

The President. Well, it didn't add to his image the first time we did it. And as I say, it would be done not for any impression on him, it would be done because, simply, we believe that our squadrons who are there, the Navy, is going to have to conduct exercises and keep itself in fighting shape.

Q. And because it's Nancy's favorite designer. Mr. President, in view of the many corporate mergers going on, both friendly and unfriendly, and in view of the fact that in a few years we perhaps could wind up with only a handful of billion-dollar conglomerates, would the administration plan to propose or support any legislation to limit some of these mergers, which are getting a little bit out of hand?

The President. Well, I can't comment on whether they're getting out of hand or not, but I do know that we have a body of law that offers us all the protection we need. In fact, I think as we've expanded into a world competition, some of that law has been overprotective. We have to recognize now that we're not just dealing with competition within our own borders but competition with firms from outside the borders. And, no, I don't believe that there's any threat or danger of monopoly control here in our land at all, and I don't think there will be.

Q. Mr. President, why did you so strongly denounce the misrepresentation of Secretary [of Defense] Weinberger as being wasteful and the cartooning of him with a toilet seat around his neck while, at the same time, you were rewarding the very newspaper that did this by giving them an exclusive interview yesterday?

Q. On the same subject of your media awardings, why is it that when there is such a need to save money, is public broadcasting being rewarded with $3 million a week in taxpayers' money when they are known widely in many quarters as ``The Voice of Managua'' and when they refuse to air the Charlton Heston-narrated expose of ``Much the -- [inaudible] -- in Vietnam,'' which was shown last week right here at the White House?

The President. Well, I can't answer for that as to why they make their decision on their programming or not. I would've settled for Charlton Heston making the speech that he made about me in Los Angeles a few weeks ago.

Q. Mr. President, your previous answer to the Philippines election left the impression that no matter what goes on in the election, the United States will accept the outcome. You didn't mean to say that an unprecedented fraud is going to be accepted by the United States, did you, sir? Is there some limit where we stop?

Q. But once they do make the decision, if it's quite obvious -- and even some of the observers from your own commission are indicating that -- if it's quite obvious that it's been a total steal, the United States isn't going to accept the outcome just as it is, are they?

Q. Mr. President, some within your administration are reported to be growing impatient with what they see as Soviet foot-dragging over setting a date for this year's summit. Do you share in that impatience?

Q. Mr. President, various Republicans who would like to succeed you, including the Vice President, have been spending a lot of time lately going to various conservative groups trying to get their seal of approval. In your view, has George Bush been politically and philosophically consistent over the years?

The President. Well, you're asking a fellow who was once a liberal New Deal Democrat before he became a Republican. [Laughter] So, sometimes we do change our minds with things that have gone on. But I just have to tell you that he has been heart and soul in support of everything that we're trying to do, and I am convinced of his sincerity in supporting all of those measures.

Q. If I can follow up, Mr. Bush is reluctant to discuss any issues on which the two of you may have differed privately since you have been President. Could you tell us an issue or two in which he's had a significant impact on your thinking or your decisions?

The President. One of the reasons I couldn't answer specifically on that, I have to tell you that he is a part of every decision, a part of the policymaking here, just as are the other members of the Cabinet. He and I both sit in with the Cabinet, and he is part and parcel of all of the policy here in the administration.

Q.  Thank you, Mr. President. You mentioned in your Saturday radio broadcast that we were going to reach the Gramm-Rudman cuts by a few little garage sales. Is it your desire to see that 250,000 veterans who have certificates of eligibility to buy VA homes are going to be excluded from having this opportunity because the Veterans Administration says they're out of money and must meet the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings quota?

The President. I can't answer that question specifically, either, here as to what we're going to do. I know that we don't want to penalize our veterans, take away any of the benefits and so forth that they have. And I'd just have to tell you that with everything that's going on, right now I couldn't answer you about the situation of the housing loans for veterans.

The President. I am waiting to see what the recommendation is. This is still being studied, and they haven't presented an actual recommendation to me. All I know at the moment is that what they're studying is how can we eliminate this possibility of a quota system. So, I want to tell you that I don't want to do anything that is going to restore discrimination of any kind. In fact, I'm trying to prevent discrimination with this idea, as I say, of eliminating quotas. So, I know it was mentioned here before that supposedly I'm opposed to human -- or to civil rights. No, I was opposed to certain features of programs that were being advocated. But there were other programs that I did support. And frankly, I was doing things about civil rights before there was such a program.

The President. Well, as I said before, I think that we must have a colorblind society. Things must be done for people neither because of nor in spite of any differences between us in race, ethnic origin, or religion. And it's so easy to fall into a bureaucratic practice of saying, ``Well, isn't this the easiest thing? Let's just tell them they have to have x number and that'll settle it.'' Well, let me give you an example. Recently here in the East -- and I won't name the locale -- we had a public housing apartment, and they had on their own set a quota. And the quota was for 30 percent black. Now, they didn't get 70 percent white; they had empty units. And yet because their quota was full, they were turning away every black applicant that came to the public housing because of their quota. This is the type of thing that we want to stop. And it isn't government policy. Again, as I say, you have to recognize that when you go down far enough in the echelons of bureaucracy, things can take place that you find you are almost helpless to stop.

I had such an experience in a whole different field, that had to do with health, when I was a Governor and found out that the bureaucracy evidently opposed the change we wanted to make so they deliberately distorted the order and picked on the most helpless people, those that were the most invalid. And I found out there wasn't really any way that I could police that throughout the entire State. And I called a press conference of your colleagues there and told them that I had to rescind the program we'd tried to put into effect because I could not control those people at that level.

Don't get me wrong -- I think that the bulk of our employees are fine and patriotic and sincere in all of their work, but I also know that there are others that are just going to, as we all sometimes do in private jobs -- they are going to do it the easy way. And I want to fix it so they can't do this the easy way.

Q. Mr. President, are the two U.S. bases in the Philippines of paramount importance when you consider U.S. policy for the Philippines? Or would you put the future of those bases at some risk if it meant standing up for democracy?

The President. One cannot minimize the importance of those bases, not only to us but to the Western World and certainly to the Philippines themselves. If you look at the basing now of the blue-ocean navy that the Soviet has built, which is bigger than ours, and how they have placed themselves to be able to intercept the 16 chokepoints in the world. There are 16 passages in the world, sea passages, through which most of the supplies and the raw material and so forth reaches not only ourselves but our allies in the Western World. And obviously, the plan in case of any kind of hostilities calls for intercepting and closing those 16 chokepoints. And we have to have bases that we can send forces to reopen those channels. And I don't know of any that's more important than the bases on the Philippines.

The President. I have to tell you that, as good military will always do, and not just here, but in anything else -- I am confident that our Navy has sought for and is looking for contingency plans for anything that might happen anyplace to us.

The President. Governor Ashcroft, Representative Bill Emerson, Carolyn and Kit Bond, and ladies and gentlemen, it's great to be back in Missouri, and it's great to be in America's heartland. I've come here to ask Missouri for a favor: We need to borrow one of your best and brightest. We need you to send an individual to the United States Senate who will be a strong voice for a prosperous, free, and secure America. Can I count on you to send Kit Bond to Washington? [Applause] Thank you. You just made my day. [Laughter] Some of you may be aware that I met Kit when he was just a youngster, and of course it was during his first term as Governor. [Laughter] Seriously, though, Kit is still a young man, but he's also a man with a proven track record of leadership and responsibility -- a Missourian of whom you are rightly proud.

Predictably, the liberal dream turned into our country's economic nightmare. Putting America back on the right track has been a team effort, and I want to point out that your Senator, Jack Danforth, has been an indispensable member of the team. Missouri, you've got a great Senator. In 1986 let's make it two for two. Speaking of two for two, it's great to hear the Globe-Democrat will be keeping St. Louis a two-newspaper town. And two fine newspapers they are.

Together, with outstanding individuals like Kit Bond at the State and local level and with active support of the American people, much has been accomplished. America has enjoyed 38 months of growth and confidence. Almost 10 million new jobs have been created -- 9,800,000 of them in just over 3 years. We've got a higher percentage of the total potential work pool working today than has ever been true in our history. Our formula for success has been trust in the people, and we have an entirely different set of goals than our liberal friends in the Democratic Party. Instead of bigger government and higher taxes, we're looking for higher growth and more take-home pay. Instead of welfare and handouts, we'd rather people have jobs and opportunity.

I think Kit Bond said it well in his second inaugural address: ``We have learned in the last two decades that greater government encroachment in our lives has not provided the answers we expected. The people have sensed this failure. Across this nation and in Missouri, they have presented a mandate for better government, not bigger government.'' So said Kit Bond. Missouri is the ``Show Me'' State. So, after making that speech, Kit went out and proved to you that he meant what he said. Under his leadership, Missouri was one of the first States to establish enterprise zones. He fostered a progrowth environment, and by the time he was done, well over 100,000 more Missourians had jobs than when he started. He broke out of old molds and established patterns to find new ways of making State government leaner and more efficient. He had the courage to say no to the multitude of special interests that pound on every elected official's door. And in the process, as Governor Ashcroft just told us, he did take a $270 million budget deficit that he'd inherited and turned it into an almost $300 million surplus.

Seriously, though, Gramm-Rudman-Hollings is not a threat. It's a tremendous opportunity for all of us to finally get rid of unnecessary Federal programs and dramatically reduce the level of deficit spending. And don't let anyone tell you it can't be done. It already has been done. We've submitted to the Congress a budget that meets the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings targets without touching Social Security, damaging essential programs for the less fortunate, or gutting defense. It is a fair and reasonable alternative. Whatever happens in the courts, Congress has made a commitment to reduce the deficit. And the Congress should adopt our budget and meet the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings targets.

Our criteria should be the same as that expressed by Abe Lincoln, whose birthday we celebrate today. He said that ``in all that the people can individually do as well for themselves, government ought not to interfere.'' The Great Emancipator also said, ``To each laborer the whole product of his labor, or as nearly as possible, is a most worthy object of any good government.'' Working people keeping the product of their labor is not what some politicians have in mind. Our opponents would rather raise your taxes than reduce spending. They'd rather take money out of your family budget than out of the Federal budget. They claim you're undertaxed. Let me ask you: Are you undertaxed? Do you want your taxes raised?

America doesn't need higher taxes; it needs less deficit spending. Raising taxes would knock the legs out from under economic growth, leaving us with higher taxes and higher spending. Those Members of Congress who are pushing for higher taxes had better take their eyes off the special interests in the gallery and start looking to the folks back home. There's a step Members of Congress can take right now that will make a contribution, and as I said in the State of the Union Message, if they can't say no to the special interests, well, then, let somebody else -- let me take the heat, as you've just been told. And as Governor Ashcroft said, give me what I once had in California and what your Governors have had here -- a line-item veto. Forty-three Governors in the Nation have the line-item veto and have used it effectively to protect the taxpayers.

You know, here in Missouri Kit tells me that with impoundment of the line-item veto, he saved you hundreds of millions of dollars in his last term. We need this same tool for responsible government at the Federal level. Why should we be saddled with spending measures that are sneaked into other legislative bills because they can't stand on their own merit? I, with the line-item veto, vetoed 943 such bills, and not once was the veto overridden. The difference was, because in California it takes a two-thirds vote to pass the budget -- the difference was that they didn't mind voting for them when they were hidden in the entire budget, but when they had to vote on them standing out there all on their own, they couldn't get the two-thirds vote to override my veto. That's why we need it at the Federal level.

There's also a crowd in Washington who, as usual, is suggesting that the easy way to reduce deficit spending is to slash the defense budget. Well, we're still making up for the folly of a decade ago when our defensive strength was permitted to erode. When we got to Washington on any given day half of our military planes could not fly for lack of spare parts or fuel. Half of our naval vessels could not leave port for lack of either crew or spare parts. We must never permit that to happen again. Strength is the greatest guarantor of peace, and keeping our country secure and at peace is the highest responsibility of the Federal Government.

Now, I know that you have been treated for the last several years to a drumbeat of propaganda that would picture the Defense Department as a bloated four-star general sitting on a bag of money. Let me tell you that is pure propaganda. The Defense Department has instituted initiatives and improvements in management to the point that most of our weapons systems now are coming in ahead of schedule and under the original asking price instead of coming in with a cost override. The young men and women in our military -- more than 90 percent of them high school graduates, the highest percentage we've ever known in the history of American military.

There are no easy ways to meet the challenges we face. I know, for example, of the rugged times that many of America's farmers are having. Those farmers who are in trouble are, by and large, the victims of the inflation that the rest of us have managed to escape. They bought land and equipment during those times when prices were rising, often encouraged by government to do so. When inflation stopped, they were left holding the bag -- the bag was full of grain, and the price of grain had gone down. Well, the farm bill I signed recently was about the best thing we could get through the Congress. Tom Coleman and Bill Emerson worked closely with me on this one. Now, all of us are going to have to work together to straighten the situation out. We have to maintain those responsible policies that helped bring down the prime interest rate from 21\1/2\ percent that we inherited to less than half of that -- 9\1/2\ percent now.

Finally, let me say, the most effective thing we can now do for the American farmer is to fight against so-called domestic protectionism. It isn't really protecting anything. It's the number-one threat faced by American agriculture. Protectionist measures would only raise the price of what farmers and all of us buy and would likely result in retaliatory trade barriers against the export of our farm products overseas.

And the way to correct the trade imbalance is not to decrease imports but to increase exports. Rather than erect trade barriers of our own, let's go to work dismantling those obstacles in other countries. Let's balance up and not down. And that way everyone is better off. I know that Kit Bond is a leader in this area. Our administration has honored him for his promotion of American exports. What we must do is nurture that bold spirit of enterprise that has always been so much a part of the American character. I have little doubt that if the rules are fair, we Americans can outproduce and outcompete anyone, anywhere in the world.

St. Louis was the departure point for those who conquered the American frontier. Today we're at the jumping-off point for the 21st century. Americans, we must be as bold as those who went before us. One thing that amazed the pundits during the last election was the large number of young people who flocked to our cause. Well, it shouldn't have surprised anyone. We are making tough decisions. We are building a better tomorrow; we're building an America as filled with opportunity and the freedom that was once passed on to us. And that is our sacred responsibility to those younger people. And I think that they've recognized now that that is taking place, and they're going to step out and into the ranks and help us in the future with that.

I have just one last thing I want to say. I know that it's very easy for people to think in our system of checks and balances, well, we have two Senators for each State, why shouldn't we have one for each party? That might look good on the surface, but analyze something: If you support and believe in the things that we're trying to do, shouldn't you have two Senators there voting to make this happen instead of having one Senator there to cancel out the vote of your other Senator?

All of the things that I've told you about, and more -- that we've accomplished in the few years we've been there -- I tell you, frankly, could not have been accomplished if we did not have, for the first time in years and years, a majority, a small majority, but a majority in the one House, the Senate. If the both Houses were, as they've been most of the last 50 years, in the hands of the other party, none of the things that have been accomplished would be taking place. So, you send Bill Emerson back to Washington. And, please, you send us Kit Bond, that we can maintain that majority we have in the United States Senate and make more of these good things happen.

This legislation was originally intended to make technical and editorial corrections to subtitle II of title 46 of the United States Code. These corrections were necessitated by errors made in the codification of that title in 1983. This bill contains sections that I do support; however, provisions were added that I simply cannot support.

Improving the management of the Federal government has been, and remains, a fundamental goal of my Administration. But close cooperation between our branches of government is critical if we are to conduct our affairs in a businesslike fashion. Far from giving the Executive branch requisite flexibility to manage efficiently, it creates significant new impediments and contains unwarranted private relief provisions that would set highly undesirable precedents.

For example, the bill would require that any funds expended under the Truman-Hobbs Act by the Coast Guard to alter the Burlington-Northern Railroad bridge be subject to the requirements of the Davis-Bacon Act, adding approximately $1.5 million to the cost of the project. It would prohibit the trial contracting out of certain aids to navigation functions on the Intracoastal Waterway in New Jersey, significantly diminishing the scope of this project. It would establish two unnecessary advisory committees, and exempt certain Coast Guard facilities from personnel ceilings.

It would also reimburse the owners of a bridge in Texas for costs of alterations that under current law are nonreimbursable. Finally, the bill would grant a specific vessel an inappropriate exception to the Merchant Marine Act of 1936, relieving that vessel of its statutory duty to repay a construction differential subsidy. Both of these provisions would discriminate unfairly and inequitably against those similarly situated. At a time when we are taking difficult steps to reduce the budget deficit, this strikes me as especially unwise.

Section 1. Determination of Fees. The Secretaries of Agriculture and the Interior are directed to exercise their authority, to the extent permitted by law under the various statutes they administer, to establish fees for domestic livestock grazing on the public rangelands which annually equals the $1.23 base established by the 1966 Western Livestock Grazing Survey multiplied by the result of the Forage Value Index (computed annually from data supplied by the Statistical Reporting Service) added to the Combined Index (Beef Cattle Price Index minus the Prices Paid Index) and divided by 100; provided, that the annual increase or decrease in such fee for any given year shall be limited to not more than plus or minus 25 percent of the previous year's fee, and provided further, that the fee shall not be less than $1.35 per animal unit month.

Sec. 3. Any and all existing rules, practices, policies, and regulations relating to the administration of the formula for grazing fees in section 6(a) of the Public Rangelands Improvement Act of 1978 shall continue in full force and effect.

Once again, we honor the mosaic that is America -- a land of mothers and fathers, brothers and sisters, sons and daughters from every background and culture. We are a nation that is truly ``one out of many.'' But America is more than a living tableau of the multitude of faiths and nationalities that have converged on our shores and helped build our character as a people. America is the embodiment of the ideal of active involvement by every citizen in building stronger communities and a better future.

Brotherhood/Sisterhood Week reminds us, therefore, not only of our heritage of tolerance and opportunity, but of the responsibility all of us have to celebrate our belonging by achieving and contributing to the fullest extent of our abilities. Brotherhood/Sisterhood Week gives every American the chance to give thanks for the blessings we enjoy by giving something back to this Land of Liberty -- through our churches and schools, charitable and community organizations, and through our families and friends.

I ask all Americans to join with the National Conference of Christians and Jews in programs in honor of Brotherhood/Sisterhood Week, recognizing that we are brothers and sisters, above all, because we are children of God and members of one common human family.

Today I'd like to speak to you about a gathering crisis in our society: It's a family crisis. To some it's hidden, concealed behind tenement walls or lost in the forgotten streets of our inner cities. But for millions of Americans, the crisis is ever present and growing, and it threatens to become a permanent scar on the American promise of hope and opportunity for all.

I'm talking about the crisis of family breakdowns, especially among the welfare poor, both black and white. In inner cities today, families, as we've always thought of them, are not even being formed. Since 1960 the percentage of babies born out of wedlock has more than doubled. And too often their mothers are only teenagers. They're children -- many of them 15, 16, and 17 years old with all the responsibilities of grownups thrust upon them. The fathers of these children are often nowhere to be found. In some instances you have to go back three generations before you can find an intact family. It seems even the memory of families is in danger of becoming extinct. And what of the babies born out of wedlock, these children born to children. Statistically, we know that they're much more likely to have a low birth weight and, thus, serious health problems. We know that out-of-wedlock children often suffer abuse and neglect as well. And what sort of future can they look forward to?

The family is the most basic support system there is. For two centuries now, it's been families pulling together that has provided the courage, willpower, and sense of security that have enabled millions of Americans to escape poverty and grab hold of the rungs on the ladder of opportunity. How often have we heard about the immigrant father laboring long into the night to give his children the advantages he never had? How many self-made men and women in America of all ethnic backgrounds owe their success to the strength of character given them by hard-working, loving parents? But for the children of child mothers and absentee fathers, there is often only a deepening cycle of futility, hopelessness, and despair.

We're in danger of creating a permanent culture of poverty as inescapable as any chain or bond; a second and separate America, an America of lost dreams and stunted lives. The irony is that misguided welfare programs instituted in the name of compassion have actually helped turn a shrinking problem into a national tragedy. From the 1950's on, poverty in America was declining. American society, an opportunity society, was doing its wonders. Economic growth was providing a ladder for millions to climb up out of poverty and into prosperity. In 1964 the famous War on Poverty was declared and a funny thing happened. Poverty, as measured by dependency, stopped shrinking and then actually began to grow worse. I guess you could say, poverty won the war. Poverty won in part because instead of helping the poor, government programs ruptured the bonds holding poor families together.

Perhaps the most insidious effect of welfare is its usurpation of the role of provider. In States where payments are highest, for instance, public assistance for a single mother can amount to much more than the usable income of a minimum wage job. In other words, it can pay for her to quit work. Many families are eligible for substantially higher benefits when the father is not present. What must it do to a man to know that his own children will be better off if he is never legally recognized as their father? Under existing welfare rules, a teenage girl who becomes pregnant can make herself eligible for welfare benefits that will set her up in an apartment of her own, provide medical care, and feed and clothe her. She only has to fulfill one condition -- not marry or identify the father.

Obviously something is desperately wrong with our welfare system. With only about half of what is now spent on welfare, we could give enough money to every impoverished man, woman, and child to lift them above the poverty line. Instead, we spend vast amounts on a system that perpetuates poverty. But the waste of money pales before the sinful waste of human potential -- the squandering of so many millions of hopes and dreams.

In my State of the Union Address, I directed our administration to study the welfare system with a keen eye to making reforms. We already have in place a low-income assistance working group, which is hard at its task. In addition, I've instructed Attorney General Edwin Meese, as Chairman pro tem of our Domestic Policy Council, to convene a working group to evaluate the effect of a wide range of government programs on American families, especially poor families. These groups will report back to me by December 1st. The welfare tragedy has gone on too long. It's time to reshape our welfare system so that it can be judged by how many Americans it makes independent of welfare.

We have followed with great interest and concern the Presidential and Vice Presidential elections in the Philippines. As the Philippines is a close friend and ally, what happens to this nation and its people is of great importance to the United States. While maintaining strict neutrality in these elections, we have consistently urged that the process be a fair and credible one leading to a government with the strongest possible mandate. The elections were marked by heartening evidence of the continuing commitment of the Filipino people to the democratic process and the furtherance of a two-party system, which should strengthen that process in the future.

Although our observation delegation has not yet completed its work, it has already become evident, sadly, that the elections were marred by widespread fraud and violence perpetrated largely by the ruling party. It was so extreme that the election's credibility has been called into question both within the Philippines and in the United States. At this difficult juncture, it is imperative that all responsible Filipinos seek peaceful ways to effect stability within their society and to avoid violence, which would benefit only those who wish to see an end to democracy. Both sides must work together to make those reforms which are needed to ensure a stable democracy, a truly professional military, and a healthy economy.

Our hearts go out to the people of the Philippines. They are at a major crossroads in their history. We are proud of our long association with them and very proud of their passionate devotion to democracy. There are no easy answers. And in the last analysis, they will have to find the solutions themselves. But they will have our help -- in any way we can.

The President. In my State of the Union Address, I said it was vital to our nation's security that we provide the freedom fighters in Nicaragua and other countries with not only the means to die for freedom but also to win freedom. There are many ways in which a democratic outcome can be achieved in Nicaragua. It could happen at the negotiating table or by the success of the ground resistance. But one thing is certain: We must provide more effective assistance, and we must lift the restrictions which now tie our hands. In Congress and, in fact, throughout the world, the opinion about the Sandinistas seems to be shifting toward our view. They don't have many defenders anymore. The debate now is over what we should do about them.

The program approved last year, the $27 million in humanitarian assistance, has helped to maintain the pressure of the resistance on the Sandinistas. The resistance has continued to grow and is operating deep inside Nicaragua. But we have to do more to help them. As I've said before, you can't fight attack helicopters piloted by Cubans with Band-Aids and mosquito nets.

Section 1. (a) To the extent permitted by law and subject to the limitations in Section 1(c), Executive departments and agencies shall participate in a system for debarment and suspension from programs and activities involving Federal financial and nonfinancial assistance and benefits. Debarment or suspension of a participant in a program by one agency shall have government-wide effect.

Sec. 3. Executive departments and agencies shall issue regulations governing their implementation of this Order that shall be consistent with the guidelines issued under Section 6. Proposed regulations shall be submitted to the Office of Management and Budget for review within four months of the date of the guidelines issued under Section 6. The Director of the Office of Management and Budget may return for reconsideration proposed regulations that the Director believes are inconsistent with the guidelines. Final regulations shall be published within twelve months of the date of the guidelines.

Sec. 4. There is hereby constituted the Interagency Committee on Debarment and Suspension, which shall monitor implementation of this Order. The Committee shall consist of representatives of agencies designated by the Director of the Office of Management and Budget.

Sec. 5. The Director of the Office of Management and Budget shall designate a Federal agency to perform the following functions: maintain a current list of all individuals and organizations excluded from program participation under this Order, periodically distribute the list to Federal agencies, and study the feasibility of automating the list; coordinate with the lead agency responsible for government-wide debarment and suspension of contractors; chair the Interagency Committee established by Section 4; and report periodically to the Director on implementation of this Order, with the first report due within two years of the date of the Order.

Sec. 6. The Director of the Office of Management and Budget is authorized to issue guidelines to Executive departments and agencies that govern which programs and activities are covered by this Order, prescribe government-wide criteria and government-wide minimum due process procedures, and set forth other related details for the effective administration of the guidelines.

Sec. 7. The Director of the Office of Management and Budget shall report to the President within three years of the date of this Order on Federal agency compliance with the Order, including the number of exceptions made under Section 2(c), and shall make such recommendations as are appropriate further to curb fraud, waste, and abuse.

Q. Although aware of your difficulties with the domestic steel market, Trinidad and Tobago is presently struggling to diversify its economic base as oil revenues continue to fall. The U.S. antidumping regulations designed, we suspect, to arrest threats from producers in the developed world, nonetheless threaten to frustrate the prospects of this industry. Would you, as part of your enlightened design to assist the Caribbean, give sympathetic consideration to relaxing existing trade laws insofar as a country like Trinidad and Tobago is concerned?

The President. This administration has consistently favored free trade. U.S. antidumping and countervailing duty regulations are consistent with this philosophy. U.S. antidumping and countervailing duty laws are administered impartially, fairly, and in a manner to uphold U.S. international obligations under the GATT [General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade]. These laws do not protect U.S. industry against fair competition, but rather are designed to offset subsidies and other trade-distorting practices. We believe it is in the interest of all countries to avoid subsidization and pricing practices that are harmful to trading partners.

The President. We have been very encouraged by the political evolution in the Caribbean since 1980. The vitality of popularly elected governments is a testament to the strength of the region's democratic traditions and institutions. We fully support this trend. While economic recovery has often been sluggish because of the vulnerability of these small economies, there is growing evidence of improvement. I am heartened by the growth of nontraditional exports from the region. These are the new industries, stimulated by the CBI, which are the source of future growth and employment. In some countries, expectations of rapid CBI-led growth have been unrealistic. It is important to recall that the CBI was given a 12-year lifespan in recognition that even in the best of circumstances, it takes time to expand exports and attract productive investments. I have great faith in the potential benefits of the CBI and am committed to maintain the opportunities for economic expansion, which is the ultimate goal of the program.

Q. The United States administration has in recent years placed greater emphasis on bilateral assistance to Caribbean States than it has assistance through institutions which have been established to foster regional integration in the commonwealth Caribbean. Is the administration not concerned that this practice tends more to lead to fragmentation rather than integration, for which the administration affirms support?

The President. The United States has developed a balanced program of bilateral and multilateral assistance in the Caribbean. We continue to assist Caribbean regional institutions -- in agricultural technology, in health and nutrition, in education and curriculum reform -- areas where scarce technical or managerial resources can be marshaled in a cost-effective manner to assist a number of countries experiencing similar problems. Bilateral assistance does not weaken the integration movement. Our bilateral assistance programs respond to the requests and priorities of the individual Caribbean governments. They are carefully tailored to specific needs and support policies and reforms directed toward economic diversification and productive private investment.

Q. Agreeing with the recommendation that West Indian governments should institute programs that will keep their citizens at home to help in the development of the region, will you consider setting up a task force which could assist regional organizations and/or individual governments in preparing such plans, and will you be prepared to encourage and help to provide for the availability of venture capital to facilitate would-be entrepreneurs?

The President. I believe economic development can best be promoted and entrepreneurs attracted to investments by establishing a stable business climate and allowing a fair rate of return on investment. In the public sector, governments can improve the business climate by adjusting tax policies and removing unnecessary restrictions on business and trade. There are other positive measures that governments can take. I understand, for example, that a number of governments in the region have energetically promoted the establishment of industrial parks and have directed infrastructure investment toward providing a favorable foundation for new business. Using the advantages offered by the Caribbean Basin Initiative and various institutions, governments can address their economic problems, attract venture capital, and allow the private sector to thrive. A sound economy with a bright future is the key element in deterring the migration of skilled citizens.

Q. You are the first United States President to have taken such a keen interest in the Caribbean area to the extent that you have now visited three of the countries and have also created the Caribbean Basin Initiative for the benefit of the region. What is your vision of the future of the Caribbean and its relationship with your country, and how do you think these can best be achieved?

The President. We have taken such a keen interest in the Caribbean because the Caribbean region is important to the United States. I believe the future of the Caribbean is bright, and I have no doubt that the close relationship that exists today between the democratic countries of the Caribbean and the United States will continue to grow. We share not only a rich history of similar traditions and values, but we also have come to know each other as people. Hundreds of thousands of people travel annually between the United States and the Caribbean, and this has served to strengthen the bonds of friendship and understanding between us. We know what we have to do to maintain this close relationship. We share similar views on the need to defend democracy, on the superiority of democratic institutions, and on the strength of private enterprise. We have to solve some economic problems, but I have no doubt that together we will overcome them.

Q. You are a strong advocate of the democratic process and governments which are freely and fairly elected by their people. In considering your country's assistance to the region, what will your policy be toward governments which manifestly fall short of what are regarded as accepted norms of democracy and human rights?

The President. The democratic process requires free and fair elections and the nurturing and strict observance of the rights of the individual. The democratic countries of the Eastern Caribbean and the United States agree on these principles. We are also aware that there are governments in the region that get poor marks on both counts. We first have to determine what a government wants to achieve. If that government wants to move toward democracy and is making a serious effort to observe human rights, the United States, working together with Caribbean countries, will do what it can to encourage these developments.

The President. When the Caribbean Basin Initiative was submitted to the Congress 3 years ago, I noted that ``deteriorating trade opportunities, worldwide recession, mounting debt burdens, growing unemployment, and deep-seated structural problems are having a catastrophic effect throughout the region.'' As the Jamaican people are painfully aware, Jamaica's difficulties have been further complicated by the deepening problems in the bauxite industry. It will take imagination and work to expand nontraditional exports to make up for the resulting decline in foreign exchange earnings. The expansion will not happen overnight. With CBI, however, the door to Jamaica's major market is now open, and I am determined to keep it open.

Meanwhile, we have responded to Jamaica's hardships by stepping up our assistance and urging others to do likewise. Encouraged by the policy reforms implemented by the Jamaican Government, we have provided funds to finance essential imports, including food, until Jamaica can expand its nontraditional exports. We are also aware of the need to maintain basic social services, and our aid program includes important assistance for schools, health care centers, and housing. Finally, we are providing technical expertise to speed the economic adjustment process by helping Jamaican agriculture and industry meet the challenges of world markets.

The President. There is a growing realization in many countries that illegal drugs constitute a deadly threat to the physical and moral well-being of their peoples. With this realization has come the recognition that drug abuse is not just a problem for the producer country or the consumer country, but a common problem that both countries must deal with together. U.S. policy recognizes the need to cooperate with the producer countries in meeting the threat. In addition to discouraging consumption in the United States, we have supported the efforts of producer countries like Jamaica to eradicate the crops in the field, and we have worked with their security forces to interdict the export of processed drugs. The results have been encouraging. Jamaica began to intensify marijuana eradication in 1984. But last year, we believe the acreage eradicated was three to four times the 1984 total, so that net yield fell by about a third. We are certain that the Jamaicans can make further progress in 1986, and we want to continue to provide the support Jamaica needs.

Q. Thirteen persons in Grenada have been charged with and await trial for taking part in illegal military exercises. Against the background of what the United States has invested in lives and money to restore democracy to the island, what will be the reaction of your administration to a violent uprising against the Government of Grenada if there is clear evidence of foreign involvement in the uprising; if there is no clear indication of foreign involvement in the uprising?

The President. First of all, I sincerely hope that the hypothetical uprising you mentioned never becomes a reality in Grenada. The Grenadian people have already suffered too much during their short years of independence. Following the rescue mission in October 1983, both the United States and the Eastern Caribbean States made Grenada's security a high priority. The police force was regrouped, trained, and by September of last year had assumed responsibility for security. From the accounts I have heard, they have done an excellent job. Grenada and the Eastern Caribbean States also strengthened the regional security system. The United States assisted in establishing well-trained individual special service units, particularly in Grenada. These units are not only meant to deal with a threat once it occurs but also to prevent it from happening in the first place. The United States is fully aware of its commitment to preserving democracy in Grenada and will stand by it in times of need.

The President. We cannot yet say what effect budget cuts will have on our future assistance program. As far as the AID program is concerned, the important thing is to establish priorities and to help governments that take steps to help themselves. Grenada has come a long way in the past 2 years, and I look forward to seeing the improvements for myself when I visit on February 20. There have been severe economic problems, and together with the Grenadian people, we have tried to solve these problems and to assure a stable future. U.S aid to Grenada has been a good investment. In our aid program, we will work closely with the Government of Grenada in setting priorities so that the assistance funds available are applied to the most effective programs, which will allow productivity and the private sector in Grenada to thrive. I would like to stress that foreign assistance is meant to lay the foundation for a vibrant economy. The key to growth is investment and trade. In that respect, the opportunities provided by the CBI will contribute to achieving and maintaining a sound economy in Grenada. You just have to take advantage of the opportunities.

The President. Following the Grenada rescue mission in October 1983, we established an Embassy in Grenada. A Charge d'Affaires was appointed as my representative in Grenada. The Embassy in Grenada is a full-fledged Embassy. I sympathize with some of the difficulties in obtaining visas, but the temporary nature of the facilities preclude us from providing the full range of visa services available at many, but not all, of our Embassies abroad. I know that the Embassy has tried to be helpful in obtaining visas through Bridgetown.

Q. Several Prime Ministers within the Caribbean have recently become convinced that the new Government of Guyana made an honest attempt to hold fair and free elections. Does your government have a view about this? And if you are likewise convinced, would that in any way change your administration's policy towards Guyana, and if so in what way?

The President. Support for democracy is a cornerstone of U.S. foreign policy. We share with the Caribbean island leaders who will be in Grenada the goal of worldwide respect for democratic institutions. Fair and free elections are, of course, an essential element in the democratic process. I am aware that a controversy exists about the recent elections in Guyana; however, we did not send official observers, and I cannot make definitive statements about the process. I look forward to hearing in Grenada the assessment of my colleagues on how democracy is progressing in the region. The United States welcomes the opportunity for improved relations with Guyana and recognizes the importance of increased cooperation between that country and other Caribbean States.

Q. Mr. President, our newspaper welcomed your country's intervention in Grenada, but the conditions of economic decline which led to that event remain. The evidence, even with the CBI, suggests that the United States has been far less disposed to address the underlying economic difficulties in the Caribbean which are really at the heart of the problem. Given the weak infrastructure development of the majority of Eastern Caribbean States, there are very few now in a position to benefit from the access afforded into the U.S. market. Would your administration sympathetically consider expanded financial aid for infrastructure development designed to stimulate productive and export capacity as a supply service to the CBI, to stimulate productive and export capacity of the smaller Caribbean States?

The President. I respectfully disagree with the premise of your question. Our assistance to Grenada and, indeed, to the entire Eastern Caribbean already includes infrastructure improvement as a major component. In Grenada, St. Lucia, St. Vincent, and Dominica we have supported major road reconstruction; in Antigua we are improving water systems; and in St. Lucia, St. Vincent, Dominica, and Grenada we have helped improve the power generating system. We support factory shell reconstruction throughout the region. We do this precisely for the reasons laid out in your question -- to stimulate productive private investment and thereby enhance the export capacity of the smaller Caribbean States. Since passage of the CBI, our assistance has increased sharply.

Q. The U.S. immigration policy appears somewhat restrictive to Caribbean nationals compared with nationals of other countries. Do you not see this as a contradiction of your stated policy to aid economic development of this region, suffering from high unemployment and sluggish development?

The President. United States immigration policy does not discriminate against Caribbean nationals or nationals of any other country. Our immigration laws are designed to be as fair as possible to the millions of people worldwide, including those in the Caribbean, who wish to immigrate to the United States. But there is a second assumption in your question that I find troubling. You seem to assume that one good solution to the economic problems of the Caribbean is for people to move to the United States. I don't believe that people should have to uproot themselves and separate themselves from their homes, their homelands, and their families in order to live a decent life. On the contrary, I believe that it is the responsibility of everyone -- the government, business, labor, private citizens -- to help expand economic opportunities at home. This means that governments must free the individual's energies to work and create, and that individuals must seek and take hold of opportunities to improve themselves.

The Caribbean's economic problems will never be resolved through immigration to the United States. What the countries of the Caribbean need is to find and create new opportunities. They need to develop new goods to export and service industries to attract foreign exchange. We would like to be part of a cooperative effort to help you do that. But to encourage people to leave their homelands doesn't solve the problem. It merely postpones what must be done to develop strong, balanced economies; destroys the people's confidence in themselves and their societies; frequently deprives the country of talents sorely needed at home; and creates social disruption. In the long run, that approach would bear negative results for the countries of the Caribbean.

Q. There is a perception that there has been some slight easing of East-West tension since your meeting with Soviet leader Gorbachev. What does this development mean for this region, which your administration identified as one that was subject to Communist penetration?

The President. Chairman Gorbachev and I had several long discussions in Geneva, and I certainly hope that those discussions have led to a reduction in tensions. I think they have. But a reduction in tensions does not mean a reduction in vigilance. We are very much aware of recent Soviet-Cuban and Libyan attempts to penetrate this hemisphere. In Nicaragua, we see the attempt by the Sandinistas, with help from Cuba and its Soviet patron, to consolidate repressive Communist rule. And right here in the Caribbean exists one of the most repressive regimes on Earth, the government of Fidel Castro in Cuba, which has caused over a million people to flee their homeland. Castro has created an island prison in the middle of the Caribbean as a grim reminder of what can happen if we are not prepared to defend our freedom. In Grenada a handful of tyrants almost succeeded, with help from Cuba and the Soviet Union, in creating a repressive, militarized state which would have been a threat to the other nations of the Caribbean Basin and the United States.

The United States rejects the idea that the Soviets should be able to spread their influence through subversion in this region. We believe that free people everywhere should support those who fight for freedom and against repression. That is what we are doing in Nicaragua, and that is why we responded to requests to rescue Grenada in 1983. As a result of my meetings with Mr. Gorbachev in Geneva, tensions may have been reduced, but not at the expense of our principles. I made it clear to Mr. Gorbachev that the United States feels very strongly about freedom and security in this hemisphere. We believe the democracies of the Caribbean should be allowed to develop without threats of subversion from the Soviet Union or Cuba. And Mr. Gorbachev knows that we will oppose any attempts by the Soviet Union and its allies to threaten the security of this hemisphere.

As the largest sources of environmental pollution have been controlled, and critical lands protected, our attention is drawn to highly specialized problems -- such as detecting and determining the significance of trace levels of chemical substances in the air, in surface and ground waters, in fish tissue, and in soils. Further progress in eliminating environmental pollutants wherever they are found to have significant impacts is leading to the control of larger numbers of smaller, more dispersed sources of potential environmental contamination, including small firms, farmers, and individuals. This trend has enormous implications, both in terms of the costs of removing such small amounts of pollution from such large volumes of the medium in which it is found, and because it seems to require detailed regulatory interventions into individual lives. Recognizing this, the Council on Environmental Quality's report documents and suggests a broader range of environmental policy alternatives that ought to be considered.

The policy recommendations contained herein are based on two fundamental propositions. The first is that the spirit, creativity, and personal drive of individual Americans will always be this Nation's greatest resource. It is the human genius that turns physical substances into resources, and human creativity in a free society is never exhaustible. Second, human institutions can encourage or constrain the ability of people to make the best use of their resources and to solve environmental problems. Rational policies that recognize and make effective use of economic incentives should help to improve the management of our environment and natural resources by stimulating new achievements on the part of the American people. Efficient use of the Nation's resources, guided whenever possible by free markets rather than centralized controls, will work to promote environmental health, economic productivity, and fiscal responsibility.

Some of the specific policies that follow from these perceptions are discussed in this report. They include enlisting volunteer efforts, long characteristic of this Nation, on behalf of parks, wildlife, and natural and historic preservation.

The Federal government's own activities should avoid adversely affecting environmental quality. This is now accomplished chiefly through the environmental impact assessment process. Another means to implement such a policy is contained in the Coastal Barrier Resources Act, which removed Federal subsidies for the development of these sensitive lands. Studies are currently underway to assess its effectiveness and to consider its applicability to other areas of critical environmental concern.

Efforts to create markets and to consider market-like management practices, which are being tried by Federal agencies in air quality and some land and water resource management programs, can be extended into other areas. A variety of successful State, local, and private market-oriented initiatives that have solved pressing water resources problems without Federal funds is documented in this report. And on the public lands, proposed user fee revenues would be invested in maintaining facilities that personally benefit recreationists and others, so that only the real public benefits would be paid by the taxpayer.

Finally, environmental protection regulations should be fashioned so that innovation and the substitution of progressively safer new products and technologies for old ones are not inhibited, especially where risk reduction or increased benefits will be the likely result. We must be alert lest government restrictions, however benevolently aimed at protecting the public as a whole, begin to hamper the creativity and productivity of entrepreneurs and other individuals who also can bring about social advances.

This Administration is dedicated to promoting conservation and stewardship. Conservation means the efficient use of natural resources. Stewardship entails a love of the land and a determination to pass onto future generations a high quality environment suitable for human living. A strong nation is one that is loved by its people and, as Edmund Burke put it, for a country to be loved it ought to be lovely. The ideas of conservation and stewardship suggest also that economic productivity is not a proper end in itself, but is only a means to the end of improved lives for all Americans. Riches alone do not guarantee the maintenance of a social order in which people can take pride.

But conservation and stewardship should never come to mean opposition to change through the fear that new development will more likely bring personal decline than social advance. The discomforts of change will be more than compensated by the benefits of a dynamic economy, in securing opportunity for new generations and in rewarding individual enterprise and initiative. A society of rising accomplishment and enhanced expectations will provide a better life for its people: a cleaner environment, and improved health and nutrition, superior educational, cultural, and recreational opportunities.

Inspired by promise, sustained by hope, past generations of Americans built a free and prosperous Nation based upon the principles of individual initiative and personal responsibility and upon private institutions of many types. They worked to turn our abundant natural resources to productive use and they learned to love their new land with its grand vistas, its mountains and forests, its fertile fields, and its bustling cities. Environment and natural resources policy can be used to help further these ideals so that liberty, prosperity, and a beautiful and healthful natural environment will continue to bless the lives of the American people. Then surely our good times will not have passed; indeed, our best days will be yet to come.

I am pleased to forward this report, which summarizes the very important work that this organization has accomplished in the past year. The National Endowment for Democracy is a key instrument in our ability to support what we believe in around the world. The Endowment permits us to give assistance to democracy by strengthening those key sectors of society that represent the basis of a free society. One of the strengths of this organization is that it is constructed on a bipartisan basis. Its activities range from Chile to Poland, from South Africa to Nicaragua, and from the Philippines to Cuba. Although the Endowment has been in operation for less than two years, the enthusiasm and support with which the world's democrats have greeted this initiative has been very gratifying. The support of the Congress is essential for the continued growth of this vital program. This Administration strongly backs the National Endowment for Democracy and will work closely with the Congress to ensure the continued growth and expansion of this vital effort.

Sec. 6. These amendments shall take effect on March 1, 1986, with respect to all court-martial processes taken on and after that date: Provided, That nothing contained in these amendments shall be construed to invalidate any nonjudicial punishment proceeding, restraint, investigation, referral of charges, trial in which arraignment occurred, or other action begun prior to that date, and any such restraint, investigation, referral of charges, trial, or other action may proceed in the same manner and with the same effect as if these amendments had not been prescribed; Provided further, That the amendments made in Rule for Court-Martial 1004(c) shall apply in the trial of offenses committed on or after March 1, 1986; Provided further, That nothing contained in these amendments shall be construed to invalidate any capital sentencing proceeding conducted prior to March 1, 1986, and any such proceeding shall be completed and reviewed in the same manner and with the same effect as if these amendments had not been prescribed; Provided further, That amendments to Rule for Court-Martial 707(a) shall not apply to any condition on liberty imposed before March 1, 1986, and the effect of such a condition on liberty shall be considered under Rule for Court-Martial 707(a) as it existed before March 1, 1986; Provided further, That the amendments made in paragraph 16 of Part IV shall apply in trials of offenses committed on or after March 1, 1986; Provided further, That the amendments made in paragraph 30a of Part IV shall apply in the trials of offenses committed under Article 106a on or after March 1, 1986; And provided further, That the amendments made in paragraph 30a of Part IV authorizing capital punishment shall apply with respect to offenses under Article 106a committed on or after March 1, 1986.

Roger Smith, Ruben Mettler, and ladies and gentlemen, good afternoon and welcome to the White House. It's an honor to be able to greet you here today, and permit me to say, it's about time we managed to get together. When I found out you'd met with every President from Johnson to Carter, I had a feeling that the list had stopped kind of short. [Laughter] Before I say anything else, let me congratulate one of your members, someone who in recent days has lived up to the very highest ideals of corporate responsibility and grace under pressure. Jim Burke of Johnson & Johnson, you have our deepest admiration.

Now, tomorrow I'm going to Grenada to see firsthand how freedom is working down in that country. I know that some of you've been there and have seen the many incentives for opening a business in that free and independent society. Many incentives for American business now exist in Grenada and elsewhere in the region thanks to the Caribbean Basin Initiative. The climate has become brighter for American business in that region. It's encouraging to witness what can happen in an environment where free enterprise is allowed to flourish. And this is particularly significant when we know that lands close to Grenada do not have these same opportunities. Through innovative private sector initiatives, the Grenadian people will be better able to determine their future and to improve the quality of their life.

Now, I know you're eager to hear where we stand on Gramm-Rudman-Hollings. But in order to illuminate the battles of the moment, let me first review our record. As men and women steeped in the practice of business, you no doubt remember in detail what the economy was like when we took office: inflation in double digits, growth at a virtual standstill, interest rates soaring -- indeed, the month that we took office, interest rates lofted up to their highest level since the Civil War.

We came to Washington prepared to do combat to put the economy to rights. And we came armed with one crucial insight: A democratic government, indeed any government, is powerless to ordain economic growth or decree technological innovation. But this much a government can do: It can reward or punish specific economic activities. High tax rates represent punishment. Burdensome regulations represent punishment. But cutting taxes and eliminating needless regulations constitute rewards.

From the decontrol of oil we went on to apply powerful, new incentives to the entire economy, and we helped to hold down the cost of doing business by cutting the growth of government regulations. We supported a sound monetary policy, helping to bring to an end the constant uncertainty about monetary policy that had been caused, again, by erratic and imprudent uses of government power. And we cut taxes, providing business with investment incentives, spurring the accumulation of venture capital by cutting the top rate on capital gains from 28 to 20 percent, and enacting an across-the-board personal income tax rate cut of nearly 25 percent.

Well, this, then, is the record. Things used to be very much worse; now they're very much better. The key was getting government out of the way, and as we turn to the future that remains the key, still. I can never forget the many times that I've said, and still believe, that the nearest thing to eternal life that we'll ever see on this Earth is a government program. They stick around long after the need for them is gone. And we're trying to do something about that.

As we turn to the future -- this remains -- getting government out of the way remains the key still, as I say. And on tax reform, we intend to lower corporate rates and allow most individuals to keep more of their own earnings. Yes, it's likely that this might involve shifting some of the tax burden from individuals to corporations. But with our commitment to revenue neutrality, the question is how the current tax burden can best be distributed to promote economic growth. The answer, I'm convinced, involves economic incentives for all -- and especially lower marginal rates. And that's why for individuals we intend to cut the top individual rate all the way down to 35 percent -- half of what it was when we took office. Business will benefit in turn as these lower rates lead the economy to new prosperity. And let me assure you, as tax reform works its way through the Senate, we intend to make certain that it avoids increases in the cost of capital. Just as we had to do combat to cut taxes in our first term, the battle for second-term tax reform will be long and hard. I was going to ask if I could count on your help, and I'm just going to assume that I can.

And the other crucial challenge facing us now is the need to limit government spending. I say government spending, not the Federal deficit itself, and in doing so I choose my words purposefully. The more the Government spends, the more resources it takes from the private sector. And other things being equal, the fewer the resources available to the private sector, the higher will be the real rate of interest and, in turn, the lower the rate of economic growth. The price competitiveness of our goods on world markets will also suffer, as I'm sure Clayton Yeutter will mention. Whether the Government obtains its funds through taxation or borrowing is, at the most basic level of analysis, irrelevant.

Yes, an accountant looking at the books would say we could eliminate the deficit by raising taxes. But a tax hike would do nothing about the root problem of government expansion -- of government extending its deadening hand to more and more of the economic life of our nation. On the contrary, a tax hike would make the root problem worse and undermine the economic growth we've already worked so hard to achieve. My friends, I just have to believe that we've come too far to go back -- back to the old days of tax and spend. It's time to cut the Federal budget, not the family budget.

And now for Gramm-Rudman-Hollings. The law has its faults, but it represents the most serious effort in decades to come to grips with Federal spending. As you know, 2 weeks ago a three-judge panel of the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia upheld the validity of Gramm-Rudman-Hollings but found the sequester mechanism of the law unconstitutional. Well, this decision does not invalidate Gramm-Rudman-Hollings nor does it diminish the determination of this administration or the responsibility of the Congress to meet the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings targets for deficit reduction. If the Supreme Court affirms this district court decision, there is a valid fallback provision already in the bill which would come into effect. And it would remain the duty of the Congress to legislate the $11.7 billion budget cut already agreed upon for the fiscal year 1986 sequestration.

Regardless of the outcome in the courts, I will go on until the day I leave this office to submit budgets that steadily reduce the Federal deficit. Indeed, the budget we submitted 2 weeks ago meets the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings targets all the way through 1991. It does so in a manner that preserves programs for the truly needy, it keeps our defenses strong, and it avoids any tax hike. It's a budget we intend to stand by, and I urge you to help us get it passed. Our administration and Congress made a promise to the American people. I think we should live up to it.

Think back to the 1950's and the early 1960's -- back to the limited government, reliable currencies, sound monetary policy, and economic growth they helped to promote. In many regards, we can take that period as a model. For we intend to achieve not just a burst of economic growth, but sustained and solid economic growth -- an era of good times and prosperity. That's going to be our target -- has been from the time we came here. New technologies are in place. The growth of past months has shown that the American people themselves are ready -- hard-working, innovative, filled with the kind of confidence and high hopes that our republic has justified in its citizens again and again. We need only reassert the best in our own tradition -- the primacy of private initiatives and the importance of limited government. And the battlefield is Washington, and isn't it worth the fight? I think it is.

Thank you very much, Prime Minister Blaize, Governor-General Scoon, distinguished Prime Ministers, and my dear Grenadian friends. I bring you the good will and affection of the people of the United States. It is my honor to be on this platform with these Caribbean leaders. We stand before you as friends who share a fundamental belief in democracy. Our commitment to humane and representative government is stronger than any tyrant's chains. And I'm certain that my colleagues approve when I say to you, we are grateful to God, today, that Grenada is once again safely within the ranks of free nations.

Now, in a sense, and I mean this in a kind of geographical sense, we are in a way all Americans in this hemisphere -- from the North Slope of Alaska to the tip of South America, these are known as the Americas -- and it's our birthright to live in freedom. It is our heritage. In this quest we stand together, and we shall always stand together. Just in the last 5 years, Brazil, Argentina, Guatemala, Honduras, Bolivia, Uruguay, El Salvador, and, yes, Grenada have returned to democracy. Today 27 of 33 independent countries, countries with 90 percent of this hemisphere's population, are democratic or in transition to democracy. And we won't be satisfied until all the people of the Americas have joined us in the warm sunshine of liberty and justice.

In free societies, government exists for the sake of the people, not the other way around. Government is not directed by the whims of any dictator or the mandate of any clique but by the good sense of the people through a democratic vote. In free societies, people do not live in fear. They never worry that criticizing the government will lead to a late knock on the door, an arrest by some goon squad. When people are free, their rights to speak and to pray are protected by law. And the goons are not running the jails; they're in the jails. In a free society, neighbors don't spy on neighbors; neighbors help neighbors. And that's the way God meant it to be.

As we rejoice in your new, renewed freedom, let us not forget that there are still those who will do everything in their power to impose Communist dictatorship on the rest of us. Castro's tyranny still weighs heavy on the shoulders of his people and threatens the peace and freedom of this hemisphere. Doing the bidding of his faraway master, he has shipped Cuba's young men by the thousands to fight and die in faraway lands. When one recalls the tons of military equipment that were captured here, we can thank God things were changed before young Grenadians, too, were sent off to fight and die for an allied [alien] ideology.

From the first days of my Presidency, I was aware of the growing trouble here in Grenada. We were worried about you and what appeared to be an attempt to turn your island into a staging area for subversion and aggression. I can still remember being awakened early in the morning and told that six members of the Organization of Eastern Caribbean States, joined by Jamaica and Barbados, had sent an urgent request that we join them in an effort to protect lives and to restore order and democracy to your country. There were some 800 students from the United States whose lives were in danger. And there were more than 90,000 of you -- Grenadians, friends, and neighbors -- who were living in fear of never again regaining your freedom. Well, ladies and gentlemen, my dear friends, I will never be sorry that I made the decision to help you, and I made it before the Sun came up.

There is a story, perhaps it's a legend, that in 1933 a group of young boys were in a swimming race across your harbor. And in the midst of the race, according to the story, to the horror of the crowd that watched, a shark appeared and surfaced directly under one young swimmer. For a few terrorizing minutes, the boy was carried on the back of the shark until the shark hit a wharf, and the boy was knocked to safety and pulled out of the water by his friends and neighbors. Well, dear people of Grenada, for a time it appeared that you were like that boy riding on the back of a shark. Your friends held their breath hoping and praying for you. And it was our honor to help you get off the shark. And we're -- all of us up here -- we're just glad we got here before it was time for his supper.

Today in Nicaragua we see a chain of events similar to what happened here. We hear the same excuses made for the Communists, while the people of Nicaragua sell [see] their freedom slowly but surely eaten away. Edmund Burke, a British parliamentarian who championed the cause of American independence, once wrote, ``When bad men combine, the good must associate; else they will fall one by one . . . .'' Well, those words still ring true. That's why we came to your aid. And that is why the United States must help those struggling for freedom in Nicaragua. In the cause of liberty, all free people are part of the same family. We should stand together as brothers and sisters. And if we do, the Nicaraguan people will be able to free themselves from Communist tyranny and win the liberty that you now enjoy in Grenada.

There are those, of course, who claim we must give up freedom in exchange for economic progress. Well, pardon me, but anyone trying to sell you that line is no better than a three-card-trick man. One thing becoming more clear every day is that freedom and progress go hand in hand. Throughout the developing world, people are rejecting socialism because they see that it doesn't empower people, it impoverishes them. In Cuba, Castro has turned a once thriving economy into a basket case. Lately, he's taken to haranguing his people, blaming them for the failures of his dictatorship.

I think it's time that we, the United States and the Caribbean nations working together, showed Castro and his gang how it's done. The foundation is already being laid. I had a conversation with Prime Minister Blaize a few months ago, and he asked if it were possible for the United States to extend more scholarships to Caribbean students. Well, Prime Minister Blaize, I'm proud to announce today that over this year and the next two, we will roughly triple the funding for our training and education programs for the Caribbean. Our goal is to train 1,500 students from these islands each year. And when these young people finish their education and training, we want to make certain that a growing, healthy economy is ready for them. Two years ago, we put in place the Caribbean Basin Initiative, aimed at spurring growth and investment in the Caribbean. The progress resulting from our efforts has been slow but steady. But nothing good happens fast. It takes patience. It takes work on everyone's part.

Prime Minister Seaga [of Jamaica] has urged expanding the provisions of the CBI to permit greater access for Caribbean textiles in the U.S. market. This, he has said, would be a giant step for job creation throughout the Caribbean. Well, I'm proud to announce today a special program that will guarantee access to the U.S. market for Caribbean-produced clothing made from cloth woven and cut in the United States. This will be good for the U.S. textile industry, but it will mean jobs for the people of the Caribbean.

And there's something else brewing that will be a big boost to the people of the Caribbean. Our Congress is considering a change in the tax code to permit funds in Puerto Rico's Development Bank to be used for investment loans elsewhere in the Caribbean. This proposal, worked out with Governor Hernandez Colon of Puerto Rico, has my endorsement and bipartisan support in our Congress. The Governor has spearheaded a drive to persuade United States firms in Puerto Rico to invest in plants in other parts of the Caribbean. And he is committed to the ambitious goal of $100 million in new investment into Caribbean Basin countries each year. Now, three major U.S. firms have already announced plans to place projects here in Grenada, and other projects are moving forward elsewhere in the Caribbean. The tax provisions being considered by Congress are tied to the success of this investment program. We applaud Puerto Rico's contribution and urge congressional approval.

Finally, I would like to announce that the United States will be undertaking, in conjunction with Caribbean governments, a 5-year, $5.5 million program to help support the free and independent judicial systems of the Caribbean islands -- recognized around the world as a pillar of your democratic traditions.

I'd like to take a moment to commend some people who are doing a terrific job in fostering the spirit of freedom and opportunity that I've been talking about -- our Peace Corps volunteers and our Agency for International Development personnel. AID has been working on everything from repairing your roads and water system to finishing up your new airport. Now, of course, it will be used to bring tourists and businessmen, instead of bombers and spy planes. Tourists are nicer, and they're a lot more fun.

The good will between our peoples can also be seen in the many private sector initiatives started here since the liberation. Having been in the film business, I am excited that the Discovery Foundation has provided the equipment and helped you set up a new television station. I -- thinking back to my past, I may have a few old movies around. Do you think anyone around here would like to see them? [Laughter] There are many wonderful people-to-people projects that we could talk about. One of the most heartwarming is Project HOPE. The vast majority of those serving are volunteers, professionals who work hard at their regular jobs and then, in their time off, donate medical- and health-related services to you -- truly out of the goodness of their hearts. These and other volunteers in the Caribbean make all of us back home very proud.

And a word of advice for my good friends. Whether the CBI succeeds and the economies of the Caribbean nations prosper depends as much on what you do as on what we do. High taxes, overrregulation, artificially high exchange rates, and bureaucratic red tape kill enterprise and hope for the future. And I know that your Prime Minister feels the same way. There is much that should be done in these areas by Caribbean countries to put their economic house in order. Needless to say, what you do to reform your systems and to create the environment for jobs and progress is up to you. That's the democratic challenge. But remember, whatever you do, the people of the United States are on your side. We want you to succeed and to prosper. Personally, after talking with these leaders and meeting you today, I am optimistic. What problems you have can and will be solved. In the not too distant future, I see businessmen flocking to the Caribbean. When they do, they will find a bounty of opportunity. They'll find honest, hard-working people, happy and warm people. And they will find democratic government. That has to be a formula for good times.

And as I look around today, I know that St. George's has been a location for many a ``jump up.'' And believe me, I will remember this one. I also know that Queen's Park was the location of a command post during the liberation 2\1/2\ years ago. The people of the United States sent our young men, our courageous soldiers, sailors, marines, and airmen, to protect our own and to save a neighbor in distress. Nineteen of our sons died here; many were wounded. Our brave lads risked all because they believed in those ideals that we've spoken about today: justice, freedom, and opportunity. Let us pledge that their sacrifice was not made in vain. Let us recapture the joyous spirit of liberty that is truly the dream of all the Americans and spend it throughout this hemisphere -- spread it, I should say, not spend it. That is what our fallen heroes would have wanted.

I can't tell you how moved I have been, from the first of you who waved a greeting to me since we've been here and now those of you who we see here. I couldn't feel closer to anyone at this moment than I do to you. And I'm going to take the message back to those Americans back home who aren't here and tell them where we've got an awful lot of good friends. Thank you all, and God bless you. Thank you.

Hemophilia is a genetic disease in which the blood will not clot properly because a specific clotting factor is missing or defective. It is almost exclusively a male disease, affecting one of every four thousand live male births, regardless of race, nationality, or family economic status.

Significant advances have been made in the diagnosis and treatment of hemophilia. Methods of early diagnosis provide the means to institute preventive measures at an early age. Modern blood fractionation technology provides a moderately priced, readily available supply of the needed clotting component for those who must have regular infusions. Still, hemophiliacs face a life of unpredictable medical complications that may result in disability or death.

Proper medical treatment for the hemophiliac, and public awareness and acceptance of this medical condition, will allow the individual to live a normal, productive, and independent life and will dispel many of the common misconceptions of the disease.

To stimulate public awareness about hemophilia and to encourage the development of improved techniques of diagnosis and treatment, the Congress, by Senate Joint Resolution 150, has designated the month of March 1986 as ``National Hemophilia Month'' and authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of this period.

Two days ago I visited with some wonderful neighbors of ours, the people who live on the island of Grenada in the Caribbean. I wish every American could've seen the joy in their faces. I couldn't help remembering that just a short time ago they were living in fear of forever losing their freedom.

For years, trouble had been brewing in Grenada. Power was seized by a radical group with close ties to the Communist world. They kept insisting that they had no intention of stamping out their people's fundamental rights -- the right to speak or to worship God; no intention of imposing a so-called dictatorship of the proletariat. We were told that those holding power in Grenada were simply idealists charting a new and better course for the future. All of this was part of a Communist pattern of deception that has been repeated so many times in so many places. This time, however, tons of captured documents exposed these lies. Today, for example, we know that no one had to push the clique that seized power in Grenada into the arms of the Soviet Union and Cuba. From the very start, they aligned themselves with the international Communist movement and, once in power, moved quickly to undermine the freedom of the Grenadian people.

Their plan almost worked, but then some who were in on the scheme balked when the heavy hand of repression was about to come down. The brutal killings that followed were similar to the fratricidal bloodletting among Marxist-Leninists in Afghanistan, South Yemen, and even among the Salvadoran guerrillas. Sadly, in Grenada, just like elsewhere, many innocent people were also victims.

I vividly remember that morning when I was awakened in the early hours and told that we'd received an urgent call for help from the Organization of Eastern Caribbean States along with Jamaica and Barbados. These neighboring democracies asked us to join them in restoring order and freedom to Grenada. There were some 800 American students and about 200 other American citizens on the island. All were in peril. So, on October 25th American military units began Operation Urgent Fury. Within a short time our citizens were safe, and the people of Grenada had been liberated from the grip of tyranny. Some of our young medical students kissed the ground when they got back home, and our servicemen were hailed as saviors by the local population in Grenada.

The Communists didn't succeed in Grenada, yet a similar chain of events had been happening in Nicaragua. We hear the same old lies, while the Nicaraguan people see their freedom being stolen away. The Communists have suppressed free speech and free press. Nicaragua's Communist dictators have launched a systematic attack against the church, its priests and bishops. And government-instigated mobs mocked His Holiness John Paul II. Meanwhile, the dictatorship is being armed to the teeth with Soviet military equipment. And everyone from the Soviets, Cubans, East Germans to the PLO and Qadhafi's Libyans are turning Nicaragua into a staging area for subversion and aggression against their and our neighbors.

But there's hope for the Nicaraguan people because freedom fighters are now struggling against the Communist dictatorship. Their ranks are filled with campesinos, small farmers who own a few acres of land. Many of them fought against past dictatorships. All they want is to be free and to live under democratic government. Helping those fighting for their own freedom in Nicaragua is both morally right and vital to our national security. If the Communists consolidate their power, their campaign of violence throughout Central America will go into high gear, bringing new dangers and sending hundreds of thousands of refugees streaming toward our 2,000-mile long southern border.

Nineteen American servicemen lost their lives, and many more were wounded liberating Grenada. If we have the courage to do what is necessary now, helping those who are struggling to bring freedom to their country, the Nicaraguan people will be able to liberate themselves. They don't want our troops, just our aid. The people of Grenada know that doing nothing is the worst alternative. Let's make certain we all live up to our responsibility.

These statements strongly reinforce our concerns that the recent Presidential elections were marred by fraud, perpetuated overwhelmingly by the ruling party, so extreme as to undermine the credibility and legitimacy of the election and impair the capacity of the Government of the Philippines to cope with a growing insurgency and a troubled economy. Many authoritative voices in the Philippines have been raised in support of nonviolence. We support these voices and expect them to be respected. We also support resolution of the issues involved by all the people of the Philippines as quickly as possible. Ambassador Habib is now returning from the Philippines and will report promptly on his return.

The American people are watching with great concern and compassion the events unfolding in the Philippines, a long-time friend and ally. The President appealed earlier today to President Marcos to avoid an attack against other elements of the Philippine Armed Forces. Regrettably, there are now reports of an attack. An attempt to resolve this situation by force will surely result in bloodshed and casualties, further polarize Philippine society, and cause untold damage to the relationship between our governments.

The United States provides military assistance to the Philippine Armed Forces in order to strengthen its ability to protect the security of the Philippines, particularly against the serious threat posed by a growing Communist insurgency. We cannot continue our existing military assistance if the government uses that aid against other elements of the Philippine military which enjoy substantial popular backing. The President urges in the strongest possible terms that violence be avoided as Filipinos of good will work to resolve the ongoing crisis.

On January 15 I welcomed the fact that the Soviet Union had put forth arms control proposals which we hoped would help to bring progress in the Geneva and other negotiations. I noted that some elements in the Soviet announcement appeared to be constructive and to build upon our proposals, which we had earlier placed on the negotiating table. Other elements, however, reflected previous Soviet positions, which present serious obstacles to progress.

We made a detailed analysis of these Soviet ideas, and we consulted closely with our friends and allies in Europe and Asia prior to responding to the Soviet Union. These consultations were excellent and made a significant impact on our own thinking. We have now completed our review and reached our decision. I have communicated this to allied leaders, and I have responded to General Secretary Gorbachev. I expressed to Mr. Gorbachev my desire to see progress in key arms control fora and in the other key areas of the U.S.-Soviet agenda: regional issues, human rights, and bilateral matters. I reiterated the U.S. position that the first steps in the nuclear arms control area should be the deep cuts in U.S. and Soviet offensive weapons which are now under negotiation in Geneva.

With respect to the concept advanced publicly by the General Secretary as his ``plan'' for the elimination of all nuclear weapons by the end of the century, I am pleased that the Soviet Union appears to agree in principle with our ultimate goal of moving to the total elimination of nuclear weapons when this becomes possible. Needless to say, this must be done in a careful manner, consistent with the overall requirements for security and stability of the United States and our allies. As the means of accomplishing this, we support a process by which the U.S. and Soviet Union would take the first steps by implementing the principle of 50-percent reductions in the nuclear offensive forces of both sides, appropriately applied, and by negotiating an INF agreement. We believe that the immediate focus should remain on the prompt accomplishment of these first necessary steps. We are also pleased that the Soviet Union has indicated publicly that it now recognizes our long-held position that verification of negotiated agreements is critical. We intend to pursue in specific terms at the negotiating table General Secretary Gorbachev's public offer to resolve any necessary verification issues.

On the other hand, many of the specific details proposed in the subsequent phases of the Soviet ``plan'' are clearly not appropriate for consideration at this time. In our view the total elimination of nuclear weapons will require, at the same time, the correction of the conventional and other force imbalances, full compliance with existing and future treaty obligations, peaceful resolution of regional conflicts in ways that allow free choice without outside interference, and a demonstrated commitment by the Soviet Union to peaceful competition. Unfortunately, the details of the Soviet ``plan'' do not address these equally vital requirements. I would like to make progress now on all of these fronts.

While we will strive for progress across the board, one area where I hope we may be able to make immediate progress is in the negotiations on Intermediate-range Nuclear Forces. Today our negotiators in Geneva have placed on the table a concrete plan calling for the elimination of U.S. Pershing II, ground-launched cruise missiles, and Soviet SS - 20 missiles not only in Europe but in Asia as well, with all such missiles to be removed from the face of the Earth by the end of this decade. I call upon the leadership of the Soviet Union to study carefully the details of our new proposal in the spirit with which it has been offered and to respond concretely at the negotiating table. I urge the Soviet Union to respond as well to the concrete and comprehensive proposals which the United States placed on the table in Geneva on November 1. These proposals covered all three areas of the NST negotiations. Our proposals on strategic nuclear arms as well as on defense and space arms unfortunately have gone unanswered.

Let me emphasize that the place to make real progress in reducing nuclear and other forces is at the confidential negotiating table. The United States is doing its part to foster in the nuclear and space talks and other negotiations the practical give-and-take process which can lead to deep arms reductions. With an equal commitment by our Soviet negotiating partners, real progress is now within our reach.

We have received disturbing reports of possible attack by forces loyal to General Ver against elements of Philippine forces that have come to the support of General Ramos and Minister Enrile. We urge those contemplating such action to stop.

Marcos has pledged to refrain from initiating violence, and we appeal to him and those loyal to him and all other Filipino people to continue to do so. Attempts to prolong the life of the present regime by violence are futile. A solution to this crisis can only be achieved through a peaceful transition to a new government.

The President today announced his intention to appoint Jean Ruley Kearns to be a member of the Board for International Food and Agricultural Development for a term of 3 years. She will succeed Charles J. Marshall.

Black history is a book rich with the American experience but with many pages yet unexplored. A chapter once beautiful and tragic was brilliantly illuminated this very year with the first celebration of the birthday of Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr., as a national holiday. This new holiday symbolizes the trail he blazed for others and the struggle of many Americans for full and unfettered recognition of the constitutional rights of all Americans, regardless of race or color.

The foremost purpose of Black History Month is to make all Americans aware of this struggle for freedom and equal opportunity. It is also a time to celebrate the many achievements of blacks in every field, from science and the arts to politics and religion. It not only offers black Americans an occasion to explore their heritage, but it also offers all Americans an occasion and opportunity to gain a fuller perspective of the contributions of black Americans to our Nation. The American experience and character can never be fully grasped until the knowledge of black history assumes its rightful place in our schools and our scholarship.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-fourth day of February, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

Throughout his tenure, Justice Black fought to maintain the vital principle of separation of powers. He strongly resisted what he regarded as unauthorized efforts of judges to supersede the judgment of the elected representatives of the people and to substitute their own views of appropriate social and economic policy.

Justice Black's long and distinguished career also was marked by his commitment to the Bill of Rights, including most notably a strong belief in freedom of speech, and the importance of a free press to the governance of a democracy. He also was a strong believer in unhindered access to the political process for all persons and to the core procedural protections afforded by the Constitution.

Hugo Black's formal accomplishments as Senator and Justice and his contributions to American jurisprudence cannot overshadow his warmth as a human being, the intimate collegial relationships he developed with colleagues, and remarkable gift for friendship that helped the Supreme Court function effectively through some of the most turbulent episodes in its history.

The President is pleased with the peaceful transition to a new government of the Philippines. The United States extends recognition to this new government headed by President Aquino. We pay special tribute to her for her commitment to nonviolence, which has earned her the respect of all Americans. The new government has been produced by one of the most stirring and courageous examples of the democratic process in modern history. We honor the Filipino people. The United States stands ready as always to cooperate and assist the Philippines as the government of President Aquino engages the problems of economic development and national security.

We praise the decision of President Marcos. Reason and compassion have prevailed in ways that best serve the Filipino nation and people. In his long term as President, Ferdinand Marcos showed himself to be a staunch friend of the United States. We are gratified that his departure from office has come peacefully, characterized by the dignity and strength that have marked his many years of leadership.

It is the Filipino people, of course, who are the true heroes today. They have high expectations for their country and for democracy, and they have resolved this issue nonviolently in a way that does them honor.

Mr. Burnett has been a member of the National Transportation Safety Board since December 1981 and currently serves as Chairman. Previously he was a practicing attorney and served as special associate justice of the Supreme Court of Arkansas. He was a juvenile judge in Van Buren County and a city judge in Damascus, AR.

Mrs. Israel has been a member of the Advisory Committee on Small and Minority Business Ownership since 1984. She is president and chief executive officer of Judy's, Inc., a group of specialty fashion stores located in five States. She is also creator and president of Golden Goose Electronics Corp., an electronic system used by retailers.

When the Congress approved humanitarian assistance for the Nicaraguan democratic resistance last year, it assured the survival of those fighting for democracy in Nicaragua. However, this assistance has not been sufficient to bring about changes in the policies of the communist Government of Nicaragua that would make possible a peaceful resolution of the conflict in Central America and end Nicaragua's aggression against our allies there.

Negotiations based on the Contadora Document of Objectives of September 9, 1983, have failed to produce an agreement, and other trade and economic measures have failed to resolve the conflict. At the same time, the legislation for humanitarian assistance is about to expire. If no further action is taken, it is clear that the Nicaraguan communists will steadily intensify their efforts to crush all opposition to their tyranny, consolidating their ability to use Nicaragua, in concert with their Soviet-block patrons, as a base for further intimidating the democratic nations of Central America and spreading subversion and terrorism in our hemisphere.

In these circumstances, the laws providing for humanitarian assistance to the Nicaraguan democratic resistance permit me to request authority to provide additional assistance, and specify expedited procedures for action by the Congress on my request. I am transmitting herewith a formal request for such additional assistance. As required by law, I have consulted with the Congress in formulating this request.

In reports that I transmitted to the Congress in November 1985 and February 1986, I described the continued efforts by the United States to promote a negotiated settlement in Central America and in Nicaragua based on the Contadora Document of Objectives. Our persistent efforts to achieve a peaceful solution have failed to resolve the conflict because Nicaragua has continued to reject meaningful negotiations. Communist attempts to circumvent and subvert Contadora, apparent from the beginning of the negotiating process, have left a clear trail of lost opportunities for peaceful reconciliation. In most recent months, Nicaragua has repeatedly frustrated negotiations aimed at producing a final, comprehensive Contadora treaty.

Recent Contadora meetings to discuss a comprehensive, verifiable regional agreement have been inconclusive largely due to Nicaraguan intransigence on key issues. Following two rounds of talks in October, on November 11, 1985, Nicaragua made public a letter from President Ortega to the Contadora Group and Support Group governments setting forth objections to the September 12, 1985, draft agreement tabled by the Contadora Group governments. Nicaragua argued that it could not assume the obligations of a Contadora agreement unless it reached a prior accommodation with the United States.

On December 3, President Ortega formally requested a suspension in Contadora negotiations until May 1986, that is until after the governments to be elected in Costa Rica, Honduras, and Guatemala will have been installed. Costa Rica, Honduras, and Guatemala, however, joined 25 other OAS member states in voting for a resolution at the OAS General Assembly in Cartagena that urged continuation of the Contadora negotiations. Of all OAS members, only one member -- Nicaragua -- voted against that resolution. Subsequently, only Nicaragua refused to resume Contadora talks -- a major reason why the United Nations General Assembly failed to achieve consensus on a resolution of support for the Contadora process.

On January 12, the Foreign Ministers of the Contadora Group and Support Group, meeting at Caraballeda, Venezuela, issued a joint statement intended to revitalize the process. The Foreign Ministers of the five Central American states, including Nicaragua, signed the ``Declaration of Guatemala'' on January 15, endorsing the Caraballeda message. Afterwards, the Government of Nicaragua issued a press communique which, although claiming ``total adherence'' to the Caraballeda message, characterized the various actions suggested in the Caraballeda message as prerequisites to resumption of Contadora negotiations. This communique also reaffirmed the Nicaraguan position of November 11 objecting to the Contadora draft agreement.

Meanwhile, the Sandinistas have rejected a February 6 proposal from opposition political parties in Nicaragua for suspension of hostilities, an effective general amnesty law for reconciliation of all Nicaraguans, a repeal of the state of emergency, an agreement for the establishment and observance of a new electoral process, effective fulfillment of Nicaragua's commitments for democratization and international assistance in the implementation of these demands. Also, another Contadora negotiating session held February 14 - 15 was inconclusive because of continued Nicaraguan refusal to address the remaining issues to be resolved in the current Contadora draft agreement.

The request transmitted herewith asks your approval for the transfer of $100,000,000 from funds already appropriated for the Department of Defense so that those funds would also be available for assistance to the Nicaraguan democratic resistance. I am requesting this transfer authority, in lieu of a supplemental appropriation, because I regard this request as a matter of high priority for the national security of the United States. Including a proposal for additional funds in this request would have diverted attention from the basic national security issues here involved. However, the resulting reduction in the funds available for the Department of Defense, if not remedied, will inevitably impair ongoing efforts to restore and maintain the readiness of the armed forces. This impairment in defense readiness will be addressed separately.

Should a peaceful settlement of the conflict in Central America be achieved during the period these funds remain available, the remaining funds could then be used for assistance to Central American countries, including Nicaragua, for relief, rehabilitation, and reconstruction.

Approval of this request will permit me to use any department or agency in the Executive Branch, including agencies involved in intelligence activities, in carrying out programs and activities to assist the Nicaraguan democratic resistance. The statutory requirements for congressional approval of the use of such agencies, as well as statutes requiring prior authorization for the use of appropriated funds will be satisfied by the approval of my request.

Finally, the request contains a series of undertakings by me, which I am asking the Congress to accept. These undertakings, which were developed in consultations with the Congress, are intended to assure that a clear and explicit understanding exists between the Executive and Legislative Branches as to the purposes of the requested assistance to the Nicaraguan democratic resistance and United States objectives in Central America.

In determining how to implement these offers, I will consult with the Congress and will be guided by the observable behavior of the Government of Nicaragua. We will not be satisfied with expressions of intent. But we will respond to changes of behavior in areas such as freedom of the press and religion, reductions of foreign arms and military personnel, respect for a cease-fire, and cessation of support for insurgents and terrorists.

My request affirms that our actions are consistent with our right to defend ourselves and assist our allies, and are directed toward achieving peace based on the Contadora Document of Objectives and a democratic reconciliation in Nicaragua, all without the use of force by the United States. I do not intend to introduce the armed forces of the United States into combat against the Government of Nicaragua, and I affirm that I will not regard approval of my request for assistance as authorizing any such action.

The final undertaking in this request responds to the desire of the Congress to be kept informed about efforts to achieve resolution of the conflict in Central America. I am undertaking to report every ninety days on progress toward a negotiated settlement, as well as on the disbursement of assistance funds and on human rights issues. The continued availability of assistance funds will be contingent upon the receipt by the Congress of these periodic reports.

Since the beginning of my first Administration, there has been no foreign policy issue more directly affecting United States national interests than the conflict in Central America, for this conflict challenges not only our strategic position but the very principles upon which this Nation is founded. We can be justifiably proud of progress in the region to alleviate and ultimately eliminate the causes of that conflict. With strong support from the United States, freedom and democracy, the fundamental pillars of peace, have made dramatic gains. Guatemala, Honduras, and El Salvador have held free and open elections. Costa Rica continues its tradition as a vigorous democratic example. United States economic, political, and military support have strengthened the moderate center in Central America and reversed the tragic polarization on the left and right that threatened to engulf the region in endless violence. As a result, the only president in Central America who wears a military uniform today is Daniel Ortega of Nicaragua. He presides over a repressive regime, armed to the teeth by the Soviets and Cubans, which is the most immediate threat to the progress of its neighbors.

Few now question that the rulers of Nicaragua are deeply committed communists, determined to consolidate their totalitarian communist state. Their long, documented record of brutal repression leaves no room for doubt. Nor can there be any dispute that they seek to export their ideology through terrorism and subversion to neighboring countries. Their neighbors' success in offering democracy as a viable alternative for the people of Central America is a major threat to the system they advocate. The Sandinistas have been constrained principally because they have not yet crushed opposition to their regime at home. The struggle of the Nicaraguan democratic resistance for democracy in their own homeland has provided a shield for democratic progress in other Central American countries. But the Sandinistas, with massive Soviet and Cuban military assistance, have clearly made the elimination of these freedom fighters their number one priority. If they achieve that goal, there will be no remaining obstacle to their efforts to destabilize neighboring states.

Despite this threat to peace, we do not accept that conflagration is inevitable in Central America. The path to peace is clear. The origin of the conflict in Nicaragua is the revolt of the Nicaraguan people themselves against tyranny. A church-mediated dialogue, serious negotiations between the Sandinistas and the external and internal opposition, including the democratic resistance, is the place to begin. The United States strongly supports such negotiations, and we welcome the efforts of the Latin American nations of the Contadora Group and Support Group to promote national reconciliation talks to resolve the Nicaraguan conflict. We will steadfastly support the Contadora process in its efforts to find a solution in Central America that will be the basis for lasting peace. We will also continue to look for flexibility in the Nicaraguan position and are prepared to respond with appropriate measures to encourage them to come to terms with their own people in a democratic framework.

At the same time, we can entertain no illusions that the Sandinistas will enter negotiations on steps to allow legitimate democratic dissent unless democratic forces in Nicaragua can credibly and forcefully assert their right to a voice in Nicaragua's future. The Sandinistas' record of repression of democratic opposition groups leaves little hope that they will willingly follow such a course. They will never embrace open, democratic norms unless confronted with undeniable demands from steadily growing numbers of Nicaraguans prepared to fight for liberty and for their right to participate in their country's political life.

Our experience with the Sandinistas over six and a half years points unmistakably to the need to accompany diplomatic policy with substantial pressure focused on the same objectives. Without power, diplomacy lacks leverage. The Sandinistas will not take meaningful steps toward national reconciliation until they realize that opposition to the consolidation of a Marxist-Leninist regime is too strong to be repressed. Approval of this request will enable the United States to be in a position to provide assistance that permits the resistance to conduct sustained operations in Nicaragua and expand their area of operations. The resistance will be able to incorporate more of the thousands of volunteers waiting to join their forces but who cannot be accepted for lack of supplies. They will be able to establish a stronger presence among a larger segment of the Nicaraguan population, thus increasing the pressure on the Sandinistas to enter into dialogue with all opposition elements, and to negotiate seriously in the Contadora process.

If the enemies of democracy thousands of miles away understand the strategic importance of Nicaragua, understand that Nicaragua offers the possibility of destabilizing all Central America, of sending a tidal wave of refugees streaming toward our southern border, and of tying down the United States and weakening our ability to meet our commitments overseas, then we Americans must understand that Nicaragua is a foreign policy question of supreme importance which goes to the heart of our country's freedom and future. With its vote, Congress will make its decision.

Those fighting for freedom in Nicaragua deserve and desperately need our help. The humanitarian assistance approved by the Congress in 1985 has proven insufficient. Cuban and Soviet military aid in the form of training and sophisticated hardware have taken their toll. If the Nicaraguan democratic resistance is to continue its struggle, and if peace, democracy, and security in this hemisphere are to be preserved, the United States must provide what is necessary to carry on the fight. If we fail to help friends in need now, then the price we will pay later will be much higher.

Section 1. There is hereby established a government-wide program to improve the quality, timeliness, and efficiency of services provided by the Federal government. The goal of the program shall be to improve the quality and timeliness of service to the public, and to achieve a 20 percent productivity increase in appropriate functions by 1992. Each Executive department and agency will be responsible for contributing to the achievement of this goal.

Sec. 6. The Director shall review, through the management review process, each agency's productivity plan based upon the requirements and guidance issued pursuant to Section 5 of this Order. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as displacing agency responsibilities delegated by law.

Sec. 7. The Director of the Office of Management and Budget shall submit to Congress, in conjunction with the President's budget, a report on productivity plans and accomplishments of the agencies and the government as a whole.

The President today signed two Executive orders which will significantly improve Federal Government productivity. The first Order dedicates the Federal Government to a comprehensive program to improve productivity substantially by 1992, while the second revokes 386 obsolete and/or inactive Executive orders.

The goal of the first Executive order, entitled ``Productivity Improvement Program for the Federal Government,'' is to achieve a 20-percent productivity increase in selected high-priority functions as a means of improving quality, timeliness, and efficiency of services Government provides to people. Every 1-percent increase in Federal productivity, which results in an estimated 1-percent reduction in Federal employment, could generate actual savings of about $1 billion, according to the General Accounting Office.

The Executive order will be followed closely by issuance of an Office of Management and Budget (OMB) bulletin containing detailed guidelines for developing, implementing, and assessing agency productivity improvement programs. Agencies' first plans describing how they will improve productivity, and in which areas, are due to OMB by March 31 as part of their annual management improvement plans. The President's Council on Management Improvement will play a major leadership role in implementing this governmentwide effort to boost productivity.

Issuance of the Executive order on productivity continues the momentum begun last July, when President Reagan asked Congress to pass a joint resolution declaring productivity improvement in the Federal sector a national priority.

In a somewhat related action, the President also signed a second Executive order which revokes 386 obsolete and/or inactive Executive orders -- the largest number ever revoked at one time. Based on a study conducted by the President's Council on Management Improvement, the revocations will simplify and clarify requirements placed on departments by the central management agencies of Government (General Services Administration, OMB, and Office of Personnel Management).

Well, congratulations on getting underway with work of the new U.S. Institute of Peace. This Institute, we think, will be a valuable source of scholarly research and information on ways in which we can promote peace with freedom. As Abraham Lincoln reminded us in his second inaugural address: ``We must do all which may achieve a just and lasting peace with all nations.'' We should always remember that peace follows in freedom's path and that conflicts erupt when the democratic will of the people is denied. History shows that democratic nations are naturally peaceful and nonaggressive. Democracies take up arms only in self-defense. I have always put in a sentence that people don't start wars, governments do.

Fundamental conflicts between freedom and tyranny cannot be papered over by treaties. True peace will always demand clear-eyed, rock-hard realism and an enduring commitment to the values of political and economic freedom that have guided our great nation for more than two centuries. Thus, the surest way to strengthen the foundation of peace is to support the growth of democracy and gain full respect for human rights. Supporting a spread of democracy means providing assistance to the brave men and women who today struggle to achieve a free and democratic society and rid their homelands of foreign-supported tyrannies. It also means fighting to help overcome the poverty in underdeveloped countries that breeds violence and radicalism. Free market economic policies, policies that are proven effective in spurring growth and prosperity around the globe, can play a vital role in building democracy. But above all, it means keeping America's defenses strong and ready.

As I intend to tell the Nation tonight, a strong national defense for the United States is not only indispensable to arms control but for the security, freedom, and peace of the entire world. A real and secure peace depends on us, on our courage to build it and guard it and pass it on to future generations. George Washington's words ring just as true today: ``To be prepared for war,'' he said, ``is one of the most effective means of preserving peace.'' American strength is a sheltering arm for peace and freedom in an often dangerous world. And strength is the most persuasive argument we have to convince our adversaries to give up their hostile intentions, to negotiate seriously, and to stop bullying other nations. In the real world, peace through strength must be our motto.

President Reagan. It's been a pleasure to have as our guest President Biya of Cameroon. President Biya's visit is a milestone in the excellent relationship between our two countries. Our discussions were warm and frank, reflecting the good will between us and our countries as well. And I'm pleased to take this opportunity to announce that yesterday a bilateral investment treaty was signed by our governments. President Biya and I are convinced this treaty will spur economic growth and greatly benefit our peoples.

Cameroon, like the United States, is blessed with rich natural resources, a vibrant private sector, and a diverse, industrious population. But resources alone do not guarantee progress, either in economic or political terms; it takes sound, dedicated leadership. President Biya exemplifies this with his energetic commitment to national unity, reconciliation, and the liberalization of his country's political institutions.

Today it's becoming ever more clear to the emerging nations in Africa that Marxist and rigid statist models of development simply don't work. Instead of economic development, political freedom, and national stability, Marxism, an ideology totally alien to African aspirations, has produced nothing but deprivation, tyranny, and conflict.

Cameroon is a shining example of how much can be accomplished when a more realistic and humane approach is taken to political and economic development. By allowing free rein of the enterprise and talents of the people and by providing incentives for them to work and earn, last year Cameroon's economy grew at an annual rate of over 6 percent. Its per capita income is among the highest in black Africa. President Biya's government enjoys a balanced budget, and his country, thanks to the growing vigor of the private sector, is essentially self-sufficient in food. In short, President Biya's wise policies have been a boon to his people.

The President is a highly respected leader in Africa. And today I sought his advice on a wide range of issues. We discussed our mutual concern about international terrorism and about aggression directed against some sub-Saharan States, especially Chad. We agreed on the importance of working together and with other friends countering these dangers.

The United States and Cameroon have for several decades enjoyed a high level of cooperation. Today we have reaffirmed our intention to continue reinforcing our positive and constructive relationship. All Americans wish President Biya continued success in his efforts to build a prosperous and democratic Cameroon. And we wish him Godspeed on his journey home.

President Biya. President Reagan and myself have just had a meeting marked by cordiality and mutual understanding. We have looked at the economic and political situation of Cameroon. President Reagan is very much aware of the progress we have made. Our domestic policies are based on a free market economy and democracy for most personal inititative and the creation of new businesses. Our growth rate has increased considerably. We have opened our borders to foreign investors, and we have excellent relations with the Western nations.

The most important conclusion of our meeting is that there is a strong conversion of views between our two countries, because, like you, we hold particularly dear ideals of peace, liberty, democracy, progress, and moral values, as well as social justice. Like you, we, too, condemn apartheid and nonrespect of the freedom of the Namibian people. I sincerely hope that once again the influence of your nation will help resolve these problems, which are a threat to human dignity. Like you, we condemn violence and terrorism throughout the world. We have opted in favor of a dialog in peace and balance. And we have strengthened our links to other African countries so that together we can make progress.

As I said, our ideas converge on many levels. And my presence here attests that we want to strengthen the ties between our two countries, and we want to strengthen bilateral cooperations. And we already have about 100 American firms established in our country. Our nation is bilingual -- English and French -- and is, therefore, fertile ground for American investors. Our two governments have signed an agreement on the reciprocal protection of investments, which will certainly encourage them. Assistance from the American Government has been of a great help to us, particularly in the fields of agriculture, education, and health. We do appreciate the contribution of the United States to our social life and hope that the number of cultural exchange programs will increase. Since our foreign policy is based on international cooperation, we count very much on the United States. Our relations are characterized by mutual friendship. I hope the United States will help defend our ideals of peace and freedom, which are often threatened in Africa. Your nation and President have our total confidence. We congratulate President Reagan on his meeting in Geneva with Mr. Gorbachev.

I congratulate the Congress on enacting acceptable legislation to accomplish this change so quickly after my veto of H.R. 3384 last month. Like H.R. 4061, H.R. 3384 would have authorized premium rebates for Federal annuitants. However, I could not approve that bill, particularly because it contained a seriously objectionable provision that would have eliminated the current 75-percent limit on the Government contribution to any health insurance plan for Federal employees and annuitants. That provision would have been too costly over the next few years, contrary to our efforts to achieve a balanced budget by 1991.

I am very pleased that the Congress has dropped this expensive provision, and I urge the Congress now to turn its attention to the structural reforms in the Federal Employees Health Benefits Program proposed by the administration. These changes would encourage greater competition and choice of health plans for employees, restructure the formula for determining the Government's share of enrollee premiums, and decrease government intrusion in the program.

The President. Well, good morning, Dave and ladies and gentlemen. And I appreciate you coming over this morning to present your recommendations. And I know you've all worked hard and -- very hard, as a matter of fact -- and I'm glad that your report is bipartisan and unanimous. I've met with Dave over the past few weeks, and he's kept me apprised of your progress. And I'm pleased to say that your work may well be the most comprehensive bipartisan review of the Defense Establishment since World War II. And I plan to review your recommendations in detail, and I will act promptly and firmly to take appropriate implementation actions. And I hope that the Congress will join me and do their part, as well.

Chairman Packard. Well, Mr. President, it is a great honor for me to present this report to you that contains our first set of recommendations. And I speak on behalf of all the Commission to say that we've been very honored to have the opportunity to help you and Secretary [of Defense] Weinberger in this very important job of getting the most defense we can from the billions of dollars that are being spent. And we know that you and the Secretary have made a great deal of progress in the past 5 years in moving ahead toward that end. And I want to tell you that this Commission has worked very hard and that every single member of the Commission has made an important contribution in developing these recommendations that we are presenting to you today. And we hope very much that these recommendations will help you and the Secretary continue this important job to improve the strength and the readiness of our Armed Forces so that they can continue to be the bulwark of freedom and peace in this troubled world of ours.

The President. Dave, I thank you very much. And as I said on Wednesday, the Commission's recommendations point the way and -- been looking forward to getting into this -- and I'll implement the recommendations that are in here just as quickly as it can be done, even if they run counter to the will of the entrenched bureaucracies and special interests. And I will also urge Congress to read the Commission's report and to remove those obstacles to good management that the Congress itself has created over the years. And, again, I thank you all for all the work that you've done.

The President. There is a lot less waste than there was when we came here. And there will be even less as we go forward, as Mr. Packard has told you, with the recommendations that are in here and that he himself has said follow the pattern of things that have already been started.

Q. Mr. President, there are reports that President Marcos has brought millions of dollars worth of currency and jewelry to Hawaii from the Philippines. Is that appropriate considering the economic problems there?

The President. Again, I think that there's no way for us to know anything about this. This is up to the Government of the Philippines and the people of the Philippines. But I think now we've got to get on with some more meetings.

In cities, towns, and rural communities across our Nation, Americans have turned time and again to the American Red Cross for help. And they have not been disappointed. Acting as a conduit for the generous outpouring of time, money, and voluntarily donated blood, the Red Cross has been there whenever needed throughout the past year.

During 1985, an unprecedented series of violent storms, including hurricanes and tornadoes, smashed across our Nation. The Red Cross responded by providing immediate emergency assistance to more than four million Americans displaced by these storms. In small towns and large cities, the Red Cross responded on more than 60,000 occasions to Americans in need, and to families whose homes were damaged or destroyed by fire, flood, or storm. Due to the unprecedented demand for assistance to disaster victims here in our Nation, the funds available to the Red Cross for such vital work have been totally depleted, and yet that magnificent organization continues to provide emergency assistance to individuals and families in need all across America.

The American Red Cross also played an active role as part of an international effort in the harrowing drama of the American travelers hijacked in Beirut, relaying messages from the prisoners to families back home and insuring their safe conduct out of Lebanon. Our Red Cross quickly and efficiently mobilized support for the victims of the terrible Mexico City earthquake and the Colombian volcano eruption, in conjunction with the International Red Cross, while continuing the vital work of feeding and providing medical care for millions of victims of drought and famine in Africa.

As the collector, processor, and distributor of more than half of the Nation's voluntarily donated blood, the American Red Cross took the lead in implementing HTLV - III antibody testing, adding significantly to the effectiveness of recruitment and screening practices already in effect that protect more than one-and-a-half-million recipients of blood and blood products from exposure to the deadly AIDS virus.

All of this was accomplished without the Red Cross cutting back on any of its continuing heavy responsibilities. Millions of our fellow citizens were taught lifesaving techniques in CPR (cardio-pulmonary resuscitation), first aid, water safety, and small craft operation. More than half-a-million emergency messages were relayed worldwide between members of our Armed Forces and their loved ones back home. Nearly six million individuals were served at Red Cross blood pressure screenings and aid stations.

Providing the most efficient and effective help in times of emergency and disaster is an enormous task. But since its founding by Clara Barton in 1881 the American Red Cross has met the challenge. It has been able to do so only because millions of Americans have volunteered their money, time, and their hearts so that those services will always be available.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-eighth day of February, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

Mr. Pendergrass is currently serving as manager for hazards awareness products in the occupational health and safety products division of the 3M Co. He has been with the 3M Co. since 1964, serving most recently as manager for industry hygiene litigation, manager of the specialty consulting service, and industrial hygienist to the associate director.

I have learned with great shock of the tragic death of Swedish Prime Minister Olof Palme. My sorrow in the face of this senseless act of violence is profound. Olof Palme was one of the world's most respected leaders, a man who made compassion the hallmark of Swedish policy. The world will remember him for his devotion to democratic values and his untiring efforts to promote peace. I offer my most sincere condolences to the family of Prime Minister Palme and to the Swedish people in their hour of grief. I also pray for the speedy recovery of Mrs. Palme.

The President today accepts with reluctance and deep regret the resignation of William Casey as Director of Central Intelligence. Director Casey remains in Georgetown Hospital recovering from his recent operation. The President has asked Mr. Casey to become Counsellor to the President whenever Mr. Casey feels his recovery is sufficient to assume those responsibilities. The President and Mr. Casey have enjoyed a long private and professional relationship. The President commends Mr. Casey for his outstanding leadership at the CIA and for his service to the Nation. An exchange of letters will be available later today.

Mr. Gates is the recipient of the Distinguished Intelligence Medal; the Intelligence Medal of Merit; and the Arthur S. Fleming Award, which is presented annually to the 10 most outstanding young men and women in the Federal service. Mr. Gates and his wife Becky have two children.

When I nominated you to this post just over six years ago and you took your seat as a member of my Cabinet, the United States faced an array of foreign policy challenges. Many of these challenges flowed naturally from America's position as leader of the Free World. Others, however, were of our own making, reflecting the relative decline in our military strength and the steady erosion of our intelligence capabilities. We came to office determined to restore that strength and those capabilities, the keys to a future of peace and freedom for ourselves and for all mankind.

To achieve these goals, we needed first to remind ourselves both that our mission was worthwhile and that we were worthy to succeed in it. At such a time, America could not have been more fortunate than to have at its service a person of your experience and courage. First and foremost, you brought to the Central Intelligence Agency a keen sense of history, a deep understanding of the geopolitical forces at work in the 20th century. With the Office of Strategic Services in World War II, you guided intelligence activity in Eisenhower's theatre of operation. You saw the value of sophisticated intelligence during one of the most critical periods in our Nation's history. You saw firsthand what pride and morale mean to those on the front lines of freedom. I know that nothing gives you greater satisfaction than the knowledge that, forty years later, you have helped restore that sense of pride and morale to America's intelligence services during another critical hour.

America has been blessed to have the service and the spirit of Bill Casey. You have given your fellow citizens your very best not only in my Administration, but in all the varied roles you have taken on during your distinguished career. As a businessman, lawyer, author, professor, and public servant, you consistently achieved great success through hard work, a sustained vision of the public good, and fidelity to the values that make our Nation great.

From the days of the campaign in 1980 through the transition and halfway through this second term, I have been fortunate to have you by my side. Your commitment and your achievements will continue in the institutions of government which you led so well and in the cause of liberty you so proudly served.

Since 1984 Dr. Macdonald has been responsible for administering and coordinating Federal programs and activities to improve understanding, prevention, and treatment of alcohol, drug abuse, and mental health disorders. He also served as Acting Assistant Secretary for Health, heading the U.S. Public Health Service, from December 1985 to July 1986, and as one of four Presidential representatives of the Board of Governors of the American Red Cross. He is an Assistant Surgeon General, PHS Commissioned Corps, a rank equivalent to Navy rear admiral. Prior to joining the administration, Dr. Macdonald was a practicing pediatrician in Clearwater, FL, and a national leader in the parents movement against drug abuse. He also was clinical associate professor of pediatrics at the University of South Florida, College of Medicine, and an active member of the Florida Medical Association, serving as chairman of the association's committee on substance abuse. Dr. Macdonald has been affiliated with numerous professional and public organizations and groups. He served as president, Scientific Advisory Board, American Council on Drug Education; president, Florida Pediatric Society; board of directors, National Federation of Parents for Drug-Free Youth; and director of clinical research, Straight, Inc., an adolescent drug treatment program in St. Petersburg, FL. He is the author of numerous articles on substance abuse and related topics for both professional and lay audiences.

President Reagan will continue to provide all information required by those conducting the inquiries into the Iran matter. Should it be determined the material is needed, the President is willing to make available relevant excerpts from his personal notes. This is consistent with his meeting with the Tower board and his commitment to cooperate fully. The President wants to get to the bottom of the matter and fix what went wrong.

Well, President Jordan and Coach Paterno and players of the Penn State football team, let me start by saying congratulations! You know, I was a sports announcer once, and in one broadcast, I referred to the Nittany Lions. And you've got a widespread alumni. I got letters from all over, because I was talking about the Columbia -- or talking to the Columbia Lions. [Laughter] And I found out who the Nittany Lions really were. [Laughter] Well, the undefeated national champions of college football -- it's a title that you all fought hard to win, and the Fiesta Bowl was a fitting end to a proud season. You showed that you deserved to be national champions.

In the 100 years since that November day when Penn State's first football team took the field and beat Bucknell 54 to nothing, I bet there haven't been many more exciting moments than those when, with seconds to go, Miami was knocking and you didn't let them in. First came Tim Johnson's sack of a great athlete, Vinny Testaverde, who had a receiver wide open with a sure chance to score. And then came Pete Giftopoulous' goal line interception; Penn State players and fans will remember it as long as they live. Pete and Tim, you and the entire squad played cool, smart, hard-hitting defense. You forced errors in the opposition, and that's saying a lot, because Miami is an outstanding team, and they don't usually make mistakes.

As for the offense, same story: smart and hard-hitting. Down by 7 minutes to go in the first half, you -- that isn't 7 minutes. I sort of sloughed that. Down by 7, minutes to go in the first half -- [laughter] -- you drove 74 yards; and then with everyone covered and no second chances, John Shaffer ran the last 4 yards himself. And Penn State was on the board and on the way.

Now before I finish, let me say a special congratulations to Coach Joe Paterno. For my money, I think he's one of the greatest coaches ever in college sports. And I'm not thinking just of his two national championships, his four times as coach of the year, his six undefeated regular seasons, his 15 seasons in the top 10, his 80-percent winning record, or his lifetime total of 199 victories. No, I say he's one of the best, because while accumulating all those honors and records, he's never forgotten that, first and foremost, he's a teacher who's preparing his students not just for the season but for life. America is great because through our history we've had men and women with his kind of goodness, honor, and decency; his kind of dedication to his calling; and, yes, his kind of values.

For the purpose of determining qualification for the exceptions from the usual requirements for naturalization, the period of Grenada military operations in which the Armed Forces of the United States were engaged in armed conflict with a hostile foreign force commenced on October 25, 1983, and terminated on November 2, 1983. Those persons serving honorably in active-duty status in the Armed Forces of the United States during this period, in the Grenada campaign, are eligible for naturalization in accordance with the statutory exceptions to the naturalization requirements, as provided in Section 1440(b) of Title 8, United States Code. Qualifying active-duty service includes service conducted, during this period, on the islands of Grenada, Carriacou, Green Hog, and those islands adjacent to Grenada in the Atlantic Seaboard where such service was in direct support of the military operations in Grenada. Qualifying active-duty service during this period also includes service conducted in the air space above Grenada, in the adjacent seas where operations were conducted, and at the Grantly Adams International Airport in Barbados.

Accidental poisonings, in which children swallow medicines or household chemicals, continue to be a tragic public health problem in our country. Since the first National Poison Prevention Week, in 1962, our Nation's yearly death toll has dropped by more than 80 percent. But even as we rejoice in this progress, we resolve to redouble our efforts to reduce the number and severity of childhood poisonings.

Thankfully, a number of organizations, private and public, continue to do a great deal to stop these accidents. The Poison Prevention Week Council coordinates a national network of health, safety, business, and voluntary groups to increase public awareness. The United States Consumer Product Safety Commission administers the Poison Prevention Act and requires child-resistant closures on many products that are potentially dangerous to children. The Poison Control Centers throughout our land provide emergency first aid information if poisonings occur. And many State and local health departments, hospitals, pharmacies, cooperative extension agents, and others conduct poison prevention programs. We can be most grateful for the caring and concern shown by these Americans.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this second day of February, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

On February 2, an estimated 20 million Filipinos went to the polls to vote on a new constitution. This plebiscite is a significant milestone on the path of democratic renewal which President Aquino has charted for the Philippines. Representative civilian government is the very essence of the democratic process. In view of our own history and values, it is an institution the United States encourages vigorously and supports totally. We congratulate the people of the Philippines on their latest, successful exercise in democracy and wish them equally well in the political contests ahead.

The United States pledges continuing support for President Aquino's courageous efforts to maintain her fellow Filipinos' freedom and participation in the political process. These are the surest guarantees that the Philippines will achieve the internal harmony, political stability, and economic prosperity it needs and has earned. The President has sent President Aquino a message conveying his personal congratulations on the successful conclusion of the plebiscite.

It's an honor to have you all here at the White House. Now, I know that must sound strange. Most people think of it as an honor to be invited here, and that includes myself. I remember how humble I felt on that day in 1980 when the American people first asked me to come here. But today the tables are turned. For by your deeds, you and the members of your community have honored all America. You've shown us all, once again, the love and courage, the self-sacrifice and eagerness to help and serve those in need -- in short, the qualities that for generations have been the heart of American life.

It was an ordinary winter's day at the end of the New Year's weekend. Some of you were hanging out laundry. Some of you were about to watch the football game. And then something happened -- investigators are still piecing together just what it was -- and your community was face-to-face with the worst accident in Amtrak history. And that's when, on that ordinary day, the people of Chase, Maryland, showed that what we take as ordinary in America is really very wonderful and special, very extraordinary.

Well, those stories of sacrifice and love were repeated hundreds of times that day. All of you and your neighbors helped people escape the wreck, helped care for them, feed them, and gave them shelter. Nancy Tharpe said there were 45 passengers in her house on that Sunday. As Bob Cooper said later, ``Everybody just chipped in and did what they had to do.'' And as a result, most of the passengers were out of the train even before the emergency crews arrived. In the hours and days that followed, you took into your homes not only the victims of the crash but rescue workers and reporters, too. I don't want to forget the magnificent work of those workers or the people who, within hours, lined up to give blood for the victims. They made us all proud, too.

Some have talked since about how amazing you were, and I know that Cathi Fischer spoke for all of you when she told a reporter, ``I don't think it was anything remarkable. I think if it had been another community they would have done the same thing.'' But that's just the point; you all did what Americans have done for more than two centuries: When others were in need, you didn't point to the other guys. You just rolled up your sleeves and went to work.

Not long ago a commentator on the network news show said that we Americans had become selfish, only out for ourselves, had lost our dedication to community and country. I know he's paid well to give his wisdom to the country each and every week. But for my money, the true wisdom is in Cathi Fischer's words, and the best answer to him is your example. Yes, on an ordinary day in January, Americans in an ordinary American community showed extraordinary courage, self-sacrifice, and love for their fellow man. And when it was all over, you didn't brag and shout. You just went back to your daily work. But you left behind a gift not just for crash victims but for all of us. Your strength strengthened all Americans. Your spirit will long inspire and guide us all. And as President, I just asked you here today so I could say thanks. Thank you all, and God bless you all.

And now I'd like to award the Private Sector Initiatives Commendation to the community of Chase, Maryland. And, Robert Booker, will you please step forward and receive this? This is in recognition of the exemplary community service in the finest American tradition. Thank you all very much. And just for my curiosity, where are the two young ladies sitting that that night cried? I know they're out there with you someplace. There you are. Well, God bless you.

Well, again, I hate to walk away and leave, but they tell me I've still got things to do over there. I haven't told this for a long time, but I got some letters from some young people when I first arrived in Washington. And one of them that always appealed to me was from a little girl and she wrote -- and very informed about the things that were facing me and the problems I had to solve and everything. And when she finished she said, ``Now, get back to the Oval Office, and get to work.'' [Laughter] So, that's what I'll do. Thank you all.

In 1885, Oberlin College established the first department of physical education for women in a coeducational school. Today, some 100 years later, women's sports are a vital component of college life and their impact is felt far beyond the university campus.

The history of women in sports is rich and long and has provided millions with an opportunity for growth, development, and the pursuit of challenging goals. From youth sports to the Olympic arena, female athletes have shown levels of spirit, talent, and accomplishment undreamt of on that midwest campus a century ago.

Participation in sports contributes to the emotional, physical, and intellectual development of women of all ages. Through individual and team activities, young girls develop self-discipline, initiative, respect for fair play and cooperation, and communication and leadership skills that will help them succeed throughout their lives. Early positive experiences strongly influence wholesome lifelong habits of physical fitness, and thus have a direct bearing on the health and well-being of this Nation.

Great strides have been made in women's athletics along with the realization that women are entitled to equal opportunity on and off the playing field. In 1972 only a handful of college athletic scholarships were made available for women; today they number some 10,000. In the past decade the number of women involved in college athletics has grown from 32,000 to 150,000. This same period saw a 110 percent increase in female participation in public high school sports programs. In 1984, the women on our Olympic team brought home 44 percent of the gold medals available to them, making America's female athletes a significant force on the international sports scene.

The number of women participating in sports continues to grow, and we will continue to assure that more opportunities are created. From coach to administrator, women play an important role in the development of athletic programs for people of all ages.

On behalf of the people of the United States of America, Nancy and I are pleased to send our most sincere congratulations to you, the crew and syndicate members of Stars & Stripes. Your victory represents more than just another yachting triumph. It reflects the pinnacle of team work, competitiveness, hard work and American stick-to-it ingenuity. Your patience has paid off and all of America is proud.

On a more personal note, having bet Prime Minister Hawke my favorite cowboy hat on your sailing abilities, I'm pleased to report that my head will remain warm and dry during my next visit to the ranch.

How, with so much against them, could our Founding Fathers have dared so much, to declare for all the world and all future generations the rights of man, the dignity of the individual, the hopes of all humanity? Was it because they believed that God was on their side? Or was it because they prayed to discover how they might be on God's side? Our Founding Fathers knew that their hope was in prayer. And that's why our Declaration of Independence begins with an affirmation of faith and why our Congress opens every day with prayer. It is why the First Congress of the fledgling United States in the Northwest Ordinance provided for schools that would teach ``religion, morality, and knowledge'' -- because they knew that no man, no nation, could grow in freedom without divine guidance.

I grew up in a home where I was taught to believe in intercessory prayer. I know it's those prayers, and millions like them, that are building high and strong this cathedral of freedom that we call America; those prayers, and millions like them, that will always keep our country secure and make her a force for good in these too troubled times. And that's why as a nation we must embrace our faith, for as long as we endeavor to do good -- and we must believe that will be always -- we will find our strength, our hope, and our true happiness in prayer and in the Lord's will.

I'd like to conclude with a story that is told by Dr. Paul Brand, the noted leprosy specialist, in his book ``Fearfully and Wonderfully Made.'' Dr. Brand tells us of how, after World War II, a group of German students -- young people -- volunteered to help rebuild a cathedral in England that had been a casualty of the Luftwaffe bombings. And as the work progressed, debate broke out on how best to restore a large statue of Jesus with his arms outstretched and bearing the familiar inscription: Come Unto Me. Careful patching could repair all damage to the statue except for Christ's hands, which had been destroyed by bomb fragments. Should they attempt the delicate task of reshaping those hands? And finally the young workers reached a decision that still stands today. The statue of Jesus has no hands, but the inscription now reads: Christ Has No Hands But Ours. Isn't that really what he was always trying to tell us? Trying to tell us that we must be the hands, as we've heard so eloquently here by so many already today.

As Americans prepare to celebrate the Bicentennial of the Constitution, we have an opportunity to explore once again the richness of our founding document and the changes it has undergone throughout its two centuries of existence. The experience of Black Americans is a critical part of that history, holding enduring lessons for all of us about the true meaning of liberty. Black Americans fought in the Revolution which gave birth to this Nation, but it took the Civil War, several amendments to the Constitution, and a series of actions by the Supreme Court, the Congress, and the Executive to secure true equality of rights for Black Americans. The story of Black Americans is the story of their continuing struggle to see fulfilled for themselves and for their children the promise and the dream of America. It is a story whose final chapters have not yet been written.

Without an understanding of America's past, we will not find the way to a future of opportunity for all. Black History Month affords every American the chance to study and to learn more about the contributions of Black Americans to our Nation's progress, from great figures like Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr., to the unsung, everyday heroes who helped build, lead, and defend a land that for so long asked more of them than it offered to them.

May this traditional observance lead all of us to work still harder for the day when no trace of prejudice or injustice remains to undercut the Constitutional rights accorded every American. To this goal, in February 1987, let us pledge anew our unswerving commitment.

The Constitution is the anchor of our Republic. Through it, we are all equal under the law, just as we are brothers and sisters in the sight of the Almighty. This bicentennial year is a singularly appropriate time to reflect on its importance to each of us.

Although the Founding Fathers could scarcely have imagined the society we have become 200 years after they hammered out the Constitution, this magnificent document remains as relevant and timely as the day the final draft was signed. The principles it embodies are timeless: protection of the individual against the state, the separation of powers among these different branches of the national government and a Federal system preserving the role of the States and, most important of all, the recognition that government derives its authority from the consent of the governed.

I call upon all Americans to join the National Conference of Christians and Jews in celebrating the vibrant, richly diverse society the Constitution has made possible in America. As we observe Brotherhood/Sisterhood Week, let us all put our names on the line as our Founding Fathers did; and let us pledge to uphold the ideals that have kept us, in all our racial and religious variety, one nation under God.

In my 1986 State of the Union Address, I charged my Domestic Policy Council to present me a strategy to meet the financial, educational, social, and safety concerns of poor families. I took that action because I did not know anyone in America who believed then, or believes now, that the current welfare system is working for families in need. The sad truth is that, despite our best intentions, the welfare system is failing; the system traps people in a cycle of dependency that robs them of dignity. We can and must do better.

Restructuring our welfare system must be a top national priority, but it is clear from 20 years' experience that no single policy mandated from Washington can solve this problem. Our goal instead must be to establish a process that allows states and communities to implement their own anti-poverty ideas based on their own unique circumstances. The Federal government must retain its current level of financing, but individual states and communities can best find the solutions to welfare dependency that will work best among their citizens and in their neighborhoods.

Many governors have already broken new ground with creative and unique approaches. I applaud those efforts, and want to begin a process to encourage many more of these state and community-based reform efforts.

I invite you to join me at the White House on Monday, February 23, during the National Governors' Association Winter Meeting in Washington, to share your recent experiences and ideas on reducing welfare dependency and poverty in your communities. Together we must persuade Congress to provide you the tools necessary to create a better life for Americans in need.

Enclosed for your review is a copy of ``Up From Dependency,'' my Administration's report on the welfare system, and its companion volumes. The report describes the crucial role you can play in our proposed national strategy. I hope you will review it in preparation for our discussion, and I look forward to seeing you later this month.

This week I wrote to the Nation's Governors asking them to come to the White House to discuss welfare reform when they visit Washington later this month. On Monday I'll be speaking to a group of concerned citizens about our welfare reform ideas. And later in the coming week, I'll be releasing the Domestic Policy Council's report, a study and series of proposals entitled ``Up From Dependency.'' All these initiatives are based upon my conviction that welfare reform is not just important but vital -- vital to our economic well-being; vital, indeed, to our self-respect as a nation. Permit me to take a few moments this afternoon to share with you why I believe this is so.

The sad truth is that our welfare system represents one long and sorry tale of disappointment. From the 1950's on, poverty in America was on the decline as economic growth led millions up toward prosperity. Then, as the Federal Government began to spend billions on welfare programs, poverty stopped shrinking and actually began to grow worse. For the first time in our nation's history, millions of Americans became virtual wards of the State, trapped in a cycle of welfare dependency that robs them of dignity and opportunity. With our economic success of the 1980's, the poverty rate has begun to shrink, but the problem of welfare dependency remains. No one doubts that welfare programs were designed with the best of intentions, but neither can anyone doubt that they've failed -- failed to boost people out of dependency.

In the fight against poverty, we now know it's essential to have strong families -- families that teach children the skills and values they will need in the wider world. How many self-made men and women in America owe their success to the strength of character given to them by hard-working, loving parents? Yet when we ask whether our welfare system has encouraged family life, we must answer: far from it. Among the welfare poor today, families as we've always thought of them are often not being formed. Since 1960 the percentage of babies born to unmarried mothers has more than tripled. And too often the mothers themselves are only children -- 15, 16, 17 years old -- who, with the birth of their babies, find all the responsibilities of grownups thrust upon them. As for the fathers, much of the time they're nowhere to be found.

We're also coming to understand that our welfare system weakens community values and self-esteem. As a lack of skills prevents our young people from obtaining the jobs and careers they want, their hope for themselves and their neighbors disappears. To reverse this terrible cycle of despair, we must build on the vitality and strength in our communities. We must work with our young people as they strive to achieve the basic educational and work skills they need for a bright future. To do this, we must make dramatic changes in the old, unworkable government programs. With less than half of the billions now spent on welfare, we could give every poor man, woman, and child enough money to lift them above the poverty line. My friends, I believe we're too great a nation, too generous of heart, too bold in finding solutions, to permit this waste of lives and money to continue.

In seeking solutions, we should return to the basic values that helped build this nation: faith in families, faith in individual dignity and work, and faith in our Federal system of government. During my meetings and speeches this coming week, I'll be setting out our proposal for welfare strategies that tap that faith. Washington may have failed to find solutions to poverty and welfare dependency, but many of our 50 States and hundreds of community leaders are making progress, due in part to the new leeway we've given them in the last 6 years. Now, they're ready with many more promising antipoverty ideas -- if only our complex welfare system will allow them greater freedom to succeed. I will ask Congress to approve a process that gives them that freedom.

We know the solutions to welfare dependency must come from States and communities, and those of us here in Washington must have the courage to let them try. Our welfare system will continue to help those who can't help themselves. We have learned that we must provide the pathways and tools that allow our needy to escape dependency and create a better life. As I've said before, the only true measure of a welfare program's success is how many people it makes independent of welfare.

You will find in the pages of the Report detailed material on the three rounds of Nuclear and Space Talks and on the talks that General Secretary Gorbachev and I had in Reykjavik, October 11 - 12. Details on progress made at the Conference on Disarmament, the Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe, and the Mutual and Balanced Force Reduction talks are also included. Our efforts to control the proliferation of nuclear weapons are discussed and the many details of arms control research are highlighted. This Report, as well as previous ACDA reports, contains a great deal of useful and informative historical material.

I'm also glad to have you here because I know each of you has struggled mightily to change America. Yet, even with our anxiousness to get on with the conservative agenda, it's sometimes important to recall how far we have come together. I always think back to the sixties and seventies -- and, well, even before then -- when our concern about Federal spending and deficits fell on many a deaf ear here in Washington. And then when we started talking about tax cuts and tax limitation, as well as lower marginal rates, official Washington was more amused than anything else.

Well, whatever our critics say, I think all of us can be confident that the American people realize -- just as I think someday historians will acknowledge -- that moving back to concepts like limited government and the free market, as well as respect for the entrepreneur, created one of the most important social and economic revolutions in our history. Not only did we grow and prosper economically but we renewed our political and social life as well. Government's inability to do anything about the burden that inflation and taxes were putting on our citizens was weakening public faith in our democratic institutions, a trend that today we have reversed.

Or consider the social damage we were doing to the most basic unit of society, that engine of social progress -- the family. For years inflation and taxes robbed the family of more and more of its livelihood -- an economic factor, of course, but as I say, a moral factor, too. For government said to young couples: We will tax you at higher rates for getting married. And in the years ahead, we will turn the screw of bracket creep even tighter, and then we'll let inflation rob your savings and erode your personal exemption -- in effect, imposing a higher and higher tax on your children. Well, is it any wonder then that in this period more and more of our young people postponed marriage or didn't marry at all, and postponed having children? But by bringing down tax rates, inflation, and interest rates, by ending bracket creep, we've made family life safer and more secure. And we can be proud today that the downward trend of marriage, family formation, and childbearing appears to be arrested. The simple fact is government had taken a stand against families. But thanks to your help and support, we're turning that around; we're putting government back on the side of families.

There's been another important dimension to our economic recovery. We're helping the poor as never before. There is, for example, no crueler burden on the poverty-stricken and the elderly than inflation. And by bringing inflation to a virtual standstill, we substantially increased the buying power of the poor families of America. So, too, our recent reform of the tax code will take millions of working poor people off the tax rolls entirely. Above all, we've built an economy that is creating millions of new jobs every year, providing growth and opportunity the poor need more than anyone. And that's why more than one-half million people moved off the poverty rolls in 1985. This economic recovery and social and political renewal have made it possible to focus on some of our deeply ingrained problems, like doing something about poverty. And it's here, I think, that we conservatives have an unrivaled opportunity in the years ahead, a cause that I believe we can make our own.

You know, America's welfare system has been a longstanding concern with us. But too frequently that concern has been interpreted as merely a desire to prevent waste or fraud or stop welfare abuse. Well now, don't get me wrong -- those are worthy and important objectives. Protecting the taxpayers' investment in Federal spending is a worthy objective -- especially since we want our Federal welfare spending to go to the people who really need it, the poor themselves, and not to people who already live comfortably. And all the economic progress that we've made, for example, has relied on trying to control Federal spending. When we took office, huge Federal programs with built-in yearly spending increases were just reaching maturation.

But none of this would have been possible without the war on waste we began from our first day in office. Working with the Congress, we completely revitalized the Inspector General's program and saved the taxpayers untold billions. Last year, for instance, the Inspector General at Health and Human Services launched over 3,000 audits and investigations of fraud against the Government that resulted in 1,000 convictions. The office's fraud and management recommendations will recoup more than $5.3 billion when fully implemented. So, the war on waste and fraud has been an important part of our ability to bring down spending and ultimately to improve economic conditions for the poor. But I just think that waste and fraud isn't all we conservatives have to offer on the poverty problem -- not by a long shot.

Back in 1982, in a speech to a black political organization, I raised some of the questions discussed by the scholarly work of Charles Murray in the ``Public Interest.'' At the time this wasn't exactly fashionable, but since then things have been changing. Slowly a new bipartisan consensus on America's welfare system has developed -- a consensus that holds what only a few could say a short time ago: that it is our welfare system that is one of the most serious obstacles to progress for the poor. The evidence is in, and the history is clear: Twenty years ago, with the best of intentions, the Federal Government began a program that it hoped would wipe out poverty in America. Today the Federal Government and State governments, with 8 major welfare programs and more than 50 smaller ones, spends more than $130 billion to pursue this objective. And now, with less than half of this money, we could give every poor man, woman, and child enough to lift them above the poverty line. But believe me, it isn't just the arithmetic that doesn't make sense. During the past few years, we've seen serious questions raised -- in scholarly works like Mr. Murray's book ``Losing Ground,'' which showed poverty actually went up as the Federal Government spent more to eliminate it, to major network television specials featuring grim personal testimonials about the Federal welfare system. And the issue here is really compassion.

And I just think conservatives should have a special interest in this because, as I've mentioned, our original skepticism about the welfare system has been sadly borne out by recent research. But second, strengthening the family has been among our highest priorities and, believe me, no one needs that strength and help today more than America's poor.

Let me pause here and cite as an example one disturbing problem we hear so much about: the homeless. Here in Washington there's a young Capuchin Franciscan priest named Father Jack Pfannenstiel who not only runs shelters for the homeless but has started a project called McKenna House, a kind of halfway house where the homeless are not just warehoused but given special counseling and training so that they might return to productive jobs and normal lives. And while the problems of the homeless are complex and deepgoing, when Father Pfannenstiel is pressed on the issue, he always remarks that at the root of these problems is a history of family breakdown and difficulty. So, I just think the time is ripe for realizing our traditional concern with strengthening the family is directly related to this emerging national consensus on the welfare issue. I think conservatives and Republicans can now join with liberals and Democrats in reappraising that entire system and examining the reason for its failure. There is common ground. We all know it isn't working. We know there will be no easy answer -- it's the belief that there were easy answers that got us into the situation in the first place.

We have to fight the impulse of many to believe that one policy change or reform, written and implemented here in Washington, can solve the problem of poverty and welfare dependency. We know from 20 years painful experience that it cannot. In seeking solutions we, as a nation, need to draw upon the practical genius of the thousands of community leaders and individuals who deal with that problem every day. The Federal Government should retain its current financing role, but it cannot provide all the answers. We need to reevaluate our entire antipoverty strategy -- a reevaluation that will provide us with new approaches and initiatives, initiatives that will have as their goal the defense and strengthening of the family as the key to a strategic assault on poverty. And that's why last year I asked for a study of our welfare system. The recommendations of that study, ``Up From Dependency,'' are now being implemented. It's also why on Wednesday of this week I will have a chance both to hear about and describe some of the approaches we hope to take in getting what is essentially a research and development program off the ground. So, too, in my radio talk on Saturday I mentioned that we had written to the Governors of the 50 States and asked them here to the White House to be a part of this nationwide commitment to welfare reform.

And today I just want to seek your active support, to ask you to join together with many millions of other Americans in this critical domestic initiative. We know the answers are out there -- in our 50 States, in our cities and neighborhoods, and in the minds and hearts of the thousands of self-help leaders who are ready with hundreds of antipoverty ideas -- if only our complex welfare system will allow them greater freedom to succeed. They can show us how to make work more rewarding than welfare; how to provide incentives for dignity, instead of incentives for dependency. And I'm certain that we can, as a nation, move forward and together on this issue. I've said a great many times, instead of citing at the end of each year how many people were being maintained on welfare -- if the program was really correct, every year they would be saying how many people we had been able to remove from welfare and restore to a position of independence. Now, all of us care about the poor, all of us want to see the tragedy that is poverty ended. So, let's get to work. Now, I realize there's going to be some crabbing, and there's going to be some of the same kind of press that, well, I've been getting kind of used to in the last few weeks.

So, even though there may be some misguided criticism of what we're trying to do, I think we're on the wrong [right] path. And you know something else? From dealing as a Governor closer at hand with welfare, and those people, I think truly that the bulk of the people on welfare aren't just lazy bums or cheaters -- they want nothing more than to be independent, free of the social workers, and out on their own once again. So, we can help them do that.

The President. Well, Stars & Stripes skipper Dennis Conner, members of the crew, and ladies and gentlemen, today the Cup that went down under has come back up. It's only appropriate to be greeting the skipper and crew of the Stars & Stripes here in front of the Stars and Stripes.

But there are so many people who helped to make this victory possible. Altogether, the United States was represented by six syndicates in Australia. Each had its own yachts, and each involved literally hundreds of people, bringing the best of American technology to bear on the complicated challenges of 12-meter racing. In designing Stars & Stripes herself, engineers used computer techniques to provide the yacht with a winged keel and a special rounded nose. Plastics experts gave the hull a coating that sheeted the yacht with thousands of tiny V-shaped grooves called riblets. Sailmakers used a mixture of Kelvar, Mylar, and an entirely new fabric, Spectra, to produce hundreds of sails suited to every conceivable weather condition. And Stars & Stripes was fitted with an on-board computer to monitor her performance and communicate before the race with computers on shore and in her tender. I just have to believe it says something about the competitiveness of American technology that this time around the United States entered perhaps the best designed, most technologically advanced, 12-meter yacht ever christened.

But no matter how sleek the yacht, it still all comes down to what the skipper and crew do with her on the open ocean. To the skipper, the navigator, tactician, mainsail trimmer, pitman, bowman, sewerman, grinders, and trimmers of Stars & Stripes: Congratulations! You performed up to the highest standards in conditions that were arduous and exhausting, and you made considerable sacrifices to do so.

The President. All that you said that was printable was, ``Hey, that's too bad.'' [Laughter] But then, while your crew scrambled to replace the bad sail, you calmly tacked to keep your opponent from gaining the wind. And in 3 minutes and 2 seconds both the new jib and jig were up, and Stars & Stripes won the race.

Beyond your skill, Dennis, there's the matter of your commitment, the matter, to put it simply, of heart. One of your crewmen caught a glimpse of just how much it all meant to you. In his words: ``Before the last tack Dennis said, `Okay, guys, this is the last tack in the 1987 America's Cup.' I turned around and looked back, and he was crying. He had tears in his eyes.'' And the crewman went on to explain: ``You have to remember that this hasn't been any gravy walk for Dennis. He's a regular American guy, a smart guy who worked his way up from the bottom and deserves the credit for what he's done.'' Well, Dennis, today we congratulate you, and today we give you that credit.

The President. And a word now to your Australian hosts and competitors. Ambassador and Mrs. Dalrymple, of course, millions of Australians must be disappointed by the outcome of these races, just as so many Americans felt the 1983 loss so keenly. But I want you to know that I've heard again and again, from Dennis and others, that the Australian people could not have been more open, friendly, or sportsmanlike. On behalf of the thousands of Americans who visited Australia for these races, I want to thank Prime Minister Hawke, the Perth Yacht Club, and the Australian people themselves.

I can't help thinking that the America's Cup has brought our two nations, already close, still closer. For in following these races, we were all able to share something ancient and deep within us: man's fascination with wind and water. Listen, if you will, to the words of sportswriter Tony Chamberlain: ``In sailing there is a term called `lift' which is both technical and poetic at once. It describes the moment of acceleration in a sailboat -- the moment when the sails harden against the wind and the boat begins to slide forward, faster and faster, until you can suddenly feel what William Buckley meant by the title of his sailing book, ``Airborne.'' How something moving so slowly -- about the pace of a moderate jog -- can impart such exhilaration in this moment is probably unanswerable. Hang gliding, dropping in a parachute, doing barrel rolls in a light airplane -- the thrills are easy to understand. But the moment of lift in a sailboat is just as much a leap off the Earth. Airborne.'' Well, gentlemen of the Stars & Stripes, for a few days you enabled us all to become airborne, and we thank you.

This is not only a victory for the great crew and team of Stars & Stripes; it's a victory for American technology, a victory for the American will to compete anywhere in the world, and I might say, and be able to win. It's really a victory for the American spirit, of which you've done such a tremendous job to be our leader. And I can't tell you how much it means to the entire team and support crew of Stars & Stripes to be part of this tremendous victory in bringing the Cup back home, where it belongs. And I'd just like to say thank you all for the tremendous reception that we got. We had no idea what it would be like when we got home. We were 12,000 miles away, and we were just concentrating on winning the Cup. And it just meant so much for us to come back and have this tremendous reception. And we just can't tell you how great it is to be back home in America. It really means a lot to see all of our friends and supporters to be with us in this tremendous victory.

And I'd just like to take a moment and add to the President's comments about what tremendous people the Australians were. In defeat, they couldn't have been more gracious, and they just were wonderful sportsmanship. And any of you that have the chance to visit Australia will find out for yourself, but I'm sure anyone you talk to on the Stars & Stripes group will tell you and reaffirm what tremendous people they were in Western Australia. And they were really part of the whole Cup. So, my congratulations to the people of Australia. As a remembrance, Mr. President, from the crew of Stars & Stripes, we'd like to have you display this wherever you choose and remember us here in our victory -- a half-model of our boat. It's the first one we've seen, and we'd like to have you have this as a part of our victory.

The Stars and Stripes team, representing the San Diego Yacht Club, traveled to the west coast of Australia to compete with the best yachts and best yachtsmen in the world. In a lengthy series of exhausting and exciting races, it successfully defeated eleven challengers for the right to face New Zealand in the finals of the challenger's division. Although the Kiwi had compiled a most impressive record in earlier races, Stars and Stripes defeated the New Zealand boat 4 to 1 to earn the right to sail for the Cup against the Australian defender.

In the final series, Stars and Stripes defeated Kookaburra III 4 to 0 to capture the America's Cup and bring the trophy back to the United States. Throughout the competition, the Australian team and the Australian people demonstrated to the world their sportsmanship and their unsurpassed hospitality.

The skill and determination of the Stars and Stripes team captured the imagination of the American people. They demonstrated the traits that have long characterized this country at its best -- optimism, dedication, teamwork, and an eagerness to master the most advanced technology and put it to good use.

In honor of the Stars and Stripes' victory in the America's Cup, the Congress, by House Joint Resolution 131, has authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation expressing to Dennis Conner and the crew the thanks and admiration of our Nation.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this ninth day of February, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

Annex V prohibits (subject to limited exceptions) the disposal from ships into the sea of all plastics, including but not limited to synthetic ropes, synthetic fishing nets, and plastic garbage bags. It also restricts the discharge at sea of other types of garbage to specified distances from the nearest land.

I hope you're enjoying your visit to the Nation's Capital, and I appreciate the opportunity to speak with you. Over these last 6 years I've depended heavily on the American Legion. James Dean, Evelyn Starr, and Dale Renaud -- they've all been indispensable in the fight for a strong and secure America. I'd just like to express to you and to legionnaires around the country my deepest appreciation for being there when it counted. It's been an honor to serve with you.

Well, seriously though, the Legion continues to play a vital role in this democratic system of ours. Six years ago we set out to make up for some of the foreign policy and national security shortcomings of the last decade. We shouldn't permit the memory of American weakness, and the consequences of that weakness, to fade. During the 1970's the defense budget shrank in real terms as we held back from building new weapons systems. Our Navy lost more ships than it did at Pearl Harbor. New equipment was scarce. Spare parts were in short supply, and inflation ravaged the value of our military personnel's take-home pay.

Since 1980 we've reactivated 4 battleships, purchased 124 new naval vessels, including 2 new carriers and 21 top-of-the-line Aegis class cruisers and destroyers. The Army has 2 new divisions. We've bought over 2,500 tactical fighters, and we've made certain there are ample spare parts, not just for the planes but for all the weapons and equipment. One of our top priorities was to restore morale to those brave and dedicated citizens serving in our Armed Forces and to attract top-quality individuals to the job of protecting our country. Well, there's nothing that's made me prouder in these last 6 years than those young people -- smart, fresh-faced, and full of life. They've answered the call. And today we have the best bunch of young people in our Armed Forces that we've ever had -- the highest percentage of high school graduates in our history, the highest percentage in the top intelligence bracket when they're being tested for various branches of the service or duties within the service. I know you agree with me that those kids will never let us down, so we better darn well see to it that this government, no matter what party is in power, never lets them down.

I've gotten some letters sometimes that they turn me inside out. A kid writes -- he's in a submarine -- he writes, and he says: We may not have the biggest navy, we got the best. And you hear things like that. I was over on the parallel in Korea, the demilitarized zone over there. And a young fellow standing up there in the cold and looking out over the no-man's-land to the other side and he just turned to me, and he said, ``When you get home,'' he said, ``tell them we're on the frontier of freedom.'' And it happens everyplace. So often those who oppose defense spending don't think about it in human terms. Those youngsters out on the aircraft carriers and the submarines and destroyers, our Army and Air Force personnel in Korea and Germany, the Marines in Okinawa and with the Sixth Fleet in the Mediterranean -- they depend on us every bit as much as we depend on them. We made a promise that they'd have the first-class equipment and weapons they need to do their job and come home safely. And the budget is not going to be balanced at the expense of their safety and America's security.

You know, back there in that '80 campaign, I campaigned an awful lot -- not on making speeches like this, but on doing question and answer, even in crowds that would number in the thousands. And invariably, then, I would get a question that would be: Well, all right, but if it comes to a choice of balancing the budget or rebuilding our defenses, which will come first? And every time, I said I have no choice. Rebuilding our defenses would come first. And every time I said it to an American audience, they did what you are just doing. [Applause] They applauded. Well, fulfilling that promise in this time of budget restraint means making certain that the maximum benefit is squeezed out of every dollar spent on defense.

To accomplish this, we've put in motion one of the most aggressive campaigns against waste and fraud in the history of the Defense Department, aggressively following up on every lead. Many stories early in the administration -- and, oh how they curdled my blood -- about procurement waste. You know, those outrageously expensive bolts and wrenches and such were actually not stories of faults that were still existing. They were actually stories of our successful efforts to make corrections. We were the ones who found out those $400 hammers and so forth and got them corrected. But somehow it never seemed to read that way. [Laughter] Well, we've continued this commitment. The Defense Department, for example, is doing even more to ensure that competitive bidding is brought into the procurement process. And this year we're, for the first time, submitting a 2-year defense budget. This will, we hope, replace the old, year-by-year, up-and-down approach, which has proven both wasteful and inefficient. We're also moving forward on changes mandated in last year's Goldwater-Nichols bill and reforms recommended by the Packard commission. In short, defense management has been and continues to go through a dramatic period of revitalization.

Today, clearly, history is on the side of the free. In our own hemisphere we've witnessed an historic expansion of democracy. Ninety percent of the people of the Americas now live in democratic countries or countries in transition to democracy. And throughout the Third World, the failure of socialism is becoming increasingly evident. Cuba's tyrant has taken to haranguing people for failures that are inherent in the system he's imposed on them. In Ethiopia, it's becoming even more apparent that it is Marxism more than drought that brought such misery and the starvation to a once proud people. The despotism and atheism of communism have even spurred resistance movements that are threatening Soviet colonial regimes in Afghanistan, Angola, Cambodia, and Nicaragua. It's both in our national interest and consistent with our traditions as a free people to assist these brave souls who are struggling for their freedom and national independence. That's especially true when it comes to those fighting Soviet-backed tyranny in Central America. We must not and will not abandon them. If you hear anyone anymore talking about the danger of Nicaragua becoming a Communist totalitarian state, correct them -- it is a Communist totalitarian state. And we're helping the people that are trying to change that.

General Douglas MacArthur, a leader I deeply respected, is said to have written that no man is entitled to the blessings of freedom unless he be vigilant in its preservation and vigorous in its defense. Well, it's all up to us now. We are the heirs of MacArthur, Pershing, Jefferson, and Washington -- and of those Americans who put their lives on the line from Bunker Hill to Belleau Wood, from Normandy to Khe Sanh. We will be vigilant in the preservation of freedom and vigorous in its defense because we will not let down those who came before us or those who will follow.

I thank you and your fellow legionnaires for all you're doing to meet this sacred responsibility. And for the ladies present -- having referred to that rough and ready Teddy Roosevelt a couple of times -- I think you ought to know that in that era, there was no West Wing to the White House and East Wing. All the offices and the Cabinet meetings and everything else took place there in the Residence. And then one day Mrs. Roosevelt proved to be a match. She said to the President of the United States, ``If I'm going to raise six kids in this house, you're going to get your people out of here.'' [Laughter] And they did.

In giving this response, the White House Counsel relied upon a written opinion from the General Counsel of the Department of Defense, who confirmed earlier oral advice on this matter when similar issues were raised in December. Mr. Wallison also pointed out that the President has made clear his desire that both Poindexter and North cooperate fully with all ongoing inquiries, consistent with their rights. In December the President proposed a procedure for obtaining their testimony without violating their rights against self-incrimination. He asked that the Senate Select Committee on Intelligence grant limited use immunity to Poindexter and North so that the facts would be known without precluding prosecution based on other evidence.

As you know -- but maybe those from the press don't -- in the past year we've been going around the country asking the experts about how the welfare system works and doesn't work. Now, asking experts is not a new thing in the area of welfare reform. Time and again over the years, government has inquired of professors and welfare professionals why people are poor and why they stay poor. And, forgive me for saying this, but the result has been a welfare system that's very good at keeping people poor.

But when we began to look at welfare reform, we changed the experts and we changed the questions. For the last year our experts have been people who know welfare firsthand, who've actually been on welfare, particularly who've gotten on and gotten off. And we've talked to hundreds of these people. We've talked to hundreds more who've set up self-help groups in their communities -- self-help groups that really worked and that really helped neighborhood people become self-sufficient. And these have been our experts. And our questions have been: How'd you do it? How did you get off welfare? How did you become self-sufficient? How did you set up a group to help yourselves and your neighbors?

Now, I've been told that this has been the first time in the history of the welfare system that government has asked not how people fail -- that's how they get on welfare and stay on -- but how they succeed. And that is, how they get off welfare?

And I'm told it's the first time ever that government has gone, as we have, not to the people who can give you a theory about getting people off of welfare, but to the people who've done it themselves, in practice, or helped others do it. Success, not failure; practice, and not theory. And that's what has shaped our welfare reform proposal, and that's what we've come to hear about today. So, now let me turn this meeting over to the experts.

Well, these senior citizens needed help. They needed to feel dignified in their existence. So, our senior center was established in 1979 with Federal dollars to renovate and purchase this property. Now we provide services in that 3,200 square-foot building to 1,700 seniors. These services help them stay in their own environment. And that is something that needs to be done. It also provides them with knowledge of their own talents and skills so that they can not only help themselves but that they will then help others.

Soldiers and sailors on relief have come to our assistance. General relief workers will spend their time with us and give us the help that we need. We have used the title 5 senior aid program out of the Department of Labor. And those four people spending 20 hours a week provide the leadership that is needed to help our 387 volunteers provide these services to the other people of the community. Of course, when you receive government funds then there are a number of records that have to be kept. And so, we have to have these people trained in the keeping of the records. We are proud of our 387 volunteers. They help us provide friendly visiting services, telephone reassurance services, health assessment services, so that the seniors can have almost an entire physical and being prevented from having diseases that would debilitate them. We have socialization, of course, that keeps the seniors knowing each other, feeling comfortable with each other, and also getting out of their homes, so that they will then be able to help other people.

We provide some chore services -- laundry for about 30 shut-ins each week -- and our volunteers do that work. We have a kitchen that provides, I'd say, anywhere from 25 to 150 meals daily, twice a week. With the jobs bill food that was given out at one time, we established an emergency feeding site for the unemployed. And, at times, we feed 300 of them. And the senior volunteers help prepare and serve those meals.

We received two vehicles from the 16 - B2 program, using the UMTA funds. And that provides transportation for about 420 seniors, using the drivers and the volunteer escorts to take these seniors about 28,000 miles a year to nutrition, socialization events, cultural places, medical appointments, and personal shopping. I feel, then, that our senior volunteers, many of them on the RSVP program, have not only become valuable assets to the community, but they have made other people, of their own peers, feel important. Yet without the Federal dollars giving us that base of operation, there is no way that we could have done this -- making these people feel the need to continue living.

We have established a co-op, because we don't just want handouts, but we want to help these people help themselves. This co-op, then, helps to extend their funds and provide nourishing food. We have joined with SHARE food bank and are trying to establish a farm in which they will grow their own truck vegetables and then either sell them or can them or freeze them for the winter. We are involved in any number of projects, one of which will be to develop a shared living facility. I think perhaps I've used my time.

Mrs. White. Thank you. Contrary to popular belief, black parents are strongly in favor of neighborhood schools. In Norfolk, where courts approved an end to busing of elementary school students for the purpose of racial balance, parents were given the option of to bus or not to bus. Given this choice, black parents chose not to bus by a whopping 86-percent majority. We had always known that the blacks who actually had to deal with busing did not like it. This clearly points out that agencies need to interact with grassroots people to solve problems relating to welfare and education. When we attempted to inform civil rights and religious leaders of the true feelings in the black community, the first thing they wanted to know was what were our professional credentials. They failed to realize that grassroots people do not need a whole lot of credentials to express their concerns or to develop some expertise in solving their problems.

Since the media was only listening to black groups advocating busing, my husband, Nelson, got the idea to organize the black parents who oppose busing -- thus, the Parental Involvement Network. We went door-to-door collecting signatures to present to the school board. We felt that 1,200 signatures was enough to convince both the school board and civil rights groups that there was substantial black support for an end to busing. We did this with a cadre of 15 parents. And in September '86, 8,000 black students returned to neighborhood schools where their parents have a greater opportunity to interact with the schools. We constantly help poor parents to understand how the school system works and to get the best out of it for their children. Education and welfare dependence are clearly related. In dealing with welfare parents, we found that more day care was needed -- that even if they got a job the funds they received are stopped before they can get on their feet. Some change is needed in this area of transferral from welfare to becoming a working-class parent.

Mr. Enriquez. Okay, thank you. The Spanish Speaking Unity Council in Oakland, California, was started as a grassroot organization in 1964, but we have grown to a community development corporation with assets of over $15 million. We operate a continuing care of services to our community from infant child care services to elderly services. We provide services in employment and training, both youth and young adults, housing programs for families and elders, emergency housing and family needs, small business technical assistance, and community economic development assistance and project development. More specific to today's panel discussion, we operated a supported work program for over 10 years, working with long-term AFDC recipients, welfare mothers.

This supported work program provided avenues of opportunity to long-term welfare mothers to come back into the job stream. Through a welfare grant diversion process, we were able to provide job opportunities in a supported work environment. In the operation of our own small businesses, we have provided a vehicle to bring back self-reliance and capacity-building into the lives of many welfare mothers. In our organizational philosophy of integrating community economic development into the delivery of social services, we have been able to build community and individual capacity to alleviate poverty in our community. Thank you.

Mrs. Gray. All right. Mr. President, let me first describe the Kenilworth Parkside community. There are 464 public housing units. We're at the end of nowhere -- some folks may refer to it -- because we're in ward 7. And they call it the part of the city that's been forgotten. Prior to 1982 only two children within our community had gone to college. There was no heat and hot water in our public housing property. Trash pickup was terrible. And because of that we began to meet ourselves and organize the residents of our community.

And through our efforts we created a program that's named ``College, Here We Come,'' Mr. President, which I know you are familiar with because you awarded us an outstanding award for sending over 582 of our children away to colleges. When those children went away to college, they returned very dissatisfied with our conditions. And because of that, those students and the parents of those students began to develop their own master plan, because we had realized we had had persons to plan for us and had not given us an opportunity to plan for ourselves. And therefore, their plans were not successful because we had no way of participating, really, but to take orders.

Through our master plan we created resident management. And through our resident management concept, we reduced our welfare recidivism. In '82 it was 85 percent. It has now been reduced to 22 percent. We reduced our crime, reduced our teenage pregnancy by 50 percent. We created small businesses. For, you see, the philosophy of our community is that the only way that we could even save our community was beginning to save our families. And how did we save our families? By returning respect and responsibility and pride back to the fathers of our community by employing them first, before we employed the youth. We created the small businesses that are now employing those former welfare recipients, and they are owned by some of the residents of our community. For we knew that the only way we could help ourselves was by saving ourselves -- that no one had the obligation to us to do anything for us. We had to do it ourselves.

I feel proud to sit here today because for the first time I know I personally had a direct input on forming this policy. And to my knowledge this has never been done before, where the executive branch of the Government has come down to the community to talk to a former public welfare recipient -- to find out how we feel about things, to find out how we felt about being dealt with when it comes to welfare reform. In working with the Kenilworth Parkside community, we have done a need assessment -- through our college students -- and found that our residents want jobs. We are proud of the rippling effect that our community program has had, around not only the city of Washington, DC, but throughout the United States, to say that we want employment. We do not want welfare; we want independence. And we thank you, Mr. President, for providing us the opportunity.

The President. Well, believe me, and I know that there are many more like these, and I wish there were time here for a lot of questions that probably people have. And I hope that you will have time to find out more and how these work -- for example, Sister, what your experience was in working with the State and cooperation and so forth.

That, in effect, is what our welfare reform proposal is all about: creating a welfare system that invests in your solutions, and in the solutions of thousands of others like you around America. Our welfare study -- it really isn't that thin -- [laughter] -- ``Up From Dependency,'' which will be released today, names nearly 400 examples of self-help groups across the land. Our reform is intended to start a process that taps this spirit and mobilizes this initiative. And here's what we propose to do. We will ask Congress to approve legislation to allow the States to experiment with the kind of antipoverty ideas that you've told us about here today. Right now Federal laws and regulations limit what the States can do. I was a Governor of a State, and I know how frustrating it could be. And that's why so many of your good ideas can't be tried within the bounds of our current welfare system.

Our proposal retains the current Federal financing role. And the Federal Government will continue to enforce civil rights laws and due process protections. All we will ask from the Congress will be that it waive the many other rules and regulations that prevent State experiments from helping people become independent. In many States -- with the limited flexibility we've given in the last 6 years -- this experimentation has begun. Some, like Utah and New Jersey, have made great strides. As you know, I've invited all the Governors to the White House later this month to present our welfare proposal and to listen to their thoughts about welfare reform.

There're just a few simple principles all experiments should follow. These are principles that all of us have learned and that you have begun to demonstrate. We've learned, for example, that work is the only genuine path to self-respect and independence. And we learned that any welfare system should offer the incentives and tools to escape welfare, not the incentives to remain dependent on welfare. With these and other lessons in mind, our proposal will ask the Congress to allow those of us in Washington to work with the States in screening reform ideas. We will offer communities and States wide latitude in developing their proposals, but we will also ensure that any initiative supports families and promotes self-reliance.

It's time for the Federal Government to admit to what it doesn't know and start listening to creative Governors like Tom Kean and Booth Gardner, Jim Martin. It's time for the Government to start listening to community self-help groups like yours and the others that Chuck and his group here have identified. It's time, as Charles Murray has written: ``to start listening to those we wish to help -- not armed with a clipboard and a set of multiple-choice questionnaire items, but with curiosity and patience . . .'' Well, that's what we've begun to do this past year, and that's what our reform package will help all of America to do in the years ahead.

You know, I had an experience as Governor, because we came up with a welfare reform plan. And it could only be permitted, under the regulations, as an experiment. And we dealt with and we negotiated with the people in Washington, and we were getting nowhere. And finally, I ordered our people -- one of whom was Chuck Hobbs right here, who is responsible for some of that plan -- I ordered our people that we would not discuss anything further with Washington unless the President was present. And he came to California, and we went down and met with him. And I scribbled a few notes in the plane on the back of a gin rummy pad. And when we got in the room with the people we'd been dickering with all these years or months and getting no place, I submitted what it was we wanted to do. It was a workfare plan -- and what we had accomplished so far in getting ready for it, and it was wonderful. The President just heard me out -- and it only took a few minutes -- and he just turned to his group and said, ``I want this done.'' You'd be surprised -- it happened. But they'd only let us experiment, so we got to do 35 out of the 58 counties in California. And they very carefully omitted the two largest, Los Angeles and San Francisco.

So, this is -- I don't want to get caught like -- I won't name the President but, I don't want to get caught like him and have me have to be able to turn and say -- I've said it in advance of your coming with recommendations. And that's what Chuck has been hearing all about.

One last little thing I want to tell you. I have a letter on my desk that I have to answer. It just arrived. It's from a young man who had a water surfing accident -- no, water skiing accident. He is a quadriplegic. He is totally dependent on the Government programs. But attached to his letter is a business card with his name on it. He has an idea for an independent business, a small business, that he is organizing, to start. And the small business will be counseling and advising other disabled people to be able to free themselves from dependency and to become independent. And what he needs, and what I'm certainly going to try and work out for him, is some kind of a bridge from his present dependency to the success there -- so that he can get by that bridge. And I think here, of all things, is a success story and an indication of what you've heard up here today. And that is what I've said myself so often -- the overwhelming majority of the people on welfare want nothing more than to be independent of it and back out with the rest of us in the workaday world.

Now, I know we just have about used up all the time. I'd even thought maybe I would ask some questions here, but I know that we don't have time for it. But even so, the questions would have been kind of redundant because I think these four individuals made it pretty plain as to what they were doing. And I think as you all exchange information about what others have found can be done, we'll find the answer to this. And it will be an answer, in the American way, which we have neglected for too many years.

For the past 4 years, Mrs. Bliss has been a participating member of the national screening committee for dance for the Fulbright-Hays scholarship program and has recently become a member of the board of visitors at the North Carolina School of the Arts. Mrs. Bliss is a former dancer, having performed for 7 years with the National Ballet of Canada; and artistic director for the Joffrey II Dancers, with whom she was affiliated for 16 years. Mrs. Bliss was a principal dancer with both the Metropolitan Opera and the New York City Opera, and she was a guest artist with the American Ballet Theater and the Joffrey Ballet. She is a guest teacher, lecturer, and consultant both in the United States and Canada; and her current primary project is authoring a book on the changes in the field of dance over the last 30 years. She is married, has two children, and resides in Oyster Bay, NY. Mrs. Bliss was born September 18, 1937, in London, England.

I will propose to Congress a comprehensive plan for providing health insurance for those who suffer a catastrophic illness. We all know family, friends, or neighbors who have suffered a devastating illness that has destroyed their financial security. As medical science has given us longer lives, we must face the new challenges to ensure that the elderly have security in their old age. A catastrophic illness can be a short-term condition requiring intensive, acute care services or a lingering illness requiring many years of care. It can affect anyone -- the young, the middle-aged, the elderly. The single common denominator is financial. It can require personal sacrifices that haunt families for the rest of their lives.

I am asking Congress to help give Americans that last full measure of security, to provide a health insurance plan that fights the fear of catastrophic illness. My plan would provide acute care for those over 65 by restructuring the Medicare program. Under my proposal, the elderly would receive catastrophic health care coverage under Medicare, while limiting out-of-pocket expenses to $2,000. This coverage will be made available for an additional monthly Medicare premium of $4.92. The plan also aims to improve protection for the general population and for the long-term care of the elderly. For too long, many of our senior citizens have been faced with making an intolerable choice -- a choice between bankruptcy and death. This proposed legislation would go a long way to help solve that dilemma.

The President. Good afternoon, and welcome to the Old Executive Office Building. Now, you might have heard that just last week I celebrated the 37th anniversary of my 39th birthday. [Laughter] And come to think of it, I guess that makes me older than any four or five of you put together. [Laughter] But at my age, I can't tell you how good it makes me feel to be with young Americans -- to share your optimism and your energy and your hopes for the future. So you see, you've given me a gift today, and I want to begin by simply saying thank you.

Before I talk about the heritage of Abraham Lincoln that we cherish, I want to mention a decision that I've made today of special significance to your families and ultimately to you. I will be sending to Congress a plan for providing through Medicare protection against the tremendous costs of catastrophic illness. Now, for those of you who might not have heard that term, that is those peculiar things that can happen, either by way of an accident or an ailment -- a disease that results in hundreds of thousands of dollars in medical expense. And I'm certain that each of you has parents or grandparents or knows others who are facing the crisis of a catastrophic illness. The proposal I'm announcing today is a giant step forward in helping those who, before now, would have had to make a choice between financial ruin or death. With the protection that this plan will provide, senior citizens will now be safe from the worst fear of old age: having their life savings taken away to pay the costs for an acute care due to a catastrophic illness.

Well now, we've gathered here this afternoon to celebrate the life of Abraham Lincoln. And I suppose I'd better point out that, despite what you may have heard, it's not true that honest Abe and I went to school together. [Laughter] It is true, however, in this young country of ours, that when I was your age there were Americans who could remember Abraham Lincoln -- people who had heard the tall lanky man promise ``malice toward none'' as he stood on a platform at the Capitol to give his second inaugural address; people who had gathered in a field in the gentle land of southern Pennsylvania to see the gaunt, war-weary President dedicate a cemetery with the Gettysburg Address; people who'd heard Mr. Lincoln swap jokes with country politicians and seen his dark eyes sparkle; people who'd stood by the tracks in silence as a train draped in Union flags rolled past, bearing the body of the fallen President from Washington across the great spaces of the young Nation back home to Springfield, Illinois. Indeed, on Memorial Day there would be members of the Grand Army of the Republic marching in that parade, veterans of the Civil War. Even now, ours remains a young nation. And Lincoln gave voice to that youth. For even in the bleakest moments, even when he set his face grimly toward war, he was untouched by cynicism or loss of faith. Mr. Lincoln believed -- he believed in freedom, believed in the goodness and the ability of his heroes -- the people of this country.

Abe Lincoln was born in 1809 in a log cabin in the western wilds of Kentucky. And he spent his entire youth and boyhood in poverty, in frontier places where men hewed down endless trees, forcing the forest with their own muscles to give up its poor land for crops; where women cooked over open fires and washed their clothes in creeks. Formal education was impossible, but young Lincoln pored over the few books he could find, studying the Bible in particular, probably the only book that his family owned. And I'm sure you must have heard that sitting by the open fire as a boy, he would work out arithmetic problems and so forth with a piece of charcoal on a wooden shovel that was there by the fireplace. The first lesson that the life of Abraham Lincoln has to teach is: You don't have to be rich to love learning and make something of yourself.

Before he became President, Lincoln succeeded as a lawyer in only a modest way; and in politics, he failed repeatedly. He lost his first race for the State legislature in Illinois. And when at last he was elected, he ran twice for speaker of the Illinois house. And both times he was defeated. In 1856 he campaigned for his party's Vice-Presidential nomination, and the nomination went to another. In 1858, he ran for the Senate, and he was defeated. Even as President, Lincoln at first seemed a loser. The Union armies met defeat in the crucial early engagement of the Civil War, then frittered away time drilling on their campgrounds when they should have been pursuing the enemy. In England, the most powerful nation in Europe, informed opinion sided with the Confederacy and held that it would be a matter of months before the North lost the war and the crude, backwoods President was forgotten. That's the second lesson Mr. Lincoln can teach us: If you are in the right, ignore defeat. Persevere. For in persevering, Lincoln saved the Union and won freedom for the more than one-tenth of the population that had been kept down in bondage.

In other countries, young men and women your age look back on the histories of their nations to emperors and kings, glorious figures raised in palaces, attended upon by servants, given every refinement of education by the most eminent scholars of the day. You as Americans look back on a different kind of figure; a poor man; a humble man of the frontier and prairie whose parents could neither read nor write; a man polite society looked down on because he told too many jokes. Yet, for all that, a man who shook the world by consecrating himself and his nation to liberty. You know, I have to tell you something about that joking thing. A great many people criticized him. They thought he laughed too much and had jokes. He had an answer for them. He said, ``I couldn't perform the duties of this job for 15 minutes if I couldn't laugh.'' And then he went on and said something else, also -- not at that same time. He said also that he couldn't perform the duties of that office if he didn't feel that he could ask for help from someone who was wiser and stronger than all others.

Perhaps you and I can best honor Abraham Lincoln by continuing his work. We see in recent incidents at Howard Beach, New York, and Forsyth County, Georgia, that racism is still with us -- North and South. Let each of us work to eliminate this scourge from our country. And in our own lives let us strive to live up to Mr. Lincoln's example: his respect for gentleness, for knowledge; his humor; his tolerance of his fellow men; his abiding love for America.

You know, living in the White House is kind of an experience. You can't ever be free of the knowledge of who and how many have preceded you there. But as more telling with Lincoln than with everyone, because just down the hall from where we go to sleep at night is Lincoln's Bedroom, furnished exactly as it was back there for him. And there's even a legend in the White House that he's still there. As a matter of fact, people who've worked there through several Presidents will go out of their way to tell you, yes, that they believe he is. Now, I haven't seen him myself. [Laughter] But I have to tell you, I am puzzled. Because every once in a while our little dog, Rex, will start down that long hall toward that room just glaring as if he's seeing something and barking. And he stops in front of Lincoln's door, the bedroom door. And once, early on in this, I just couldn't understand it. So, I went down and I opened the door, and I stepped in, and I turned around for him to come on, and he stood there, still barking and growling and then started backing away -- [laughter] -- and would not go in the room. So, the funny thing, though, is I have to feel -- unlike you might think about other ghosts -- if he is still there, I don't have any fear at all. I think it would be very wonderful to have a little meeting with him and probably very helpful.

How many of you have gone to the Lincoln Memorial? You must have. Well, now I want to ask you -- the first time I was ever there, someone, a veteran of being there, told me to do something. And I wonder if you were ever told to do it. And that is, to go in and stand on one side of that great monument and look up at the profile of Lincoln. But then to go round to the other side of the statue and look at the other side of Lincoln. And what the artist has accomplished -- if you ever have another chance, go there and try this: on one side in that face you see strength. You see the thing that he had that made him able to deal with those problems. When you get around to the other side, that side of the face, you see compassion. You see the great kindliness of that man. Now, I don't know how the artist accomplished that, but it's there. So if you haven't done that, make another trip sometime and see if that isn't true.

Well, I guess that's enough of a history lesson here for today. There are many stories about Lincoln that could be told, but I know that I'm not to keep you here any longer. And I just want to thank you all for being here. And that thing that I said about loving our fellow man and tolerance and so forth -- I was blessed. I was raised in a family that -- my mother and father told my brother and myself that the greatest sin there was was intolerance, prejudice against any other people for any reason. And we grew up with that, both of us, and I'm happy for it. And your generation, you don't have anything to live down as my generation did, of previous practices that were based on prejudice. So, just make up your minds and believe firmly, we're all God's children, equally beloved by him. And as he made it plain, by loving one another, we in turn do love him.

You know, a few years ago, as I look back down the annals of time, as I travel back to 1809 -- I see a little baby, a baby who could not know his destiny; a baby who could not know that the unity of the whole country will rest in his hands; a baby who could not know that he will be responsible for the removal of a nation's shackles. And then, as time progresses, I see this boy gradually accepting the mantle of manhood. And then, as we come up to 1863, I see, as Dr. King said, ``a facilitating President signing the Emancipation Proclamation.'' And then, as we come through the years, as we come up to 1983, another Republican President is in the White House. This President also saw the need to remove shackles. These were the shackles of indifference toward education. President Lincoln's proclamation was used to unite the country, but President Reagan's proclamation was used to unite the minds. President Lincoln's proclamation can be found in any reference book, while President Reagan's proclamation is a living testament to the commitment of educational excellence.

The shackles that President Reagan loosed were not physical shackles; they were the shackles of ignorance. They were the shackles that bound the mind and kept the school from reaching its maximum potential. It seemed as if nothing could break these bonds. And then there came a man, a man with the authority to make a change and the compassion to do so. This man, much like Abraham Lincoln, saw the condition and proceeded to rectify it. And it was then that the school adoption program was implemented. And now I, on behalf of the students of Hines Junior High School, wish to thank you, Mr. Reagan. If it was not for -- if it were not, rather, for your proclamation, we wouldn't have had a chance to ride the battleship Eagle. If it wasn't for your proclamation, we wouldn't have had a chance to have a Redskins All Star Club with tutoring in all of the four major subject areas, with communications and cultural enrichments; we wouldn't have had a chance for Redskins and Redskinettes to come to Hines and sponsor many social events; we wouldn't have had that chance if you hadn't decided to make a change. The gratitude that we feel is not for mere words to define.

But we also wish to thank Mrs. Dole. We wish to thank all of the Maritime Associates. I could stand up here all day long and I could never finish telling you the things that DOT has done for Hines. But instead, I'll conclude by saying this, as a famous orator once stated: ``In order to discover new oceans, first you must have the courage to lose sight of familiar shores.'' Those people that I have named -- they were in actuality helping Hines to discover new oceans. Whenever President Reagan signed a bill or advocated legislation for the improvement of the schools in any way, shape, form, or fashion, he was in actuality helping Hines and our advocates to discover new oceans.

And now, with that in mind, I wish now to present to you, Mr. Reagan, this Hines Junior High School jacket. But we sincerely hope that you will not consider this as merely a jacket. We hope that you consider this as a symbol of the bond that we now share. And with this jacket comes a lifetime association with the Hines family. And with a open heart do we welcome thee.

The President. Thank you very much. I am very proud to have this. And, you know, I know there are present here -- and I have met here a few on the platform -- principals, some teachers, as well as students. And I know at your age, it's awfully easy sometimes to get very frustrated and sometimes think they were oppressing you. I remember once sitting in the principal's office when I was in high school. [Laughter] I hadn't been invited there for a social. [Laughter] And he said something that I remembered over the years. He said to me: ``You know, Reagan, I don't care what you think of me now. I'm only concerned about what you may think of me 15 years from now.'' And more than 15 years later, and before his death, I had the opportunity to tell him how I felt about him -- 15 years later -- and how much a part he had played in my life and how indebted I was to him.

To remind us of our own rich heritage and the blessings of life in America, 1987 has been designated the National Year of Thanksgiving. It is no coincidence that this is the year in which we celebrate the 200th anniversary of our Constitution.

The early settlers of our country possessed a strength and a conviction based on their faith in God that helped them withstand the rigors and hardships of carving a nation out of wilderness. They laid a firm foundation built on the worth, dignity, and inalienable rights of the individual. For sustaining them and granting them success in bringing forth on this continent a new Nation, they praised the Almighty and His mercy.

Throughout our history our Presidents have summoned the Nation to continue this tradition of praise and thanksgiving. From George Washington kneeling in the snow at Valley Forge to Abraham Lincoln praying for the preservation of the Union to Franklin Roosevelt expressing confidence the prayers of mankind would bring us through to victory, we have turned with faith and trust to the One Who holds the whole wide world in His hands.

We look to the future of our Nation in this same spirit. Let us thank God for our constitutional form of government, for our precious freedoms of speech, assembly, religion, and the press, and for all those who sacrificed to preserve them in peace and in war for two centuries.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twelfth day of February, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

Today I have approved H.J. Res. 102, a joint resolution containing four unrelated provisions. This legislation provides $50 million in additional funds for the emergency food and shelter program run by the Federal Emergency Management Agency through a consortium of private charitable and religious organizations to assist the homeless by transferring funds from the disaster relief program; authorizes the Veterans Administration to contract for treatment and rehabilitation services in community-based treatment facilities for veterans suffering from chronic mental illness; disapproves a proposed deferral of funds for intrastate storage and distribution costs of surplus food donated to the States for the needy; and in section 3 purports to disapprove the pay raises I recommended for the Vice President, Members of Congress and the judiciary, and certain executive branch officials.

The Attorney General has advised me that the purported disapproval of my pay recommendations is without any legal force and effect because the House of Representatives did not vote on the resolution until after expiration of the statutorily prescribed 30-day period for passage of a joint resolution of disapproval. The Federal Salary Act, pursuant to which I made these recommendations gives the Congress 30 days in which to pass a joint resolution disapproving the recommended increase. That act, of course, does not prevent the Congress from taking legislative action that either amends the act or sets the statutory rates of pay for covered individuals. Subject to the constitutional limitations in article III, section 1, precluding a decrease in compensation for members of the judiciary, I recognize that the Congress has the legal authority to repeal the pay raise. In this case, however, the Congress chose to use the 30-day joint resolution of disapproval mechanism provided in the act, and its actions must be interpreted accordingly.

Now, I know Coach Parcells has a family commitment today and couldn't be with us, but I also know he's going to be a little upset with me for saying that. I read somewhere that he likes to keep everything nice and modest and humble and understated. I even hear that when, from time to time, great players like yourselves make mistakes, he issues only very gentle, low-key, even tender reminders like: ``Now, now, linebacker Carson, that's a no-no.'' [Laughter] I guess the truth is that Bill Parcells is a little more outspoken than that. But I also guess that coaches do have a right to take the game seriously. Not as seriously as the fans, of course, but seriously.

Well, as both stories suggest, football is more than just serious business -- and being successful at it means realizing that. Harry Carson and the Gatorade bucket proves my point. The New York Giants played great football this year, but they also had fun. That kind of spirit has always marked the great Giants teams. That's why our fans have been so -- or your fans, I should say, have been so loyal and for so many years. I don't have many fans anymore. [Laughter] Well, they knew that someday they would have a great team again and that such a team would mean more than just great athletes, it would mean a team with a heart -- a team that liked each other and a team that loved fun, but loved winning more.

All I can say is I'm awful grateful the Gipper played before your time. But Lawrence Taylor, Harry Carson, Carl Banks, Byron Hunt, Andy Headen, Gary Reasons, and the rest of you -- you were all superb this year. And so were the men in front of you, from Jim Burt to George Martin; and those behind you -- a secondary that took some critical losses this year but came right back at the opposition. And finally, I wanted to single out Phil Simms, not only for his great play on the field but for his character as a leader. But it's hard to single out people on this team. It wasn't just Phil or Joe or L.T. or Harry. The one thing everybody noticed about this team is that it was a band of brothers, a team forged by one undeniable bond -- the will to win.

So, I want to congratulate all of you -- George Young for playing such a crucial role in developing this team, Coach Parcells, the Maras. All of us today, all of America, salute you. And we salute you as the best.

Mr. Young. It's nice to be here surrounded by the Secret Service instead of by the Redskins. [Laughter] It's a privilege for me to represent the Giant organization in thanking the President for inviting us to meet him and also for inviting us to visit the most famous home in all the world. But before we do anything more, we have some presents for Mr. President from three of our captains -- Phil Simms, George Martin, and Harry Carson. But Harry Carson, you'd better be careful of -- he's a little sneaky. [Laughter] Phil Simms will be first.

Mr. Carson. Mr. President, I had to talk some of my teammates out of dunking you because that's what they wanted me to do to you. [Laughter] But instead, I would like to present to you this visiting team jersey so that whenever we come to RFK, you can sit in the stands and root for the best team.

Mr. Martin. Mr. President, all of the ballplayers of the New York Giants voted unanimously to make you an honorary ballplayer of the New York Giants. They did so only because they said that you and I were very close in age. [Laughter] I quickly informed them that as a senior member of the New York Giants that that grants me the veto power. [Laughter] And in doing so, sir, I would like to give you a replica of our Super Bowl ring and make you an honorary coach of the New York Giants.

This afternoon I'd like to spend a few moments discussing a decision I made this week, a major decision that's likely to affect virtually every family in America. Our administration will propose to Congress a comprehensive plan to cover catastrophic illnesses. A catastrophic illness can strike anyone -- the young, the old, the middle aged. The single distinguishing characteristic is simply this: Whatever form it takes, a catastrophic illness costs money -- lots of it. The problem has grown in recent years as we've achieved medical breakthroughs enabling Americans to live longer lives. Come to think of it, I myself have already lived some 22 years longer than the life expectancy at the time of my birth. But longer lives for Americans involves the challenge of seeing to it that our older citizens have the financial security they need. With our new proposals, I'll be asking the Congress to join our administration in meeting that challenge.

In brief, this is how the proposals break down: First, we're asking Congress to legislate acute catastrophic illness insurance for Medicare beneficiaries, most of whom are 65 and over. Under this proposal, Medicare itself would be amended to provide unlimited Medicare coverage. Moreover, our proposal would establish a limit of just $2,000 for out-of-pocket Medicare expenses that can presently run into the many thousands. And we can do all this by adding just $4.92 to the Medicare monthly premium. This is a pay-as-you-go program, a program that requires no tax dollars. Now, what does this mean in practical terms? Well, the answer is simple: peace of mind for some 30 million older Americans. Suppose, for example, that someone over 65 fell and broke a hip. And then suppose that, while still recovering, she contracted pneumonia. A broken hip and pneumonia -- that could mean two acute care hospitalizations within the same year, care that would cost thousands. Under Medicare as it stands today, the patient herself would have to pay a significant portion of these costs -- and all but the very wealthy would be wiped out. But under our proposal, Medicare itself would pay most costs above $2,000, giving the patient financial security.

Regarding the cost of long-term care for older Americans, there are no easy answers. But in its second part of our initiative, our proposal calls for the Treasury Department and others to find ways of helping families meet these costs. Options we will examine include, for example, favorable tax treatment for savings accounts established to meet the costs of long-term care. Of course it's too early to predict what will work best, but the important point is that our proposal calls on the Government to start working. I'm confident that, working with Congress and private insurers, we can find a new and innovative way to ease the financial burden of long-term care.

But our proposal isn't just aimed at older Americans. In part three of our initiative, we will take steps to improve catastrophic illness coverage for all Americans, regardless of age. Under our plan, the Federal and State governments would work together to promote the formation of what are known as risk pools within the States -- helping to provide insurance for those who could not otherwise obtain insurance. We will encourage the States to use their authority to require catastrophic coverage as part of the health insurance available through employers. And we'll work with Congress to change certain requirements, giving the States more flexibility in the management of Medicaid programs. And as in many matters related to health care, education is important. Under our plan, the Federal Government would work with the private sector to make widely available information about the risks, costs, and financing options of various forms of catastrophic illness insurance; and to encourage every American to plan for his health care in the future.

All of us have family, friends, or neighbors who have suffered devastating illnesses that threatened their financial security. For too long older Americans, in particular, have faced the possibility of sicknesses that might not only wipe out their own savings but those of their families. Our proposal would make available catastrophic medical insurance for every American eligible for Medicare. It would take steps to provide catastrophic illness coverage for Americans of all ages. And it would begin the search for ways to meet the costs of long-term care. As I said a moment ago, what it all comes down to is peace of mind. And I think you will agree -- it's worth it.

I am pleased to transmit the enclosed report on the adherence of the United States to obligations undertaken in arms control agreements and on problems related to compliance by other nations with the provisions of bilateral and multilateral arms control agreements to which the United States is a party.

In view of the continued pattern of uncorrected Soviet violations and the increasing magnitude and threat of Soviet strategic forces, I decided on May 27, 1986, to end the U.S. policy of observing the SALT I Interim Agreement (which had expired, and which the Soviets were violating) and the SALT II Treaty (which was never ratified; which, had it been ratified, would have expired on December 31, 1985; and which the Soviets were violating). These agreements are now behind us, and Soviet allegations and the facts of Soviet compliance with regard to these agreements are therefore not discussed in this year's report. For our part, we will continue to exercise utmost restraint in our strategic force programs as we press for equitable and effectively verifiable agreements on deep reductions in U.S. and Soviet nuclear arsenals.

Well, George [Bush] and I thank you all very much, and welcome to the White House. Today -- in this, the 200th anniversary year of the writing of the Constitution, and here in one of America's most historic buildings -- we're gathered, yes, as leaders of government; yes, as business people; yes, as educators; yes, as scientists; yes, as all of these, but even more as Americans. We're here to take a step into America's future. We'll talk today about the 21st century. That seems like the distant future; but in the life of a person, much less the life of this still young nation, the 21st century is but a few moments away.

A child who begins kindergarten this year will graduate from high school in the year 2000. It's not too early to ask what kind of a nation that child will inherit from us. Will we give that child the best education in the world to prepare for leading our country and the world in the next century? While that child is growing up, America's industrial base will be changing. And here, if his parents find themselves in a shrinking industry, will they have the opportunity to be retrained for jobs of the future, not those of the past? And when that child grows up, will he find himself in a strong, competitive nation that is a proud leader of a fair, free, and growing world's economy? Or will he or she find themselves in one that has built walls to isolate itself and that, in its isolation, has stagnated and declined?

In the last 6 years America has once again become the economic wonder of the world, the land of promise to which people everywhere look as a beacon of hope, freedom, and growth. We cut tax rates, and now all around the world, other nations are taking notice. We cut regulations that stifled economic growth -- and here, also, other nations are following us. We've done all this, and as a result we've reignited the American flame of opportunity and created more new jobs in the last 5 years than Europe and Japan combined. Will we now prepare the way to continue this legacy of opportunity into the next decade and into the next century? These are the questions that we Americans will answer. And let me put my cards right here on the table. I have a very simple goal, and I believe all Americans share it. Call it competitiveness. Call it a quest for excellence. Call it preparing for the 21st century. In the year 2000 we want America still at the top of the charts, the front of the pack, the head of the class. Yes, in the year 2000 we want America to be number one -- and climbing still for the stars.

The quest for excellence that I have in mind is not just a legislative package, although legislation will play a part. It is not just another government program, although government has a role. Rather, it's a great national undertaking that will challenge all Americans to be all that they can be, to work together to seek new opportunities, to be the very best in a strong and growing international economy -- an international economy that gives us both the challenge of competition and, as it grows and we grow with it, the promise of a century of prosperity ahead.

To America's business the quest for excellence will be the challenge to make products more efficiently, to embrace new ideas, better methods of management, and new technologies; yes, to make the proudest, most desirable label on more and more products and services around the world, the label that reads: ``Made in America.'' To America's workers the challenge is to be prepared for the new jobs and new skills of the future and to prove, in the quality of their work, that the pride is indeed back. To America's educators the challenge is to prepare our students for this changing world so that they can write clearly; so that illiteracy among this great and free people becomes a thing of the past and more children read at their level skill or above; so that every high school graduate has a basic understanding of mathematics and science and knows how to work a computer; and so that every graduate knows the meaning of our sacred American heritage.

In the last 3 years Governors, mayors, school boards, and parents around the country have made quality the focus of their reforms. The challenge now is to finish the job -- to make sure that by the year 2000 America has the best educational system in the world. Yes, to all of us, the quest for excellence is a challenge to join together in looking to the new world marketplace not as a source of fear and uncertainty, but in the way Americans have always looked at their challenges: as a great opportunity, as another open frontier for the American spirit, as America's great next adventure.

As America moves toward the 21st century, government also has a role in our great national quest for excellence. We have already taken giant steps. Our tax reform has given us the most incentive-oriented tax system in the world. And already other governments are asking themselves what they can do to catch up with us. Perhaps you saw a newspaper account recently about a German entrepreneur who has built three factories here in America and is building another. These factories make products for export to Latin America and the Far East. Explaining why he was building export factories in America rather than Germany, he told the reporter that the difference was taxes. Because of taxes, he said: ``In the United States, I have to earn $1.8 million in order to put $1 million in my own reserves. In Germany I have to earn $4 million to do the same thing.'' But as much as our tax reform has done to make America more competitive, there is still more to do. This week I'm sending to Congress proposed legislation to ensure that government will contribute its share to America's quest for excellence. Ours is a diverse package, as diverse as the challenge before us. But diverse though it is, it has one central purpose, and that is to make certain that in the years ahead the door of opportunity and excellence is open to all Americans.

For America's workers this package will include new efforts for job retraining. Properly prepared workers in our declining industries can be the competitive edge for our rising industries. They are skilled; they know how to perform in the industrial workplace. They have the discipline and dedication to quality that America will need in the marketplace of the next century. We must not let this national treasure go to waste. And that's why our job retraining proposal will target dislocated workers. These are the workers who, in the past, made America the world's leader in industry after industry. We must never forget that they're the key to our future, as well. Our package also includes training funds for young people who come from economically disadvantaged backgrounds. America will not be able to compete in the world of the next century if some of us are permanently barred from the team. We need every American lending a hand, and that includes those who today are caught in the poverty trap. We must find ways to recruit these people for America's team. They deserve the same opportunities all Americans deserve. And we all need them joining in, grabbing the lifeline with us, and helping to pull America into the future.

America's most competitive edge has always been our scientific and technological creativity. In many respects, we invented the modern world. The light bulb, the telephone, the airplane, the mass production automobile, the computer, the transistor, the semiconductor -- the list of American inventions that we take for granted is endless. Today we are still a leader in innovation. In communications technology, for example, one expert has put it like this: ``The Americans are light years ahead of everyone.'' But still we aren't doing enough. In too many industries we have developed the technology, only to see others bring it to the marketplace. Our legislative package will help make the journey from the American laboratory to the American factory, to the world market, a shorter journey and a more certain one.

Part of our focus will be on Federal laboratories, including defense laboratories. These are among the largest and most productive centers of scientific research in the world. But in the past there have been set up roadblocks between what was going on inside and the commercial world outside. That will change. We will encourage scientists working in Federal laboratories to patent, license, and commercialize their research. Federal agencies will establish royalty-sharing plans with their scientists. We will recruit science entrepreneurs to act as conduits between the laboratories and business, venture capitalists and universities. We will also encourage exchanges between Federal laboratories and private industry, so each can benefit from the other. We will encourage our defense and space programs to continue to spin off technology to industry and to do it even faster than they have. And we will double the budget of the National Science Foundation over the next 5 years.

We're also proposing to establish a number of science and technology centers around the Nation. These will be on university campuses. They will focus on those areas of science that directly contribute to America's economic competitiveness. They'll be homes to long-term research in areas such as robotics for automated manufacturing and microelectronics, new material processes, and biotechnology. They will help to ensure that when it comes to technological leadership, America in the next century will continue to have the inside edge.

And finally, we cannot retain our technological leadership unless our children have the basic knowledge of science and technology that the 21st century will demand. And that's why we will begin a campaign for scientific literacy. It will include internships in Federal labs for promising students and aid to schools on all levels to buy scientific equipment and computers. We will also make available the expertise of top Federal scientists to help develop textbooks, software, and lab equipment for our schools and universities. America's natural resources are precious beyond measure, but let us never forget that a greater and more important resource than even these is in the minds of our young people. Our program will help ensure that these young minds are ready for the 21st century.

But all the science and all the education in the world will do us little good if the markets of the world are shrinking. We must continue to promote the expansion of world trade. History has taught us that we cannot become more competitive or enjoy major job growth by restricting imports across the board. In 1930 the United States imposed major new tariffs, against the advice of most economists. Three years later the unemployment rate stood at 25 percent. Free trade is one of the few things almost all economists agree on.

There is developing a great bipartisan consensus that the answer to our trade problems is more trade. As House Speaker Jim Wright said recently, ``The solution lies in opening markets to American goods, not in closing our markets to foreign goods.'' But if the greater world trade is to be the launching pad for economic growth in the 21st century, trade must be a two-way street. In the world of the forties, fifties, and sixties, America was the dominant economic power. We sought to lead the world by example out of the devastation of war through growth-oriented, free trade policies. We've had much success. Europe and Japan have rebuilt. Many developing countries have experienced strong growth. Our fundamental belief in the power of the market remains unquestioned. We will not sit idly by when other countries close their markets to our products, subsidize their exports, or fail to trade fairly.

And that's why, these last 6 years, we've taken the strongest actions in American history against unfair trade practices abroad. And that's why we will be asking Congress to strengthen the protections we give patents, copyrights, and trade secrets, so America's intellectual property will be clearly staked out with a sign that reads: No Trespassing. And that's why I will be asking Congress for authority to negotiate a new round of trade agreements, to bring down the barriers to world trade all around the world.

Yes, we must help those whom a changing economy has displaced, but we must also never forget that what's at stake here is America's future -- the future for ourselves, our children, and their children into the next decade and into the next century. How America will approach the 21st century -- that's what we're talking about today, America's future. This will be a great national discussion of our future, a kind of great national tent meeting that they used to call a Chautauqua. And together we're going to be part of it. I'm going to be traveling to schools and factories, to laboratories and workplaces, all across America. Our great national quest for excellence must begin with each of us thinking and talking about what we can do.

I have lived through a third of American history. I've seen war and depression, peace and prosperity. I've seen the great spirit of the American people build industries and transform the world. But all this time, I have never seen our land hold so much promise as it does today. We are strong as only a free people can be strong. There flows within each of us the heroic blood of pioneers and immigrants. And the greatest adventure men or women can want awaits us: the adventure of a new century. That century can bring untold wealth, peace, and happiness, not only to ourselves but to all mankind. We can lead the way. Our quest for excellence can become the entire world's. Our search for greater competitiveness can be copied in every land. And from this great competition will be built a growing world economy -- the one sure answer to hunger and poverty and the one sure guarantor of a bright future for ourselves and the world.

I've asked you here today to join me in that quest. Two hundred years ago a small group of Americans gathered in Philadelphia to draft a new order for the ages -- the U.S. Constitution. We look back on them now with reverence, because all that we as Americans have been blessed with since that steamy Pennsylvania summer could not have happened without their vision and their courage. They overcame sectional rivalries and parochial interests. They looked to the future not only of our nation but of all mankind, not only for their lifetimes but for centuries to come.

And that is the challenge before us today. As we make America strong, as we work for a free and fair economic constitution for the industrial world, as we improve our education, science, and training, we will be setting ourselves and the entire world on a course to a brighter America. And generations will look back on us, as we do on the Founding Fathers, and give thanks in the name of God.

Few events humble men more than natural disasters. Last year in the United States alone, hurricanes, floods, and tornadoes killed 290 people and destroyed property valued at $15 billion. Working to mitigate the human toll of that devastation were nearly 90,000 American Red Cross disaster relief workers -- 95 percent of whom were volunteers -- helping the victims first to survive, and then to rebuild their lives.

Disaster assistance speaks to the deepest and purest ideals of the Red Cross movement. It is the reason the Red Cross was formed more than a century ago, and it remains the truest example of its continuing commitment to service.

The American Red Cross has responded to recent disasters swiftly and magnanimously, as it always has. Since September, nearly a dozen major disasters -- including eight large-scale floods in the South and Midwest -- have pressed the American Red Cross into action. But disaster is not the only spur. Social services, health and safety programs, blood and tissue efforts, and international activities all galvanize our Red Cross into service.

The organization continues to lead the way in making the Nation's blood supply as safe as possible. It recently introduced testing to reduce post-transfusion non A, non B hepatitis, following up its 1985 implementation of HTLV - III testing for AIDS. It also launched its Look Back initiative, a program that notifies people who have been transfused with blood or blood components from donors who later tested positive for the AIDS antibody. Finally, the American Red Cross undertook a massive AIDS public education effort to spread the facts about the disease.

The American Red Cross continues to train millions of students in first aid, cardiopulmonary resuscitation, water safety, and small craft operation. It maintains vital communication services to the Nation's military through a network of Red Cross posts at 277 domestic and overseas military installations. Every 11 seconds, the Red Cross helps someone in our Armed Forces or a member of a service family. Last summer, the Red Cross formed the National Bone Marrow Donor Registry, giving new hope to thousands of patients with life-threatening blood diseases. Finally, the American Red Cross continues to aid foreign disaster victims. Its response to the October 1986 earthquake in San Salvador included cash, goods, and staff services valued at more than half a million dollars. Work still goes on in the aftermath of the terrible September 1985 earthquake in Mexico City, where Red Cross workers from around the world are helping the victims to rebuild.

No one can predict when the next river will flood or the next storm will hit. No one can foresee the next threat to the Nation's health. What is predictable is that we will face such threats and emergencies, and that the American Red Cross will be there to offer help and hope.

Before joining the White House, Ms. Risque was a government affairs representative for the Standard Oil Co. of Ohio; prior to that, she spent a year as the energy affairs representative for the American Paper Institute. Ms. Risque worked as an assistant to the Assistant Secretary of Commerce for Tourism during the Ford administration, and earlier as a publicist for the public relations firm of Robert A. Marston and Associates of New York. She has a bachelor of arts degree from Radford College and resides in Virginia.

The President. Helen [Helen Thomas, United Press International], besides reminding you this is a photo opportunity and no questions -- but I'm not going to take any questions on that situation until the Tower commission's report is turned in to us.

The President. Well, this is up to him. I have always said that when the people that I've asked to come into government feel that they have to return to private life, that's their business and I will never try to talk them out of it.

The President. It's been a pleasure to have an old friend, Prime Minister Yitzhak Shamir of Israel, back to the White House. His visit symbolizes the close and special relations between our countries. His visit has provided an opportunity for in-depth discussion, and I'm pleased to report our discussions went well. High on our agenda, of course, was Middle Eastern peace and our search for a constructive approach to Arab-Israeli reconciliation. We talked about the dangers that threaten Israel and its neighbors and efforts being made to bring a degree of stability to that troubled region. Measurable progress, we both agree, is vital. Peace cannot be built in an environment where there is no hope.

In our discussions we agreed, again, that the road to peace lies through bilateral negotiations between Israel and its neighbors, including representative Palestinians. We reviewed the diplomatic discussions over the last 2 years which we've conducted with Jordan, Egypt, and Israel -- all of whom share a strong desire to end the conflict that has plagued the Middle East. Our goal now is setting in motion a process accepted by Israel and its neighbors which can lead to a comprehensive peace settlement. We believe this requires direct bilateral negotiations. Any reasonable means of including an international conference should be considered. But the United States remains ready to be an active partner in any serious peace effort.

Prime Minister Shamir and I discussed Iran. I underscored our opposition to Iran's use of force, terrorism, and expansionism. In discussing Iran and other regional issues, the Prime Minister and I agreed on the importance of looking to the future, instead of dwelling on the past. We also went over our countries' strong and vital bilateral relationship and the broad scope of our cooperation. Both our governments face tight budgets. I assured Prime Minister Shamir that we will continue our steadfast support for Israel's own efforts to ensure its security and economic well-being. In that regard we have designated Israel, with other countries, a major non-NATO ally, for purposes of cooperation in certain aspects of military research and development. Finally, in our discussions we reaffirmed our concern about the plight of Soviet Jewry. We took note of recent releases, but are waiting to see the gates truly opened for Jewish emigration.

The United States and Israel share many common values and traditions. We have developed a warm friendship that encompasses close mutual and strategic cooperation. This relationship, in which each gives special consideration to the other's interests, strengthens us both. It's unshakable, and we're proud of it. As we look to the future, the Prime Minister and I are committed to the close cooperation long enjoyed by the United States and Israel. It is an honor to have Prime Minister Shamir with us to reaffirm the solid bond of affection between our countries and our peoples.

The Prime Minister. Mr. President, it is with profound satisfaction that I stand here today, as we give expression to the abiding and deep friendship between our two countries. Mr. President, America under your leadership stands tall and upright despite transient difficulties. You continue to discharge your great responsibility as the leader of the free world. Without strong United States leadership, mankind could be exposed to very grave peril in the hands of the forces of evil and totalitarianism.

Our two countries share values, perceptions, and goals that unite us in thought and in deed. Since my last visit as Prime Minister, we have given more substance to agreements we reached then in regard to strategic cooperation and the free trade area. Now your administration has moved one more step forward by giving a new dimension to our relations. I refer to your decision to accord Israel the status of a major non-NATO ally. We have been among the first to join your Strategic Defense Initiative, and we hope to expand our cooperation in this program. We've also just concluded an agreement enabling the establishment of a relay station for the Voice of America in Israel. Both projects are a reflection of our continuing support of America's defense and advancement of freedom.

In our talks today we explored the prospects of advancing the peace process in the Middle East. While this is not an easy task, it is a noble goal to which we are committed. On the foundations of the Camp David accords -- which remain the only agreement, therefore, only viable cornerstone for peace in the area -- we renew the call to our neighbors to join us in direct negotiations for the obtainment of peace between us. Egypt, our partner to the Camp David agreement, could play a significant role by encouraging our other neighbors to follow her example and enter into face-to-face talks with us without preconditions.

Mr. President, the struggle for the freedom and repatriation of Soviet Jewry is by no means over. We must press on with all vigor to persuade the Soviet authorities to let all our people return to their ancient homeland, the land of Israel. I take this opportunity of expressing our gratitude to you, Mr. President, for the great effort you made for the humanitarian cause of our brothers and sisters in the Soviet Union. Their happiness at coming home to Israel and experiencing freedom and democracy is their and our tribute to you.

Mr. President, this year, 1987, records two events of great significance in the life of our two nations: You will celebrate the bicentennial of the United States Constitution, which is regarded as the model for truth, civil liberties, and democratic government. We are marking the 90th anniversary of the birth of our national liberation movement, Zionism, which restored us to our ancient land and renewed our national independence. Both events have enriched the quality of our lives. And they are the root of our present relationship, joint efforts; our dreams; and our confidence in the future.

With the passing of Bryce N. Harlow the Nation has lost one of its finest public servants. Recognizing the need for improved communication between the executive and legislative branches in the era of the modern Presidency, Mr. Harlow founded the Congressional Liaison Office of the White House and served as its Director under Presidents Eisenhower and Nixon.

He was trusted by Presidents and Members of the House and Senate on both sides of the aisle. He was a brilliant writer and eloquent speaker whose knowledge of the intricacies of government served the Nation admirably for nearly four decades. He was an insightful architect of public policy whose contributions have strengthened our democracy's political process.

Five years ago I asked all Americans to light a candle in support of freedom in Poland. During that Christmas season of 1981 candles were lit in millions of American homes. We had confidence that the spirit of freedom would continue to shine in the darkness that martial law had brought to that brave country. As Americans, we were showing solidarity with Solidarity.

Symbolic gestures were not enough. Economic and other sanctions were imposed on Poland in response to the repression that descended on the Polish people as a result of martial law. Our message was that America would not passively stand by while a grand experiment in freedom was brutally smashed in Poland. If the Polish Government wanted a decent relationship with the United States, we made it clear they would have to lift martial law, release the political prisoners, and enter into a real political dialog with Polish society.

Today, more than 5 years later, the light of freedom continues to shine in Poland. The commitment and sacrifice of hundreds of thousands of Polish men and women have kept the flame alive, even amid the gloom. In 1983 martial law was lifted and thousands of political prisoners have been freed in a series of amnesties. Since the final amnesty last September, no one has been arrested on political charges in Poland. Yet there is still far to go. The threat of arrest still hangs over those who seek their freedom. The right to genuinely independent trade unions is still stifled. Independent political activity continues to be repressed by various governmental measures. National reconciliation remains a dream, a goal for the future, rather than a reality of today.

I continue to believe, as do the Polish people, that it is a possible dream. The Church in Poland has greeted the major amnesty of political prisoners last September as a significant step by the Polish Government. In response to that amnesty, we initiated a step-by-step process of expanding our dialog with the Government of Poland. In our dealings with Polish authorities, we have made one point clear: The continuation of better relations between our countries, and their further improvement, will be possible only if we see maintained the spirit and principle of the amnesty and a reliance on dialog and respect for human rights. Only through genuine and meaningful reconciliation can the plight of the Polish people be alleviated. We will be watching to see that further steps are taken toward national reconciliation in Poland and that the progress made is not reversed.

Significantly, the leaders of Solidarity and of the Catholic Church in Poland agree that this is the right course for us to take. They have now urged us to lift our remaining economic sanctions in order to encourage further movement in the right direction. In considering this question, I have drawn on a broad cross section of views. We have been in touch at the highest levels with the Polish Government, with the Church, and with Solidarity. We have also consulted with our allies. After careful review, I have decided that the economic sanctions imposed in December 1981 and October 1982 should be rescinded, and I am accordingly restoring most-favored-nation tariff treatment for Poland and lifting the ban on Poland's eligibility for official U.S. credits and credit guarantees. We have always worked closely with our allies on issues concerning Poland, and they have sent messages of support for this step forward.

I am honored by the expression of concern from distinguished Members of Congress, leaders of the Polish-American community in this country, and Solidarity. Together we underscore the heartfelt concern of our citizens about Poland. Let no one doubt our brothers and sisters who struggle to build a freer and more humane Poland, or our resolve to stand by them. As it was in 1981, freedom is precious to us. The slogan of the Polish independence struggle of the last century was: ``For Your Freedom And Ours.'' That is our slogan, too. And it is more than a slogan; it is a program of action.

Today is a first step, a big step. Our relations with Poland can only develop in ways that encourage genuine progress toward national reconciliation in that country. We will be steady. We will be committed. The flame that burns in the hearts of the Polish people, a flame represented by the candles we lit in 1981, that flame of justice and liberty will never be extinguished.

Section 1. (a) The function vested in the President by section 1110(b) of the Act of entering into agreements with developing countries is delegated to the Director of the United States International Development Cooperation Agency, and this function may be redelegated to the head of any other agency. This function shall be exercised in accordance with section 112b of Title I of the United States Code and applicable regulations and procedures of the Department of State.

Sec. 2. The functions vested in the President by section 1110(f)(2) of the Act of waiving any minimum tonnage requirements are delegated to the Secretary of Agriculture, who shall exercise this function in accordance with policy guidance provided by the Food Aid Subcommittee of the Development Coordination Committee.

Sec. 3. In order to ensure that the furnishing of commodities under the Act is coordinated with and complements other United States foreign assistance, the exercise of all functions delegated by this Order shall be coordinated through the Food Aid Subcommittee of the Development Coordination Committee.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 19th day of February, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

I am pleased to transmit today for your immediate consideration and enactment the ``Trade, Employment, and Productivity Act of 1987'' (the Act). The intent of this proposal is simple: to assure American competitive preeminence into the 21st century. The proposal itself is wide ranging, designed to help American workers, including those who are not yet full participants in our economy, to reach their highest potential and to permit American business to better marshal our Nation's resources. I am convinced that enactment of my proposal will allow American workers and business to meet world competition head-on, and win.

The initiatives in the Trade, Employment, and Productivity Act are under the jurisdiction of a number of different congressional committees. These initiatives all have a common element: they will improve our Nation's productivity and competitiveness. I strongly urge the Congress to consider the Act in its entirety. Failure to enact all of the initiatives would be akin to sending the American worker into the international arena without the proper tools.

The Act has five titles dealing with increasing investment in human and intellectual capital; promoting the development of science and technology; better protecting intellectual property rights; bringing about essential legal and regulatory reforms; and improving the international economic environment. Many of the statutory initiatives I am proposing will be complemented by administrative actions.

Title I of the Act is the Investment in Human and Intellectual Capital Act of 1987. Education and training are truly investments. We must prepare ourselves for the future by taking the opportunity to acquire the talents and skills needed to adapt to the dynamics of the marketplace. To excel in the 21st century, our society must continue the necessary reforms for excellence in our schools. A major part of this effort must include reauthorizing Chapters 1 and 2 of the Education Consolidation and Improvement Act to target resources on the neediest schools and youngsters; foster greater innovation, experimentation, and parental choice; build accountability into the program; and provide incentives and rewards for success. I am also proposing amendments to the Bilingual Education Act to give school districts greater flexibility in designing and operating programs that address the particular educational needs of limited English proficient students. But Federal legislation can only accomplish so much. To complement our legislative initiative, I charged Secretary Bennett with working with our Nation's governors to continue identifying what works in American education and to continue seeking places of excellence that will serve as models. We must improve our children's basic skills -- reading, writing, and computation; raise standards in elementary and secondary schools; and instill in our children productive habits and sound values. Together we must, by the year 2000, dramatically reduce illiteracy.

Investment in human capital must be an ongoing process. Training and retraining of the Nation's workforce are a critical part of that process. I am proposing a new $980 million worker readjustment program that will help some 700,000 dislocated workers each year through counseling, job search assistance, basic education, and job skill training. This program will help assure that we will not lose the valuable work experience and talents of workers who are displaced from their jobs. We must provide training and adjustment opportunities to these workers early -- before they exhaust unemployment benefits. Another potential source of skills for our Nation is the large number of economically disadvantaged Americans who are not now part of the mainstream of American economic life. To tap this important resource, I am proposing two interrelated initiatives for recipients of Aid to Families with Dependent Children (AFDC). The first is the AFDC and Summer Youth Employment and Youth Training program, which will allow States and localities to use money now allocated for summer jobs for year-round remedial skill training and education for AFDC youth. The funding for the program will be increased to $800 million. The second is a new employment and training program in AFDC called Greater Opportunities Through Work (GROW). GROW will encourage teenage parents and children who have not completed high school to stay in or return to school. Older AFDC recipients will participate in employment and training activities, including remedial education, designed to improve their capacity to support themselves and their families. I am also proposing to give States greater flexibility in developing comprehensive approaches to the problems of the unemployed by decentralizing authority, financing, and responsibility for administering the Unemployment Insurance and Employment Service programs.

Title II of the Act is The National Science Foundation (NSF) Authorization Act, which will authorize appropriations for the NSF for a 5-year period, with a doubling of our budgetary commitment. I will also be taking a number of administrative actions that will make Federal R&D spending more effective, including establishing university-based science and technology centers, which will focus on fundamental science that directly contributes to our Nation's economic competitiveness. I am also creating a private/public Technology Share program at Federal laboratories; initiating a People-to-People Exchange program to transfer knowledge between Federal laboratories and industry and academia; and issuing an Executive order to improve U.S. industry and academia access to the Federal science and technology enterprise. The NSF will work with the Department of Education and State and local governments to assure that our children have the basic scientific literacy needed for the 21st century. I have also directed the Department of Defense to accelerate its efforts to ``spin off'' technologies to the private sector. To assure continued American leadership in the field of high energy physics, the Secretary of Energy will embark on the siting and construction of the Superconducting Super Collider -- a 21st century version of a linear accelerator -- that will help us understand the very nature of matter.

In addition, we are interested in exploring with the Congress and industry representatives measures that will provide additional incentives for American business to advance its technology and research and strengthen our international position in the world marketplace. This could include extending the current R&D tax credit beyond its expiration at the end of 1988; making it permanent; increasing the credit rate beyond the current 20 percent; and extending or increasing the current 50 percent automatic apportionment of R&D expenditures between domestic and foreign income and making it permanent. We look forward to discussions with the Congress on these and other possible approaches in an effort to ensure stability, certainty, and appropriate incentives in this vital area.

To continue to generate ideas, innovation, and invention, we must ensure that inventors are rewarded for their efforts. This can be done by protecting the rights of inventors to the economic rewards for their efforts. Title III of the Trade, Employment, and Productivity Act is The Omnibus Intellectual Property Rights Improvement Act of 1987. I am proposing a series of badly needed changes, including omnibus intellectual property reform and a technological solution to the potential problem of unauthorized copying of copyrighted material on digital audio tape recorders. We will also seek to join the Berne Convention and gain copyright relations with twenty countries with which we currently have none.

I am also proposing to broaden the statutory definitions of trade secrets and confidential commercial information under the Freedom of Information Act (FOIA) to permit Federal agencies to withhold information if disclosure would be harmful to commercial interests. In addition I will issue an Executive order to better protect business confidentiality under the FOIA by giving business the opportunity to object to the release of commercial information submitted to the government if release would cause competitive harm.

Title IV of the Act is The Legal and Regulatory Reforms Act of 1987. Outmoded rules and regulations and self-imposed disincentives place us at a disadvantage in the global marketplace. We must pare down the unnecessary costs that American business faces while continuing to protect worker safety and maintain public health and safety standards. I am proposing statutory reforms to reduce the costly product liability spiral, to amend our antitrust laws to reflect the dynamics of world trade, and to deregulate surface transportation (including termination of the Interstate Commerce Commission) and the pricing and transportation of natural gas, including repeal of demand restraints in the Fuel Use Act. I am also proposing oil pipeline deregulation and repeal of corporate average fuel economy standards.

This bill will implement the recommendations of the Vice President's Task Group on Regulation of Financial Services to reform the Federal financial services regulatory structure. I have also asked Vice President Bush to direct the Task Force on Regulatory Relief to take a fresh look at the Federal regulatory structure from the competitiveness standpoint and to improve the cost effectiveness of regulations or eliminate unnecessary regulatory burdens.

I am also proposing amendments to the Export Administration Act that will expedite trade with our trusted international trading partners, reduce the processing times for license applications covering products which are widely available throughout the free world, and, in those instances which require it, allow us to move quickly and effectively to halt technology diversion that is a threat to our national security. In addition, I have asked the Cabinet to report back to me by early March on additional recommendations to improve our export control program.

As part of our mutual effort to ensure that our financial services industry is able to compete effectively, we will work closely with the Congress to enact meaningful reforms of the Nation's banking laws that will promote a freer, more open financial services marketplace, complete with proper government supervision and disclosure. Our work should ultimately seek to remove those prohibitions that prevent greater competition between commercial banks and securities firms. We will also seek the elimination of barriers to effective interstate banking and other unnecessary impediments to an efficiently functioning, modern financial service industry. Fully competitive and economically sound financial services markets are essential not only for a vigorous, growing domestic economy, but also for a fully competitive international trade position for the United States.

In addition, I am proposing changes to the Employee Retirement Income Security Act (ERISA) to enhance the effectiveness of the private pension system in providing retirement income security for American workers. Included in this package is a paper that sets forth the Administration's proposal on funding and termination of defined benefit pension plans.

Title V of the Act is the International Economic Environment Improvement Act of 1987. I am proposing improvements to our trade laws that will enhance our ability to attack other nations' unfair trade practices and open markets abroad without forcing future Presidents to start self-defeating trade wars. Specific proposals I am submitting include: seeking negotiating authority for the Uruguay Round; amending the antidumping law to provide a new predictable pricing test for products from nonmarket economies; establishing a 24-month deadline on dispute settlement cases; improving the Export Trading Company Act; and establishing reciprocal access to foreign markets as an additional factor for consideration in Section 301 cases. My proposal to include reciprocity as an additional factor in Section 301 cases will complement, and be complemented by, aggressive use of Section 301 to attack unfair foreign trade practices. I am also proposing statutory changes to the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act (FCPA). While assuring that bribery to gain foreign sales is deterred through criminal sanctions, we must eliminate the uncertainties and ambiguities in the FCPA. I have also asked the Congress for the additional $200 million for the ``war chest'' to combat aggressively foreign predatory financing practices.

These initiatives will be complemented by our efforts to improve economic and monetary cooperation on a global scale; to address the LDC debt crisis through structural reforms and private sector investment; and to aggressively use existing trade authorities. I will also be devoting considerable attention and resources to our major market opening initiatives -- one bilateral, the other multilateral. We are now engaged in historic negotiations with Canada on a free trade agreement that will improve commercial opportunities on both sides of the border and serve as a model for trade liberalization on a global scale. We have succeeded in our effort to include agriculture, services, intellectual property, and investment in the Uruguay Round of GATT negotiations. We will now push for speedy and comprehensive results.

The Act is a comprehensive proposal for assuring that the Federal government does everything possible to make our workers and businesses preeminent in the 21st century. But we must remember that ultimately it is the decisions of those workers and businessmen that make the market go. We should not intrude unnecessarily upon the decisionmaking of workers or business or impede the effective operation of the marketplace.

Likewise we must avoid protectionist measures that isolate workers and business from the global marketplace. First, our workers and businessmen do not need that kind of help -- we can compete without tilting the board in our favor. Second, the protectionist approach does nothing to make our country more competitive. Rather it is a short-term painkiller that will make us less competitive in the future. Protectionism will not save jobs; it will only redistribute them. Moreover, it would trap our workers in areas of our economy where we are relatively weak, instead of allowing us to grow in areas where we are strong. In a sense, protectionism is like an unfair tax -- one that hurts most Americans in the interest of helping a few.

Finally, the most important thing we can do in the short term to reduce our trade deficit is to reduce the Federal budget deficit. I have submitted a Fiscal Year 1988 budget that meets the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings target without raising taxes. I urge the Congress to work with me to achieve that goal.

Two hundred years ago, a group of patriots conceived the Constitution and thereby created the political, economic, and social framework for our Nation. As a result, many precious freedoms have been guaranteed to American citizens. Inherent in these is the freedom to produce, to sell, and to buy or not to buy.

Our competitive marketplace has flourished and become the most productive in the world, providing American consumers with unparalleled choices and opportunities. The goal of the Constitution's framers was to provide a free market in goods and services marked by creativity, by invention, and by the productivity of American workers.

We can be thankful today for the wisdom of our Founders. A functioning national market for goods and services with common money, standard weights and measures, reliable legal procedures respecting honest contracts, freedom from oppressive taxation, the encouragement of invention, and a dependable postal system were commonly recognized as needs in the debates of the Constitutional Convention. The resulting document, signed in Philadelphia in 1787, so effectively addressed those concerns that the same principles guide our modern economy.

These principles of freedom and fairness are the basis for consumer rights in the marketplace: the right to choose among products, services, and suppliers; the right to adequate information about what we buy; the right to expect that products offered for sale will conform to reasonable safety standards; the right to be heard; and the right to consumer education.

National Consumers Week 1987 is dedicated to reminding us that the exercise of these rights helps to maintain the vigor of our economic system -- creating positive pressure for better products, services, and warranties -- and that consumer education is a lifelong process.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this nineteenth day of February, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

The President. Thank you very much. And good evening to all my friends there and all you loyal conservatives that are gathered there at dinner this evening. I know now that you're about to hear from the Attorney General. I discovered where he was when I tried to get him on the phone. I wanted to ask him where I could find a cheap lawyer. But I'm glad he's there. It's all in fun, Ed.

I look forward to being there personally tomorrow, joining you for the largest of CPAC's 14 conferences involving 50 groups representing some 3 million Americans. Well, I'll spend some time tomorrow outlining goals for the future. But for tonight, if you are listening, let me deliver to you my deep and lasting thanks for what you believe and for what you've done in the name of those beliefs. And we'll talk tomorrow, and it won't be by phone.

Now, enjoy the assembled stars of Broadway and the talents of my friend Yakov Smirnoff. I hope you hear this part -- I know you'll all join me in congratulating him on acquiring his United States citizenship this year. [Applause] Now, I know you heard that. So, Yakov, welcome aboard! We're glad to have you be one of us. So, until tomorrow then, God bless you all, and good night.

The President. Thank you all. Thank you. As Henry VIII said to each one of his six wives -- [laughter] -- ``I won't keep you long.'' [Laughter] Fellow conservatives and dear friends, it's such a pleasure to be with you again. I see so many who've served our cause with such distinction over the years. David Keene and so many others of you deserve accolades for commitment and dedication.

What we've accomplished these last 6 years wouldn't have been possible without a solid foundation, one painstakingly laid. And much of that work was done by men and women who were content to make their contribution knowing their names would never be enshrined, individuals who didn't make the clips when the recent documentary about the conservative movement was made. Two centuries ago the Americans who were the bulwark of the cause of liberty and independence -- who backed up the Hancocks, the Jeffersons, and the Patrick Henrys -- were of similar stock. And so, today let me express my appreciation to all of you. You are truly freedom's team. The going may be a little rough at this moment, but let no one doubt our resolve. [Applause] Thank you very much.

But getting back to our resolve: Six years ago we won a great victory, and we don't intend to let anyone again drag our beloved country back into the murky pit of collectivism and statism. This is the 200th anniversary of our Constitution, and no cloud will dim the shining light of our remembrance. This year we rededicate ourselves to the shared values and the common purpose that have given our nation unrivaled prosperity and freedom. We hear the cynics, but pay them no mind. We pass by the pessimists and the doomsayers knowing that they'll always be with us, but confident that they no longer can hold our country back unless we let them. We see before us a future worthy of our past and a tomorrow greater than all our yesterdays. If there's any message that I wish to convey today it is: be of good cheer. We're coming back and coming back strong.

Our confidence flows not from our skill at maneuvering through political mazes, not from our ability to make the right deal at the right time, nor from any idea of playing one interest group off against the other. Unlike our opponents, who find their glee in momentary political leverage, we garnish our strength of purpose from a commitment to ideals that we deeply believe are not only right but that work. Ludwig Von Mises, that great economist, once noted: ``People must fight for something they want to achieve, not simply reject an evil.'' Well, the conservative movement remains in the ascendancy because we have a bold, forward-looking agenda. No longer can it be said that conservatives are just anti-Communist. We are, and proudly so, but we are also the keepers of the flame of liberty. And as such, we believe that America should be a source of support, both moral and material, for all those on God's Earth who struggle for freedom. Our cause is their cause, whether it be in Nicaragua, Afghanistan, or Angola. When I came back from Iceland I said -- and I meant it -- American foreign policy is not simply focused on the prevention of war but the expansion of freedom.

Modern conservatism is an active, not a reactive philosophy. It's not just in opposition to those vices that debase character and community, but affirms values that are at the heart of civilization. We favor protecting and strengthening the family, an institution that was taken for granted during the decades of liberal domination of American government. The family, as became clear in the not-too-distant past, is taken for granted at our peril. Victimized most were the least fortunate among us, those who sorely needed the strength and protection of the family.

A Federal welfare system, constructed in the name of helping those in poverty, wreaked havoc on the poor family -- tearing it apart, eating away at the underpinnings of their community, creating fatherless children, and unprecedented despair. The liberal welfare state has been a tragedy beyond description for so many of our fellow citizens, a crime against less fortunate Americans. The welfare system cries out for reform, and reformed it will be. And when it is, the number one question that must be asked of every change is: Will this strengthen the family? Now, personally, I think that criterion should guide our decisions, not just in welfare reform, but in the deliberations of every department and agency. And if the answer is negative, the proposal should be sent to the Heritage Foundation for study, and you can bet they'll know what to do with it.

Our positive stance on family and children is consistent with our heartfelt convictions on the issue of abortion. Here again, we're not just against an evil. We're not just antiabortion; we're prolife. Many who consider abortion the taking of human life understandably feel frustrated and perhaps a sense of helplessness in bringing about the legal changes that we all seek. Progress has been slow and painful, and all the while the taking of unborn lives continues. Well, while we keep up the pressure for a change of law, there is something that can be done. Those of us who oppose abortion can and should aggressively move forward with a positive adoption versus abortion campaign. We must see to it that adoption is a readily available alternative and is an encouraged course of action. I would like to commend those in our movement, while not easing up on applying political pressure, who have been involved in providing counseling and services, especially to unwed mothers. Every time a choice is made to save an unborn baby's life, it is reason for joy. In the meantime, we in government will see to it that not one tax dollar goes to encouraging any woman to snuff out the life of her unborn child and that eventually the life of the unborn again comes within the protection of the law.

Last week we sent to Congress legislation to enact on a permanent, governmentwide basis the Hyde amendment restriction on Federal funding of abortion. Our proposal would also cut off funding, under title 10, to private organizations that refer or perform abortions except when the mother's life is in danger. I hope all of you will join in the bipartisan effort to enact this much needed legislation. Conservatives are working for a society where children are cherished and in school are taught not only reading, writing, and arithmetic but fundamental values as well. And in striving for this, we will not compromise in our commitment to restore the right to pray to the schoolchildren of America. We want a strong America, and we know the truth behind President Eisenhower's words, when he quoted a young Frenchman's observation that if America ceases to be good, America will cease to be great.

We must offer a vision of a future that works, a positive agenda for positive results. And we must not be so much against big government and high taxes as we are in favor of higher take-home pay and more freedom. And we've proven it works. With an emphasis on enterprise, investment, and work, on jobs and opportunity, we turned around economic decline and national malaise and set in motion one of the longest periods of peacetime economic growth and job creation in postwar history.

The pundits, you know, the pundits told us that we couldn't expect to get anything accomplished, even before we got to Washington. Now, they're trying to bring the curtain down before the show is over. Well, I learned a lesson in my former profession. So, let me give you a tip: We're saving the best stuff for the last act.

Seriously though, today free enterprise is propelling us into a new technological era. Small businesses throughout our land now have computer capability, which a decade ago was available only to large corporations. The economic vitality pushing our country into the 21st century is broad-based and irreversible -- and it's not coming from the top, but from the bottom. The creative talents of our citizenry, always America's greatest asset, are being magnified by state-of-the-art technology and put to work for our benefit as never before. We have every reason to be optimistic.

Our scientific advances offer us new methods of meeting the challenges we face as a people. One of the first significant questions to emerge as a result of our rapid progress deals with the Strategic Defense Initiative. [Applause] I see you know that that is our effort to develop a way of protecting mankind from the threat of ballistic missiles. It holds the promise of someday making those missiles, deadly weapons that have been the cause of such dread, obsolete. We have offered to share the benefits of our SDI program with the Soviet Union, perhaps as part of an overall agreement to dramatically reduce our respective nuclear arsenals. But let me make this clear: A defense against ballistic missiles is just one of many new achievements that will be made possible by the incredible technological process that we are enjoying.

Each step forward improves our lives, adding to our ability to produce and build and generate wealth. Yet each step also has strategic implications. SDI, as I say, is one. Let there be no doubt, we have no intention of being held back because our adversary cannot keep up. We will use our scientific skills to make this a more prosperous world and to enhance the security of our own country. We must not and will not bargain the future away.

Six years ago we came to Washington at a time of great national uncertainty. The vigor and confidence so evident in our land today reflect more than luck. They are the outgrowth of ideas that stress freedom for the individual and respect for the humane and decent values of family, God, and neighborhood. We are giving our children the greatest gift that is within our power to give, the one we received from those who came before us: a strong, free, and opportunity-filled America. And I thank you for all that you have done and continue to do to make certain that we do just that.

This past Tuesday I gave a major address on our administration's proposal to make our nation more competitive in the world economy. Then on Thursday I submitted those proposals to Congress. American competitiveness -- it's an issue that involves all our hopes for keeping this country a land of opportunity in the years ahead. Of course millions of us have the feeling that, recently, American products haven't been measuring up in the world marketplace quite the way they should. According to one poll, 9 out of 10 Americans are worried that the United States is losing its competitive edge. But it's important to move away from general notions like these to define the problem as precisely as we can.

Looking back we know that, virtually throughout our history, the United States has grown more competitive with the rest of the world, not less. In the century and a third between our founding and the First World War, we went from a minor agrarian nation -- a country for the most part of small towns and little farms scattered among vast reaches of virgin wilderness -- to an industrial power of the first rank, with great cities and factories and a workforce that was large and highly skilled. By the end of the Second World War, the United States stood alone, an economic giant that none of the war-ravaged powers could even begin to match. Since the war the United States has undergone economic expansion, growing economically still stronger; but so have other nations.

The countries the Second World War laid low have in recent decades not only rebuilt to prewar levels but gone on to play major roles in the modern world economy. This is as it should be, as we Americans would want it to be. It's no good being the tallest one around just because everybody else is flat on his back. And we went to great lengths with the Marshall plan and other programs, specifically to help other nations get back on their economic feet. But, yes, this new prosperity on the part of other nations does involve certain challenges. By the way, I'd like to stress that I used the word ``challenges,'' not ``threats.'' Threats are something you need to beat back; challenges are something you can rise to.

Today we see these economic challenges everywhere, challenges like the high quality of so many foreign goods and improved marketing techniques for selling foreign goods here at home. The strong dollar of recent years -- in large part a reflection of the underlying health of our economy -- has added a challenge of its own, making foreign goods less expensive in America and American goods more expensive abroad.

Yet perhaps the most distressing shortcomings involve the aspect of American life that will most directly affect our future -- education. Compared to students in the Soviet Union, American high school pupils spend over 20 percent fewer hours each year in school. Compared to students in Japan, American pupils receive significantly less instruction in those subjects of special importance to so many areas of economic growth -- mathematics and the sciences.

An incredible achievement indeed, but one to build upon, not take for granted. And that's why in my address on Tuesday I put forward an array of proposals, including worker retraining, redoubled efforts to open foreign markets to American goods, and new research initiatives to spur innovation in science and technology. This quest for excellence must be a great national undertaking that challenges Americans to achieve their best -- that challenges workers to take greater pride in their product; businessmen to become even more enterprising and innovative; and educators to instill in our children a willingness to strive for that magic word, ``excellence.'' So, I call on Congress to put our proposals at the top of its agenda and to act upon them promptly. Working together I'm confident that we'll go on to still more jobs and even greater prosperity. After all, when it comes to world competitiveness, we Americans have quite a history behind us.

Well, tonight there are no speeches after the meal, so I'll be brief. Having been a Governor, I can sympathize that sometimes it feels like you're out in the middle of the arena and the voters are rooting for the lions. After our meeting I hope that each of you understands that this administration is rooting for you. In these last 5 years we've done our best to make certain the Federal Government doesn't increase taxes and drain away the revenue base that you depend on at the State and local level. Federal money is, as we all know, nothing more than local money that is given back, minus a carrying charge and coupled with complex guidelines and regulations. Well, we'd rather have local and State officials, and the people themselves, keep that revenue right at home. And as far as those guidelines -- you've helped us save the States billions of dollars by ridding the books of needless paperwork and trimming back the redtape. I've thought from my own days as Governor that the best thing the Federal Government can do for the States is get out of your pockets and out of your way.

Seriously though, it's a pleasure to share this wonderful evening with you all. So, there isn't a place on here to set this. I always have to go over and get it. I now lift a glass to all of you, to our country, may her 50 States and 5 territories always shine as the stars in the constellation of freedom and democracy.

Thank you all very much, and welcome to the White House. It's a great pleasure to have you all here in Washington and have this opportunity to talk to you, as one chief executive to others, about our plans to prepare America for the century ahead. With me, as you saw -- usually a group anyplace I go anymore, so we -- Secretary Bennett and Secretary Bowen, Chuck Hobbs, the Vice President. And they'll all help me in answering any questions that you may have. Mostly, however, we want to listen to you, to hear what's happening at the State level; because I may be prejudiced, having been a Governor myself. But I'm convinced that it's in our States and communities that we find many of the most innovating and exciting answers to our problems.

First, however, I want to talk about what we see as our three top agenda items: welfare reform, education, and competitiveness. All three, of course, are connected. Success in all three areas is necessary if America is going to be all it can be.

On the subject of welfare reform: Tomorrow we'll be sending our legislative proposal to Congress, to start that long and convoluted process by which we hope to get true reform started. Our goal is to establish a process that allows States and communities to implement their own antipoverty ideas based on their own unique experiences. States and communities are in the best position to find solutions to welfare dependency. In fact, a number of you already have used the limited independence that you now have to improve your welfare systems. Dozens more of you've demonstrated that you're eager to pursue new ideas and fresh strategies.

I'm also convinced that for any plan to work, it must be based on the advice of experts -- not the ones in the universities and the think tanks, whose expert advice helped create the current welfare crisis, but the real experts: people like a lady named Kimi Gray, a one-time welfare mother with five children. We had her here in the White House the other day, and she told us about how she had gotten herself off of welfare and sent her five children to college. Not only that but she went on to become the driving force behind the Kenilworth Parkside Resident Management Association, taking over the management of these housing projects. And when she started out, she says that Kenilworth Parkside was referred to as ``the end of nowhere, the part of the city that's been forgotten.'' But through the resident management concept, welfare recidivism was reduced from 85 percent to 22 percent and teenage pregnancy was cut by 50 percent. Crime in the neighborhood fell, and new businesses started up.

And how did she do it? Well, her work echoes what every other true expert about welfare knows, what everyone who's had success getting people off of welfare, rather than on, will tell you. ``Our philosophy,'' she said, ``is that the only way we could save our community was by saving our families.'' And how did they do that? Well, here are her words: ``By returning respect and responsibility and pride back to the fathers of our community.'' There, spoken with the eloquence that comes from experience, is the fundamental truth about the difference between dependency and self-sufficiency: It hinges on the family. The fundamental principle that must guide all our efforts at reform is that anything we do, any change we make, must strengthen, support, and give encouragement to the family. We must do all we can to ensure that the family is a safe haven for its children, a source of strength and security for all its members.

And let me make a related point: In some cases day care may be a necessity, but it can never replace the love and care of the parents themselves. We've always been a nation that's drawn its strength from the values of family life. If America hopes to enter the 21st century united and free, we must once again make a wholesale, conscious commitment to strengthening and protecting those basic family values and the strong, stable families from which they spring. I know you all recently received my letter on welfare reform. And I know that you're as dissatisfied with the present system as we are. And many of you've thought long and hard about what needs to be done. Well, that's why we're anxious to hear what ideas your task force, headed by Governor Mike Castle, has to offer. And all of you, individually, have made great strides. We need your ideas, but not just your ideas. I'm asking each of you to help get our legislation through Congress. And I'm asking each of you, then, to use your new freedom to try new approaches in your State so that we can work together to make welfare work better.

Also, I've previewed the ideas you're going to consider tomorrow as a group, ideas developed over the past year by your task force on welfare reform. And I want you to know that I applaud those efforts, especially the emphasis that you're putting on increased self-responsibility among people the welfare system has too often assigned to long-term dependency. An important part of the solution for many is education. And may I take a minute here to congratulate all of you on the impressive strides you're making in this area. Last August you issued a report called ``Time For Results.'' And you raised some tough questions and offered some bold recommendations for reform.

You told us that our education system should set high standards and hold teachers and administrators accountable for the jobs they do. You told us that we should encourage more parental choice and involvement, and you told us to open up the education profession to qualified individuals from other professions. And you said that our colleges should be judged by their success or failure in educating our students. Secretary Bennett tells me that you're moving full speed ahead to put your recommendations into practice. Well, I want to urge you today to continue to build on your report and to carry your ideas through, specifically ensure that all our students have good teachers by opening up the profession to all competent individuals who have mastered the subjects to be taught and make an even greater push for higher standards and higher expectations for all of our children, regardless of their social or economic background.

You've taken the lead, and the Federal Government is going to work to do our part. Last week I sent two important pieces of legislation to the Congress: our ECIA proposal to improve the education of disadvantaged children and our bilingual proposal to restore flexibility to decisions on the best means of teaching children whose first language is not English. These proposals complement your reform efforts. We're encouraged by the progress of our education reform movement. You're on the front lines, so let's stick with it.

And finally, the task of competitiveness. Welfare reform and education are a big part of that. People are our most valuable resource; and their imagination and creativity, hard work, and faith -- that's what'll drive America into the 21st century. We can't afford to leave anyone out, and no one must be excluded. And that's why I recently sent to Congress proposed legislation to ensure that government will contribute its share to America's quest for excellence. Ours is a diverse package, as diverse as the challenge before us. But diverse though it is, every part of it has one central purpose -- and that is to make certain that in the years ahead the door of opportunity and excellence is open to all Americans.

Well, now I've broken my promise of last night at dinner. I've talked too long. Our friends from the press will be leaving now. And when they've cleared the room, I'll just turn to your Chairman, Bill Clinton, so that I can hear some of your ideas. Nice to have had you.

We all know family, friends, or neighbors who have suffered a devastating acute care illness that has destroyed their financial security. A catastrophic acute care illness requires treatment so costly that families can only pay for it by impoverishing themselves. A catastrophic illness is financially devastating and requires personal sacrifices that can haunt families for the rest of their lives.

Virtually all the elderly have acute care insurance protection under Medicare. About two-thirds also have private supplementary insurance, or Medigap. These two types of insurance together still have some significant limitations in coverage. As a result, unpredictable health care expenses loom large in the personal budgets of the elderly.

There are gaps in Medicare as currently structured for acute care expenses. Hospital coverage is limited. After 60 days of hospital care, a Medicare patient begins to make increasingly costly payments -- rising from $130 per day for days 61 through 90, to $260 per day for days 91 through 150, to the full cost of care for more than 150 days in the hospital. On top of this, there is a required 20 percent co-payment for all physician services covered by Medicare. The Medicare program, then, requires the greatest payments from those with the most serious health problems.

About 13 percent of the elderly are also covered by Medicaid, a health program for the poor. Medicaid is State-operated, and many States limit the amount and kind of services they will pay for under the program.

The proposed ``Medicare Catastrophic Illness Coverage Act'' would provide improved acute care coverage for the elderly and disabled by restructuring the Medicare program. The proposal would set an annual limit on out-of-pocket expenses for approved charges, with the additional coverage financed by a modest additional premium to be paid by beneficiaries.

Under the proposed legislation, a $2,000 out-of-pocket limit for Medicare-proposed expenses would be established. Beneficiaries would be assured that once they had incurred out-of-pocket expenses of $2,000 for approved charges, the Medicare program would pay for all remaining covered services.

As part of the added protection, all hospital and skilled nursing facility coinsurances would be eliminated. Further, no beneficiary would ever pay more than two hospital deductibles in any year. Skilled nursing facility care would be fully covered for 100 days each year. The complicated ``spell-of-illness'' concept would be eliminated. The current deductible and coinsurance for physician-related services would not be changed until the $2,000 limit was reached.

The proposal would be completely financed by a modest addition to the existing monthly Supplementary Medical Insurance (part B) premium. Any beneficiary electing the optional part B would be automatically covered for catastrophic expenditures. The catastrophic expense cap would be adjusted annually to reflect changes in program costs. The new premium would cover the full costs of the catastrophic illness benefit in an actuarially sound manner. Consequently, this new benefit would not require the infusion of additional general revenues nor exacerbate the current budget deficit.

The legislation that we are advancing today addresses a fundamental gap in the health insurance protection of the elderly and disabled. I am asking the Congress to give elderly Americans a health insurance plan that fights the fear of catastrophic acute care illness. For too long, many of our senior citizens have been faced with making an intolerable choice -- a choice between bankruptcy and death. This proposed legislation would help solve this tragic problem. I urge you to join me in facing the challenge before us and to consider favorably our approach to catastrophic illness protection under Medicare.

Well, it's good to have you and the members of the council here again -- we met before. I recall that when we met last year, you had some pretty impressive ideas on your agenda dealing with economic development, education, and housing. While Congress has yet to act affirmatively on two of those items -- education vouchers and enterprise zones -- working together we were able to get legislation on tax reform and on tenant management and public housing.

This year the objectives, which are among the highest on our list of domestic priorities, our competitiveness and welfare reform, which together create paths of opportunity. And I understand that you have also expanded your own agenda to include items which complement these objectives.

We must start now preparing America for the 21st century. America is beginning the great quest for excellence that will open paths of opportunity so that all Americans will be ready for the year 2000. Our welfare reform package is our way of opening paths of opportunity. We can't go into the competitive world of the next century with so many of our fellow citizens caught in a poverty trap -- a trap that robs those in it of hope and dignity and robs all of us of the benefits of their minds and their work. But welfare reform is not the only part of our quest for excellence.

This year's report and its recommendations focus on encouraging public-private partnerships. The objective is to target the specific needs of each community while encountering fewer layers of bureaucracy and decreasing the dependency on Federal dollars.

The Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Program has been effective, channeling almost one billion dollars since 1975 into various programs authorized by the Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Act.

Over the years, with the aid of these resources, the States have been able to accomplish the primary goals of deinstitutionalization of status offenders and the separation of juvenile and adult offenders at the State and local levels. In addition, many successful demonstration programs have been implemented in jurisdictions across the country. We, therefore, think that it is time to turn over the responsibility for continuing these programs to the State and local communities who benefit from them.

Several of the OJJDP's recommendations will go a long way toward making the transition from total reliance on Federal funds. Interagency cooperation and efforts to provide coordinated juvenile justice activities will ensure the most efficient use of taxpayer dollars. This is key because although we are proposing termination of OJJDP, there are still other Federal agencies that will be providing services and programs benefitting juveniles. Also, the Administrator recommends encouraging the involvement of States, community groups, volunteers, public-private partnerships, and the private sector in protecting society and reducing juvenile crime.

However, simply because we propose terminating this Federal grant program it would be a mistake to conclude that the Administration's commitment to a strong criminal justice system is less than complete. Rather, we have sought improvements to those elements of the criminal justice system where we believe the Federal government has a legitimate responsibility. Indeed, it is precisely because of our strong commitment to improving the criminal justice system that we continually search for scarce Federal dollars. Accordingly, Federal funding for the administration of justice has greatly expanded during my Administration. While 1982 funding totaled $4.7 billion, as measured in outlays, my 1988 budget provides $9.2 billion. This is an increase of almost 100 percent.

The report sets forth six recommendations for improving Federal juvenile delinquency prevention policy. I can assure you that each of the recommendations will be implemented to the extent possible with respect to funds appropriated in fiscal year 1987.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Beryl Dorsett to be Assistant Secretary for Elementary and Secondary Education, Department of Education. She would succeed Lawrence F. Davenport.

The President today announced his intention to designate the following individuals to the positions of Chairman and Vice Chairman, respectively, of the President's National Security Telecommunications Advisory Committee for terms of 1 year.

Well, thank you all, and welcome to the Old Executive Office Building. It's a pleasure to be able to welcome so many distinguished executives from the Midwest, the part of the country that I grew up in and that still holds a special place in my heart.

But as business leaders from America's heartland you represent a tremendously important audience: men and women with responsibility for so much of our country's corporate and economic might -- so much of America's growth, prosperity, and job creation. You know, a few years ago, I challenged our nation's educators to improve education throughout America. Since then all 50 States have had task forces in education, and our students' test scores have risen. And now we're engaged in another great effort, an effort to make America more competitive in world markets -- in a word, a quest for excellence. And in a moment I'll issue you a challenge that's every bit as important as the one I gave to the educators.

But in a certain sense, the quest for excellence began when we first took office in 1981. During the past 6 years we've cut tax rates, reduced regulations, supported a sound monetary policy, and held down the growth of government spending. And the result: Inflation has fallen to its lowest level in 25 years. Our unemployment rate is among the lowest in the Western World. Our economy has created some 13 million new jobs. In manufacturing -- often cited as one of the weakest sectors -- the fact is that labor productivity is rising at a rate almost 50 percent greater than the postwar average. Several firms have moved some of their manufacturing operations back into America. Yet, as we both know, there's still so much more to be done. And in considering our quest for excellence, we must look, above all, to the future.

Just last week I sent to Congress a package of legislative proposals to advance this quest for excellence. These proposals include job retraining for displaced workers, training funds for young people from economically disadvantaged backgrounds, a host of measures that would spur innovation in American science and technology, and proposals that would do a great deal to improve that aspect of American life that bears so directly on our future -- education. I could speak at length about each of these -- but, then, I made you a promise. So, let me concentrate instead on one area that I know is of special concern to each of you: world trade.

Well, as you know, at the end of the Second World War the United States stood virtually alone, an economic giant that none of the war-ravaged powers could begin to match. After the war the United States grew still more economically stronger, leading the world by example. Today Europe and Japan have been rebuilt, and many real income levels have risen in many developing countries. By way of international trade, this new prosperity in the rest of the world adds greatly to our own by enabling them to buy American goods. But, yes, it also poses certain challenges. To begin with, there's the serious problem of markets that have been intentionally closed to American goods. Here, too, we've already begun to take action. Indeed, in this administration we've taken the strongest actions in American history against unfair trade practices abroad. And in the 2 years to come, we'll be taking actions that are stronger still.

The proposals we sent to Congress include, for example a request to grant wider protection to patents, copyrights, and trade secrets -- in effect putting up a ``No Trespassing'' sign over American intellectual property. And in our package, the Trade Employment and Productivity Act, we asked Congress for the authority to negotiate a new round of trade agreements to lower trade barriers the world over. Free trade must be also fair trade, and we intend to see to it that world trade is just that. The Secretary of Treasury recently reached an agreement to encourage greater growth and domestic demand among our trading partners. Growing world markets are the ultimate answer to growth in our economy, growth in trade, and growth in the number of jobs. Yet in this quest for excellence there's much more to do than to open foreign markets -- much to do to make American goods and services, American education, indeed our whole way of life, resonate with excellence. I've already mentioned the many proposals that I sent to Congress last week, but there are limits to government's role -- limits to what government should do, limits, after all, to what government can do.

So, in closing, I need to enlist your help, if you will, to issue that challenge that I mentioned at the outset. For the sake of our future, do all you can to make your businesses more innovative and efficient. In export markets, compete more effectively, develop better techniques of management, better goods, and better services. Because the better our management, the more innovative and competitive we are, the more jobs we'll create, and the more prosperous all of America will become. For our part, our administration has done its best to provide a healthy economy and to protect you from protectionist legislation. And now I ask you, in short, to participate in every way you can in this -- America's quest for excellence. We all have a stake in the outcome.

Vision is a priceless gift that enriches our lives in countless ways. Through our eyes we drink in the beauties of art and nature. Reading offers us a window on the world -- present and past. The ability to see is something we tend to take for granted until it is threatened by disease or injury. But there are steps all of us can take now to protect the gift of sight.

One of the most important precautions is regular eye examinations by an eye care professional. Such checkups can alert us to the early stages of an eye disease that, if unchecked, could cause irreparable loss of sight. Thanks to research, eye doctors now have effective treatments for some of the most sight-threatening eye diseases.

For example, research supported by the National Eye Institute has shown that laser treatment can help many people who are at risk of visual loss from diabetic eye disease. It is essential for people with diabetes to have regular eye examinations to learn whether they need this treatment.

Regular eye checkups are also important for people who have reached middle age, because glaucoma, cataract, macular disease, and many other serious eye disorders tend to strike in middle and later life. But if these conditions are detected and treated in time, serious visual loss often can be prevented.

Children, too, stand to benefit from eye examinations. A routine checkup may reveal some problem that should be corrected while the child is still young. Many children have been spared from lifelong visual handicaps because a checkup gave warning of a need for treatment.

Preventing eye injuries is also very important. Everyone should wear goggles, safety glasses, or a face mask when working with chemicals or machinery that might be a hazard to the eyes. People participating in certain sports may also benefit from protective eyewear.

And there is more we can do. We can give the gift of sight to others by making arrangements to donate our eyes after death. Donations are needed for corneal transplant operations that can cure blindness in people whose corneas have been damaged by injury or disease. It is hard to imagine a more magnanimous bequest.

This is a time to recognize the many contributions of private organizations devoted to the safeguarding of eyesight, the prevention of visual loss, and the rehabilitation of those with impaired vision. During this centennial year of the National Institutes of Health, we can also celebrate the many research accomplishments of the National Eye Institute.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-fifth day of February, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

The President. On behalf of myself and the American people, I want to extend my thanks to Senator Tower, Secretary Muskie, and General Scowcroft. Whatever this report may say, I have appointed -- or I'm proud to have appointed this distinguished Board, because it fulfills my commitment to get the facts and share them with the American people. This is why I asked Attorney General Meese to conduct his review and why, when that review uncovered unauthorized actions, I ordered full disclosure of what we then knew. It was why I urged the appointment of an Independent Counsel and why I appointed David Abshire as my Special Counselor on this matter. And it is also why I ordered full cooperation with congressional inquiries. And it's why I appointed this Board, the Tower board.

The significance of this Board's work is reflected in the size of this volume, which I am going to carefully study over the next several days. But Senator Tower, Secretary Muskie, and General Scowcroft, in completing the task so well, you've again demonstrated a willingness -- one you've shown all your lives -- to help your country, to devote yourself to public service. In a highly charged atmosphere, I know it wasn't easy to interrupt your lives. But this was an important contribution to your nation, and the American people are grateful to you for it.

And now, in addition to thanking these distinguished gentlemen, I want to make it clear that I consider their work far too important for instant analysis. I intend to read and digest it first, think carefully about its findings, and promptly act on its recommendations.

Next week I will address the Nation and give the American people my response to this report. But I pledge to the American people today that I will do whatever is necessary to enact the proper reforms and to meet the challenges ahead.

This legislative proposal is the result of an exhaustive, year-long administration study of the needs of poor Americans. Hundreds of welfare recipients, former recipients, and self-help and welfare experts were consulted. The study, ``Up From Dependency,'' concludes that our Nation's current welfare system is both inefficient and ineffective in meeting the needs of the poor and in providing opportunities and incentives for economic independence.

Currently our welfare system is a labyrinth of 59 major welfare programs that require some 6,000 pages of Federal regulations and cost more than $132 billion in FY 1985. Welfare spending has soared since the 1960s, so that today some 52 million Americans, or one in five, benefit from welfare. All told, this spending is more than twice as great as the ``poverty gap,'' or the amount it would take to lift all Americans above the official poverty level. Thus, many Americans who are not poor receive public assistance benefits, even as many others remain in poverty.

The study also found that our current array of welfare programs creates incentives that undermine the willingness to work and become self-reliant. Most welfare recipients say they want to work, but they also say they can often get more on welfare than they can earn in a full-time job. The study found that while current welfare programs provide valuable temporary help to families, that same help replaces the breadwinner and enables young mothers to raise children without fathers.

The study found that by parachuting benefits to individuals from faraway State and Federal capitals, our centralized welfare system also weakens communities. It undermines the implicit social contract among neighbors and neighborhoods that keeps any community peaceful, livable, and productive. Finally, while welfare rescues many Americans from short-term distress, it also mires too many in long-term, unwanted dependency.

I believe we can and must do better. I believe it is time to learn from the mistakes of our centralized welfare system by implementing a new national strategy that stresses grass-roots participation, State and local initiative, and creative ideas for reducing dependency and strengthening economically self-reliant families.

This strategy must build on the enterprise that individuals, communities, and State governments have shown in recent months and years by creating their own alternatives to the current welfare system. Federal legislation enacted since 1980 has given States greater, if still modest, latitude to undertake employment and training programs. The States have responded with reforms that put a premium on reducing dependency and instilling skills and a sense of pride among welfare recipients. This legislative proposal builds on that success by giving States greater flexibility to implement new ideas aimed at reducing welfare dependency. America's 50 States have always been laboratories for creative social change, and this initiative creates a process to tap that creativity.

This proposed legislation also encourages investment in the hundreds of self-help and anti-poverty initiatives now blossoming around the country. In cities and rural areas, thousands of low-income Americans have mobilized to help themselves, their neighbors, and their children. This proposed legislation seeks to assist those efforts by encouraging local leaders to work with the States in creating welfare policies that will work best for their own communities and citizens. The bill recognizes that a single, national solution to the problem of poverty and welfare dependency cannot work for thousands of distinct communities. The proposed legislation encourages diverse solutions for diverse needs and communities.

Toward these ends, the bill authorizes the waiver of certain rules and requirements in Federal programs in order to promote demonstrations of innovative solutions to the problem of welfare dependency, while ensuring that the rights of families and individuals under Federal civil rights and other laws are protected in the demonstrations. The demonstrations offer opportunities to simplify the delivery of public assistance, to increase the self-sufficiency of low-income families and individuals, and to give States and communities greater flexibility to design public assistance policies that seem most appropriate for their own citizens. The waiver applies to any Federal or federally assisted program intended to alleviate poverty and that meet certain other requirements specified in the bill.

The bill also establishes an Interagency Low-Income Opportunity Assistance Board, with a chairman appointed by the President, to certify and evaluate demonstrations proposed by the States. Each State will be required to report annually on each demonstration.

I urge the Congress to act without delay on this important legislative proposal. I am confident that working together we can provide States and communities the means they need to assist low-income Americans in building lives of dignity and self-sufficiency.

Nearly four million Americans have grown up with severe physical or mental impairments that have slowed their learning, limited their mobility, inhibited their expression, and rendered them dependent on others for care and assistance.

For many of these people with developmental disabilities there is now the prospect of a brighter future and greater opportunity. Americans are becoming increasingly aware that such disabilities need not keep individuals from realizing their full potential in school, at work or at home, as members of their families and of their communities.

New opportunities have been created through the efforts of those with developmental disabilities and their family members, along with professionals and officials at all levels of government. Working together, they have brought about significant changes in the public perception of young people and adults with developmental disabilities, opening new doors to independent and productive lives.

One important new milestone is the fruitful partnership between government and the private sector in finding productive employment for people with developmental disabilities, people who might otherwise have been destined to a lifetime of dependency. In the past 2 years, the Administration's Employment Initiative has resulted in finding job opportunities for more than 87,000 people with developmental disabilities.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-sixth day of February, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

Donald T. Regan came to me many months ago to say he would like to return to private life in the near future. However, after the revelations about Iran, he indicated he would like to stay and help me and the administration through the investigations. Last week he indicated that with the release of the Tower board report he felt he would like to go through with his original plans to return to private life. I am therefore accepting with regret his resignation as Chief of Staff, effective today. Don Regan has served the administration and the Nation with distinction for 6 years -- first as Secretary of the Treasury, and as my Chief of Staff for the last 2 years. I have known him as a friend and associate who has always put the Nation's interest first.

I am also pleased to announce that Howard H. Baker, Jr., has agreed to serve as Chief of Staff to the President of the United States. Howard Baker is a distinguished American who has served as majority and minority leader of the United States Senate, a leader of the Republican Party, and a man of unquestioned integrity and ability.

I am enormously pleased that he is willing to take on this responsibility and to help me organize the White House staff for an aggressive 2 years of work. Howard and I have been friends for a number of years. I have the utmost respect and admiration for him. Howard expects to assume his new responsibilities early next week. I look forward to having him work with me in the months ahead.

In accepting your resignation I want you to know how deeply grateful I am for all that you have done for this Administration and for our country. As Secretary of the Treasury you planted the seeds for the most far-reaching tax reform in our history. As Chief of Staff you worked tirelessly and effectively for the policies and programs we proposed to the Congress.

I know that you stayed on beyond the time you had set for your return to private life, and did so because you felt you could be of help in a time of trouble. You were of help and I thank you. Whether on the deck of your beloved boat or on the fairway, in the words of our forefathers, may the sun shine warm upon your face, the wind be always at your back, and may God hold you in the hollow of His hand.

When I asked John Tower, Edmund Muskie, and Brent Scowcroft to investigate the Iran affair, my attitude was: Let the chips fall where they may. I told you, the American people, that I wanted all the facts to come out. Well, the Board's effort is a demonstration of my commitment to find out what was wrong and fix it. Two days ago, as you know, the Tower board presented me with their report. I'm still studying it and continuing to consult with members of my Cabinet, the Congress, and other advisers. After a full evaluation, I'll speak to you again, midweek, about this issue in detail and about how we can move forward from here.

I also want to note that, after 6 years of outstanding service beginning as Secretary of the Treasury and then as Chief of Staff, Don Regan indicated to me some time ago that he would like to return to private life. So, yesterday I regretfully accepted his resignation. Don's been a friend and a valuable and trusted member of the administration. I'm pleased that Howard Baker has agreed to serve as my Chief of Staff. He's served our country with distinction as majority and minority leader of the Senate and a leader of the Republican Party. I've known Howard for years and have enormous respect for his abilities and talents. He'll be here next week, and we're going to be wasting no time preparing for another 2 years of aggressive work.

And I want to talk to you today about one of the most important issues we'll be confronting. Over the last 2 years, as I campaigned steadily for tax reform, I spoke to you often about the need to rid our tax system of the special interests, those interests who put their advantage above the good of the Nation as a whole. Well, with bipartisan support we achieved a remarkable victory with tax reform, lowering rates and making it fairer for all Americans. But now that we've done that, another part of our government stands out in even starker contrast.

I'm talking about our budget process, which today is as rife as it ever was with favoritism and special pleading. My friends, this problem is crying out for reform. We got the special interests out of the tax code, and now it's time to get them out of the budget process. Until then, our economic prosperity will never be safe. The pressures for more and more Federal spending will grow until they burst through all remaining constraints. We'll be back where we were 7 years ago with Federal spending running wildly out of control. And you know what will happen then: As surely as night follows day, huge new tax burdens will be thrust on the American people. Inflation will come back in force. And our economic expansion and the millions of jobs we created -- well, that'll only be a memory.

That's not a happy scenario, and we must do everything we can to keep it from occurring. As you well know, Gramm-Rudman-Hollings is today the most important check on congressional overspending. Its guidelines promise us a gradual phaseout of the deficit and a balanced budget by 1991. When it was passed in 1985, it was hailed by both Democrats and Republicans as a legislative triumph. Finally, Congress seemed to be serious about getting its budget house in order. But now some in the Congress want to back away from their commitment to cut deficit spending. Some have even suggested that we cancel the second round of tax rate cuts scheduled to take place in 1988 as part of our tax reform bill. Well, let me say this as plainly and simply as possible: That's just not acceptable. We must keep our promises to the American people. There's no going back on either Gramm-Rudman-Hollings or tax reform. I have submitted a budget that meets the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings deficit limit for fiscal year 1988. It's a good budget, a sound budget. It will keep us on track toward eliminating deficit spending and help build the foundation for a continued economic expansion with low inflation, high job creation, and a reduced trade deficit.

So, don't believe them when they say it can't be done. Congress can keep its Gramm-Rudman-Hollings commitment if it wants to; it only has to want to. And that's where you come in. Speak out loud and clear. It's time to rise above politics and self-interest. It's time once and for all to end deficit spending. That's why I have long supported passing a constitutional amendment that would make balanced budgets mandatory. Then we wouldn't have to fight this battle all year, every year. America could greet the future confident that the monster of deficit spending was locked away forever in its cage.

Americans' mighty contributions to the greatness of this land we call America have been tinged with poignant irony. Though they endured the chains of slavery and segregation, Afro-Americans have fought and died to keep our Nation's flame of liberty burning brightly. Theirs is a chronicle that can best be described as a litany of hope and faith in our Constitution's principles and in the ultimate fulfillment of its promise of equality under God for all.

Founding Fathers were the architects of the greatest political document ever written. In its preamble, they recorded their dream of securing ``the Blessings of Liberty to ourselves and our Posterity. . . .'' The dream of liberty for black Americans found many courageous champions before and during the bloody years of the Civil War, in the Jim Crow era, and in the modern civil rights movement. They saw that the bell of liberty rings hollow unless applied equally to Americans of every race, creed, and color.

The issues of freedom and equality are at the very core of National Afro-American (Black) History Month. This month offers all Americans the chance to learn more about a vital part of our history. But as we learn, we must remember that the battle against the disease known as prejudice cannot be waged and won in one era and forgotten in another. Every generation must renew the fight against injustice.

Dorn has served as Deputy Assistant Secretary of State for Legislative Affairs since 1986. Prior to her service at the Department of State, she was chief of staff and floor assistant to former Congressman Tom Loeffler of Texas. She served previously on the staff of the Committee on Appropriations of the House of Representatives.

Of course, it hasn't always been easy. In the past year your critics -- and I can't help noticing how often they're my critics, too -- [laughter] -- your critics have delighted in taking the actions of an isolated few and portraying all broadcast preachers in that light. It won't work.

Long before the revelations about one ministry, you were busy assembling a board of ethics and a code of conduct for your entire field. And you have shown that integrity is a cornerstone of your ministries and are preparing so that in the year 2033 your successors, and maybe many of you, will meet to mark another 45 years of service with accountability to God and man. And I'll tell you what.

America is in the midst of a spiritual revival. From the growth of your radio and television stations to the polls of George Gallup, we see the signs of Americans returning to God. On our campuses the political activism of the sixties has been replaced with the religious commitment of the eighties. Organizations like Campus Crusade for Christ, the Fellowship of Christian Athletes, and Youth for Christ have grown in popularity. And why not, your message is rooted in one sure guide for life, the guide for our Founding Fathers and every generation of Americans as much as for ourselves, the infallible wellspring of our national goodness: the Bible, the inspired word of God.

The first amendment protects the rights of Americans to freely exercise their religious beliefs in an atmosphere of toleration and accommodation. As I have noted in the past, certain court decisions have, in my view, wrongly interpreted the first amendment so as to restrict, rather than protect, individual rights of conscience. What greater legacy could we leave our children than a new birth of religious freedom in this one nation under God? Now, I hear the smart money in this town say we haven't got a prayer, but somehow I believe the man upstairs is listening and that He'll show us how to return to America's schoolchildren the right that every member of Congress has: to begin each day with a simple, voluntary prayer.

At the heart of our Judeo-Christian ethic is a reverence for life. From the Ten Commandments to the Sermon on the Mount, the mission of faith is to cherish and magnify life -- and through it God's holy name. Yet since the Supreme Court's decision in Roe v. Wade, there have been 20 million abortions in America. And as the Bloomington baby case showed, this callousness for life can spill over into other areas, leading to decisions on who is good enough to live and who is not.

There's something else I need your help on, and that's getting Congress to stand by its commitment to the cause of freedom and against the consolidation of a Communist regime in Nicaragua. In approving $100 million in aid to the freedom fighters in 1986, Congress laid down certain preconditions for renewing aid this year, including remindments [requirements] that the freedom fighters demonstrate that they are a proficient fighting force and that they show they have popular backing. Well, in truth, many who voted for those conditions believed there was no way the freedom fighters could meet them, not in the short time they had. They thought they'd found an easy way to get out of further support without taking blame. But the freedom fighters met those conditions.

Now we hear that further aid will jeopardize the peace process. By that reasoning, deploying the Pershing II and ground-launched cruise missiles in Europe should have led to the end of the intermediate nuclear force talks, and in fact, many who now oppose aid to the freedom fighters said it would. But the Senate is now debating ratification of that first agreement ever to eliminate an entire class of U.S. and Soviet nuclear weapons. The principle is the same. Peace doesn't come through the weakness of America and its democratic allies: Peace and freedom come through strength.

And we swallowed them. We gave the Sandinistas $118 million over the next 18 months, even as they brought in Soviet and Cuban advisers, began supplying Communist guerrillas in El Salvador and elsewhere, and started to install Communist tyranny in Nicaragua.

The falsehoods have continued. Just over a week ago, I received a letter from Sandinista leader Daniel Ortega in which he said that Nicaragua allows ``the full and unrestricted exercise of freedom of speech, debate, and association.'' Well, just about the time that letter arrived at the White House, in Nicaragua, Sandinista thugs attacked a meeting of mothers of political prisoners.

Organization of American States. I was particularly concerned about the promises made in 1979 to bring democracy to Nicaragua. A month later, from the same platform, Daniel Ortega replied to me. He said that the pledges of democracy, of individual liberty, of a mixed economy, of freedom of press and religion were -- here's his word: ``inexistent.'' Why? Because a political pledge did not have -- again from his speech to the OAS -- ``the force of a legal commitment.'' Well, he should have been a Hollywood producer. No, so one question must be answered: Sandinista promises of the past have been broken; can we believe them now?

Sandinista steps toward peace and democratization can be reversed once the pressure from the freedom fighters is removed. The five democratic Presidents of Central America affirmed just weeks ago that the Sandinistas have failed to comply with the regional peace plan. Indeed, the Sandinistas haven't made one concession on their own without a threat hanging over them. And again and again the Sandinistas have shown themselves students of what Lenin said: that ``telling the truth is a bourgeois prejudice.'' It's just this simple: The way to democracy and peace in Nicaragua is to keep the pressure on the Sandinistas taking irreversible steps to comply with the regional peace plan, and giving aid to the freedom fighters now.

Well, that's how on target the criticisms of aid to the freedom fighters are. It's time for us to face why, even as the five Central American countries search for peace, the Soviet-bloc continues to pour billions in tanks, bullets, and other assistance into Nicaragua. To quote one of our leading national strategists, Zbigniew Brzezinski: ``Potentially at stake in Central America is America's capacity to defend Western interests throughout the world.'' And he adds: ``If the Soviet-Cuban presence in Nicaragua destabilizes the entire region, the United States will inevitably pull back'' from Europe and the Pacific to defend our border. Our choice is whether to remove U.S. assistance to the freedom fighters, but is there any discussion about removing Soviet assistance to the Sandinista regime?

But there's something more than security at stake: freedom. Religious persecution under the Communist Sandinistas has been persistent and often brutal -- Jews, Catholics, evangelical Christians, and others -- all have suffered. Perhaps you know the story of Prudencio Baltodano, a father, a farmer, and an evangelical man of God. Sandinista soldiers tied him to a tree, struck him in the forehead with a rifle butt, stabbed him in the neck with a bayonet, and then cut off his ears. ``See if your God will save you,'' they jeered as they left him for dead. Well, God did save Prudencio Baltodano. He found his way to Costa Rica and then to the United States. Recently his wife and children were located in a refugee camp in Costa Rica, and through the efforts of the church located here in the Washington area, the family was reunited here in the United States. And Prudencio Baltodano is with us today. Senor Baltodano.

Let me tell you one other story of Sandinista religious repression. I mentioned Campus Crusade for Christ earlier. In late 1985 the Crusade's national director for Nicaragua, Jimmy Hassan, was arrested. For hours, he was harassed, questioned, and put in a tiny cell, questioned again, placed in a cold room, questioned yet again, and had a gun put to his head and the trigger pulled.

Is there any force on Earth more powerful than that love? Is there any truth that gives more strength than knowing that God has a special plan for each one of us? Yes, man is sinful, separated from God. But there is God's promise of salvation, even for the least likely of us.

This more I want to say: As You well know, the fighting will be cruel, and even tonight I may come knocking at your door. Although I have not been a friend to You before, still, will You let me enter now, when I do come?

President today announced his intention to nominate Howard W. Cannon to be a member of the Board of Trustees of the Barry Goldwater Scholarship and Excellence in Education Foundation for a term of 4 years. This is a new position.

Across our Nation and around the world, consumers are sending business an important message: there is no substitute for good service, the kind on which companies make their reputations. Under free enterprise, we consumers express our views through our everyday marketplace decisions and require businesses to adapt to our changing consumer choices.

The flexibility of American economic freedom opens the door to many opportunities for consumers and businesses. Both profit from today's increased emphasis on service. Customer-oriented companies that listen to their customers and make the commitment to act on their customers' wishes outperform their self-centered competitors time and again in profitability and customer loyalty. As a result, consumers are finding increasing responsiveness in some corners of the marketplace and are creating a demand for service in others. Indeed, customer service is emerging as a key competitive advantage today, not only in the domestic marketplace, but also in the expanding international arena.

In many industries, service is the product. The service sector accounts for 60 percent of our gross national product and provides some 70 percent of American jobs. Communications, transportation, utilities, banking, accounting, health care, and home maintenance are but a few examples of service industries indispensable to our way of life. Whether the transaction involves goods, services, or both, quality of customer service is a crucial ingredient in the interaction between customer and business, before, during, and after the sale.

This is the 7th year I have proclaimed National Consumers Week. I initiated National Consumers Week in 1982 to acknowledge and emphasize the significant stake consumers have in our economy. Our economy has three bases, the triad of capital, labor, and consumers; without any one of them the whole economy would lose its balance. Over the past 7 years, I have watched National Consumers Week grow into an established, national event involving millions of Americans in all sectors of our economy. I am proud of the success National Consumers Week enjoys. In recognition of the importance of consumers to our economy, and of service to consumers and business, ``Consumers Buy Service'' is the theme I have selected for National Consumers Week, 1988.

Constitution and laws of the United States, do hereby proclaim the week beginning April 24, 1988, as National Consumers Week. I urge consumers, businesses, educators, community organizations, labor unions, the media, and government officials to identify, emphasize, and promote activities during National Consumers Week that draw attention to the importance of service in consumers' purchasing decisions.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this second day of February, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

More than 17 million Americans own a small business; and the rest of us benefit from their ingenuity, enterprise, and hard work. These entrepreneurs employ half of all Americans in the work force. These achievements and the American heritage of economic liberty that helps make them possible are truly fitting reasons for each of us to join in observance of Small Business Week.

Today, small businesses provide well over two-thirds of all new American jobs, as well as 40 percent of our aggregate national output; the bulk of new American products and technologies; and more than two-thirds of all first jobs. The majority of jobs held by younger, older, minority, and female employees are in small business. In the next quarter-century, fully three-fourths of all new jobs created in America will have their genesis in small business.

The development of new enterprises depends on many factors, including the hopes, dreams, and hard work that have always characterized America's entrepreneurs. But it also depends on a climate hospitable to small business -- a climate marked by a lack of government interference in the marketplace; low taxes; low interest rates; and the basic freedom to strive for and create progress, prosperity, and opportunity for ourselves and our fellow Americans. Government, the servant of the people, must make sure that it does not harm that climate, which is so necessary to our Nation's well-being and future.

Conference on Disarmament plays an important role in international endeavors to create a more stable and peaceful world. You resume your work in a year that holds promise for realizing concrete steps toward this universal objective. I am pleased to be able to report to you that we are making discernible progress on all aspects of my administration's comprehensive agenda: reductions in nuclear arms, peaceful settlement of regional conflicts, development of confidence-building measures, and advancement of human rights and fundamental freedoms.

The signing of the INF treaty was an historic event. For the first time, the United States and the Soviet Union will begin reducing nuclear arms. We hope that this beginning will be followed by reaching agreement on our proposal for a 50-percent reduction in U.S. and Soviet strategic nuclear arsenals. In the field of nuclear testing, the United States and U.S.S.R. have begun full-scale, step-by-step negotiations with agreement on the needed verification improvements to existing treaties as the first step. Both sides have also agreed that progress toward banning nuclear tests must be part of an effective disarmament process. In Vienna, we are working out the terms of reference for negotiations on conventional stability in Europe. In addition, we are continuing the process, which was successfully initiated in Stockholm, in the area of confidence-building measures.

Conference on Disarmament has an impressive agenda. Of special importance is your effort on a convention banning chemical weapons. Progress has been made in narrowing differences of principle; you now face the arduous task of working out the details and finding solutions on issues which affect vital security interests of all our countries. General Secretary Gorbachev and I have reaffirmed our commitment to negotiations in the Conference on Disarmament, which would result in a truly effective, verifiable, and global ban on these terrible weapons. Under the capable leadership of Ambassador Max Friedersdorf, the United States delegation will continue to work with you in resolving this and other difficult issues which engage this forum. I wish you Godspeed.

It's noisy, isn't it? [Laughter] He's probably on his way to Denver. [Laughter] [The President referred to the sound of a plane flying nearby.] But, as Dexter Manley might point out -- and a happy belated birthday, Dexter -- this wasn't a victory accomplished solely on individual feats. No, it was the teamwork of a well-coached organization. This is exemplified by the five team Super Bowl records set Sunday night. So, congratulations go to Joe Gibbs and his excellent coaching staff.

Having spent a share of my life in show business, couldn't you have saved some of those thrilling moments in the second quarter for the last 10 minutes of the fourth quarter, so we could have a big curtain?

But seriously, I'm sure all the Redskins join me in congratulating the Denver Broncos on a fine season. Being number two in the NFL is also something to be proud of. There probably isn't a classier organization to win that runner-up position. Coach Reeves, John Elway, and the rest of the Broncos are true sportsmen.

Gibbs. On behalf of the Redskins, I want to thank the President. And we really feel like that this was a total team and family effort for the Redskins. And by that I mean there was no one individual, as Doug and Ricky and Timmy and everybody else will tell you. It was all of us pulling together. It was special teams; it was our defense -- played absolutely superb; our offense; it was our owner, Jack Kent Cooke; Bobby [general manager Bobby Beathard], getting the talent; and our coaching staff, which I'm very thankful for; and most assuredly, all the fans. Everybody out there that belongs to the Redskin family pulled together and helped us get this. And we really did it as America -- the same thing as a team effort by every single person in the family. And we thank you very much, and thank you, President.

I am extremely pleased that today the Senate has voted, 97 to 0, to confirm my nomination of Judge Anthony M. Kennedy as Associate Justice of the Supreme Court. Judge Kennedy has served with great distinction as a Federal appellate judge in this nation's largest circuit for 12 years. He will make an outstanding addition to the Supreme Court.

By confirming Judge Kennedy as an Associate Justice, the Senate has not only restored to the Nation a full nine-member Supreme Court, it has reaffirmed this country's commitment to the philosophy of judicial restraint. Judge Kennedy believes, as I do, that the role of the judge in our democratic society is faithfully to interpret the law, not to make it; and that it is just as important to protect the victims of crime as it is to protect criminal offenders.

Americans in every generation have turned to their Maker in prayer. In adoration and in thanksgiving, in contrition and in supplication, we have acknowledged both our dependence on Almighty God and the help He offers us as individuals and as a Nation. In every circumstance, whether peril or plenty, whether war or peace, whether gladness or mourning, we have searched for and sought God's presence and His power, His blessings and His protection, His freedom and His peace, for ourselves, for our children, and for our beloved land.

That was surely so at the very beginning of our Nation, in the earliest days of our quest for independence and liberty. It could only be thus, for a people who recognized God as the Author of freedom; who cherished the ancient but ever new words of Leviticus, ``Proclaim liberty throughout all the land unto all the inhabitants thereof'' and who cast those words where they would ring out forever, on the Liberty Bell; who affirmed along with Thomas Jefferson that the God Who gave us life gave us liberty as well.

So did they believe, those who gathered in Carpenters' Hall in Philadelphia in 1774, the members of the First Continental Congress. They had come together, in times that tried men's souls, to deliberate in the united interests of America and for our ``civil and religious liberties.'' John Adams later wrote his wife Abigail about what followed: ``When Congress first met, Mr. Cushing made a motion that it should be opened with prayer.'' Some delegates opposed the motion, citing differences in belief among the members; but Sam Adams, that bold lover of liberty and our country, arose to utter words of healing and unity.

And so it happened. Because Sam Adams gave voice to all the goodness, the genius, and the generosity that make up the American spirit, the First Continental Congress made its first act a prayer -- the beginning of a great tradition.

We have, then, a lesson from the Founders of our land, those giants of soul and intellect whose courageous pledge of life and fortune and sacred honor, and whose ``firm reliance on the protection of Divine Providence,'' have ever guided and inspired Americans and all who would fan freedom's mighty flames and live in ``freedom's holy light.'' That lesson is clear -- that in the winning of freedom and in the living of life, the first step is prayer.

Let us join together, Americans all, throughout our land. Let us join together, in factories and farms, in homes and offices, in places of governance and places of worship, and in outposts everywhere that service men and women defend us.

Let us, young and old, join together, as did the First Continental Congress, in the first step -- humble, heartfelt prayer. Let us do so for the love of God and His great goodness, in search of His guidance and the grace of repentance, in seeking His blessings, His peace, and the resting of His kind and holy hands on ourselves, our Nation, our friends in the defense of freedom, and all mankind, now and always.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this third day of February, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

January 27, I transmitted to the Congress a request for $36.25 million in further assistance for the Nicaraguan democratic resistance. Our goal in Nicaragua is simple -- peace and democracy. Our policy has consistently supported the efforts of those who seek democracy throughout Central America and who recognize that the freedom fighters are essential to that process.

I have already stated, I would make that certification only after consulting personally with the Congress and the Presidents of the four Central American democracies, and I would give considerable weight to their views on the question of whether Nicaragua has complied with the San Jose Declaration.

Furthermore, in the event that I find it necessary to make such a certification, I will notify the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President of the Senate of my intention to do so ten days in advance. If the Congress adopts during that ten-day period a concurrent resolution stating that the Government of Nicaragua is in compliance with the San Jose Declaration, then I will refrain voluntarily from making the certification, and the suspension of lethal aid deliveries will continue.

I believe that this arrangement will afford Congress and the Executive branch the opportunity to address jointly the central question of Sandinista compliance with the commitments made at the San Jose Summit. Accordingly, I strongly urge that the Congress give its approval to my request of January 27, which in my judgment will serve to enhance the national security interests of the United States by strengthening the prospects for democracy in Central America.

This Council will bring experts together to assess current health promotion and disease prevention activities. The Council also will make recommendations for better use of resources and for innovative methods to encourage healthy lifestyles.

The Council's work on health promotion and disease prevention should prove particularly valuable in controlling the increasing costs of health care. The administration appreciates the leadership of Congressman Don Ritter of Pennsylvania, who initiated the proposal to establish the Council.

We are disappointed that the House of Representatives did not vote to keep pressure on the Sandinistas during the peace process. We thank our many supporters in Congress who worked so hard on behalf of this issue. We will continue consultations with these congressional supporters and others concerning the future of the resistance and the peace process.

I want to thank each of you for being here today and for sharing with us the spiritual message that God has placed in your hearts. God's love shines through every word. His truth is the ultimate power source, and it's always there. It's available to ministers of the Gospel, Presidents, and the local grocery clerk.

Our forefathers drew on the wisdom and strength of God when they turned a vast wilderness into a blessed land of plenty called the United States of America. God has truly blessed this country, but we never should fall into the trap that would detract from the universality of God's gift. It is for all mankind. God's love is the hope and the light of the world.

This more I want to say. As You well know, the fighting will be cruel, and even tonight I may come knocking at Your door. Although I have not been a friend to You before, still, will You let me enter now, when I do come?

And just last week, one of those five -- we did get them out. Their plea was for sanctuary. One of those five was in my office, a handsome young man in his early twenties. And it was evident -- and not only from his letter but from his words -- when he was thanking me for what we had done, that he believed in God.

I am deeply disappointed by the House of Representatives' vote against the administration's request for additional assistance to those fighting for freedom and democracy in Nicaragua. I believe this action undercuts the efforts of those brave men and women at a critical juncture in the Central American peace process.

Yesterday's vote was won by those who advance the proposition that the prospects for peace and democracy in Nicaragua are best served by removing military pressure from the Sandinista regime. We have a fundamental difference of opinion. Whatever the case, the Communist regime in Managua should not interpret the House's action as a signal permitting a reversal in steps taken toward fulfillment of the commitments made under the Guatemala accords. I look forward to consulting closely with the Congress to determine whether the Sandinistas are making measurable and timely progress towards attainment of democratic reforms.

Meanwhile, my commitment to peace and democracy in Central America is undiminished. I wish to assure those struggling inside Nicaragua for those values we hold so dear of my personal support. And in the days ahead, I expect to consult with congressional leaders and our friends in Central America as to how best to build on the impressive record of progress our Central America policy has achieved during the past 6 years.

Every year, millions of Americans and visitors from abroad travel throughout our country to see for themselves the beauty of our land, the hospitality of our people, and the record of our history. They discover the glory and story of America, the evidence and the experience of all the hard-won freedom, justice, and opportunity we and our ancestors have cherished and preserved. National Tourism Week fittingly celebrates tourists, travelers, and those who earn their livelihood by serving them.

Travel and tourism offer countless benefits for Americans and for our guests from other lands, including domestic friendship and international goodwill, enhanced communication and cooperation, and the chance to view and visit natural wonders of limitless variety, city and countryside, and outstanding cultural events.

The travel and tourism industry, once small, is now our third-largest retail trade and second-largest employer. The travel industry directly or indirectly supports nearly seven million jobs and generates some $292 billion in receipts, or 6.4 percent of our gross national product. Internationally, tourism now is the largest business export among America's service industries; it contributes more than $19 billion annually to our balance of trade.

Tourism Week reminds us not only of the economic, educational, and recreational benefits of travel and tourism but also of the warm and wide welcome that Americans traditionally and gladly offer to neighbors from near and far.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this fourth day of February, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

The many achievements of American women in sports at home and abroad are sources of pride and inspiration for all of us. Whether on high school playing fields across our land or in Olympic arenas, female athletes time and again display qualities Americans cherish -- not only great ability but also greatness in spirit, courage, and skill.

Reflection on this record of accomplishment reminds us of the many benefits of women's and girls' sports and of the importance of physical fitness for people of all ages and abilities. True physical fitness helps us do our best in life, as well as in sports and physical activities at any level. Women's sports and fitness activities also help develop leadership skills that can carry over into many other areas. Opportunities for female athletes of every background can truly touch the lives of many people for the better and enrich our country. The same is true for greater attention in schools and communities to physical fitness for girls; fitness research; and private, volunteer, and public sports programs.

Well, again, welcome. And I am pleased today to sign this bill, S. 825, the Housing and Community Development Act of 1987. This comprehensive legislation represents both compromise and cooperation between the administration, the Senate, and the House. Through a concerned effort, the legislation was transformed from a budget buster that would have reversed hard-won housing policy reforms into a rational, cost-effective bill that is fiscally responsible.

Thanks are due to many people for producing this compromise. In particular, Senators like Jake Garn, Pete Domenici, Bill Armstrong, Phil Gramm -- the Republican Four Horsemen -- deserve our gratitude for holding the line when an unacceptable version of the legislation came before the Senate.

A key feature of this housing bill is the permanent authorization of the housing voucher program that we first proposed in 1982. The housing voucher program exemplifies our commitment to community development through public-private partnerships.

Vouchers gave families the dignity of choice -- the opportunity to choose the type and location of their housing and the ability to be near family and friends and schools and churches or jobs. This legislation puts the private market to work in supplying rental housing by enabling the government to help needy families with vouchers so they can afford to rent housing of their own choosing. This legislation is a big step toward our housing goal of a home for every American family.

In just the last year, our voucher program has helped 100,000 low-income families find housing of their own choosing. We know flexible housing vouchers serve needy families better at substantially less taxpayer cost. And I'm also pleased that this bill authorizes the availability of vouchers to rural areas, but it's very disappointing that the Congress refused to appropriate the funding for a rural housing voucher program this year.

This bill also adopts our proposal for modernization of public housing and gives us new tools to combat fraud and abuse in housing and FHA insurance programs. It also includes authority for the designation of enterprise zones -- part of an initiative that we proposed in 1981. I'm also gratified by another provision of this bill which authorizes HUD to fund local, private organizations that are working to end housing discrimination. Too often -- one case is too many -- families and individuals seeking to buy or rent homes still confront bigotry and discrimination. Well, the fair housing initiative program section of this bill will help ensure that such racism will not be tolerated.

Special thanks to Sam Pierce for leading the 3-year fight for this program. Secretary [of Housing and Urban Development] Pierce has been one of the unsung heroes of our administration. His loyalty and hard work, his good sense and commitment can be seen in this bill. Few others could have brought such divergent forces together as Secretary Pierce, and he deserves our appreciation and applause.

Well now, this housing bill also makes some progress in eliminating ineffective programs, such as the Solar Energy Bank, the Rental Housing Development Grant, and the section 235 subsidy programs. As we work together to reduce the Federal deficit, we need to assure the American people that their tax dollars are being used to meet critical housing and community development needs in a cost-effective way.

There are, of course, a number of provisions in this bill that the administration did not support. Previously enacted cost-saving reforms were eroded, and provisions mandating unnecessary cost increases were included. The rights of landlords and owners and the Government's ability to wisely manage subsidized projects are excessively restricted. In the spirit of cooperation, the administration will work with Congress to see if we can correct these features of the bill.

On January 23, while the Iranian assault against Iraqi forces was especially intense, I reiterated the deep concern of the United States at the suffering and instability which the Iran-Iraq war has brought to the Gulf region. Since that time, although Iraq has stopped the Iranian attack east of Basra and pushed it back somewhat, the fighting in this tragic conflict has continued on the ground, in the air, and at sea.

Clearly, the peoples of the region cannot rest secure until there is a negotiated end to the conflict. We have frequently called on Iran's leaders to join in working toward a negotiated settlement, as the Iraqis have repeatedly offered to do. Regrettably, the Iranian Government has so far proved unresponsive in the face of all efforts to encourage reason and restraint in its war policy. It has also persisted in its efforts to subvert its neighbors through terrorism and intimidation.

We continue to work for a settlement that will preserve the sovereignty and territorial integrity of both Iran and Iraq. Toward that end, I have asked Secretary of State George Shultz to take the lead in an international effort to bring Iran into negotiations. Secretary Shultz has recently named Under Secretary-designate Ed Derwinski to be responsible for our ``Operation Staunch.'' This effort has my full support.

As I emphasized in January, this conflict threatens America's strategic interests, as well as the stability and security of all our friends in the region. We remain strongly committed to supporting the self-defense of our friends in the region and recently moved naval forces in the Persian Gulf to underpin that commitment. We also remain strongly committed to ensuring the free flow of oil through the Strait of Hormuz. Finally, we are determined to help bring the war to the earliest possible negotiated end. With that goal in mind, the United States calls for an immediate cessation of hostilities, negotiations, and withdrawal to borders. I urge the international community, in the appropriate fora and through the appropriate mechanisms, to cooperate in the endeavor. The time to act on this dangerous and destructive war is now.

President today announced his intention to nominate Mark E. Buchman to be president of the Government National Mortgage Association at the Department of Housing and Urban Development. He would succeed Glenn R. Wilson, Jr.

Well, all of you here -- and to think that I kept trying to get Howard [Baker] to drop the packages and let me bring them over here. I didn't know why he was going to all that trouble. [Laughter] But, yes, it was a surprise, but I don't know of a happier surprise -- all of you here, so many of you so dear to both of us. And I couldn't have imagined this in my wildest times. A matter of fact, I had it figured that we'd be just about getting into the helicopter now to go to Camp David, and I'm glad we're not.

Baker. Mr. President and ladies and gentlemen: Mr. President, if you are truly surprised -- [laughter] -- after 77 of these happy occasions, your acting skills have lost none of their luster. [Laughter] But surprise or not, on behalf of everyone here, your administration, your staff, your political party, and your friends from all over the country, we wish you happy birthday, Mr.

Mr. President and Mrs. Reagan, as you know, there are two people who've worked especially hard to recognize your birthday in this unique way. One of them, the First Lady, is on my left, and the other is Marvin Hamlisch.

The President. Well, believe it or not, I am speechless. For the last few hours, I have been surprised as I've never been surprised before. I came over here to have a hasty lunch and get into my Camp David clothes with Nancy and found myself at a luncheon party inside the State Dining Room with a great many friends there.

Monday I'll be journeying to North Carolina to participate in a symposium examining one of our country's most serious challenges: the use of illicit drugs. In North Carolina we'll be talking about drug use in the workplace, a problem that, it is estimated, costs our society nearly $100 billion in lost productivity each year and poses a grave threat to our public health and safety.

And public safety is an issue. There was a train wreck in Maryland a little over a year ago, when the crew went through signals that told them to stop. Sixteen people were killed, including two young sisters. Those young victims will never know the joys of life, of marriage, of having their own families. Why did that tragedy occur? Well, the National Transportation Safety Board determined that the engineer ran the stop signals because he was impaired by marijuana.

The next step is to identify the users -- not to put them in jail but to do what we can to get them off drugs and to help them to live a drug free life. Drug testing not only permits us to identify users but it has been shown to be a deterrent, as well. In fact, a no-drug policy in the military, which includes screening and testing, has resulted in a two-thirds decline in the number of drug users in uniform. This same commitment could well save money and lives in the private sector. And we're determined that the Federal Government, the Nation's number one employer, lead the way in eliminating the use of illegal drugs in the workplace.

But this challenge isn't the Government's alone: It belongs to all of us. Those using drugs are affecting our lives, hurting others, whether they want to admit it or not. When policemen, judges, mayors, and military officers are gunned down by drug traffickers in countries like Colombia, anyone using drugs in the United States is helping pull the trigger of a murderer's gun. And the death toll also includes those shop owners and police killed during drug-related incidents in our own country. No decent person could want to contribute to such vicious crime, yet everyone who uses illegal drugs, even occasionally, shares the blame.

But it's never too late to quit, and it's never too late to take a stand. I've always believed that, once we've made up our minds, there's nothing we Americans can't accomplish. Making up our minds is the hard part.

Just this week we saw Congress divided on my request for continued assistance to those fighting for freedom in Nicaragua. Both sides claim their goal to be peace and democracy in Central America; the argument is over how to achieve it. To my disappointment, the House of Representatives voted to remove military pressure from the Sandinista regime in Nicaragua. The Senate agreed with me, that we cannot leave the democratic resistance in that country to the mercy of that Communist regime and expect the Sandinistas to democratize out of the goodness of their hearts.

All of this has serious implications for our country's national security and, no less important, has grave implications for those brave souls who are fighting for democracy in Nicaragua -- people who trusted us. Their fate, the fate of democracy, and our own security interests depend on the next steps we take.

I understand that some in Congress have already begun to develop an alternative assistance package. I await the details. I will work with the members of both parties to see to it that the fact that we disagree does not mean that America cannot act. What I will not accept, however, is an assistance package that is little more than a disguise for surrender and abandonment.

I know that I've got to move on and get over to the forum and the meeting on this subject that I just mentioned. But again, I just want to tell you this is very heartwarming. You make me very proud, indeed, and I'll try to be deserving of this warm welcome. Thank you very much.

But today we're here to talk about drugs in the workplace, as you've been doing. As I mentioned, earlier today I had the opportunity to hear from some people who know firsthand about what drugs in the workplace can mean. And I've been very impressed, as well, with what our panel here has told me. As you know, Nancy and I have both taken a personal interest in the crusade for a drug free America. Like so many Americans, we watched with greater and greater apprehension during the years when too much of our media and too many of our cultural and political leaders sent out the message that using illegal drugs was okay.

Well, thank God those days are over. Those days of scenes in a movie where you would get laughs out of someone who was high on marijuana, those scenes where everybody -- the first thing they did was open a bottle before the scene began on the screen -- well, this conference proves that we no longer shrug off illegal drug use. Yes, Americans in all walks of life have seen the truth about drugs. Workers, employers, students, teachers are all saying no to drugs and alcohol.

A few weeks ago we learned that America's students are saying no as never before. For 13 years we have conducted annual surveys of thousands of graduating seniors in high schools across our country: What drugs have they used? How often? What do they think about drug abuse? Well, just last month the survey of the class of 1987 came out, and the news was the best ever. For the first time since the surveying began, a substantially smaller proportion of high school seniors -- one-third smaller -- acknowledged current use of cocaine than did the year before. Use of marijuana and amphetamines is also dropping.

And by the way, I'm the only one in the family the Government's paying, but I think she's working more than I am. [Laughter] And by the way, she's asked me, as she always does when I speak to an audience that includes young people -- please, for your families, for your friends, for yourselves, do what so many others are doing and just say no to drugs and alcohol.

But if we're to achieve our goal of a drug free America, we must reach outside the schools and into the workplace. Now, the professional basketball court may seem like a long way from the average office or factory. But as I heard those personal stories before I came out here, I couldn't help thinking how similar they were to a story about drugs in the workplace that I was planning to tell you.

A few years ago, here in North Carolina, North Carolina State had one of the Nation's most promising young basketball stars. David Thompson led North Carolina State to an NCAA championship before signing a pro contract for over $2 million. After three seasons of brilliant play, he was the highest paid player in the National Basketball Association, and then he got into drugs. Over the next two seasons, his game deteriorated. He became injury- and accident-prone. He started showing up late for practice and got into fights on the court. So, he was traded and eventually cut. Two years ago he filed for bankruptcy -- millions and a brilliant career squandered on drugs.

Thompson was an extraordinary athlete but an all too typical on-the-job drug user. Game deteriorating? Studies show that drug users are two-thirds as productive as nonusers. Lost productivity because of drugs costs America nearly $100 billion a year, and that's like having a pulled hamstring in the race of international commerce.

Injury and accident-prone? Drug users are three or four times as likely to be involved in accidents. For example, a study of airline pilots using flight simulators showed that they had trouble performing standard landing maneuvers as long as 24 hours after smoking a marijuana cigarette. I have heard that the amount of time that marijuana stays in the fat in the body -- unlike alcohol leaving so quickly -- that it can be up to 4 days that the body is still being affected.

Difficult to get along with? Ninety-two percent of all Americans say they don't want to work around someone who gets high during the day, perhaps because drug users act the way they tell researchers they feel: They don't want to be at work -- period.

One other thing: As I heard firsthand today, when it's all over and drug users look back on the wreckage of their careers and their lives -- like David Thompson -- their advice is: ``Never, never try it.'' They wish they never had. They wish someone had discovered their habit earlier and given them help.

Well, that's why we're here. Now, I've heard critics say employers have no business looking for drug abuse in the workplace. But when you pin the critics down, too often they seem to be among that handful who still believe that drug abuse is a victimless crime.

But we've heard the story of victimless crime before, and it's a bad one. The drug user is a victim. His employer is a victim. His fellow employees are victims. The family that depends on his wages are victims. And America -- which is only as strong and as competitive as all of us together -- America is the victim. It would be hard to find any crime with more victims than drug abuse.

Almost a year-and-a-half ago, we announced a Federal campaign for a drug free workplace. To accomplish this, we proposed to put the Federal Government in the lead, moving toward a drug free workplace for Federal employees. We're encouraging State and local government to follow our example, as well as Federal contractors and all of the private sector. That means you. And I know that the companies represented here have already moved ahead.

I'm proud of the progress we've made, particularly in the military and other areas where an alert mind can mean the difference between life and death. We got a headstart with the military. And since the drug program started there, illegal drug use has gone down by two-thirds. But I know we have a long way to go. The companies here today are leaders, but I know hundreds of others are making progress, too. We in Washington have a lot to learn from you. You're showing how compassion and campaigns for a drug free workplace go hand in hand.

The crusade for a drug free America is being waged on many fronts. In the last 6 years, for the first time ever, we've set up a nationally coordinated attack on drug smuggling. Drug seizures are at an all-time high.

Federal drug arrests have increased 66 percent. Arrests of major traffickers have tripled. But in the end, the crusade against drugs will be won not on the shores but in the heart of America. If students, workers, executives, professionals -- if all of us decide that there's no place for the enslavement of illegal drugs in this land of the free, then we will win and drugs will lose. And that's our challenge. That's the crusade that you're helping to lead.

You know, there's a great deal of emphasis and people talking about -- when I heard a phrase about throwing money at drugs, the idea that it can all be done if we have enough people out there on the borders intercepting. Well, we have intercepted, tons and tons. We have fleets of airplanes and boats and trucks that have been confiscated. And I told some people earlier today, I saw for the first time in my life what $20 million looked like. It was piled up on a table down in Florida, confiscated from drug dealers. And yet as long as there is a profit in it, that isn't enough. The real answer must come from taking the customer away from the drugs, not the other way around.

Then, to those of you -- and like some who've spoken here today -- who've resolved their problem and cured, they are the greatest exponents. I found that out back, Jim, in my Governor days, when I would try to talk to young people about this when it was first beginning -- the emphasis then was on marijuana. And I found out that I might stand there and talk all day, and I wasn't as effective as one individual who could stand up in front of them and say to them, ``I've been there. I used to do that.'' And he can solve more problems in 10 minutes than, as I say, as I could all day. And those are the people, so many of them, who are so unselfishly now joining the crusade. And God bless them and -- for all of that you're doing to help -- you, to your fellow Americans. I thank you, and God bless you.

To have healthier eyes, one needs the healthy attitude of caring for those eyes -- and of recognizing how much they contribute to life, learning, independence, work, recreation, and the enjoyment of visual beauty. Thanks to recent advances in the treatment and prevention of eye disease, the possibility of keeping good vision for life is now excellent.

Regular eye checkups are a must. With improved diagnostic techniques and new treatments, we can now stop many potentially blinding diseases even before they begin to affect vision. But many treatments can save vision only if problems are detected early, often before a person notices any symptoms.

Ensuring a lifetime of healthy eyes begins at infancy. Even an infant with healthy-looking eyes may have an unsuspected vision problem that only an eye specialist can detect. We now know that parts of the brain involved in vision cannot develop without early stimulation. If children are to see normally, congenital cataracts, lazy eye, or misaligned eyes must be treated early.

The many eye diseases associated with aging need not be disabling. For instance, in cataracts, the cloudy lens can be surgically removed and an artificial lens implanted. In another age-related disease, leaky blood vessels develop in the back of the eye, often doing irreparable damage in only weeks or months. Laser treatment can usually stop the destruction and save the remaining vision.

I also invite eye care professionals, the communications media, and all public and private organizations committed to the goal of sight conservation to join in activities that will make Americans more aware of the steps they can take to protect their vision.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this tenth day of February, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

At the beginning of your administration, some of your officials considered Mexico as the next Iran. Six years later Mexico is still there, and after some rocky times, the relations are considered very good on both sides of the border. One year before the end of your term, what is your actual assessment of the bilateral relations, and what is still to be done?

The President. ``Mexico as the next Iran'' was a phrase used briefly by one former official. It was never the judgment of my administration. I think it's true to say that relations between the United States and Mexico today are strong and productive. In the past 5 years, working pragmatically on the many problems we jointly face, we've reached mutually beneficial agreements on trade and investment; cooperated closely to help Mexico manage its foreign debt burden; and addressed unique issues of immigration, energy, and the environment along our common border.

The past few months, in particular, have seen an unprecedented number of new agreements reached between our two countries. In November we signed a bilateral framework understanding on trade and investment, which in conjunction with the GATT process will help us to reduce barriers to trade and investment between our countries. In early December we signed a mutual legal assistance treaty, which will assist both countries in combating a wide variety of criminal activity ranging from drug cartels to white collar criminals. Also, in December the United States was pleased to play a role in the Government of Mexico's plan to exchange debt for new bonds. In addition, we have recently signed agreements on steel, beer, wine, and distilled spirits, and we are close to concluding a major new civil aviation agreement. And at the end of the February 13 meeting in Mazatlan, we will sign a new 4-year textile accord and a telecommunication agreement.

De la Madrid and I have worked to place U.S.-Mexican relations on a new path. Much work remains to be done. In the time we have left in office, we must build on the progress we've made so that we can turn over to our successors a better relationship. It must be equipped to manage the growing ties between our two peoples and deal with the problems we both face. We must continue to work closely to combat narcotics trafficking and the other common maladies that hinder our ability to cooperate even more closely.

In your last State of the Union Address, you said that trade will be the foremost concern of your February meeting with President Miguel De la Madrid. For years you've sponsored a proposal for a North American common market, but given the economic disparities between the two countries, how could Mexico be an equal partner with the United States? From your position, which would be the Mexican role and/or advantage in such an economic alliance?

The President. We are seeing the beginnings of an historic restructuring of the Mexican economy, of Mexico's trade relationships with the United States, specifically, and the world, in general. In recent years, under the leadership of President De la Madrid, Mexico has undertaken a number of important steps. As I mentioned already, Mexico has acceded to the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT) and signed with the United States last November a bilateral framework understanding on trade and investment.

The recently signed framework understanding is a symbol of the special relationship which exists between our two nations as well as a recognition that both countries will gain from the continued liberalization of bilateral trade and investment flows. My February 13 meeting with President De la Madrid will serve to affirm and build upon this progress. Through the framework process, as through the multilateral trade negotiations taking place in the GATT, both of our governments are committed to working toward the progressive reduction of barriers to trade and investment. We see these steps as providing a solid foundation on which to build towards freer flows of trade and investment of benefit to both our nations.

Two years ago, Secretary [of the Treasury] James Baker proposed a plan to help heavily indebted countries to resume growth to avoid defaults. Yet 2 years later, growth has not resumed, and the debt problem is one of the main weaknesses of the international economy. There are, however, some signs of progress, like the U.S. backed Mexican bond-for-debt swap. Is the United States prepared or willing to go further in these or other kinds of measures?

The President. The program for sustained growth proposed by Secretary Baker in October 1985 is a dynamic program for encouraging the adoption of policies which experience in many countries has shown lead to sustained growth. The program recognizes the need for new loans from development banks and commercial banks in support of these reforms. Recently the program has been expanded through the menu approach to include a variety of financial instruments, such as debt-equity swaps, bonds, and trade credits, in addition to general balance-of-payment loans as options in commercial bank financing packages.

We welcome the innovative proposal developed by the Government of Mexico to allow foreign creditors to exchange their loans at a discount for long-term bonds issued by Mexico. The voluntary debt-bond swap program designed by Mexico is consistent with our efforts to encourage market-oriented solutions to the problems of developing countries. Our policy recognizes that each country is unique and must work with its creditors to devise the solutions most appropriate to its economic and financial position.

The economic policy reforms begun by President De la Madrid have helped put Mexico in a position to work out mutually beneficial agreements with its creditors. His farsighted efforts to open up the Mexican economy and revitalize domestic industries are helping place Mexico on the path of sustained economic growth. We remain ready to assist Mexico's continuing and creative efforts to manage its external debt.

The United States and the Soviet Union are on the beginning of the long path to nuclear disarmament. The Group of Six has offered to help monitor the nuclear test ban. Would you accept such help, since the real conflict between the United States and the Soviet Union seems to be in terms of the so-called low-intensity conflict?

The President. The United States shares the desire of the Group of Six for concrete arms control measures. We and the Soviets have agreed that a comprehensive ban on nuclear testing must be linked to an effective disarmament process which must include the elimination of nuclear weapons. Our immediate priority in the area of nuclear testing limitations is reaching an agreement on essential verification improvements to the Threshold Test Ban Treaty (TTBT) and the Peaceful Nuclear Explosions Treaty (PNET).

These treaties are bilateral, and our verification concerns with them are of a bilateral nature. We believe that bilateral discussions will best serve progress in this area. If the Soviet Union agrees to essential verification procedures, I will request Senate advice and consent to ratification of these treaties. Once the treaties are ratified, the United States will immediately propose negotiations on ways to implement a step-by-step parallel program -- in association with a proposal to reduce and ultimately eliminate all nuclear weapons -- of limiting and ultimately ending nuclear tests.

Your administration seems to have identified the Central American peace plan as directed only to Nicaragua and the demise of the Sandinista regime. But it is not so, and the democratization of Nicaragua means not only national dialog and a cease-fire but elections that the Sandinistas could win. In any case, it is likely that they will remain as an important political force in Nicaragua. Is the United States disposed to accept this outcome? Could you explain the U.S. plans in Central America beyond the Nicaragua solution, whatever it is?

The President. Nicaragua under the Sandinista regime is out of step with the rest of Central America, which has moved decisively toward democracy in the last decade. Simply put, attention has focused on Nicaraguan compliance, because Nicaragua has the farthest to go in meeting its commitments under the peace plan.

Guatemalans, and Hondurans are moving toward the sort of stable, popular system that has served their Costa Rican neighbors so well. In 1979 Nicaraguans overthrew Somoza with similar hopes for their country, but the Sandinistas hijacked the revolution for their own purposes and dashed the hopes of the many democratic forces that helped bring down Somoza. In doing so, they imposed on the people of Nicaragua an alien ideology and the totalitarian controls associated with Soviet-style regimes, which also threaten their neighbors. This is what led to the creation of a national resistance and, ultimately, civil war.

Through the Central American peace plan, Nicaragua's neighbors have given the Sandinistas a clear message: Democratize, because until a democratic Nicaragua takes control of its own future, its problems will continue to be the problems of the entire region.

Nicaragua's key problem is not just a matter of words or particular elections, it is a matter of unilateral monopoly of power in a closed society. One day Daniel Ortega says he won't give up power in an election; the next day he says he will. Incidentally, in the last few weeks other Sandinista comandantes have tried to explain why they don't have to abide by free elections. What all this means is that Central Americans can't settle for promises. They did that once and are paying the price today. Nicaragua's democratic neighbors agree with us that Sandinista compliance with the regional peace accord will make or break the plan.

You asked whether the United States could live with the Sandinistas being a political force in Nicaragua. That's not up to us; that's a decision the Nicaraguan people must be allowed to make for themselves.

Democracy and development are at the heart of our policy there. The monopoly ambitions of the Sandinista front are only a temporary obstacle standing between Central Americans and the freedom and prosperity they so desperately want and deserve.

President today announced his intention to nominate Daniel G. Amstutz for the rank of Ambassador during his tenure of service as chief agricultural negotiator in the Uruguay round of multilateral trade negotiations.

Treaty is one of a series of modern mutual legal assistance treaties being negotiated by the United States in order to counter more effectively trans-border criminal activities. The Treaty should be an effective tool to combat a wide variety of modern criminals including members of drug cartels, ``white-collar criminals,'' and terrorists. The Treaty is self-executing and utilizes existing statutory authority.

Seventy years ago, on February 16, 1918, the Lithuanian National Council declared the independence of Lithuania and established the Republic of Lithuania. This restoration of Lithuania's sovereignty was recognized around the world -- even by the Soviet Union, in 1920. Lithuania joined the League of Nations in 1921, and for the next two decades Lithuanians enjoyed liberty and self-determination under a government that fostered political and religious freedom for all citizens.

Then, in June 1940, the year after the signing of the Molotov-Ribbentrop Pact, the Soviet Union invaded and illegally occupied Lithuania and the other Baltic States. The United States unequivocally condemned this violation of national sovereignty and national integrity, and ever since then our policy has remained consistent. We have never recognized the forcible incorporation of Lithuania into the Soviet Union, and we never will.

Observance of the anniversary of Lithuania's Declaration of Independence is natural for Americans, who faithfully celebrate our own Independence Day each year. America has long been a beacon of hope to Lithuania, because Americans cherish their self-determination, individual liberty, and independence -- the God-given rights the Lithuanian people seek to reclaim in the face of religious and political persecution, forced Russification, and ethnic dilution. It is therefore fitting to show our solidarity with the people of Lithuania.

We join in Lithuania's proud and solemn remembrance of the 70th anniversary of its independence, and together with people the world over we share the spirit and the hope of the Lithuanian people as they commemorate that day. Among the Lithuanian people the spirit of liberty remains unbroken -- the spirit of a true leader of her people, Nijole Sadunaite, whose sacrifices for country and conscience continue so courageously to the present day, and who wrote from the Gulag, ``Our brief days on earth are not meant for rest, but to participate in the struggle for the happiness of numerous hearts''; the spirit of the freedom marchers of Vilnius, Lithuania's capital, and of Kaunas; the spirit of every time and place where bold sons and daughters remember their heritage and their highest ideals.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 11th day of February, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

First, there's the INF treaty. How do you think I felt when Gorbachev called a week and a half ago and asked me if our first group of on-site inspectors could be the Denver Broncos' pass defense? [Laughter] And then along came the House vote on contra aid. I felt so terrible I nearly called Dan Reeves and John Elway to tell them what a rough week I'd had.

But seriously, while the Denver Broncos are all terrific athletes and people, each one of us has to congratulate the Washington Redskins. [Applause] Believe me, the House action on the contra vote was a missed chance at a victory for peace in Central America.

A couple of weeks ago, I talked about the state of our Union, and tonight I'd like to talk about something that I think in many ways is synonymous: the state of our movement. During the past year, plenty of questions have been asked about the conservative movement by some people who were surprised to find out back in 1980 that there was such a thing. I mean a powerful new political movement capable of running a victorious national campaign based on an unabashed appeal to the American people for conservative ideas and principles.

Well, we conservatives have been in Washington now for awhile, and we occasionally need to remind ourselves what brought us here in the first place: our unshakable, root-deep, all-encompassing skepticism about the Capital City's answer to the UFO, that bizarre, ever-tottering but ever-flickering saucer in the sky called the prevailing Washington wisdom.

Well, my fellow conservatives, I think that's exactly what this year is about -- settling the matter by lunchtime, letting the liberals in Washington discover, once again, the lesson they refuse to learn, letting them know just how big our election year will be -- because of booming economic growth and individual opportunity -- and how big an election year ball and chain they've given themselves with a 7-year record of opposition to the real record, but most of all, letting them know that the real friends of the conservative movement aren't those entrenched in the Capital City for 50 years.

The real friends of the conservative movement are an entity that gets heard from in a big way every 4 years and who, I promise you, are going to be heard from this year. I'm talking about those who, if the case is aggressively put before them, will vote for limited government, family values, and a tough, strong foreign policy every single time. I'm talking about those believers in common sense and sound values, your friends and mine, the American people.

You see, those who underestimate the conservative movement are the same people who always underestimate the American people. Take the latest instance. As I mentioned, in recent months some people -- and I'm not mentioning any names, because I don't want to build up any candidacies before New Hampshire, but you know who they are -- have actually taken on themselves of proving to the American people that they've been worse off under this administration than they were back in the Carter years of the seventies.

Well, you see, any statistical comparison of the two recent administrations would start with 1977 to 1981 as the budget years of the last administration and 1981 to 1987 as the pertinent years for this one. Now, that sounds reasonable enough. But our opponents have a new approach, one that would have embarrassed even the emperor's tailors.

Washington Times this week: ``All of the foreshortened Reagan gains are nullified by the Carter losses; so they look like no gains at all or, worse, losses.'' Our successes, in short, are statistically buried under the last administration's failures.

But the truth is otherwise, because under the last administration real per capita disposable income rose at only 1-percent annual rate, only half the 2-percent rate of increase under this administration -- a gain that has totaled 12.4 percent in 6 years. Under the last administration, median family income declined 6.8 percent, while under this administration, it went up 9.1 percent.

Or take real after-tax labor income per hour. If you use the approach adopted by our liberal critics, you see a 4\1/2\-percent decline. But the truth is that that figure fell 8\1/2\ percent under the last administration, and we turned this around and accounted for an 8.9-percent increase.

Here again, we've stopped the decline, and that's not to mention what all this has meant in terms of opportunity for women, for blacks, and minorities -- the very groups our opponents say they most want to help. Well, since the recovery began, 70 percent of the new jobs have been translated into opportunities for women; and black and other minority employment has risen twice as fast as all other groups. Minority family income has also increased at a rate over 40 percent faster than other groups. In addition, since 1983, 2.9 million people have climbed out of poverty, and the poverty rate has declined at the fastest rate in more than 10 years.

So, think for a moment on what these statistics mean and the kind of political nerve and desperation it takes to try to sell the American people on the idea that in the 1980's they never had it so bad. The truth is we're in the 63d month of this nonstop expansion. Real gross national product growth for 1987 was 3.8 percent, defying the pessimists and even exceeding our own forecast -- which was criticized as being too rosy at the time -- by more than one-half percent. Inflation is down from 13\1/2\ percent in 1980 to only around 4 percent or less this year. And there's over 15 million new jobs.

Now, the reason I spell out these statistics and stress this economic issue should be very clear. You know some cynics like to say that the people vote their pocketbook. But that's not quite the point. Economic issues are important to the people not simply for reasons of self-interest. They know the whole body politic depends on economic stability. The great crises have come for democracies when taxes and inflation ran out of control and undermined social relations and basic institutions.

American people know what limited government, tax cuts, deregulation, and the move towards privatization have meant: It's meant the largest peacetime expansion in our history. And I can guarantee you they won't want to throw that away for a return to budgets beholden to the liberal special interests.

I think the economic record of conservatives in power is going to speak for itself. But now let's turn to another area. For two decades we've been talking about getting Justices on the Supreme Court who cared less about criminals and more about the victims of crime, Justices who knew that the words ``original intent'' referred to something more than New Year's resolutions and fad diets.

Let's look at how far and how successfully we've carried the battle into the lower courts. Just look at the statistics on criminal sentencing. In few places can you see more clearly the collapse of the liberal stranglehold on our courts. The most recent statistics show Federal judges imposed prison sentences that averaged 32 percent longer than those handed down during 1979. Robbery sentences were 10 percent longer; drug offenses, 38 percent longer; and weapons offenses, 41 percent longer.

The great legal debates of the past two decades over criminal justice have, at their root, been debates over a strict versus expansive construction of the Constitution. The Constitution, as originally intended by the framers, is itself tough on crime and protective of the victims of crime. For so long, the liberal message to our national culture was tune in, turn on, let it all hang out. And now they see conservatives taking the lead as our nation says no to drugs and yes to family and absolutely to schools that teach basic skills, basic values, and basic discipline. And it's no wonder that our nation admires a man who believes in teaching values in education and talks turkey to teachers, parents, and educators, such as our Secretary of Education, Bill Bennett.

And so, I say to you tonight that the vision and record that we will take aggressively to the American people this November is a vision that all Americans -- except a few on the left -- share; a vision of a nation that believes in the heroism of ordinary people living ordinary lives; of tough courts and safe streets; of a drug free America where schools teach honesty, respect, love of learning and, yes, love of country; a vision of a land where families can grow in love and safety and where dreams are made with opportunity. This is the vision. This is the record. This is the agenda for victory this year.

Well, that's the record then on the economy and the social issues. Now let's turn to foreign policy. I want to be clear tonight about the vote on contra aid. It was a setback to the national security interests of the United States and a sad moment for the cause of peace and freedom in Central America. Until now the carrot-and-stick approach has worked in forcing a Communist regime to relax some of its repression. But now the action by the House of Representatives removes one part of that formula and goes only with the carrot. The effect of this vote then was to trust the promises of democracy of the Sandinista Communists -- the kind of promises that no Communist regime in history has ever carried out and that this regime was likely to carry out only under continued pressure. The effect of this vote was to rest the hopes for peace and democracy in Central America purely and simply on the word of the Communist regime in Managua. This course is -- and I repeat -- a risk to America's national security.

But you know I read something the other day, and it's worth a note here. One of those opposing aid to the freedom fighters said it was important to get a 20-vote margin. Well, as you know, it was nothing like that. If we could have turned around four or five votes, we would have won. Last week's vote was not the final word, only a pause. Last week the bad news was the lost vote in the House, but the good news was our support in the Senate and the overwhelming number of House Republicans who voted with us and those 47 Democrats who braved the threats of reprisals to vote for contra aid.

So, let me make this pledge to you tonight: We're not giving up on those who're fighting for their freedom, and they aren't giving up either. I'll have more to say on this in a few weeks. For now, I'll leave it at this: Get ready. The curtain hasn't fallen. The drama continues.

While we're on foreign policy, let me turn for just a moment to what I said in that December interview while Mr. Gorbachev was here. You know, Ben Wattenberg was one of the journalists there, and he brought up a speech that I made back in 1982 to the British Parliament. And he asked me if what I really was saying was what I said in England: that if the West remained resolute, the Soviets would have to, at some point, deal with its own internal problems and crises; that the tides of history are shifting in favor of the cause of freedom.

Well, no, there is no room for illusion. Our guard is up. Our watch is careful. We shall not be led by -- or misled by atmospherics. We came to Washington with a commonsense message that the world is a dangerous place, where the only sure route to peace and the protection of freedom is through American strength. In no place has this thesis of peace through strength been tested more than on the matter of intermediate-range nuclear forces, INF.

In deploying over 400 SS - 20's, with over 1,200 warheads, against our friends and allies in Europe and Asia over the past decade, the Soviets were playing a high-stakes game of geopolitical blackjack. The prize was Europe; the strategy, discredit America's deterrence and undermine the NATO alliance. But we and our allies turned over a winning hand, deploying in Europe Pershing II and ground-launched cruise missiles that provided an effective counter to the new Soviet missiles; and Moscow finally stopped upping the stakes.

I would like to see is for some of those who've been praising our INF treaty to show they've learned its true lesson and vote to maintain an adequate defense budget, our work on a strategic defense against ballistic missiles, and yes, aid to the freedom fighters in Nicaragua.

And while we're on the subject of our nation's defense, you know, there's a man I want to talk about tonight who said once that ``the definition of happiness was service to a noble cause.'' No one has done that better, and tonight I salute Cap Weinberger for all he's done for America.

But at the same time we must not look at any single step alone. We must see not just the INF treaty but also the advance of SDI and, most important, the growing democratic revolution around the globe against totalitarian regimes. We should engage the Soviets in negotiations to deter war and keep the peace. But at the same time, we must make clear our own position, as I have throughout these negotiations.

In sitting down to these negotiations, we accept no moral equivalency between the cause of freedom and the rule of totalitarianism. And we understand that the most important change of all is this: that containment is no longer enough; that we no longer can be satisfied with an endless stalemate between liberty and repression; that arms reduction negotiations, development and testing of SDI, and our help for freedom fighters around the globe must express the clear goal of American foreign policy -- to deter war, yes; to further world peace, yes; but most of all, to advance and protect the cause of world freedom so that someday every man, woman, and child on this Earth has as a birthright the full blessings of liberty.

We've seen dramatic change in these 7 years. Who would have guessed 7 years ago that we would see tax rates drop from 70 percent to 28 percent, the longest peacetime economic boom in our history, or a massive shift in world opinion toward the ideas of free enterprise and political freedom.

We've been not only undoing the damage of the past, we've put this nation on the upward road again. And in the process, the differences between the liberals and conservatives have become clear to the American people. We want to keep taxes low; they want to raise them. We send in budgets with spending cuts, and they want to ignore them. We want the balanced budget amendment and the line-item veto, and they oppose them. We want tough judges and tough anticrime legislation; they hold them both up in the Congress -- you'd be surprised how many judges are waiting out there before they -- so that they have to pass on them before they can take their office, and they've been waiting for months. We want a prayer amendment; they won't let it come to a vote in the House. We stress firmness with the Soviets; they try to pass legislation that would tie our hands in arms negotiations and endanger our defenses.

I say we have a program and a plan for the American people, a program to protect American jobs by fighting the menace of protectionism, to move forward at flank speed with SDI, to call America to conscience on the issue of abortion on demand, to mention, as I did in my State of the Union Address, the overwhelming importance of family life and family values.

We mustn't just think that electing the President is enough. We've been doing that for more than half a century. In the 50 years between 1931 and 1980, only 4 years in that period was there a Republican majority in both Houses of the Congress -- 2 years in Eisenhower's regime, 2 years in Truman's. But for 46 of those 50 years, they controlled the Congress. Every Democrat President, except for those 2 years, had a Democratic Congress. Every Republican President had a Democratic Congress, except for those 2 years in Eisenhower's regime. And now, in the last 7 years added to that -- yes, for 6 of those years we had one House. But except for the 4 years, for 58 years it will be our opponents holding the House of Representatives, where so much legislation and authorization for spending and so forth comes in. And in all those 58 years, there have only been 8 single years in which there was a balanced budget. So, who's at fault for the deficit today?

Back when the War on Poverty began, which poverty won -- [laughter] -- from 1965 to 1980 -- in those 15 years, the Federal budget increased to five times what it had been in '65. And the deficit increased to 38 times what it had been just 15 years before. It's built-in; it's structural. And you and I need to get representatives not only in the executive branch but out there in the Legislature so that we can change that structure that is so built-in and that threatens us with so much harm.

I've gone on too long for all of you here, but I couldn't resist, because you're the troops. You're out there on the frontier of freedom. One young soldier over there in Korea, one of our men, saluted me when I visited there and very proudly said, ``Mr. President, we're on the frontier of freedom.'' Well, so are you. Thank you. God bless you all.

Monday, February 15, the United States and the Soviet Union will resume step-by-step negotiations on nuclear testing with the opening of round two of these talks in Geneva. The nuclear testing talks represent a practical approach -- as the President has long advocated -- to nuclear testing limitations which are in our national security interest.

In undertaking these talks, the United States and the Soviet Union agreed, as a first step, to negotiate effective verification measures for two existing, but unratified nuclear testing treaties: the Threshold Test Ban Treaty (TTBT) and the Peaceful Nuclear Explosions Treaty (PNET). Once our verification concerns have been satisfied and the treaties ratified, we will propose that the United States and the Soviet Union immediately enter into negotiations on ways to implement a step-by-step program -- in association with a program to reduce and ultimately eliminate nuclear weapons -- of limiting and ultimately ending nuclear testing.

We are making progress toward our goal of effective verification of the TTBT and the PNET. During General Secretary Gorbachev's visit to Washington in December, the United States and the Soviet Union agreed to design and conduct joint verification experiments intended to facilitate agreement on effective verification of these two treaties. These joint experiments, which will take place at each other's nuclear test site, will provide opportunities to measure the yield of nuclear explosions using techniques proposed by each side. Through these experiments, we hope to provide the Soviet Union with all the information they should need to accept U.S. use of CORRTEX -- the most accurate technique we have identified for verification of the TTBT and the PNET.

We and the Soviets also agreed to visit each other's nuclear test sites for the purpose of familiarizing ourselves with the conditions and operations at those test sites. These unprecedented visits, which build on an idea the President first proposed in September 1984, took place last month in a constructive and cooperative atmosphere.

With a better understanding of the practical problems associated with conducting these experiments, we now have the information needed to design the experiments. The two sides have agreed to begin this work immediately upon resumption of negotiations on Monday. We hope that the sides will continue to make expeditious progress in these talks.

I am meeting with Mexican President De la Madrid in Mazatlan, Mexico, so I've prerecorded this radio talk. Over these last 7 years, maintaining a constructive and friendly relationship with our neighbors to the south has been one of the highest priorities of our administration. As we review what has transpired, there is every reason to be pleased.

The leaders of our two nations are aware that good relations and cooperation between us are invaluable to both our peoples. And that's why the meetings between our top leadership have been frequent and our talks at those meetings comprehensive. My meeting today with President De la Madrid will cover a number of issues -- from economic concerns, to our mutual commitment to fight drug traffickers, to the security challenges facing the hemisphere.

Mexico is our fourth largest trading partner and we, correspondingly, are Mexico's largest trading partner. Our commercial ties are strong and of great benefit to people on both sides of the border. We've worked hard to make it that way. Last November we signed a new framework understanding that underscored our special trade and investment relationship. During our meetings in Mazatlan, President De la Madrid and I will reaffirm our commitment to take advantage of every opportunity to strengthen the commercial ties between our peoples.

At the same time, we've been working with our Mexican counterparts on such things as a new textile accord, a telecommunications agreement -- which will be signed in Mazatlan today -- and a new civil aviation agreement, which is in the final stages of negotiations. I hope that one day all of this will be seen as the initial steps leading toward an historic freeing of commerce and trade throughout the continent.

This law offers protections for more than a million undocumented immigrants living in the United States, many of whom are from Mexico. It provides a means for them to find legal employment in our country and to participate openly and freely in our society. Population movement and employment are subjects being examined closely by joint U.S. and Mexican commissions. A study of the issues and frank dialog between us is essential, and I am gratified by the responsible long-term approach the Mexican Government is taking in this sensitive area.

American and Mexican policemen and law enforcement officials have lost their lives in this fight. We've been allies with brave individuals, men and women of integrity who are putting their lives on the line against this evil and the corruption and bloodshed that follows in its trail.

I might add that each and every one of us can make a contribution to winning this war against drugs. First, by refusing to use illegal drugs ourselves and, second, by helping others to get off drugs -- and the traffickers would go out of business if people quit buying illegal drugs. That's the real solution, and it's up to each and every one of us to be a part of the solution.

Finally, my talks with President De la Madrid will also cover the security threat to this hemisphere. Since 1980 we've witnessed an impressive expansion of democracy throughout the Americas. However, this progress cannot be taken for granted.

The establishment of totalitarian regimes, supported by Cuba and the Soviet Union, is a threat to stability and freedom. Nowhere is that threat more acute than in Central America. I would hope that the United States and Mexico will find common interest in opposing any such totalitarian threat.

The peoples and Governments of United States and Mexico are and ought to be friends. Our national interests dictate it; our peoples demand it. It is in this spirit that I meet today with President De la Madrid. I will pass on to the people of Mexico your very best wishes.

America, members of his party, ladies and gentlemen: On behalf of the people and the Government of Mexico, I am very pleased to extend a most cordial welcome to the President of the United States of America and to the distinguished members of his party.

This is the sixth time that we two Presidents have met and, on balance, this type of top-level communication between the governments of our countries has shown itself to be both effective and useful. On the basis of personal friendship and direct, frank communication, we two Presidents have periodically had the opportunity to review issues of interest to us and to improve the manner in which our relations are conducted.

I must gratefully acknowledge President Reagan's interest in maintaining our relations within an atmosphere of mutual cordiality, dignity, and respect. We have dealt successfully with delicate issues and broadened the basis for cooperation, which, as neighbors, our two countries require. Today we can affirm that our relations are conducted on a very positive level. There is fluid and wide-ranging communication between the two governments, and we have institutional mechanisms, not only to solve but also to prevent problems.

I am certain, Mr. President, that on this occasion, perhaps the last time we meet as Presidents, we will strengthen the basis for good and productive relations and discuss as frankly as we always have the problems on our agenda. President Reagan, I cordially welcome you and also the members of your party.

Reagan. President De la Madrid, distinguished guests, people of Mexico: This is a momentous occasion for me. Over 5 years ago, President De la Madrid and I first met near the border in Tijuana. We dedicated ourselves to building on the strength, friendship, and cooperation that are traditional bonds between our two countries. We resolved to address the daily concerns of our citizens with mutual respect and understanding. We set out to make progress on difficult issues and to discuss areas of disagreement with the candor of good friends. The personal rapport we developed has served the interests of both our peoples.

Mexico and the United States stand together as we strive to meet the perplexing challenges that face our nations. We can be proud of what has been accomplished in so short a period. We have created dynamic commercial ties that lay the foundation for a stronger and expanding trade relationship and more competitive economies. We have worked together to find positive and creative solutions to a threatening international debt problem. We have established strong new mechanisms to deal with border matters. We have strengthened law enforcement cooperation, reducing the ability of criminals to take advantage of different jurisdictions.

Today we will meet again in the spirit of good will and cooperation that has been the hallmark of our relations. Today we help pave the way for a new generation of political leaders in both our countries who will soon follow us and build on the foundation we've laid. That foundation is cemented by our shared values and common goals: a better quality of life for our peoples, opportunities for our children, and the dignity of living peacefully in free and democratic societies. Much still needs to be done to achieve these goals, but we can be proud of the legacy we leave.

President, next year we will commemorate the 100th anniversary of the founding of the U.S.-Mexico International Boundary and Water Commission. The Commission has been a success, a model for others throughout the world. It is concrete and living proof that two nations can live as neighbors, deal with the reality of a 3,000-kilometer border, and respect each other's sovereign independence and identity.

There will be no greater monument to this upcoming anniversary, which marks a century of Mexican-American cooperation, than the current high plane of relations between the leaders of our countries and the bonds of family, commerce, and friendship between our peoples. This is the spirit in which I come today. Thank you, and God bless you.

Note: The President spoke at 12:17 p.m. at the Camino Real Hotel, where he was accorded a formal welcome with full military honors. The Presidents' remarks were translated by interpreters. Following the ceremony, they met with U.S. and Mexican officials at the hotel.

Reagan and President De la Madrid met privately for approximately 45 minutes with only notetakers present. President Reagan congratulated President De la Madrid on his 5 years of leadership and for the modernization that he had brought to Mexico. The President stressed that during the tenure of the two Presidents significant successes had been achieved in trade, investment relations, drug enforcement, commercial ventures, and general economic improvements.

President stressed the importance of the drug problem for our two countries. He raised the issue of certification to Congress by March 1 and urged the Mexican President to work even harder on drug eradication. President De la Madrid emphasized his deep concern and intensive efforts to deal with the drug problem. He said he condemns narcotics and would have more to say on the matter publicly later.

President De la Madrid said his country has been supportive of the Esquipulas plan [Guatemala accords]. They also discussed East-West relations, and the President commented on his recent summit meeting with General Secretary Gorbachev.

De la Madrid, members of the Mexican and U.S. delegations, friends, this is the sixth time President De la Madrid and I have met, as he told us, since 1982. I am extremely pleased with our discussions and with the remarkable record of accomplishment since we last met in Washington.

Today we have rededicated ourselves to work together through the framework process and in the GATT [General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade] to seize every opportunity to expand commerce between us. One day I hope these steps will be seen as part of the historic evolution toward the free and unimpeded trade and investment on this continent and in the Western Hemisphere.

And cooperation on the debt is but one of the many areas where progress is being made. Agreements that have been reached or are near in several areas -- such as textiles, telecommunications, and civil aviation -- are positive steps forward.

We can also point to the successful management of difficult environmental problems along our common border. Under the agreement we signed in 1983, we're meeting our responsibilities. This is exemplified by the recently signed contingency plan on hazardous substances.

And I'm gratified by the new dialog we've undertaken on these subjects and by the establishment of U.S. and Mexican commissions to study these questions jointly. In 1986 the United States Congress passed, and I signed into law, the Immigration Reform and Control Act, intended to reestablish control of our borders. It offers protections for well over a million undocumented immigrants living in the United States, many of whom are from Mexico, by providing a means for them to find legal employment and to participate openly and freely in our society.

The mutual legal assistance treaty signed in December has already been ratified by the Mexican legislature. A few days ago I transmitted this treaty to the United States Senate for prompt ratification so that cooperation against criminals can be intensified. And as for the fight against criminals, Mr. President, perhaps our most serious undertaking has been the battle against the scourge of international drug trafficking and the use of these drugs in our societies. The people of the United States are now turning away from drugs. Drug use is no longer fashionable, and in most circles it's no longer tolerated. My wife, as you're aware, has taken the lead in an energetic program to combat drug abuse. Our success, measured by the number of people rejecting drugs, should curb the demand that fuels the trafficking.

This menace threatens the fabric of both our societies. The heartache and corruption brought on by these traffickers are pervasive. President De la Madrid, if the decent people of our two societies are to win, it requires cooperation and a mutually reinforcing effort. And, Mr. President, I'm certain we are both committed to victory in this war against drugs and the evil it has wrought on our peoples.

Our first responsibility to our citizens is to assure them an environment where they can raise their families in peace and freedom and prosperity. And that is why our commitment to democracy in our hemisphere must be unshakable.

Totalitarian societies -- such as those in the Soviet Union, Cuba, and now Nicaragua -- have demonstrated for all to see that tyranny doesn't work. Mexico and the United States have a common interest in stable, free, and democratic governments in this hemisphere. I would hope this common interest will manifest itself in a common stand against the expansion of totalitarianism.

A year from now, new Presidents will be in office in both our countries. They will be challenged, as have you and I, Mr. President, to achieve real, measurable progress on matters that concern us both because they affect the daily lives of our people. In the past 5 years, we have demonstrated that we can cooperate to achieve creative, mutually beneficial solutions, and this is a valuable legacy that we leave to our successors.

President, I want to say publicly before we part that I truly believe history will honor you for the wise and politically courageous way you're guiding Mexico on the difficult but ultimately rewarding path to economic recovery and national development. This is an effort worthy of our admiration, our respect, and our support. And I know that with continued perseverance it will be crowned with success. I also believe, Mr. President, that you and I together have turned the relationship between the United States and Mexico in a new, more constructive direction that our successors can build upon.

I arrived today, I spoke of the foundation for Mexican-American relations that we've laid these last 5 years. Well, you know, one of my first jobs as a young man was digging foundations at a construction site. I worked there with strong, decent men whose hard work was a necessary part of the building process.

President De la Madrid, it's been an honor for me to work with you and your colleagues, to labor beside you, and to have your friendship. Our peoples will live better lives for what we've done together. I can think of no goal better than that.

By reordering priorities so that we spend more on national security and less on wasteful or unnecessary Federal programs, we have made freedom more secure around the world and have been able to negotiate with our adversaries from a position of strength. By pursuing market-oriented economic policies, we have uncorked the genie of American enterprise and created new businesses, more jobs, improved production, and widespread prosperity. And we have done all this without neglecting the poor, the elderly, the infirm, and the unfortunate among us.

The current expansion, now in its sixty-third month, has outlasted all previous peacetime expansions in U.S. history. Business investment and exports are rising in real terms, foreshadowing continued economic growth this year and next.

Since this expansion began, 15 million new jobs have been created, while the unemployment rate has fallen by 5 percentage points -- to 5.7 percent, the lowest level in nearly a decade. By comparison, employment in other developed countries has not grown significantly, and their unemployment rates have remained high.

The outburst of spending for means-tested entitlement programs that occurred in the 1970's has been curbed. Eligibility rules have been tightened to retarget benefits to the truly needy, and significant progress has been made in improving the efficiency and effectiveness of these programs.

Federal spending for domestic programs other than entitlements has been held essentially flat over the past 5 years, while basic benefits for the poor, the elderly, and others in need of Federal assistance have been maintained. This is a dramatic improvement over the unsustainably rapid annual growth of these programs that prevailed before 1981.

Our defense capabilities have been strengthened. Weapons systems have been modernized and upgraded. We are recruiting and retaining higher caliber personnel. The readiness, training, and morale of our troops have been improved significantly. Because we are stronger, enormous progress has been achieved in arms reduction negotiations with the Soviet Union.

Federal agencies have undertaken a major management improvement program called ``Reform '88.'' This program has two main objectives: to operate Federal agencies in a more business-like manner, and to reduce waste, fraud, and abuse in government programs.

Some functions of the Federal Government -- such as financing waste treatment plants -- are being transferred back to State and local governments. In other instances -- such as water projects -- State and local governments are bearing a larger share of costs, leading to more rational decision-making in these areas.

Finally, we have made real progress in privatizing Federal activities that are more appropriate for the private sector than government. Notable examples include the sale of Conrail, the long-term lease of National and Dulles Airports, and the auction of billions of dollars in loan portfolios.

If the deficit is not curbed by limiting the appetite of government, we put in jeopardy what we have worked so hard to achieve. Larger deficits brought on by excessive spending could precipitate rising inflation, interest rates, and unemployment. We cannot permit this to happen, and we will not.

Bipartisan Budget Agreement reflects give and take on all sides. I agreed to some $29 billion in additional revenues and $13 billion less than I had requested in defense funding over 2 years. However, because of a willingness of all sides to compromise, an agreement was reached that pared $30 billion from the deficit projected for 1988 and $46 billion from that projected for 1989.

In submitting this budget, I am adhering to the Bipartisan Budget Agreement and keeping my part of the bargain. I ask the Congress to do the same. This budget does not fully reflect my priorities, nor, presumably, those of any particular Member of Congress. But the goal of deficit reduction through spending reduction must be paramount. Abandoning the deficit reduction compromise would threaten our economic progress and burden future generations.

Under the Bipartisan Budget Agreement, progress toward a steadily smaller deficit and eventual budget balance will continue, but this projected decline rests on two assumptions: continued economic growth, and implementation of the Agreement. If the economy performs as expected, and if the Bipartisan Budget Agreement reflected in this budget is adhered to, the deficit should decline to less than 3 percent of GNP in 1989. For the first time in several years, the national debt as a proportion of GNP will actually fall. Reducing the deficit and the debt in this manner would bring our goal of a balanced budget and a reduced burden on future generations much closer to realization.

Moreover, adherence to the Agreement, as reflected in this budget, will ensure the achievement of additional deficit reductions in future years, because in many cases the savings from a given action this year will generate deficit savings in subsequent years. Given the good start made in 1987, we have an opportunity this year to put the worst of the deficit problem behind us.

In formulating this budget, I have endeavored to meet national priorities while keeping to the terms of the Bipartisan Budget Agreement and the G-R-H Act. In essence, the Agreement limits the 1988-to-1989 increase in domestic discretionary program budget authority to 2 percent. To address urgent national priorities insofar as possible within this overall 2 percent limit, my budget proposes that some programs -- such as those for education, drug enforcement, and technology development -- receive larger funding increases, while others are reduced, reformed, or, in some cases, terminated.

I propose an increase of $656 million over the $16.2 billion appropriated for 1988 for discretionary programs of the Department of Education. Although State and local governments fund most education activity, Federal programs provide crucial aid for the poor, the handicapped, and the educationally disadvantaged.

I have proposed reform of our over-centralized welfare system through State experimentation with innovative alternatives. In addition, my initiative would overhaul current employment and training programs for welfare recipients, and strengthen our national child support enforcement system.

Ineffective programs to assist dislocated workers would be replaced by an expanded $1 billion worker readjustment program (WRAP) carefully designed to help those displaced from their jobs move quickly into new careers.

I would provide $11.5 billion for space programs, including: essential funding for continued development of America's first permanently manned Space Station; increased support for improving the performance and reliability of the space shuttle; a major new initiative, the Advanced X-ray Astrophysics Facility, for space science; further support to encourage the commercial development of space; and a new technology effort, Project Pathfinder, designed to develop technologies to support future decisions on the expansion of human presence and activity beyond Earth's orbit, into the solar system.

I also recommend $363 million in 1989 to initiate construction of the Superconducting Super Collider (SSC), including $283 million for construction and $60 million for supporting research and development. The SSC as currently envisaged will be the largest pure science project ever undertaken. It will help keep this country on the cutting edge of high energy physics research until well into the next century.

To improve the speed and accuracy of tax processing and expand information services provided to taxpayers, I would provide a $241 million increase for the Internal Revenue Service. These funds are designed to assure smooth implementation of the 1986 tax reforms.

Fortunately, during the past 7 years, our defense capabilities have been restored toward levels more consistent with meeting our responsibility to provide an environment safe and secure from aggression. Specifically, combat readiness has been improved, and our forces have been modernized.

The proposals for national security contained in this budget represent an essential minimum program for keeping America safe and honoring our commitments to our friends and allies. Anything less would jeopardize not only our security -- and that of our friends and allies -- but also would dim the prospects for further negotiated agreements with our adversaries.

As called for in the Bipartisan Budget Agreement, my budget requests defense funding of $299.5 billion in budget authority and $294.0 billion in outlays for 1989. It also provides for about 2 percent real growth in these programs in future years. Also, as called for in the Agreement, my budget requests $18.1 billion in budget authority for discretionary spending for international affairs. This includes $8.3 billion in security assistance to allied and friendly countries where the United States has special security concerns.

Incentives. -- It is essential to continue to change the incentive structure for many domestic Federal programs to promote greater efficiency and cost-effectiveness. This budget proposes to create such needed incentives.

Federal programs offer payments without sufficient regard for how well taxpayers' money is being spent. For example, farm price support programs, under the Food Security Act of 1985, are much too costly. I plan to continue pushing for the elimination of artificially high price supports, thereby reducing the need for export subsidies. In particular, I plan to propose amendments to the Act to modify the counterproductive sugar price support program that currently poses significant problems in the areas of trade policy, foreign policy, and agricultural policy. The importance of agricultural trade to the economic health of the farm sector and the Nation as a whole mandates increased reliance on free markets, not government largess.

The budget proposes certain reforms in the medicare program in order to achieve the savings agreed to in the Bipartisan Budget Agreement. First, as justified by the results of several independent studies, I propose to reduce the add-on payment for teaching hospitals under the prospective payment system (PPS) for indirect medical education from 7.70 percent to 4.05 percent, the best estimate of the added costs incurred historically by teaching hospitals. Second, I propose to limit medicare overhead payments for graduate medical education and make consistent varying secondary payor enforcement mechanisms. To reduce escalating supplementary medical insurance costs and help slow future increases in beneficiary premiums, I propose to limit payments for certain overpriced physician procedures, limit payments for durable medical equipment and supplies, and eliminate a loophole in the payment process for kidney dialysis. In total, these reforms would reduce spending for medicare by $1.2 billion from the level that would occur if current law were continued. Spending for the medicare program would still increase by 7 percent from 1988 to 1989.

Although the provision of needed legal services for those who cannot afford them is an important goal in our society, the current system earmarks a large portion of the funding to ``National and State Support Centers'' that have been criticized for political involvement. I urge Congress to disallow use of Federal funds for such ``think tanks'' and limit the use of funds to the direct assistance of the poor in need of legal aid.

Government often continues programs at the Federal level that are no longer needed. This is the case with rural housing programs, the Economic Development Administration, urban mass transit discretionary grants, urban development action grants, sewage treatment, Small Business Administration direct loans, housing development action grants, the housing rehabilitation loan program, and economic development programs of the Tennessee Valley Authority. Efforts to reverse this situation have been undertaken by prior administrations as well as my own, but the limited results to date indicate the difficulty of curbing excessive government involvement in these areas.

Regulatory Relief. -- For 7 years I have worked to reduce the excess burdens of government regulation for all Americans -- working men and women, consumers, businesses, and State and local governments. As a result, various departments and agencies have reduced the scope and costs of Federal regulation. Federal approval of experimental drugs has been expedited, making them available to treat serious or life-threatening diseases when other treatments do not work. Excessive burdens on State and local governments are being lifted. Access to goods and services has been made easier, and at less cost. Federal reporting requirements on individuals and businesses have been eased, as well as the paperwork burden on those who wish to compete for contracts with the Federal Government. Under the leadership of the Presidential Task Force on Regulatory Relief, headed by the Vice President, the Administration will continue these and other efforts to lessen the burden of excessive government regulation.

As a case in point, my budget proposes termination of the Interstate Commerce Commission, contingent upon enactment of legislation that completes deregulation of the motor carrier industry. There is no justification for continued economic (as opposed to safety) regulation of surface transportation, and there is a substantial argument against it. As a result of economic deregulation of trucking and railroads, consumers save tens of billions of dollars each year, and the industry is healthier, more innovative, and better able to adapt to changing economic circumstances. This is no time to turn back the clock.

Privatization. -- The government and the private sector should do what each does best. The Federal Government should not be involved in providing goods and services where private enterprise can do the jobs cheaper and/or better. In some cases, the fact that no private provider exists is a reflection of government policy to prohibit competition -- as with first class mail service. In other cases, an absence of private providers reflects a government policy of providing large subsidies -- as with uranium enrichment. Invariably, the taxpayer ends up paying more for less.

Accordingly, my budget proposes that a number of Federal enterprises be transferred back to the private sector, through public offerings or outright sales. Following our successful sale of Conrail and auctioning of $5 billion in selected loan portfolios, I am proposing the sale not only of the Naval Petroleum Reserves, but also of the Alaska Power Administration, the Federal Government's helium program, excess real property, and a further $12 billion in loan portfolios. In addition, I have proposed legislation to authorize a study of possible divestiture of the Southeastern Power Administration, and plan to study possible privatization of our uranium enrichment facilities, as well as ways of making the U.S. Postal Service more efficient through greater reliance on the private sector. Such ``privatization'' efforts continue to be a high priority of this Administration, and I look forward to acting on the final recommendations of the Privatization Commission, which I established last September.

Privatization does not necessarily imply abrogation of government responsibility for these services. Rather, it recognizes that what matters is the service provided, not who provides it. Government has an inherent tendency to become too big, unwieldy, and inefficient; and to enter into unfair competition with the private sector.

Therefore, I am proposing the development of a private mediating institution to reduce the backlog of cases before the U.S. Tax Court. I propose that the private sector be relied upon for booking functions for concessional food programs. I also encourage the complete privatization of wastewater treatment plants, certain mass transit projects, the Department of Agriculture's National Finance Center, and the Rural Telephone Bank.

In addition, our Administration plans to initiate privatization and commercialization efforts involving Federal prison industries, relying on a private space facility for micro-gravity research opportunities in the early 1990's, commercial cargo inspection, military commissaries, Coast Guard buoy maintenance, and the management of undeveloped Federal land. Moreover, my budget proposes that the work associated with certain Federal employment positions be reviewed for the feasibility of contracting their responsibilities out to the private sector as yet another way to increase productivity, reduce costs, and improve services.

One of the best ways to test the worth of a governmental program or a particular project is to shift some of the cost of that program or project to the direct beneficiaries. We have done that, for example, with water resources development projects. As a result, local sponsors and users choose to proceed only on the projects that are most important and most cost effective.

Federal Government has a major effect upon our daily lives through the direct delivery of services, the payment of financial assistance through various entitlement programs, the collection of taxes and fees, and the regulation of commercial enterprises. As the 21st century approaches, the Federal Government must adapt its role in our society to meet changing demands arising from changing needs and requirements. At the turn of the century, the U.S. population will exceed 268 million, with a greater proportion of elderly requiring more specialized services. The Nation will operate at a much faster pace as changes in technology and communication link the world's economies, trade, capital flows, and travel as never before.

I have asked the Office of Domestic Affairs and the Office of Management and Budget to work with the President's Council on Management Improvement to conduct an in-depth review and recommend to me by this August what further adjustments in the Federal role should be made to prepare for the challenge of government in the 21st century. This summer I will receive their report, ``Government of the Future.'' I also intend to complete the ``Reform '88'' management improvement program I started 6 years ago to overhaul the administrative, financial, and credit systems in our Federal Government; to implement productivity and quality plans in each agency; and to examine the needs of the Federal work force of the future. I want to leave a legacy of good management of today's programs, with plans in place to handle tomorrow's challenges.

Some of it is obvious -- like the billions of dollars in unneeded projects that were included in the thousand-page 1988 spending bill that was dropped on my desk last December. Some are not obvious -- like the billion dollars in unnecessary interest expense the government paid, year after year, because it lacked a cash management system, or the billions of dollars lost annually for lack of a credit management process to ensure collection of the trillion dollars in loans owed the Federal Government.

July 1980, I promised the American people: ``I will not accept the excuse that the Federal Government has grown? . . . beyond the control of any President, Administration or Congress . . . we are going to put an end to the notion that the American taxpayer exists to fund the Federal Government. The Federal Government exists to serve the American people . . . I pledge my Administration will do that.'' I have delivered on that promise.

The first step was taken within months after my inauguration when I formed the President's Council on Integrity and Efficiency, composed of the agency Inspectors General. By the time I leave office, they will have delivered savings of over $110 billion in reduced waste, fraud, and abuse to the American people.

Then, in March 1982, I initiated the world's largest management improvement program with these words: ``With Reform '88 we're going to streamline and reorganize the processes that control the money, information, personnel and property of the Federal bureaucracy.'' I told my Cabinet at that time that ``we have six years to change what it took twenty or thirty to create -- and we came to Washington to make changes!'' I have followed up on that commitment. The President's Council on Management Improvement has overseen this effort, and is generating significant results.

These efforts are described in greater detail in my Management Report, which is being submitted concurrently. They can succeed only if all Federal managers and employees work together. Therefore, I propose in this budget a new approach to paying Federal employees who increase their productivity. I ask the Congress to modify the current system of virtually automatic ``within-grade'' pay increases for the roughly 40 percent of employees eligible each year to one that is based on employee performance. This will give Federal employees stronger incentives to improve service delivery and reduce costs to the taxpayer.

I have stressed on numerous occasions, the current budget process is clearly unworkable and desperately needs a drastic overhaul. Last year, as in the year before, the Congress did not complete action on a budget until well past the beginning of the fiscal year. The Congress missed every deadline it had set for itself just 9 months earlier. In the end, the Congress passed a year-long, 1,057-page omnibus $605 billion appropriations bill with an accompanying conference report of 1,053 pages and a reconciliation bill 1,186 pages long.

Members of Congress had only 3 hours to consider all three items. Congress should not pass another massive continuing resolution -- and as I said in the State of the Union address, if they do I will not sign it.

I am asking for a constitutional amendment that mandates a balanced budget and forces the Federal Government to live within its means. A constitutional amendment to balance the Federal budget -- and a provision requiring a super-majority vote in the Congress to increase taxes -- would impose some much-needed discipline on the congressional budget process. Ninety-nine percent of Americans live in States that require a balanced State budget, and a total of 32 States already have passed resolutions calling for a convention for the purpose of proposing a balanced budget amendment to the U.S. Constitution.

I am asking the Congress for a line-item veto, so that my successors could reach into massive appropriation bills such as the last one, cut out the waste, and enforce budget discipline. Forty-three State Governors have a line-item veto; the President should have this power as well. As Governor of the State of California (1967 - 1975), I used the line-item veto 943 times. The California State legislature upheld each of these vetos, even though both Houses were controlled by the opposition party.

Joint budget resolution. The budget process has so degenerated in recent years that the presidential budget is routinely discarded and the congressional budget resolution is regularly disregarded. As a remedy, I propose that henceforth the Congress and the Executive collaborate on a joint resolution that sets out spending priorities within the receipts available. The requirement of a Presidential signature would force both branches of government to resolve policy differences before appropriations measures must be formulated. The budget process could be further improved by including in the budget law allocations by committee as well as by budget function.

Individual transmittal of appropriation bills. The current practice of transmitting full-year continuing resolutions skirts appropriations committee-subcommittee jurisdictions. More importantly, it does not permit the Legislative and Executive branches to exercise proper scrutiny of Federal spending. Therefore, I propose a requirement that appropriations bills be transmitted individually to the President.

Strict observance of allocations. During the 1980s, an unacceptable budget practice evolved within the Congress of disregarding congressionally approved function allocations. Funds regularly were shifted from defense or international affairs to domestic spending. I strongly urge that each fiscal year separate national security and domestic allocations be made and enforced through a point of order provision in the Budget Act.

Enhanced rescission authority. Under current law, the President may propose rescissions of budget authority, but both Houses of Congress must act ``favorably'' for the rescission to take effect. In 1987, not a single rescission was enacted, or even voted on, before expiration of the 45-day deadline. I propose a change of law that would require the Congress to vote ``up or down'' on any presidentially proposed rescission, thereby preventing the Congress from ducking the issue by simply ignoring the proposed rescission and avoiding a recorded vote.

Biennial budgeting. The current budget process consumes too much time and energy. A 2-year budget cycle offers several advantages -- among them, a reduction in repetitive annual budget tasks, more time for consideration of key spending decisions in reconciliation, and less scope for gimmicks such as shifting spending from one year to the next. I call on the Congress to adopt biennial budgeting.

Truth in Federal spending. -- As part of my Economic Bill of Rights, I will shortly transmit legislation that will require any future legislation creating new Federal programs to be deficit-neutral. In addition to requiring the concurrent enactment of equal amounts of program reductions or revenue increases, my proposal would require that all future legislation and regulations be accompanied by financial impact statements, including the effect on State and local governments.

Important tasks remain, however. The large and stubbornly persistent budget deficit has been a major source of frustration. It threatens our prosperity and our hopes for lessening the burden on future generations.

Two years ago, the Legislative and Executive branches of government responded to this threat by enacting the G-R-H Act, which mandated gradual, orderly progress toward a balanced budget over the next several years. My budget achieves the 1989 target of the amended Act while preserving legitimate programs for the aged and needy, providing for adequate national security, devoting more resources to other high-priority activities, and doing so without raising taxes.

My budget also embodies the Bipartisan Budget Agreement reached last November. In presenting this budget, I am keeping my end of the bargain. I call upon the Congress to uphold its end -- by ensuring that appropriations and other legislation are in full accord with the Agreement. By exercising this measure of restraint and self-discipline, we can secure great benefits for the Nation: a lower budget deficit, reduced demand on credit markets, more stable financial markets, a steadily declining trade deficit, and continued prosperity with non-inflationary growth. And, by reforming the budget process, the Congress can improve its decisionmaking and garner the thanks of a grateful public. Surely, these are small prices for what is at stake.

The President. Mr. Chief Justice, members of the Court, and ladies and gentlemen, welcome to the White House, and thank you for coming to witness this historic occasion. This ceremony is the culmination of our constitutional process, which involves each of the three branches of government. I've had the honor of nominating Judge Kennedy to be an Associate Justice of the United States Supreme Court. The Senate has confirmed my nomination, and I now ask that Chief Justice William Rehnquist administer the constitutional oath of office to Judge Kennedy.

Justice Rehnquist. Thank you, Mr. President. Before I administer the oath, let me say on behalf of my colleagues and all of us how grateful we are to you for having this very fine ceremony in the White House. We appreciate it.

President, in again expressing our deep appreciation for the confidence and the trust that you've reposed in us. And we thank you, Mr. President, and we thank you, Mr. Chief Justice, for this gracious reception and for the warm welcome you've given us to the Court and to this city. We feel very much at home here.

In this year, the bicentennial, it is appropriate to recognize an essential truth, and that is that the Constitution of the United States is the single fact, the single reality, the single idea, the single moral principle that sets the United States apart from other nations, now and throughout history. I shall honor the Constitution. And at this gracious assembly and ceremony, it is appropriate to note also that the Presidency, the Congress, and the courts are committed to the Constitution and to the rule of law and to the heritage of freedom.

Well, we gather here today to welcome as the newest Associate Justice of the Supreme Court a man I've known and respected for more than a decade and who, like those Washington nominated, will give dignity and luster to our national character: Anthony M. Kennedy.

Judge and now Justice Kennedy -- sounds good, doesn't it -- [laughter] -- takes a distinguished seat on the High Bench. It was first held by one of those initial Washington appointees: John Rutledge. A century and a half later, Hugo Black filled it. And for more than a decade, it has been graced with the service of one of the great gentlemen of the American judiciary, a Justice widely acclaimed for his decency and fairness: Justice Lewis Powell.

Like his distinguished predecessor, Justice Kennedy's career has been marked by his devotion to a simple, straightforward, and enduring principle: that we are a government of laws, not of men. Our Constitution, our form of government, is built on a bedrock value: self-government, yes, but self-government with a purpose -- which is individual liberty.

We often say that to preserve liberty the Bill of Rights was added after ratification, but we should not forget that the framers in Philadelphia didn't put a Bill of Rights in their original document, because they believed that the system they'd constructed -- with all its checks and balances and its restrictions on the Federal Government's powers -- was a sufficient safeguard of freedom.

The framers had gone to Philadelphia with a clear mandate to, as the Annapolis convention had instructed, ``render the Constitution of the Federal Government adequate to the exigencies of the Union'' -- which was to say, to give it the power to tax, to regulate interstate commerce, and to raise an army and navy to defend the Nation. The absence of these powers under the Articles of the Confederation had led to trade wars among the States, local rebellions, international humiliation, the exhaustion of the Government's finances, and the ruin of the economy.

The question the framers asked was: How can the central government receive the power to govern without also receiving the power to oppress? Their answer, as we know: Define and divide power. The National Government got only so much, the States and the people kept the rest. And what the Federal authorities received, the framers distributed, some to the legislature -- and in fact, some to one House and some to the other and some to the entire legislature -- then some to the executive and some to the judiciary.

And so, the role assigned to judges in our system was to interpret the Constitution and lesser laws, not to make them. It was to protect the integrity of the Constitution, not to add to it or subtract from it -- certainly not to rewrite it. For as the framers knew, unless judges are bound by the text of the Constitution, we will, in fact, no longer have a government of laws, but of men and women who are judges. And if that happens, the words of the documents that we think govern us will be just masks for the personal and capricious rule of a small elite.

Justice Kennedy has shown a consistence and courageous dedication to preserving ours as a government of laws, and that's why I nominated him. In more than 12 years on the bench of the 9th Circuit, he won the respect of his colleagues and of the entire legal community. Lawyers and judges of all persuasions characterize him as fair, openminded, and scholarly.

I am proud to report on the continued success of my Administration's efforts to better manage the Federal Government. Keeping the machinery of government well oiled and up-to-date is a difficult and often frustrating task, but it is absolutely essential if the American people are to have the quality of Federal services they deserve.

Historians and scholars often speak of ``the American experiment.'' They are dead right: that is exactly what we are. We are an experiment to prove that men and women are not only capable of governing themselves, but that free, democratic institutions are superior to any other. Our people have every right to expect that their National Government perform its appointed tasks in a timely, efficient, and courteous fashion.

Our first step was to ask one of the classic questions of good management: Should we be performing a particular task at all? One of the root causes of waste and inefficiency at the Federal level is that the Federal Government has taken on responsibilities that lie outside its proper sphere of action. Accordingly, wherever appropriate, we eliminated Federal regulatory programs and tried to terminate other programs that are unnecessary or duplicative of private sector activities. In other cases we returned Federal programs to the States or to the private sector to operate. Administrative overhead was reduced and cost-effectiveness enhanced by consolidating many Federal programs into block grants and turning them over to the States. Similar gains were realized by selling Government-owned enterprises like Conrail to private bidders. Further gains can be made by increased use of private sector ancillary and support services for activities where government plays a continuing role. In other areas, the Federal Government can scale back operations and reduce barriers to competition, in order to encourage private alternatives.

Second, we launched an all-out campaign against fraud, waste, and abuse at the Federal level. We expanded the role of our agency Inspectors General and made greater use of oversight mechanisms such as internal controls. Over the past 7 years, we have gone after the unscrupulous contractors who bilk the Pentagon, the doctors who overcharge the Medicaid program, the welfare chiselers who collect benefits to which they have no right, the embezzlers who line their pockets with the taxpayers' money, and the deadbeats who evade taxes or will not repay Federal loans. Individuals and corporations have been prosecuted to the fullest extent of the law for cheating the government, and the number of abuses has been substantially curtailed. As a result, billions of dollars have either been saved or put to better use by Federal agencies.

Third, we have worked to improve individual agency operations by managing the agencies better and making their resources go further. Through intensive management review of agency programs, implementation of the recommendations made by the President's Private Sector Survey on Cost Control, and the budget review, we homed in on unique agency problems and assisted their managers in solving them.

Fourth, for the first time in history, we developed and are implementing governmentwide management systems to collect and analyze information concerning finances, personnel, and other administrative responsibilities. The Federal Government now has uniform accounting systems that will soon be used by every Executive branch agency. The government's credit policies and loan programs are likewise being carried out in a uniform manner -- with the result that these credit programs are now being operated in a manner comparable with practices in the private sector. In the same way, our practices for handling cash receipts and disbursements have been improved, and new technology has been applied to improve the timeliness of transactions and reduce the potential for abuse. Information on the work performed by government employees is now standardized and collected uniformly, as are details on government property and procurement.

Lastly, and most importantly, we are making Federal agencies more productive. I realize that productivity, efficiency, and quality control are terms more often associated with private, profit-making enterprises than with government. Yet, I have long believed that they should apply to government as well. We owe our ``customers'' -- the American people -- the highest standards of service. Major strides have been made in improving the timeliness and efficiency of Federal Government operations. For example, a new automated passport system has enabled the State Department to issue passports in about half the time it used to take -- and the Department has done this at a time when passport applications have increased by 20 percent. The Commerce Department is using a similar system to speed the issuance of export licenses. The Food and Drug Administration has reduced the time it takes to test and approve new medical devices by about one-third -- without cutting corners on safety. The Federal Aviation Administration is implementing new ways to speed passenger planes in and out of airports. The Internal Revenue Service is accelerating the processing of tax returns. And these are just a few of our many accomplishments.

Although we have achieved much already, not every initiative we have begun will be completed before the end of this Administration. Some additional implementing work will remain, especially in completing systems for managing government operations and in planning for the 21st century. Nevertheless, our work to date will leave a firm foundation on which future Administrations can build. This is the ``management legacy'' that my Administration will leave behind for our successors.

Third, a summary of accomplishments and our goals for the coming year in our priority areas of credit, financial management, productivity, improved services through technology, procurement, and privatization.

Fourth, a description of the roles played by key agencies such as the General Services Administration, the Office of Personnel Management, and the Department of the Treasury, as well as special organizations such as the President's Council on Management Improvement, and the President's Council on Integrity and Efficiency -- both of which have been invaluable in their support and assistance. This section also includes detailed plans, agency by agency, for the implementation of our goals in each of our priority areas, and our legislative agenda.

I have been deeply gratified by the professionalism and spirit of cooperation with which Federal executives and employees have assisted in realizing the management goals of this Administration. We can be very proud of our joint effort to date, but on no account can we be content with what has been done so far. Genuine reform will require continuing dedication and a devotion to stated management goals that endures long after my time in office has expired.

If we know anything about the future, we know that the pace of change -- already swift -- will be even faster. It is no idle question to ask how democratic institutions will manage to keep up. Americans in the 21st century will have additional, and perhaps different, needs and expectations of their government. To meet those needs and expectations, we must prepare now by overhauling, modernizing, and streamlining the machinery of our Federal system.

The result of their effort should be a blueprint for government in the 21st century: better governance over those things that are truly Federal in nature, increased responsiveness to the needs and demands of the American people, and less taxpayer dollars spent on the administration of government.

My first Economic Report, issued in 1982 after a year in office, could look only to the future for encouraging economic news. The task of rebuilding the economy was just beginning, and hard choices were being made. Inflation had begun to come down from double-digit rates, but America was mired in recession, its second in as many years. Today, however, we can point to real, solid economic progress. The policies of this Administration have spurred and sustained a record economic expansion -- the longest in U.S. peacetime. Fifteen million new jobs have been created during this expansion, with strong gains widespread across industries and demographic groups. Real gross national product (GNP) has risen nearly 23 percent during these 5 years of growth.

And the accomplishments are not all in the past. Our policies will continue to contribute to rising standards of living in the years ahead. By enhancing private incentives and opportunities for work, investment, and entrepreneurship, we have laid the groundwork for growth far into the future.

To ensure that the renewed energy of the private sector remains a force for growth, we must continue our efforts to bring down the Federal deficit through restraint on spending, to resist the siren song of protectionism, to support policies that foster noninflationary economic growth, and to rein in government when it threatens to make our markets less open, our industries less responsive, or our economy less flexible.

November 1982, the U.S. economy has grown without interruption and without a resurgence of inflation. Only twice before in our Nation's history -- but never during peacetime -- has recorded economic growth continued for so long. During the current expansion a strong increase in employment, combined with low rates of inflation and higher productivity growth, have meant rising standards of living for the American people.

Employment has increased dramatically, and all demographic groups have benefited. While overall employment has risen about 15 percent since November 1982, employment of blacks has increased by more than 25 percent and employment of Hispanics by more than 40 percent. Correspondingly, unemployment rates -- especially among minorities -- have fallen rapidly, although those rates are still unacceptably high. I believe that all who want jobs should be able to obtain employment commensurate with their skills and abilities.

As the unemployment rate has declined by almost one-half, some have claimed that the new jobs are low-quality, dead-end positions, while others have argued that booming employment has put us on the verge of another round of inflation.

Neither view is accurate. The facts show that the strongest job growth has been in the higher paid, high-skill occupations. The bulk of the new jobs created have been full-time positions in occupations that pay well. While it is true that the number of jobs in manufacturing has risen more slowly than in the service-producing sector of the economy, this is a reflection of the innovation of American business and the skill of American workers, not a sign that the United States is ``deindustrializing.'' The share of manufacturing output in total output actually has risen over the course of the expansion, and it is now above its postwar average. However, rapid increases in manufacturing productivity have meant slower growth in employment in this sector.

This strong productivity growth, in combination with the downward adjustment of the dollar's exchange rate, has lifted the competitiveness of our products on world markets. Around the globe, products ``Made in the U.S.A.'' are becoming more common and more sought after.

With sound and stable economic policies, saving and investment will be encouraged, and the Nation's productive capacity will continue to expand. I remain committed to the goal of price level stability, and I view the decline in inflation during my Administration as a major accomplishment. I would not take lightly the prospect of a resurgence of inflation. But economic growth itself will not lead to a spiral of worsening inflation; only irresponsible economic policies would do that.

Our economic projections show inflation slowing during the coming years, even as output grows at a robust average annual rate of 3.2 percent. But continued economic progress requires that policymakers adhere to forward-looking principles, pursuing the long-term best interests of the Nation through a sustained commitment to growth and stability. The prospects for growth in the immediate future have been diminished somewhat by last year's plunge in the stock market, as well as by the increase in interest rates and tightening of monetary policy during 1987. Nevertheless, I anticipate that the U.S. economy will continue to post gains in 1988, as the expansion moves through its 6th year.

The past 5 years have marked an outstanding period of economic growth in the United States. It has been unusual in its longevity, unusual for the fact that inflation has remained subdued, and unusual relative to the performance of other industrial economies. Between 1982 and 1986, American businesses, large and small, created two and one-half times as many new jobs as Japan and the major industrial countries of Europe combined. In 1987 this trend appears to have continued, as the U.S. economy again generated new jobs at a remarkable rate. The U.S. unemployment rate has fallen 5 percentage points, and now stands well below those in most other major industrialized countries, where unemployment rates have yet to recover fully from the last recession. Overall, we have not lost jobs because of foreign trade. Instead, growth-oriented policies of lower and fairer taxes, reduced interference by government, and free and open international trade have been a source of strength for the economy. Indeed, the U.S. economy has flourished, and the outlook is full of promise.

It is hard to believe that at the beginning of the 1980s the prevailing attitude toward the economy could best be described as despair. Inflation and interest rates had ratcheted higher with each successive business cycle, and, as the economy suffered through its second recession in 2 years, the goal of sustainable growth appeared increasingly elusive. Amid double-digit inflation and unemployment rates, there were calls for the Federal Government to do more and more, thereby compounding the failed policies of the past. Instead, I took government policy back to the basics, and the last 5 years of economic growth testify to the vitality of free markets and the productivity of the American people. Government intrusions in the Nation's economic life have been reduced, and the private sector has responded with an explosion of activity, creating new products and new jobs at a very rapid rate.

Federal Government has an important role to play in the Nation's economy, but it is a limited role. As a general proposition, economic decisions should be left to the private sector, which has been our economy's strength throughout its history, or to State and local governments when the issues cannot be handled satisfactorily by the private sector. Only in issues truly national in scope is there a role for the Federal Government.

We have made efforts to restrain Federal spending, to limit it to only the government's vital functions, and those efforts have borne fruit. Last fiscal year, for the first time in 14 years, Federal outlays, after adjustment for inflation, declined. Government spending on goods and services absorbs resources that might be used better by the private sector, and any Federal outlay must be financed eventually by inflation or taxes. Because there is no free lunch, we must make the hard choices, funding only those programs that are in the best interest of the Nation, not those that happen to have the most influential lobbyists. For example, while a strong national defense is rightly the responsibility of the Federal Government, a continued proliferation of pork-barrel projects is not. America's sense of fair play is violated when hard-earned tax dollars are needlessly turned over to powerful special interests.

In the conduct of macroeconomic policies, we have turned away from the stop-and-go policies of the past. My Administration has adopted a long-term view that fiscal policy determines the division of economic activity between the public and private sectors and is not meant to respond to every rise and fall in the economic data. Similarly, monetary policy should provide adequate liquidity for sustained noninflationary growth. Together, these policies create a stable environment in which individuals and businesses can plan for the future and make the most of their economic opportunities.

For too long the Federal Government has interfered unnecessarily in private economic decisions. There is a legitimate, although limited, role for the Federal Government in certain industries -- for example, in ensuring the safety and soundness of the Nation's banking and payments systems. But many government regulations impede the operation of markets, inhibit competition, or impose costs on firms and raise the prices faced by consumers, without providing commensurate benefits. Regulations that interfere with the efficient use of labor, investment, and raw materials ultimately reduce our productive potential, making this country worse off.

While my Administration has been successful in reducing many regulations and intrusions into markets, much remains to be done. We must lessen remaining disincentives to work, diminish the burden of Federal regulations, and dismantle government programs that needlessly subsidize inefficient producers.

In particular, we must release financial institutions from outdated legal restraints, eliminate the remaining controls on interstate trucking, deregulate natural gas, and repeal mileage standards for new automobiles. We must resist appeals for even more government intervention that would introduce additional inefficiencies, such as requiring advance notification of layoffs and plant closings. With few exceptions, the private sector is best able to allocate resources to their most highly valued uses, and it should be allowed to do so without excessive paperwork and restrictions. That is why privatization, deregulation, and private sector initiatives have been important elements of my economic program. I believe in the inherent dynamism of the private sector, and I believe that the most constructive thing government usually can do is simply get out of the way.

Administration has been a force for economic change in the United States and, by our example, in the world at large. Our proven market-oriented policies are being adopted in more and more countries around the globe, as they recognize the high costs of big government and the harmful effects of stifling the entrepreneurial spirit.

In order to enhance growth and economic opportunity, many nations have followed our lead, undertaking reductions in sky-high tax rates that diminish incentives to work, save, and produce. In addition, tax reform is becoming a worldwide movement. Just as in the United States, tax reform abroad promises to end many distortions and inefficiencies, allowing businesses and individuals to make decisions about production and investment in order to increase their economic well-being, rather than simply to reduce their tax bills.

From continent to continent, the benefits of privatization and deregulation are becoming appreciated. Even China, and perhaps now even the Soviet Union, appear to be edging toward freer economic systems. Instead of viewing private enterprise as the adversary, many governments now see it as their best hope for progress and prosperity. Developing as well as industrialized nations are reducing market rigidities and interferences, thereby expanding economic freedom and opportunity for their citizens.

The debt burden carried by developing countries is not just their problem; we all have a vital interest in finding solutions that promote growth and protect open international financial markets. And we will continue to work with all who display a real determination to deal with this difficult issue.

United States has been a constructive force in the world economy, not only by demonstrating the benefits of private enterprise, but also by our commitment to free trade and international economic cooperation. In addition, this Nation's strong demands for imports helped support output growth abroad during much of this decade. The world economy has become increasingly interdependent, as trade has multiplied and financial markets have become essentially global.

To continue to reap the benefits of an open international trading system, we are committed to reducing further the barriers that interfere with the free flow of goods, services, and capital. To this end, the United States has entered into, and will continue to seek out, bilateral and multilateral agreements to lower impediments to international commerce. The Free-Trade Agreement recently negotiated with Canada is an historic accomplishment. Once the necessary implementing legislation is passed, it will establish the largest international free-trade area in the world. At the same time, in the Uruguay Round of the multilateral negotiations under the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade, we have been working to lower trade barriers worldwide. In that forum, we have placed special emphasis on eliminating spiraling subsidies to agricultural production and harmful barriers to agricultural imports, on establishing and enforcing adequate protections for intellectual property, on liberalizing trade in services, and on ensuring evenhanded treatment of foreign investment. Through these avenues and others, we will continue to pursue the goal of free and fair trade, which can only expand opportunity and prosperity both at home and abroad.

American people elected me to this office with a vision of a reinvigorated economy, and I have watched that vision become reality. The resurgence of America has confirmed my optimism. The accomplishments of the last 7 years should inspire us, but not blind us to the important challenges that remain.

Foremost among our challenges is the continued high level of Federal spending and the budget deficit. Federal receipts last year were $255 billion above their level in 1981; nevertheless, the deficit has nearly doubled since then, bloated by a $326 billion increase in outlays. Although we have succeeded recently in slowing the growth of spending, and the deficit declined by $71 billion in the last fiscal year, the deficit is still too large.

Recent progress in controlling Federal outlays notwithstanding, as a percent of GNP, outlays remain well above the postwar average. The government continues to spend too much, absorbing resources that could be put to better use by the private sector. There are several essential functions of the Federal Government, such as providing a strong national defense and ensuring an appropriate safety net for those in need, but in many areas the government's presence is oppressive and unnecessary.

Tax increases are not the key to eliminating the deficit. Some taxes are unavoidable -- the necessary functions of the Federal Government must be paid for. But tax reform and the cuts that have been instituted in income tax rates represent successful efforts to find less distorting, less burdensome, and more equitable means of financing government. Undoing tax reform through tax increases would affect economic activity adversely by raising uncertainty about government policy and reducing incentives to work and produce. Rather, in coming years we should look to ways to enhance incentives for investment in future productive capacity, including reducing the tax rate on capital gains.

Current budget practice is to deliver a pair of mammoth bills that must be passed and signed in a matter of hours -- or the government has to shut down. This is not responsible government, and I will not sign another of these behemoths. This budget process does not serve the best interests of the Nation, it does not allow sufficient review of spending priorities, and it undermines the checks and balances established by the Constitution.

So that such massive appropriations bills do not have to be an all-or-nothing proposition, I have asked for the line-item veto, a power that 43 State Governors already have. With a line-item veto, future Presidents could pare away waste and enforce budget discipline. In addition, expanded rescission powers would allow the Executive to cut unnecessary spending on programs that, in many cases, have outlived their usefulness. Finally, to ensure that balanced budgets become a permanent feature of our fiscal landscape, the legislatures of 32 States have asked for -- and I endorse -- a constitutional amendment to force the Federal Government to live within its means. These steps must be taken, because the current budget process is impending budget progress. By its very nature, the democratic process is often messy and unfocused. But we know that democracy works and that tough decisions can be made. We must rise to the challenge again and prove that we can craft sound budgets through a sensible process.

We also must resist efforts to push the Nation into protectionism. Our foreign trade deficit is very large, but it has turned the corner in real terms. Last year foreign trade contributed significantly to our economic growth. Moreover, further improvements are on the way. At this point especially, it would be a tragic mistake to attempt to close the trade gap by closing our markets.

My administration is committed to working diligently with the Congress to draft responsible trade legislation, but if that legislation is not free of harmful protectionist measures, I will veto it. Our goal is to see the trade deficit reduced in an environment of sustained economic growth and low inflation. To this end, we are working with the other major industrial countries to coordinate economic policies that sustain noninflationary economic growth, encourage an orderly reduction of international imbalances, and thereby foster stability of exchange rates.

We must maintain the confidence of foreigners and our citizens alike in the ability of the United States to generate profitable investment opportunities and to follow responsible economic policies. The vitality of free and open markets, full of opportunity and promise, is the best foundation for investment. We must see to it that our tax structures and regulations do not discourage saving and investing. We must encourage investment not only in plant and equipment, but also in the American people themselves. Education, skills, research and development -- these are some of the most fruitful areas for investment; expanded knowledge enhances the productive potential of our most valuable resource, our people.

America is blessed with great gifts -- abundant land and natural resources, a diverse and hard-working people, an unshakable tradition of democratic values. My confidence in America has been shown to be well-founded over these past few years. The economy has been revitalized, and the record peacetime economic expansion has brought with it renewed opportunities and enhanced well-being. We set ourselves a formidable task: to reduce and to rationalize the role of government in the economy. That effort has been richly rewarded. During our watch, the U.S. economy again has shown its strength.

But our job is not finished. The Federal budget must be controlled in order to build a solid foundation for future economic growth. And I will not be satisfied until all Americans share in this prosperity; there are still too many enmeshed in poverty and without jobs. We must rise to our remaining challenges, heartened by our triumphs and inspired by the resilience of a resurgent America.

I am today designating Caspar Weinberger and Drew Lewis to the National Economic Commission. These appointments, along with those announced today by the Republican leaders of the House and Senate, complete the current membership of the Commission.

This Commission, which was created in last year's reconciliation bill, is charged with making recommendations on reducing the Federal deficit and is to issue its report on March 1 of next year. The Commission should also examine the current budget process as part of their deliberations.

I am very pleased that these two men have agreed to lend their considerable expertise to the Commission. While Cap most recently served as my Secretary of Defense, he has had extensive government experience at OMB and HEW as well as in State government in California. He knows the budget inside and out and is familiar with a broad range of Federal programs. Drew has exhibited his many abilities in both the public and private sector; he served as my Secretary of Transportation and is currently at Union Pacific.

I have said before, I believe when all aspects of the budget are reviewed the primary policy problem will be viewed not as a lack of revenues but an inexorable growth in spending. Over the last 7 years, revenues have increased by $250 billion, but spending has increased by $325 billion. And while defense has necessarily grown, it accounted for only $125 billion, or less than 40 percent, of the increase.

The President. It's been a very great pleasure to meet with Chancellor Kohl again for a friendly and highly useful discussion. This year marks the 40th anniversary of a series of events that have shaped the destiny of our two countries. In 1948 the United States stepped forward and helped spark the postwar recovery of West Germany and Europe and assisted in starting the constitutional process that created a West German state. In response to Soviet challenges, we launched the Berlin airlift and aided in laying the foundation for collective security and the economic integration of Western Europe.

It was in this crucible of events that the modern relationship between the Federal Republic of Germany and the United States was forged, a relationship that has prospered and many times proven its value to both our countries. As befits good friends, the Chancellor and I have met regularly since we assumed office. Our discussions reflect the richness of our relationship and the many interests we share. I especially benefit from hearing the Chancellor's views on world problems.

Among the many subjects we discussed today was the state of the NATO alliance, including our common defense efforts and arms control strategy. I thanked the Chancellor for his support throughout the long INF negotiations and now for the treaty itself. This treaty represents a major political victory for NATO, a success far beyond what many thought possible. It carries important lessons on how successfully to negotiate arms reductions with the Soviet Union. We also reviewed progress on the NATO alliance's next arms control priorities. These include negotiations toward a 50-percent reduction in strategic arms, a verifiable global ban on chemical weapons, and redressing the serious imbalances in conventional forces in Europe.

We agreed that we must deal with the Soviet Union from a position of realism, strength, and alliance unity. And we agreed that the alliance must maintain both military strength and readiness. These are the underpinnings and preconditions of any successful dialog with the Soviet Union. Only a strong West can have a positive influence on the way in which the Soviet Union deals with other countries and with its own people; we know that a weak Western alliance cannot.

Chancellor and I also discussed economic and trade issues. In particular, I told the Chancellor that I supported the efforts he's made to stimulate the West German economy, and I expressed the hope that he would do more. The Chancellor, in turn, welcomed our efforts to reduce the United States Federal deficit. We both agreed on the need to avoid trade protectionism. Protectionism would be an economic disaster for both our countries.

East-West relations may bring. We look forward to a positive response to the invitation the Western powers extended last December to the Soviet Union to join with us in taking steps to improve the lives of Berliners.

Kohl. Mr. President, ladies and gentlemen, my visit to Washington -- and this is my ninth bilateral meeting with President Reagan -- is a return visit to the memorable visit the President paid to Berlin and Bonn last June.

Berlin initiative announced by you, Mr. President, was one of the points on which we focused in our conversation. I once again expressed my appreciation and gratitude to President Reagan for this initiative, and I assured him that the Federal Republic and the Federal Government will do all it can in order to make its contribution towards the success of this initiative. In the meantime, the three Western protective powers have entered into talks with the Soviet Union on this issue, and the President assured me that Secretary of State Shultz, on the occasion of his forthcoming visit to Moscow, will make it plain to his Soviet interlocutors that Berlin must be included from the very beginning in positive developments of West-East relations.

We had intensive exchanges on the present state of West-East relations. Never in the postwar history has the United States of America and the Soviet Union been engaged in such an intensive dialog at the highest level as in the last few years. And with the INF agreement, the third summit meeting between you, Mr. President, and General Secretary Gorbachev has for the first time in history opened the way towards genuine disarmament. And I have seized this opportunity, once again, to express my congratulations to the President on this success -- the success which will be your success and which will always be linked with your Presidency.

America; it's in the interest of the Atlantic alliance; and it is, not least, also in the interest of our own country. Nobody who has objections as far as this agreement is concerned, be it here in Washington or somewhere else in the United States, can point to the Federal Republic of Germany. And that is the reason why yesterday, when I had talks and meetings with the leadership of the Senate, I pleaded in no uncertain terms in favor of the ratification of this agreement without any restricting amendments.

Government of the Federal Republic of Germany vigorously supports a 50-percent cut of the strategic offensive potential of either power, because this step is not only in the interest of the United States of America but it would also be in the very real interest of the Federal Republic of Germany and of Western Europe. Mr. President, we staunchly support a worldwide ban on chemical weapons, and we support the early adoption of a mandate for negotiations on conventional stability in the whole of Europe, from the Atlantic to the Urals.

In accordance with the decisions taken by the alliance in Reykjavik and in Brussels, I have supported the position that, in conjunction with the establishment of a conventional balance and the global elimination of chemical weapons, tangible and verifiable reductions of nuclear systems of shorter range should also be reached. The objective being equal ceilings, no zero resolution, no denuclearized zone -- and least of all, in Europe. We were in agreement that all these disarmament questions and issues as well as the necessary measures to preserve our common security should be combined and form an overall concept for our alliance. And we think that the forthcoming NATO summit meeting must be an incentive for that and give new impulses to that effort.

We have agreed that we will remain in bilateral contact as far as all these issues are concerned. And along this line -- and the President and I myself were in complete agreement on that -- trust and confidence between West and East must be further developed and intensified, and this would also include the solution of regional conflicts as well as ensuring respect for human rights, particularly so in the countries of the Warsaw Pact.

President, you have just made the same point, and we are all in agreement that we will be able to face up to the tasks ahead of us. And this new phase can be mastered only when we show unity, coherence, and the closest measure of coordination and consultation. Now, Mr. President, I would like to take this opportunity here to express, as Chancellor of the Federal Republic of Germany, before the American public, that we are fully aware of the fact that the Federal Republic of Germany knows that only together, with their allies, and only together with the support of all the free nations of Western Europe and the United States of America, will it be possible to attain its legitimate aim of easing, in the interest of the people, the consequences of the division of our country and to make the frontier between East and West more permeable. We are belonging to the West, and that is the way it will be also in the future.

Community. I was able to report to you about the successful conclusion of this summit meeting -- the European Community -- we had a week ago in Brussels and the measures we agreed upon there, particularly the restriction in the limitation of agricultural production and our commitment to the maintenance and to the support of the common policy favoring continued free trade all over the world -- were some of the main positions we have taken there. And I also assured you that we will certainly not adopt a tax on oils and fats.

President, it has been a reassuring experience in all the visits I paid to you here in the White House, that as far as our commercial relations, trans-Atlantic commercial and economic relations are concerned, we have always renewed our commitment to the concept of a free trade and to rejection of protectionism. That this is part of the spirit in which we are facing these tasks and in which we will be able to live up to the tasks of the future.

President, once again, I thank you very much for the extremely friendly atmosphere for our exchanges and for the support I've been receiving from you, from the members of your Cabinet, and the members of your staff. These have been 2 short days I spent here in Washington, but I think these were 2 good days. And I think it is this spirit in which we will go on working also in the future together. Thank you.

The President. Mr. Chancellor, your suggestion during your last visit for a U.S.-German Youth Exchange Council has resulted in the recent establishment of a body of prominent Americans and Germans who have accepted the challenge to expand youth exchanges between our two countries. I fully support the work of this youth exchange council and share your strong personal commitment to advancing mutual understanding, particularly between the younger generations in our two countries. I am, therefore, especially pleased to be able today to exchange with you, in the presence of Director Wick and Professor Weidenfeld, the two coordinators of U.S.-German cooperation, copies of the documents establishing the U.S.-German Youth Exchange Council.

Kohl. Mr. President, I think what we have just done is more important than anything else we could have possibly done. We discussed the issues, the great international issues, but what we have done here concerns the future. It relates to the next generations, and I think they will form their opinion and their judgment about what we have done by measuring us against this background.

This week I transmitted to Congress our proposed budget for 1989. This budget fulfills the second-year obligations of a bipartisan agreement I hammered out last November with the leaders of Congress. We then, after arduous negotiations, agreed on a plan to reduce Federal deficit spending by over $75 billion in 2 years. If Congress upholds its commitments and stands firm against pressures for increased spending -- pressures that reached a peak during election years -- solid results will be forthcoming.

And progress already has been made. If our proposed budget is enacted, deficit spending will have dropped from $221 billion in fiscal year 1986 to $130 billion in fiscal year 1989. As a proportion of gross national product, it will have been cut by more than half since 1983. The legislative and executive branches, by living up to our commitments of last November, are demonstrating the kind of responsible leadership expected by the electorate.

The budget we've transmitted is true to that spirit. It reduces the level of deficit spending while at the same time holds the line against any general tax increase. It remains firm in our commitments to essential domestic programs. It also includes funding for the minimum defense program needed to keep our country safe and necessary to honor our commitments to our friends and allies.

We've proposed a trim budget that keeps the lid on spending and yet still recognizes that some increases are justified. For example, we're actually calling for Congress to spend substantially more on education, combating AIDS, the war against drugs, and improving air safety, while keeping discretionary domestic spending within predetermined limits.

The long-term solution to the plague of deficit spending, however, is not prudence this year or next. What's needed is reform that will bring discipline and accountability to the budget process. Exemplifying the shortcomings, last year the Federal budget was slapped together into a single behemoth bill and delivered to me hours before the Federal Government was due to run out of money. I was faced with the decision to either sign, without time for careful consideration, or see the Federal Government shut down. I pledged during the State of the Union, after plopping down 43 pounds of paper sent to me by Congress, that I would never sign another catchall continuing resolution. I'm pleased that at least 34 Senators and a good number of Congressmen, including many in the leadership, have indicated that they, too, do not want a repeat of last year's budget mayhem.

Make no mistake, we have the opportunity to put our fiscal house in order and to reform the budget process. We've proven time and again that, by working together, partisanship can be put aside and progress can be made when the national interest is at stake. It took cooperation from both sides of the aisle, for example, to put in place an economic recovery program that has given this country the longest peacetime expansion in history.

Being mindful of the suffering that comes with unemployment, that last figure is a matter of particular pride for me. And as our economy has grown, unemployment has dropped to its lowest level since 1979. But that statement doesn't come near to describing the success we've enjoyed. Today more people have jobs and a higher percentage of our work force is employed than ever before. Since the recovery began, we've created more new jobs than in all of Western Europe and Japan combined. And even the meaning of unemployment figures is sometimes not fully understood. Our 7 million unemployed citizens are often thought of as people who have lost their jobs, as they're sometimes described in the media. In fact, less than half of the unemployed are job-losers. Fifty-five percent are new entrants, mainly young people looking for their first jobs; reentrants, individuals who left the work force, perhaps to raise a family, and are now seeking to get back in; or job-leavers, who voluntarily left their jobs to change locations or occupations.

We, of course, need to remain concerned about each and every citizen who is seeking work and should not be satisfied until everyone who wants a job -- a good job -- has one. One person enduring the pressures and frustrations of unemployment is too many. That is why responsible Federal spending and taxing policies -- policies that foster growth and expand opportunity for all our citizens -- are so important. That is what the budget that I have just sent to Congress is all about.

I think there are at least two of us in this room who have a great feeling of nostalgia right about now, because it isn't the last time for you, but it is for us under these same circumstances. And we're going to miss this very much.

Seven years ago some of you were our first guests for a state dinner, and since then I've thought that was the right way to begin. I'm wondering now if we might have started something. I don't want to tie my successor's hands. So, let me say that as a Governor I always thought that before a new President began entertaining heads of state from around the world he should show that first things come first and spend an evening with the heads of our 50 sovereign States and our territories.

We've just finished a year-long celebration: the bicentennial of the drafting of the Constitution. You know, the framers had a way of referring to the States as opposed to the Federal Government. They said ``the people.'' For example, James Madison once noted that ``the people'' called the Constitutional Convention, meaning the States did, and Congress just sort of tagged along trying to catch up and take credit. But there's a wisdom in saying ``the people'' to mean the States, a wisdom that until a few years ago was too often forgotten. The founders gave us a Federal system in the first place, because the best government of, by, and for the people is not the National Government but State government.

Federalism has been an integral part of our policies. For example, we've done our best to make certain that the Federal Government doesn't increase taxes and drain away the revenue base on which State and local governments depend. We've loosened Federal grant guidelines and regulations in general and given States more room to experiment in areas like welfare reform that were once tightly controlled. And we've worked in partnership with you to improve the quality of education.

We've also remembered that part of federalism is recognizing that the States are laboratories of democracy. And so, we've tried to get Congress to follow the lead of the States in one of the most important matters before the Government: the Federal budget. You know, I remember it used to be thought of as sophisticated to say that the Federal Government was so much wiser than State government, and that was why it should be kind of a big brother to the States, telling them what to do and how to do it. Well, the Federal budget process should put an end to that myth once and for all. Not one of you would put up with the mess that we have here in Washington at budget time.

Now, before I take my seat, I ask all of you to join me in raising a glass to one of America's outstanding Governors and your chairman -- he's feeling lonely right now; his State just lost half its population -- [laughter] -- and to another distinguished Governor and your vice chairman: to John Sununu and Jerry Baliles.

I'd like to pick up today on a subject from last night: giving government back to the people, giving many of the responsibilities not specifically stated in the Constitution as Federal functions back to the States and localities where they belong. I remember when we first came to this town over 7 years ago. When you started to talk about federalism, you sometimes felt like a lone voice crying in the wilderness.

Well, we're no longer a hopeless minority. Together, you and I, over the past 7 years, have begun to return balance to the relationship between the Federal Government and the States. This past October, I signed an Executive order that restricts the Federal Government from preempting State laws and requires that all proposed policies and legislation comply with the principles of federalism.

And I commend Governor Sununu and the National Governors' Association in your efforts to examine ways -- including constitutional amendments -- to restore the balance of power between the National Government and the States. Federalism, as arcane and maybe even antiquated as it may sound to some, is gaining momentum, with success following success. As States and localities take on more of their rightful responsibilities, they're showing that they can teach the all-wise Federal Government a thing or two.

Not one of our efforts of the past will be more crucial than working to ensure the protection of our children, families, and neighborhoods. As I said in the State of the Union, one of our most important responsibilities is to provide the very best opportunities for the generation that will follow us. Isn't that the dream of every parent, that their children's future will be even better than theirs? Our job is to make sure that government policies are geared to protecting and nurturing our most precious natural resource: our children.

Education, of course, is an essential element. One can't read the writings of our Founding Fathers today without being impressed by the faith that they put in education -- the faith they had that an educated populace would guarantee the success of this great experiment in democracy that they were undertaking. Such a strong faith in education must have been based not just on wishful thinking but on sound observation, observation that the American style of education -- not just for the few, not just for the elite, but for all -- was working. And so, one can't help but believe they knew what they were doing when they quite consciously left the responsibility to educate the American people up to the States.

I suppose it's the destiny of every second generation or so to think for awhile that maybe they're wiser than our Founding Fathers. And it's the destiny of the generation that follows to realize that this almost certainly is not true and to try to bring the Nation back to its first principles. The mystique of Washington, of big government, held sway for 40 years; and even as the dollars spent on education increased by over 3,000 percent, the quality of education in this country precipitously declined. It seems odd to us now that people would actually believe that a collection of bureaucrats sitting in a building in Washington, DC, could actually do a better job designing and running our children's education than the thousands of communities and millions of parents who know intimately their children's needs.

In the last few years, we've arrested the decline in American education by returning to the fundamental common sense of our Founding Fathers and the fundamental common sense of parents across this nation. The States have begun to reassert their authority in education, and many of you Governors have been leading the charge. And with this new renaissance of federalism has come a wealth of new ideas, innovation, and experiment, but more needs to be done.

Now, nothing is more important to good education than good teachers, yet in most States unnecessary regulations and requirements block talented people from entering the field. Governor Kean of New Jersey recognized the problem and instituted a new alternative certification program that has been an unqualified success in opening up the teaching profession to all those who have something to offer, increasing the number of applicants to teaching jobs, and improving the quality of teachers. We also need more accountability in our educational system. That means merit pay at all levels of the system so that those who are doing a good job are encouraged and rewarded.

It also means giving parents a greater choice of the school their child will attend. I've long supported various mechanisms to increase parental choice, including tuition tax credits, vouchers, and magnet schools. It's now clear from the experience of many cities and school districts that increased choice leads to increased competition and better schools -- so, better teachers, more accountability, but also better content.

Nation at Risk'' said our high school students should have 4 years of English and 3 years of math, science, and social studies. Many States have moved in the direction of these requirements, but only 3 States have adopted them. In any case, requiring that students take the key subjects is only the first step; we need to make sure that our students study the basics, but also raise the standards in those courses. Now, it's not for the Federal Government to specify content of curricula, but I urge educators and citizens to take a look at Bill Bennett's recent proposed model high school curriculum and to make sure that our schools are giving students as rich and challenging a curriculum as they deserve and as equality of opportunity demands.

Perhaps the greatest test of federalism is how we meet the urgent need for welfare reform -- how successful we are in fashioning local and community solutions to problems that would destroy families, or worse, keep families from forming in the first place. With a variety of innovative programs, the States are moving forward to meet this challenge, and I think we have reason to be optimistic that in the diversity of these approaches we may find new answers. And that's why I strongly support the Brown-Michel bill on welfare reform. This cost-effective proposal allows for States to demonstrate their ideas for reform of a system that is just not working for poor people. And I know that many of you have already developed demonstration programs, and we hope that more of you will do so.

Another problem for which the States are looking for solutions is child care. Once again, the Brown-Michel bill will permit you to develop your own ideas on child care, ideas that will treat child care in the way that is best for you and the families in your communities, instead of having the Federal Government jump in.

And now, if I might, I'd just like to sound a note of caution. It's natural in politics -- when there's a perceived need in the country, when people are calling out for solutions, they look to government first. Often government has a role, a crucial and a necessary one. Still, maybe it's my conservative bent, but I can't help but feel uneasy sometimes. Some describe a conservative as he who would rather sit and think, and others describe him as someone who would rather just sit.

A program on PBS some time ago described in devastating detail how our current welfare program, originally designed to raise people out of poverty, has become a crippling poverty trap, destroying families and condemning generations to a dependency. Economist Walter Williams, in ``The State Against Blacks,'' details how many laws and regulations -- also originally designed with a progressive social purpose -- have just the opposite effect. They keep the poor poor. Now, much of the push for child care is designed to rectify the ills of earlier programs, and many of these efforts are timely and good. But in this area, more than any other, government should tread carefully, humbly, because we're dealing with the most fundamental element of human society: the family.

Of course, one of the best things we could do for families is obliterate drug use in America. Our society's come a long way in 8 years, from do your own thing to just say no. Again, States are taking the lead in helping to make our society intolerant to drug use with stiff penalties and sure and swift punishment for offenders.

And one final word if I may. Over the last year, many of you've been traveling abroad as sort of special trade emissaries, and you've done a tremendous job working to improve trade and open foreign markets to American goods. Well, at this moment, we have before us an unprecedented opportunity to demonstrate to the world just what we mean by free and fair trade. I'm talking about the Canada free trade agreement -- the first ever of its kind and scope.

At this moment in history, we have a choice. We can go the way that some are proposing -- threats, tariffs and retaliation, and a shrinking world trade system, or openness, expansion, and freer and fairer trade, bringing an upward cycle of prosperity to all who participate. The first leads inevitably and inexorably to Smoot-Hawley. And the second -- well, I mentioned our Founding Fathers earlier.

Perhaps as great as the political unity they achieved in Philadelphia in 1787 was the economic breakthrough -- the principles that would enable America to become the world's largest free trade zone, a continental economy.

We now have the chance to expand that free trade zone to include our largest trading partner: Canada. And I hope I can count on your support for this historic agreement. As with our Founding Fathers, it will, in many cases, mean transcending the special interests of the moment -- no matter how valid they may be in themselves -- and looking to the broader interest not just of one State or not just of the United States, but of an entire world whose freedom and prosperity depend on an open and expanding cycle of free trade.

This is Ronald Reagan, speaking to you, the citizens of the North Atlantic alliance, over the satellite channels of WORLDNET and the Voice of America. In just a few days, I'll be flying to Europe to meet with the heads of the governments of our North Atlantic allies, and this will be our first meeting since General Secretary Gorbachev and I signed the Intermediate Nuclear Forces agreement in Washington in December. That agreement represented a step toward world peace and world freedom, and it was a major victory for the Atlantic alliance. So, at next week's meeting we'll celebrate the success of a policy we launched over 8 years ago, and we'll ask ourselves, What next? Today I'd like to share with you some thoughts we in America have about the alliance, the INF agreement, and the road ahead.

Preservation of a peaceful, free, and democratic Europe is essential to the preservation of a peaceful, free, and democratic United States. If our fellow democracies are not secure, we cannot be secure. If you are threatened, we're threatened. If you're not at peace, we cannot be at peace. An attack on you is an attack on us. This is not simply a matter of treaty language, important as treaty language is. It is an enduring reality -- as enduring as the reality that a threat to the security of the State of Maine or New York or California is a threat to the security of all 50 American States. Simply put: An attack on Munich is the same as an attack on Chicago.

Americans did not come easily or willingly to the lesson of how closely America's peace and freedom are tied to Europe's. We had a tradition dating back to President Washington of avoiding permanent alliances. And yet twice in this century when peace and freedom were under siege in Europe, one way or another, we found ourselves part of the struggle. At the end of the Second World War, we hoped that peace, freedom, and democracy were at last secure in Europe forever. Even though the United States had a monopoly for a number of years on nuclear weapons, we did not seek to exploit the advantage for territorial or any other kind of gain. We went home, took off our uniforms, put on our civilian clothes, and got back to the normal life with our families and our communities. Europeans often say that we Americans are naive. Well, four decades ago, perhaps we were.

Soon we learned that the postwar world was not to be as we, through all those years of fighting, had prayed it would be. We watched with growing apprehension and dismay as the Soviet Union turned its back on the commitment made at Yalta to conduct free and open elections in Eastern Europe. Throughout Eastern Europe, the Red Army remained a fully mobilized army of occupation. And there were attempts to subvert the democracies of Western Europe and then the Soviet adventure in Greece, not unlike what the Soviets are doing today in Central America.

Well, peace has been the alliance's goal, the purpose of its forces and its strategies. And for almost 40 years, peace has been its achievement -- an unprecedented period of European peace in which we in the democracies have lived in freedom and prospered. NATO's strategy for peace has always been simple: Prevent aggression before it starts. Be strong enough, be determined enough so that no adversary would think even for a moment that war might pay.

But we recognized in the mid-sixties that the strategic nuclear balance alone is not sufficient to keep the peace. The alliance's adversaries must not believe that our only possible response to a limited attack is to begin an intercontinental nuclear exchange. If they do, they may doubt that we would risk such a response and be tempted to test us.

That, of course, is why the Soviet deployment of SS - 20 intermediate-range nuclear missiles starting in the late seventies was such a threatening challenge. The SS - 20 wasn't just a new weapon but an entirely new level of threat to which NATO had nothing comparable. Without provocation or warning, the Soviet Union was shaking the fundamental structure of European peace.

And now we have succeeded. It wasn't easy. Europeans know that only too well. You saw the many demonstrations, many of them violent, protesting deployment. You heard the angry voices accusing the United States and NATO of warlike intentions. You went through election campaigns fought over deployment. You watched as the Soviets, playing to pacifist sentiments, rejected my 1981 proposal for the total elimination of longer range INF missiles as unrealistic and not serious; later, walked out of negotiations and -- both before and after they returned -- issued one ultimatum after another. You witnessed the courage of your leaders as they stood by the alliance decision, above all, the leaders of the five basing countries: Britain, Belgium, Italy, the Netherlands, and the Federal Republic of Germany.

I recognize that not everyone is completely at ease with the agreement. Some worry about the Soviet conventional and chemical advantage and that removing the Pershing II's and ground-launched cruise missiles would leave Western Europe more vulnerable to these Soviet forces. Some are concerned about the link between the United States and European pillars of NATO. With these weapons gone, they ask: Is peace still secure?

I'm happy to say that the answer is yes! The approximately 4,000 nuclear weapons that will remain in Europe are a strong link between the pillars of NATO, as are the more than 300,000 American servicemen and women and their families who live and work in Europe. And those nuclear weapons that will remain are dispersed throughout NATO, not concentrated in one country, and do not, by the way, put any one country at special risk. Ensuring the peace requires that these nuclear weapons stay where they are until we can achieve a better balance of conventional forces on the continent. Because of them and the Soviet knowledge that we have them, we can maintain the balance that maintains the peace.

You see, the United States remains steadfastly committed to the NATO strategy of flexible response, and we in the United States will do our part to ensure that NATO maintains all the modern forces, both conventional and nuclear, needed to uphold that strategy. After all, our goal is not a nuclear-free or a tank-free or an army-free Europe but a war-free Europe. A war-free Europe is what we have today; a war-free Europe is what we want to preserve.

As we look to NATO's next decade, we must make sure that all of our forces for peace, including our nuclear forces, remain modern and effective. This will require constant work, because military machinery wears out or becomes obsolete. And it will require being smart about the weapons and equipment we develop and buy, so we get the best value for our money. I'm pretty tightfisted myself, so I've been glad to see that NATO is taking efficiency seriously.

Better coordination among West European nations will also help in defense planning or in other areas, as we've seen in the Persian Gulf. And let me add that we in America welcome multilateral and bilateral defense cooperation among our European partners of the sort that the Western European Union and the Germans and the French and other governments have demonstrated within the overall framework of the alliance. Such cooperation and coordination are essential to strengthening the European pillar of the alliance and, thereby, the alliance as a whole.

Americans will do our part in keeping the alliance strong. Our troops will stay in Europe, a guarantee that our destiny is coupled with yours. We will keep our forces, including the strategic nuclear umbrella, strong and up to date.

And we will press forward with our Strategic Defense Initiative. I can't help noting that initially there was great confusion about our SDI program. Some called it Star Wars. They said it would dangerously expand the reach of American arms into space. But now the recognition has grown that this technology will not expand the threat of arms but limit it. It will protect and defend people. SDI holds the promise of lifting from mankind the burden of nuclear terror and making this a safer world.

United States is not alone in pursuing a strategic defense. In the last decade the Soviets have spent $200 billion on strategic defense. It would be a fatal mistake not to pursue this program. Even before it becomes leakproof, strategic defense will strengthen deterrence. It can make anyone who might think about disabling the West with a first strike think again, because it will undermine Soviet confidence in the military success of an attack.

But keeping our forces ready and able is hardly the only item on the alliance agenda. We want a safer world, one with smaller forces and fewer weapons while maintaining the essential balance that keeps the peace. That's the goal of the strategic arms reduction talks underway now in Geneva -- a 50-percent reduction in the strategic arsenals of both the United States and the Soviet Union.

The first priority of any new negotiations must be to eliminate conventional capabilities for surprise attack and large-scale offensives. The United States hopes that the Warsaw Pact countries will join with the Atlantic allies in focusing on correcting the imbalances, above all, in tanks and artillery, which are the most threatening ground forces. A safer peace requires that neither side be able to mount a massive conventional attack without warning.

More balance between East-West conventional forces will require substantial reductions by the Warsaw Pact countries -- bigger reductions than any we might make, because their forces are so much bigger and more threatening. And we must be able to verify that they are keeping their forces at the negotiated levels.

Finally, we're seeking in arms control talks in Geneva an effective, verifiable, and truly global ban on all chemical weapons. Strategic arms reductions, conventional arms balance, an effective ban on chemical weapons -- these are our post-INF negotiating priorities. And yet as we approach these negotiations, we again hear the voices that call on us to turn back from our strategy of combining strength with negotiations. They say the Soviets under a new leader have changed -- in the era of glasnost we can trust the Soviets more.

But can we afford to forget that the policy called glasnost is separated from the era of the gulag by fewer years than NATO has existed? In fact, the policy called glasnost coexists today with the reality of political repression in the Soviet Union. We cannot afford to forget that we are dealing with a political system, a political culture, and a political history going back many decades, even centuries. Swings between glasnost and the gulag are not new or even peculiar to the Soviet regime. In history they recurred again and again as the throne passed from czar to czar, and even within the reign of a single czar. We cannot afford to mortgage our security to the assessed motives of particular individuals or to the novel approaches of a new leadership, even if we wish them well. We must stick with the strategy of strength and dialog that has kept the peace and brought us a remarkable achievement in the INF treaty.

They can allow expanded commercial air service to Berlin so it can become one of the chief aviation hubs of central Europe. They can join Britain, France, and the United States in bringing more international meetings to Berlin. They can allow young people from East Berlin to visit the Western sectors and take part in cultural events there. They can join the Western sector powers in allowing and encouraging international sports events to take place throughout the city.

And they can tear down the Berlin Wall. To the Soviets today I say: I made my Berlin proposals almost 9 months ago. The people of Berlin and all of Europe deserve an answer. Make a start. Set a date, a specific date, when you will tear down the Wall. And on that date, bring it down. This would be an impressive demonstration of a true commitment to openness.

Europe and within the Soviet Union itself, we look for the Soviet leadership to demonstrate its seriousness about its Helsinki commitments to human rights. We look for an end to Soviet sponsorship of regional conflicts and for the Soviets to allow more and more people-to-people exchanges between East and West. These are pillars on which an enduring improvement in relations must be built.

For you see, the basic differences between East and West have nothing to do with the level of arms. We do not distrust each other because we're armed; we're armed because we distrust each other. It's a question of values, of beliefs, of moral principles. You can see it in a thousand ways. How did the Soviets treat Germany and the German people after the war? How did the democracies? How do the Soviets treat Third World nations like Afghanistan or Ethiopia today? How does the West? What is the condition of Eastern Europe today? What is that of Western Europe? Or take a simpler thing: What do the Soviets mean by words like democracy, freedom, and peace? Not, I'm sorry to say, what we mean.

Negotiations between East and West do not imply moral equivalency of our two systems or ways of life. We must never forget to say this publicly and say it repeatedly: So long as the difference between East and West is the difference between oppression and freedom; so long as Europeans in the East cannot worship and speak freely; so long as gigantic armies are poised in Eastern Europe, facing west, training to attack first -- just as NATO's troops are trained only to defend when attacked; so long as this is the state of our world, NATO's strategy and reason for being must remain to stop aggression before it happens.

I mentioned earlier what President Truman said when he signed the North Atlantic treaty. On that occasion he also noted, speaking of the alliance, that ``we are like a group of householders, living in the same locality, who decide to express their community of interests by entering into a formal association for their mutual protection.'' During the past four decades we in the alliance have, if anything, grown even closer together.

Today, in a sense, we live not simply in the same locality but in a single house, a house that may someday include all of mankind among its residents: the house of democracy. ``In my Father's house are many mansions.'' In the house of democracy are many languages and many national heritages, but one ideal: the dignity of man, or as Abraham Lincoln said, the belief that ``no man is good enough to govern another without that other's consent.'' All of us honor this truth. All of us are united in defending it. We have raised high the roof beam of this great structure of an alliance to shelter that truth from all the winds that blow and all the bears and wolves that prowl.

Yes, the Atlantic community is the house of democracy. The Atlantic alliance is the guardian of Europe's greatest legacy to the ages -- human freedom and democratic rule. This is the challenge before the alliance now: to remain strong so that generations to come will know peace and freedom just as we do. Thank you, and God bless you.

During the past four years, you have served our country with honor and courage, just as you have throughout your distinguished career. As my first Assistant Secretary of Defense for Reserve Affairs, you played a major role in revitalizing the reserve components of our Armed Forces. You were instrumental in restoring confidence and pride in one of our most noble national traditions -- the concept of the American citizen-soldier.

Since taking the helm a year ago as Secretary of the Navy, you continued to press forward the highest standards of excellence throughout the Navy and Marine Corps. From the most remote outposts to the lecture halls of Annapolis, your commitment to the quality of our military capability and the well-being of our men and women in uniform has been undivided.

As your service to this Administration comes to a close, I want to thank you for the selflessness and loyalty that you have always personified. In the end, it is these qualities that will ensure that freedom endures in this generation and in every generation to come.

Over the past three months the Department of Defense has been struggling to implement a mandated 33 billion dollar reduction of the FY 89 budget approved by you last year. The Navy Department was directed to absorb a significant share of this reduction, which eventually became approximately 12 billion dollars.

Like many others, I have serious concerns regarding the entire budget reduction process. First, the Department of Defense has been required to absorb cuts at a ratio almost twice as great as non-defense programs. Second, many Defense reductions themselves have been made in the wrong areas, and without clear strategic thought. I am particularly upset with the nature of the cuts as they affect the Department under my authority.

On three separate occasions, the uniformed and civilian leadership of the Navy Department provided the Secretary of Defense with proposed cuts totaling the amount required to meet the budget reduction, but which also would preserve the cherished goal of your administration to rebuild our Navy to a minimum level of 600 ships. In each case the advice of this senior leadership, concurred in by the Joint Chiefs of Staff, was ignored. I can only conclude that the decision to reduce the level of our fleet to a point that it may never reach the 600 ship goal was motivated by other than military and strategic reasoning.

During the four years I have served in your Administration, I have repeatedly expressed my gratitude at your decision to rebuild the greatest Navy in the world. Since I became Secretary of the Navy last year, I have stated just as frequently my belief that the force levels of our sea services remain minimal and must not be reduced. Even in the current budget environment such force levels could have been maintained. Since recommendations to that effect were rejected by your Secretary of Defense, I am unable to support him personally, or to defend this amended budget during budget deliberations. Consequently, I find it necessary to resign from my position as Secretary of the Navy.

I am pleased to transmit today for your immediate consideration and passage the ``Superconductivity Competitiveness Act of 1988.'' This legislation is needed to help translate U.S. leadership in science into leadership in international commerce.

In the estimation of one noted physicist, in the past year we have made 200 years worth of progress. As additional breakthroughs occur, the effect on our standard of living -- indeed, our way of life -- could be dramatic and unprecedented, in areas as diverse as transportation, energy, health care, computers, and communication.

By funding basic research, the Federal government has played a key role in these scientific breakthroughs. In Fiscal Year 1987, the Federal government spent about $55 million in superconductivity research. In Fiscal Year 1988, the Federal government will spend significantly more -- increasing the annual spending to more than $100 million. Ultimately, however, our success in superconductivity will depend on the private sector, which will make the critical decisions on how much capital, time, and effort to invest in commercializing superconductivity.

II amends the National Cooperative Research Act (NCRA) to cover joint production ventures. This is a particularly important step toward allowing U.S. firms to become more competitive with firms overseas in moving important research involving superconductivity and other fast-moving high technology areas from the laboratory to the marketplace.

II recognizes that unless U.S. firms are encouraged to organize their research and development activities in the most efficient manner possible, they cannot compete effectively with overseas firms. I should stress that the purpose of the NCRA is not to provide firms with immunity for anti-competitive behavior. Our antitrust statutes will continue to protect American consumers and businesses from harmful practices where they occur. This extension of the NCRA should promote innovation and productivity and will permit this country to maintain -- or in some instances to regain -- its position of world technological leadership.

Currently, there is no court-ordered remedy for patent infringement when a product made overseas, using a process that is patented in the United States, is imported into the United States. Title III would establish such a remedy and would permit U.S. manufacturing patent process holders to sue for injunctive relief and damages. (Relief of this nature is already available to process patent holders for products made in the United States using processes patented in the United States.) Title III would not extend the territorial application of American law. It would not prevent a foreign manufacturer from using a process overseas that is patented in the United States, as long as items manufactured under that process are not exported to the United States.

IV of the Act would provide protection for certain commercially valuable scientific and technical information generated in Federal government-owned and -operated laboratories. In particular, Title IV recognizes that commercially valuable scientific and technological information generated in Federal facilities loses potential commercial value when it is released wholesale under the Freedom of Information Act (FOIA). In addition, mandatory disclosure of such information under FOIA could encourage U.S. competitors to exploit the U.S. science and technology base rather than making investments in their own research and development infrastructure. Under Title IV, Federal agencies will be required to withhold information of this nature requested under the Freedom of Information Act where disclosure could reasonably be expected to harm the economic competitiveness of the United States. This Title is not intended to end the U.S. tradition of sharing the benefits of our excellence in science and technology; it merely provides that the Freedom of Information Act may not always be the appropriate or best avenue for doing so.

I should note that my Administration is currently developing a uniform policy to permit Federal contractors to own the rights to technical information that they develop for the government. This is intended to provide these contractors with proprietary rights equal to those of other firms that submit technical information to the government that was developed at private expense. Because our policy in this area is still under development, Title IV has been drafted to apply only to Federal government-generated, government-owned scientific and technical information.

There is a growing realization that, although the United States has long been a leader in breakthroughs in the laboratory, it has occasionally failed to convert these breakthroughs into commercial applications. This Act, in conjunction with the other components of our superconductivity initiative, can and will speed the process of commercialization. There is no time to waste in this effort. I urge the Congress to act promptly and favorably upon this legislative proposal.

President today announced the appointment of Alan Michael Kranowitz as Assistant to the President for Legislative Affairs at the White House. He is presently Deputy Assistant to the President with primary responsibility for liaison with the House of Representatives. He will replace William L. Ball III, who the President will nominate to be Secretary of the Navy.

November 20 of last year, I agreed with congressional leaders on a package designed to reduce the Federal deficit. That Bipartisan Budget Agreement between the President and the joint leadership of the Congress reflects a strong consensus that Federal spending must be brought under control.

Continued spending growth, particularly where wasteful or unnecessary, adds to the Federal deficit and absorbs resources that would otherwise be employed more fruitfully in the private sector of the economy. The Bipartisan Budget Agreement represents an important step in reducing spending growth. But protecting the Federal budget from special interest, budget-busting legislation requires a continued, ongoing commitment. Despite recent encouraging efforts to bring the Federal budget deficit under control, major problems persist.

In making this important proposal, one point deserves special emphasis. In complying with the deficit neutrality requirements of the Truth in Federal Spending Act of 1988, some may be tempted simply to shift spending requirements, either expressly or implicitly, from the Federal government to State and local governments. This is not, however, and should not be interpreted as being, the intent of this initiative. Instead, through enactment of this landmark legislation, we seek to achieve an historic breakthrough: to make the Federal Government -- both the Legislative and Executive branches -- more fully accountable for its actions and the effects of those actions on all the citizens of our Nation and, in so doing, get its fiscal house in order.

It will also continue the important work we have accomplished in reducing or eliminating needless Federal expenditures. It is worthy of broad, bipartisan support. Accordingly, I urge its prompt and favorable consideration.

The report provides information about the ongoing negotiations for a 50-percent reduction to equal levels in U.S. and Soviet strategic nuclear offensive arms, an effective and verifiable ban on chemical weapons, and the correction of disparities in conventional forces. Also described are the ancillary activities of the Arms Control and Disarmament Agency in support of our arms control policies and, concomitantly, the security of the United States.

INF Treaty constitutes a breakthrough in verification, the most far-reaching in the history of arms control, and should serve as a guide for other treaties to come. The political and economic advantages of carefully negotiated and effectively verifiable arms reductions hold great promise for peace, security, and continued prosperity for our country. The 1987 record of progress toward those goals is contained in this 27th ACDA Report.

The President. It has been a pleasure and an honor for me to meet today with Prime Minister Cavaco Silva on his first official visit to Washington. Portugal is a founding member of the North Atlantic Treaty Organization, a valuable friend and an ally. We salute Portugal's impressive transition to democracy and its continuing commitment to the collective defense of the West. Beyond the shared values and common interests that link our two countries, the Portuguese-American community has made a lasting contribution to American society that we can all appreciate.

Prime Minister, you and I have just concluded a most useful discussion covering a broad range of international as well as bilateral issues of importance. Southern Africa, the Middle East, and Afghanistan were among the topics we covered today, and I'm grateful for your advice and counsel, Mr. Prime Minister. High also on our list of topics was the agenda for the NATO summit, where we will meet again next week. I listened intently to the Prime Minister's views on East-West issues. I brought him up to date on recent developments in U.S.-Soviet relations and our plans for the Moscow summit. Secretary Shultz discussed his meeting with Soviet Foreign Minister Shevardnadze. Prime Minister Cavaco Silva briefed us on Portugal's assessment of the recent European Community summit in Brussels and the current political and economic situation in Portugal.

As our meeting today underscored -- while trying to improve relations with adversaries -- America still remains strong and unflinching in its commitments to our friends. The core of our foreign policy is our permanent partnership with our fellow democracies in the Atlantic alliance, on which the global balance of power and the cause of freedom so crucially depend. Be assured, we will never sacrifice the interests of our allies and friends in any agreement with the Soviet Union. The people of the United States and the people of Portugal are united with all other free peoples in the cause of freedom and the responsibility of maintaining the peace. The United States, Mr. Prime Minister, and Portugal are doing their part in this historic adventure. We're honored to have such friends.

These are challenging times. From our cordial and candid conversation, I know that we share similar goals and many of the same concerns. Portugal's role as a key and trusted ally is much appreciated here. We applaud Portugal's desire to modernize its armed forces and to play a more active role in NATO's collective defense efforts. Our commitment to assist Portugal in these efforts remains firm, ever within the context of the harsh budget realities that we all face. The task of leadership is to rise to challenge. I believe from our meeting today our two governments will accelerate the pace of our extensive cooperation and develop even further the close and mutually beneficial relationship which has traditionally existed between our two countries.

The Prime Minister. Mr. President, this morning we had the opportunity to have a useful exchange of ideas on the strengthening of the Atlantic alliance in a perspective of peace and security for the Western World, on the relations between our two countries, and finally, on the international situation. Portugal's and the United States positions converge toward the need for firmness and cohesion in the Western world.

I reiterated to President Reagan the Portuguese Government's support of the INF agreement and the continuation of the dialog with the Soviet Union. I expressed my firm belief that Western Europe's defense is not feasible without the United States commitment in the framework of NATO. I am sure that, at the next NATO summit meeting which will be held in a few days, we will have the opportunity to restate our common determination to strengthen the Atlantic alliance as a requisite for the preservation of peace and our common values. I informed President Reagan of the conclusions of the last European Council and the prospects for building a united Europe and for Portugal's development and modernization.

In the context of Portugal-U.S.A. relations, I reasserted our desire to maintain a preferential relationship since Portugal, being the United States maritime frontier with Europe, is a strategically important ally and wishes to remain a close and reliable ally.

A few differences have emerged regarding the agreement signed between our two countries in 1983, in the context of the defense agreement, which has bound us since 1951; namely, the legitimate Portuguese expectations regarding assistance levels granted to Portugal by the United States. We approach this subject in the spirit of openness that should guide relations between friends and allies. I stressed the difficulties that will result for Portugal if that assistance were curtailed, particularly at a time when we are committed to the reequipment of our armed forces and trying to modernize the country in an effort that cannot be deferred. I stated to President Reagan, that the Portuguese Government intended to request that consultations be held in the terms of the agreement.

In holding these consultations, we do not have the intention of ceasing or reducing the facilities enjoyed by the United States in Portuguese territory but rather to identify and overcome existing difficulties. As friends and allies, we want to look for solutions that will meet our common interests, so as to ensure a framework of cooperation to strengthen the preferential relations that exist between our two countries.

When we analyzed the international situation, we gave special relevance to the situation in Southern Africa, a region where Portugal has important responsibilities to fulfill. I am gratified by the ongoing talks between the United States and the Angolan Governments -- which are a positive step in the peace process -- and by the support provided to Mozambique.

President, I wish to express my appreciation for the opportunity to meet with you on this occasion which, I am sure, has contributed to strengthen the relations between our two countries as well as the Atlantic alliance's cohesion.

Thank you, Secretary Verity, Van Smith, and Jack Murphy. I'm especially pleased also that Governor Baliles is here today. He and several other Governors realize the importance of healthy, robust trade and have been champions of such international commerce. I couldn't be more pleased to join you today to launch the ``Export Now'' campaign. America loves a winner, and I think this campaign exemplifies the winning spirit of American enterprise and competition.

Although the doomsayers haven't grasped the magnitude of what is happening in international commerce, our manufacturers, farmers, and world traders are already in the process of regaining America's share of world markets. Just a single figure tells the story. In the last quarter of 1987, our exports in real terms -- that's the volume of goods after adjusting for any change in prices -- were up 20 percent from the same period a year earlier.

We're in the midst of a great trade turnabout. Why? Well, there are several parts to the answer, as you all know. Obviously, the fact that the dollar's exchange rate is now at a far more realistic level is of great significance. One of the primary goals of ``Export Now'' is to drive home the point to middle-sized and smaller businesses that new opportunities are emerging because of the adjustment in the value of the dollar.

In short, exporting, for American businesses -- large and small -- is now a profitable option. At the current exchange rates, many American companies can now quote a lower price to their customers in Hamburg or Antwerp or Osaka than their competitors and still make a higher profit than on sales in our own domestic market. Of course, quoting a good price is only half the battle.

Quality products and good service are also part of the trade equation. And in the last few years, American industry has been going through an unprecedented period of renovation, computerization, and modernization. The commitment behind the dramatic changes I'm talking about resulted from the rude shock American business experienced when hit by the wave of imports some years ago. But our corporate leaders and working men and women did not give up, not in the least. They slimmed down. They became more efficient. They shut down obsolete plants. They worked to develop a new spirit of cooperation between management and labor, and placed much greater emphasis on quality and getting the job done right.

And now, as the exchange rate adjustments have opened new opportunities, our business community is ready to meet the competition. You know, there's a saying in sports, ``No pain, no gain.'' Well, American business has taken the pains, and now it's ready for the gains. What we don't need now, however, is protectionism that undermines all the progress we've made. I strongly urge Congress to send me a trade bill that does not imperil our ability to export by causing other countries to close their markets. U.S. businesses are in the process of recapturing old markets -- we shouldn't shoot ourselves in the foot after we've worked so hard and are in a position to win the race.

There are provisions in the legislation currently in conference that encourage exports, and we don't want to lose those, but there are also some totally objectionable provisions -- including measures that are GATT-illegal [General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade] and reduce U.S. competitiveness. We ask for your support to ensure that we don't end up with an economy-killing protectionist bill.

I visited a number of plants last year in various parts of the United States, and I must say I was deeply impressed by what I saw -- whether it was at Harley-Davidson in Pennsylvania, Dictaphone in Florida, Broan in Wisconsin, or Somerset Technologies in New Jersey. The working people of this country are ready and willing to compete head on. And I happen to believe that on a level playing field they can outproduce and outdo anyone, anywhere. Again, America's greatest asset is the character of our own people. I challenge anyone who says the United States is in some kind of decline to just look at the current export figures. We're beginning to beat our major competitors, both in third markets as well as in exporting to them directly. Let me give you just a couple of real world examples.

Back in 1973, when American auto manufacturers needed help in complying with the Clean Air Act, Corning Glass Works developed the catalytic converter. For 3 years, Corning dominated that market, but by 1977 Japanese makers of catalytic converters had come up with a superior and less expensive product. Detroit automakers gave Corning a choice: meet the competition head-on within 12 months or lose their business.

Through union cooperation and worker participation from the factory floor to the boardroom, Corning did just that -- it came up with a better and more competitively priced converter. Corning not only kept Detroit's business but is now making inroads in the Japanese market.

Change is the order of the day for a dynamic and expanding economy. Today new opportunities are opening as the people of the free world are brought closer together by technology and the elimination of political barriers to commerce. A great milestone in this evolutionary process will be the adoption of the U.S.-Canada free trade agreement. Our own businesses -- big and small -- need to be ready for the expanding horizons that will result from this historic agreement.

Bill, your ``Export Now'' program has come along at exactly the right time, and I'm delighted to support this initiative. I also want to commend Jim Abdnor, the Administrator of the Small Business Administration, who has been working to stimulate small businesses' interest in exporting. The conditions are right. We're already off to a great beginning in export growth. And now let's show the world what we can do.

Secretary of State George Shultz today reported to me on his recent trip to Moscow, and it was encouraging. Progress continues to be made on our four-part agenda, and the commitment remains to do all that we can to advance the cause of peace and to settle regional conflicts.

Any process that is undertaken must meet Israel's security needs and satisfy the legitimate rights of the Palestinians. Secretary Shultz leaves tonight for the Middle East to see if practical and real progress can be made that provides a pathway to a comprehensive settlement, and he carries with him my full support.

There's another regional conflict that has serious implications for our country's security interests: Nicaragua. Our policy consistently has been to bring peace and freedom to all of Central America. Today four of the five Central American countries choose their governments in free and open democratic elections. Independent courts protect their human rights, and their people can hope for a better life for themselves and their children. One country, Nicaragua, with its Communist regime, remains a threat to this democratic tide in the region.

So, there's no argument that all of us seek peace and democracy in Nicaragua, and the difference is how to achieve that goal. On February 3d, Congress voted on continued support for the democratic resistance in Nicaragua, and to my disappointment, the majority in the House of Representatives voted to remove the pressure of the democratic resistance on the Sandinista regime. However, the Senate agreed with me that we cannot leave those fighting for freedom in Nicaragua at the mercy of the Communist regime and expect the process toward democracy to move ahead.

We've already seen what happens when pressure is removed. In just 2 short weeks, the Sandinistas threatened the only free press in that country and rejected a cease-fire proposal made by the mediator, Cardinal Obando, which incorporated the essential elements laid out and agreed to last August.

And in the first 2 months of 1988, Soviet military assistance to Nicaragua has almost doubled, compared to the same period in 1987. These do not represent signs of peace; these remain troubling indications of a regime determined to crush its opposition and threaten its neighbors.

Mr. President, through the years you've been very eloquent on the subject of human rights in the Soviet Union and Nicaragua. The question really is: Why have you never condemned the treatment of the Palestinians in the occupied areas -- shooting unarmed protesters, beating people to death, children, trying to bury some alive? And I'd like to follow up.

The President. Helen, we have spoken to the Government there, and we've also spoken to the Palestinian leadership, because there is every evidence that these riots are not just spontaneous and homegrown. But we have spoken, and that's part of the reason why the Secretary of State is going back over there. We don't support that sort of thing, and we are trying to persuade all the participants to try to arrive at a solution representing justice for all.

Well, if you want that and you say you believe in security for Israel and legitimate rights of the Palestinians, why don't you go on the public record now and say that there should be an exchange of removal of the occupation and of peace?

The President. Yes, and we have used that a number of times and are using it now. But we think that -- and the thing that is taking the Secretary of State there -- we think that the necessity is for all who are represented in that situation, on both sides, should come together, when you stop to think that legally a state of war still exists there in the Middle East, between the Arab nations and Israel, and that it's time for us to arrive at a true peace and recognize the rights of all.

Mr. President, Shi'ite militiamen are scouring southern Lebanon for Colonel Higgins, the American kidnaped last week, and you've expressed a determination to get him out. Can you say that the same intense efforts, the same kind of dragnet, will be used to find the other American hostages, one of whom, Terry Anderson, is about to mark the end of his third year in captivity?

The President. We have never given up on that. As you can realize, it's very frustrating to try and establish a location, knowing of course that you are governed by the fact that unwise action on our part could bring about harm to the hostages. But we've never let up, and we never will, in trying to obtain the freedom of all the hostages.

Sir, Pat Robertson said today that his Christian Broadcasting Network once knew the location of American hostages in the Middle East, and that the United States, in effect, missed an opportunity to rescue them. I understand he's clarified that remark, but I wonder if you have any thoughts about the tone that he's setting in this campaign.

I don't want to comment on the campaign, but I can only say this: that it would be very strange if he actually did have information as to the location of those hostages. Isn't it strange that no one in our administration was ever apprised of that? We have tried our best, and through every kind of channel, to establish their whereabouts, because that's the beginning of efforts to try and get them free. But if he thought that he knew, he kept it to himself.

The President. Well, I know that this is one other thing we're pursuing. If he really is, and if he is willing to acknowledge the right of Israel to exist as a nation -- this has been one of the blocking points, that how do you sit down and try to get into a talk about peace when someone says they have no right to even exist? And I'm sure that the Secretary of State is apprised of that fact and will see what we can do there.

And given the 40-year hostility in the area which has been built up, how can you as the ``Great Communicator'' try to alleviate some of the antagonism between the Israelis and the Palestinians before you leave office?

The President. Well, we are trying to and will continue to try to. That's a goal that I would think would be one of the greatest achievements of this administration -- if before I leave, we could bring about a peace in the Middle East.

The President. Well, we have had -- it's a little difficult for me, because there's some things that I shouldn't be saying. But we have had intimations that there have been certain people suspected of being terrorists, outsiders coming in, not only with weapons but stirring up and encouraging the trouble in those areas.

Mr. President, it's my understanding that in 1985 your national security adviser, Robert McFarlane, briefed you on the Iraqi pipeline project and got and gained your approval for it. In light of the difficulties that your Attorney General, Mr. Meese, is encountering now, could you explain your position on the pipeline and tell me if you think it was a good idea at that time?

The President. I have no recall of knowing anything about this pipeline plan until fairly recently, and then found out with regard to the transmittal of the letters that have now been turned over to the special investigator. And this was about the first information that I recall having. Now, I can't say to you that I was given information earlier, because I just have to tell you if I was I have totally forgotten -- that I have no knowledge of anything of that kind.

Well, Mr. President, does it trouble you at all that your dear friend Mr. Meese has become entangled in this project, and it has yet been another case which has brought him, some would say, embarrassment?

The President. Let me just say one thing. I have every confidence in his integrity. I've known him for more than 20 years, but I cannot comment in any way on this case that is now before a special investigator.

Mr. President, the white minority government of South Africa has now effectively banned activities by dissenting organizations, even when those activities are peaceful. What is your view on that, and what can you do, if anything, to reverse it?

Department has already contacted them about that, and we are making our own feelings clear that they should be working toward a multiracial democracy and not oppressing political organizations there. And we've made our feelings clear about that.

Well, sir, may I follow up? Have you considered sending aid to the freedom fighters -- the ANC [African National Congress] or any other organization -- against this oppression just as you send aid to other freedom fighters around the world?

The President. No, we have not involved ourselves in that, other than things such as the sanctions and so forth. We have tried our best to be persuasive in this very difficult problem and to find -- or to encourage a better solution.

The President. Well, the difference is that we don't have an armed insurrection going as we have in some other countries, and we have a great division even among the people who are being oppressed. It is a tribal policy more than it is a racial policy, and that is one of the most difficult parts here.

Mr. President, throughout your administration, when members of your Cabinet or members of the administration have been accused of any kind of wrongdoing or simply of bad judgment, it's been your policy generally to say nothing. Is your loyalty more important to you than the perception that the members of the Government must be above reproach?

The President. No, Bill, and I have to say that I do not favor violations of ethics or laws at all in or out of government, but I do want to call your attention to one thing. I think -- and this has gone on pretty much throughout the time that I've been here -- that there is a kind of lynch mob atmosphere that takes place, and people are -- the memories are there of this person, that person, and so forth. But no attention is paid to the fact of how many of them, when it actually came to trial, was found to be totally innocent, but in the meantime, they have been smeared nationwide. And it's very difficult for people to remember what the outcome was. They only remember the other of the -- in other words, guilt was by accusation and not by actual trial and conviction. And I could call to your attention to Ray Donovan, Jim Beggs of the space program -- both of them totally cleared of any wrongdoing whatsoever. And this has been true of a great many others. But those that were doing something wrong and were apprehended and it was proven on them, they're no longer with us.

Well, sir, people have asked if -- as in the case of the Iran-contra affair, when the committee which investigated it noted that you never condemned the actions of those members of your staff who were involved -- the question was raised whether your silence meant that you did not find their actions objectionable?

Mr. President, what are you doing to make things easier for corporations to trade with the Soviet Union in nonstrategic items, such as food processing, pharmaceuticals, automotive, and hotels, for instance? And do you believe the Soviet Union should join GATT, the General Agreement on Trade and Tariffs? And will you discuss these and other trade items with Mr. Gorbachev in your forthcoming summit?

The President. Well, I can't relate to you discussions about those particular things with him. But I do know that there has been consideration of them involving themselves in the GATT procedure; and that, of course, is being reviewed among those of us who are participants now. But I don't know whether that answers your question or not, but our trade with the Soviet Union is restricted mainly on the basis of where we might be giving them technology and information that could be used one day against us.

Mr. President, I know you have to remain neutral in the Republican race, but you could clear up a major issue right now by telling us whether George Bush, in fact, did have reservations about the sale of arms to Iran; whether he had reservations about Israel's role in that policy; and whether, in fact, he's telling the truth when he tells us that he did have those reservations?

The President. Yes, in the general discussion, and that's not unusual here. I've ordered our people on Cabinet matters or anything else, and I want to hear what they really feel. I don't want to be surrounded by yes-men. And, yes, there were reservations, but I'm not going to go into -- just as he wouldn't go into the private discussions that we may have had.

I think it's time for me to point out what the opposition was based on of anyone who did oppose. Particularly, it's been revealed that Secretary Weinberger and George Shultz both objected. They did not object, the idea that we were trading arms for hostages. Their objection -- they knew what we were trying to do. This had been a request that came to us from some people not in the Government of Iran but who wanted to privately meet with us on how there could be a better relationship if and when the day came that there was a new government in Iran. And if you'll remember, back in those days, almost every other day there was speculation that the health of the Khomeini was failing to where there might be this contest of a new government.

Their objection was -- what we had done, we'd gotten this request; and in dealing with it, in this conversation with these private individuals, we pointed out our feelings about terrorism and so forth. They agreed with us. And the thing was that they, the Hizballah, as we know, is philosophically attuned to Iran. The idea was that they could perhaps influence the Hizballah to give up some of our hostages. And indeed, as the talks went on, they did. We got two of them free.

But their objection was that if and when this became known, as it would be, it would be made to appear that we were trading hostages for -- or arms for hostages. Now, we were giving these arms to these individuals, because we felt that maybe they could influence the Hizballah. We weren't dealing with the kidnapers at all. And this was what the whole situation was. But it turned out that George and Cap and those who had doubts were right in that when it did become known, by way of a henchman of the Ayatollah, then everyone just automatically said that -- and to this day are saying -- it was arms for hostages.

On the issue of George Bush and his role though, this has become one of the major issues between the Vice President and Senator Dole. Now, although you have to remain neutral, as the author of the 11th Commandment, thou shall not criticize one's fellow Republican, do you have any advice for these two men, and aren't you getting a little concerned that they might be hurting the Republican chances by their very bitter political feud?

Are you satisfied -- [inaudible] -- the budget cuts in the military have not damaged our national security, and are you still committed to a 600-ship Navy at a time when the Soviets are not cutting their navy?

And sometimes, they have tried to pretend that that is in an effort to reduce the deficit spending and so forth. But in a 5-year period, the Congress cut my defense budgets a total of $125 billion at the same time that they increased my request for domestic programs by $250 billion. And this budget which is now being attributed to me -- no, this isn't as low as they originally wanted to cut it, but it was as high as we could get it in the negotiations for the present budget. And it has been harmful.

But let me tell you that in 1980, when we came here, the Navy had 479 vessels, and by 1987, we had 568. And by next year, it will be 580. And so, what has happened is that there will be a little delay in the achieving of the 600-ship Navy. But I can't help but remind -- or tell all of you, when I was campaigning in 1980 and knew the state of our defenses, I was faced with the question. And some of you will recall I did a lot of campaigning on, question-and-answer basis. At almost every gathering, there would be a question: Well, if I came to a choice between deficit spending and buildup of our defense structure, which would I choose? And every time, I said, in responsibility, I would have to choose the buildup of our defenses. And every time, in every audience in America that I said that to, gave me an applause that was almost an ovation for saying that.

The President. I don't think right at the moment -- and with the way we're progressing in various treaties and so forth -- I don't believe that the threat is that immediate, and because very shortly we will achieve our 600. We want 15 carriers and their squadrons, and we've just launched the 15th carrier, 100 nuclear-powered attack submarines, and 4 battleships, and we're achieving that.

Mr. President, you must certify by March 1st whether Panama has been cracking down on drug trafficking through that country or whether aid to Panama should continue to be suspended. What are you going to do?

The President. Well, I can't give you the answer yet, because we're still working on that and still collecting the facts as to what their effort has been at trying to intercept the drugs and join us in that campaign. But as you said, March 1st we will be giving the answer.

Sir, if I could follow up: Some officials in your administration have suggested that if Noriega [Commander of the Panamanian Defense Forces] would step down and go into exile, that you would stop the prosecution of him on drug charges.

The President. No, and I'm not going to comment on something of this kind. This man has been indicted by a Federal grand jury, and so I'm not going to make any comment of that kind, nor have we made any advances or suggestions of that kind to the Government of Panama. What we would like to see is a return to democracy and a civilian government in Panama, and not this domination by -- literally -- a military dictator.

Mr. President, Federal Reserve Chairman Alan Greenspan today objected to pressure from the administration regarding the formulation of monetary policy, such as was contained in the budget and the Economic Report and a Treasury letter to Federal Reserve Board members. Don't you have confidence in your appointee to the Fed, Alan Greenspan, as the Chairman?

In your opening statement, you seemed to suggest that the Sandinistas are taking advantage of Congress not coming through with contra aid to withdraw some of the concessions they had made. With Congress about to consider new humanitarian aid -- both a Democratic and a Republican plan -- is it worth it to pass humanitarian aid without military aid?

The President. Well, I think the only comment that I can make there is that anything that will keep the freedom fighters as a pressure on the Sandinistas is worth doing. Just as when we tried to pass our own bill and narrowly failed, you could see that the military aid was down the road aways -- it was not necessary right now. The other aid -- humanitarian aid -- is more imminent. And so, if we can get that, that's fine, and then we'll take our chances on the other in trying to get it. But they do still have some military stores for a limited period of time.

If I may follow up on that point, sir: In the two plans that are being considered, the Democrats want the Defense Department to deliver whatever stores and supplies are authorized. The Republican plan would give that responsibility to the CIA. Do you favor either course?

The President. I certainly would favor the CIA. I think that involving our military when there is no need to is very rash and foolish, because you would be putting our military into a combat situation, and this is what we've been trying to avoid in Central America all the way.

In that regard, Mr. President, I'd like to ask you about the latest hostage situation. Do you think it was responsible for your administration to allow a marine lieutenant colonel, William Higgins, to operate in southern Lebanon at a time when eight Americans were already being held in that country and when your own State Department was recommending against travel there and considering the ramifications of the abduction of William Buckley, earlier?

The President. I don't think that you can use that as a measure of where officers can be assigned to duty. They're in a dangerous business to begin with. And we are a part of the United Nations, and we have obligations to the U.N. with regard to the UNIFIL force [United Nations Interim Force in Lebanon] that has been there for a number of years now. And this particular officer happened to volunteer when there was a vacancy at that spot -- volunteered for that. And I think that we have to have the confidence -- and I do have the confidence in men like him -- that someone would have a hard time getting secrets that could harm this country from a person of that kind.

The President. I don't know whether they're going to be used effectively or not. I know they're going to be used -- they have been for quite some considerable time now. As a matter of fact, if anyone listened for more than 15 minutes to their candidates, he would decide that we're in an economic slump, we're burdened by inflation, high interest rates, and unemployment, when at the moment none of those things are true. And we have a higher percentage of our potential employee pool employed than ever in our history and are continuing the longest expansion -- economic expansion -- in our history. And tomorrow morning, I think you'll find a little good news, along about 8:30 a.m. tomorrow morning, is going to be released with regard to the economy. So, I just think that, you know, the kids will play -- [laughter] -- and as long as they want to do that, but I hope it'll easily be forgotten.

Mr. President, the budget that you have proposed to Congress would eliminate three housing programs for the homeless. It would make deep cuts in an emergency food program, and it would end a job training program for the homeless. Do you believe that the problem of the homeless is less pressing now than just a year ago, when you signed legislation from Congress to create these programs?

The President. No, but I do know that we're doing a great many things, and we also are keeping track of the extent to which the private sector is joining in and helping on this. And this budget is the result of long, long weeks of negotiation with the Democrats and ourselves, and I think that we're meeting the problems.

I also have to say this: that sometimes our budget in programs can reflect another program we've had going, which is a management program. And we have had a team for a considerable period of time now that has been actually investigating the management practices of government programs as compared to the way they're done in the private sector. And there are millions and millions of dollars that are being saved. So that something that maybe looks smaller does not mean that the people in need are going to get less; it means that we're able to provide that with less administrative overhead. When I came here from a governorship, as a Governor, I had seen Federal programs administered in our State in which it was costing the Federal Government $2 for every dollar that reached a needy person. This is something we've been trying to change, and we've made some progress in it.

The President. I have said that I think that there is a great reform that is needed throughout many of those programs. And it is a reform to where we can get these programs to where their goal will be to remove people from dependency and make them independent of government help instead of doing what we've been doing for too many years now -- and that is, actually involving them in dependency to the place where they never can get out. We've made them permanently dependent on government, and we're trying to change that, correct that.

With the inauguration of Mr. Roh Tae Woo, Korea will celebrate its first peaceful transfer of power. Since Korea has only experienced authoritarian rule, and not true democracy under a good or enlightened President, could you tell us the secret of being such a leader, and what can be done in Korea to bring expanded democracy?

The President. Over the past few decades, Korea has impressed the world with its economic miracle of rapid growth. In the past year, Korea has matched that economic progress with a kind of political miracle, setting a new course toward an open and democratic political system. The 1987 Presidential election marked an important milestone in that process. It is, however, important to remember that democracy is a process, not an end point. Americans value democracy, because it is a dynamic system that changes as a nation changes.

As you know, I met President-elect Roh in Washington last year. He impressed me as a man committed to the democratization of your country, because he knew that was what Koreans, including himself, wanted. I understand that President-elect Roh likes to refer to his having big ears. That is really the key to leadership in a democratic society. You have to listen carefully before you make decisions. Sometimes -- especially when you have a wide-open election year as we have now -- some may not like the results, but accept them and understand the different ways in which others see problems.

In a political sense we expect closer cooperation between the United States and the new Korean government, but economically (trade) we expect increased tensions in the short term. What can be done to keep these tensions under control so that this area tracks the political area?

The President. Korea and the United States are longtime allies and friends. The relationship has become closer, stronger, and more complex over the years. You are now our seventh-largest trading partner. Korean and American businessmen routinely visit one [an]other. We have a growing Korean-American community living in our country. All of these trends are very positive, yet sometimes overlooked.

Change has also brought some new stresses -- notably in the trade and exchange rate areas. There are real problems. Working together, as we have done for so many years in other areas, I am sure that we can solve these issues. The key is remembering that it is in our mutual interest to find good solutions.

Participation in the international open-market system that has enabled Koreans to prosper has both benefits and responsibilities. Korea must be willing to accept responsibilities commensurate with its new, increased role in the international economic system.

U.S.-Soviet summit would you encourage the Soviet leader to play a more active role in restraining or completely stopping North Korea's terrorist actions, including jeopardizing the 1988 Seoul Olympics?

The President. The United States and Soviet Union and everyone else in the region should be cooperating to reduce tensions on the Peninsula, as well as in the world as a whole. We hope that improved U.S.-Soviet relations will help move things in that direction and, of course, improve the situation in other areas of the world, too.

The key problem in Korea is North Korea's proclivity to use violence. The world was shocked again by the recent murder of 115 innocent people aboard KAL 858 by North Korea. A successful incident-free Olympics in Seoul this September is in everyone's interest. The prospect of North Korean -- or anyone else's -- attempts to disrupt the games through violence is a danger that we and the Soviets can agree to work against.

We hope that Moscow will use its close relations with Pyongyang to urge moderation and to encourage the resumption of direct North-South contacts on practical ways to reduce tension. It is time for the North to eschew violence and get down to the serious business of resuming dialog with Seoul. If it does, it may be able to join in the peace, progress, and prosperity other nations in the region have begun to share.

How do you assess possible diplomatic initiatives of the new Korean Government toward the East bloc, including the Soviet Union? Is there a role for the United States to play in helping improve Korean-East bloc relations?

The President. In recent years the Republic of Korea has made some progress in expanding contacts with the Eastern bloc. The Olympics will emphasize how this has happened. Continued progress in this direction is inevitable since Korea has so much to offer -- products and expertise in the economics of free-enterprise industrialization.

President today announced his intention to nominate Barbara McConnell Barrett to be Deputy Administrator of the Federal Aviation Administration, Department of Transportation. She would succeed Richard H. Jones.

Sec. 4. In executing the functions delegated to him by this Order, the Secretary of Defense may delegate such functions as he may deem appropriate, subject to his direction. The Secretary shall consult with the heads of affected agencies in performing the functions delegated to him by this Order.

We understand that President Delvalle today dismissed General Noriega from his position as Commander of the Panama Defense Forces. At this time we want to reiterate our unqualified support for civilian constitutional rule in Panama. There is but one legitimate sovereign authority in Panama, and that is the Panamanian people exercising their democratic right to vote and elect their leadership in a free society.

We condemn all efforts to perpetuate military rule in Panama, including efforts to remove President Delvalle from office. We want to reiterate our unqualified support for civilian constitutional rule in Panama. There is but one legitimate sovereign authority in Panama, and that is the Panamanian people exercising their democratic right to vote and elect their leadership in a free society. We have also initiated a series of consultations to learn the views of other countries in the hemisphere with regard to this situation.

Monday Nancy and I will be attending a very special meeting in Washington. It's a gathering of concerned citizens from every walk of life who are working with us to develop a national strategy to fight drug abuse in America. This is part of the White House Conference for a Drug Free America, which was established last year by Executive Order 12595.

Well, there was legitimate reason for concern. Fathers and mothers saw their children wasting their lives. Husbands and wives felt helpless as a loved one destroyed a marriage. And as is so often the case, the children suffered most.

I can't help but be proud that my wife, Nancy, took on the challenge of mobilizing our people against this evil. She came up with the formula that will make all the difference: Just say no. It's as simple as that. It's going to require all of us working together, however, to help those we love and care for to just say no and live right.

We've already made progress. First and foremost, that complacent attitude has been replaced with vigorous and active involvement. Not only is the use of illegal drugs no longer accepted but is, in many circles, no longer tolerated. The old line about drug use being a victimless crime is being replaced with an understanding that the money spent on drugs, even by casual users, ends up financing murderers in South America as well as on our own streets.

Monday, the members of the White House Conference will be joined by some 2,000 other activists who are dedicated to a drug free America. Whatever recommendations they ultimately make, it is clear there are no easy answers. We must continue to seek every opportunity to stop the sale and use of illegal drugs. Nancy, I know, has dedicated her life to this not just as First Lady but as parent and good citizen. Our commitment will not end when we leave Washington at the end of my term.

We want everyone to have the opportunity for a productive, meaningful life. That also requires our country to be secure, which is why we've been so concerned about events in Central America. Democracy has been progressing in that region, but one area where totalitarianism has a foothold could well undo all that's been accomplished. Nicaragua, with its Communist regime, represses its own people and threatens its neighbors. Well, if there's any lesson we've learned, it is that freedom and peace go hand in hand, so it is imperative we see democratic progress in Nicaragua. And in the past several months, under pressure from the democratic resistance, there have been some limited reforms there.

And already we can see warning signs. In just 2 short weeks, the Sandinistas threatened the only free press in the country and rejected a cease-fire proposal which incorporated the essential elements laid out and agreed to last August. And in the first 2 months of 1988, Soviet military assistance to Nicaragua has almost doubled, compared to the same period in 1987. These are serious matters, and it's not time for wishful thinking. We must face reality in Central America, or we will face the consequences. We must have a policy, everywhere in the world, based on realism and strength.

Next week, I'll be in Brussels meeting with our NATO allies to assure them America is ready and willing to stand with them to keep the peace with freedom that we have gained together through the alliance these past 40 years.

Lois has been doing. On my desk in the Oval Office, I have a little sign that says: There is no limit to what a man can do or where he can go if he doesn't mind who gets the credit. And I can't think of anyone who is a better example of that truth about quietly getting things done than Lois Herrington. Lois, I speak for everyone here in saying thanks for the great job that you do.

There are few things that I'm more proud of than the work Nancy has done in the fight against drugs. And in a moment I'll talk about money and law enforcement and so forth. They're important, no doubt, but Nancy has addressed something more fundamental. She's touched the conscience and consciousness of the Nation.

We're fighting the crusade for a drug free America on many fronts. In the past 7 years, we've, for the first time ever, set up a coordinated Federal, State, and local campaign against drug smugglers. Among other things we've enlisted the military in the battle, including Navy ships and AWAC planes.

We've also set up 13 Federal, State, and local strike forces to investigate and prosecute major drug rings. We've substantially increased the number of Federal prosecutors and agents. And we've strengthened the laws so that, for example, we can now dispose of property that was bought with drug money. We don't have to give it back.

They closed down 682 clandestine laboratories. And they seized 92,000 pounds of cocaine. These are all records. We've taken fleets of airplanes, boats, and trucks from smugglers and dealers. I visited Florida some time back and saw for the first time what $20 million looks like. It was piled up on a table, confiscated from drug dealers. I've heard stories of our planes tracking drug planes and landing right behind them on the runways, agents jumping out and making the arrest.

We've discovered drugs in hollowed out lumber and in bathrooms and luggage compartments in airplanes. One morning in Tennessee a man woke up and found a body in his driveway. It was wearing an unopened parachute and carried a large package of cocaine. An air smuggler had tried to elude pursuers by bailing out of his plane. Drug seizures are at an all-time high. Federal drug arrests have increased 66 percent. Arrests of major traffickers have tripled.

And that's how we're fighting on what you might call the supply side of the crusade against drugs. But as significant as stopping smugglers and pushers is, ending the demand for drugs is how, in the end, we'll win. That's why the best news I've heard in a long time was the recently released annual survey of high school seniors. For 13 years we have asked thousands of graduating seniors what drugs they use, how often, and what they think about drug abuse. For the first time a substantially smaller proportion of the seniors -- one third smaller -- acknowledged current cocaine use than did the year before. Use of marijuana and amphetamines is also dropping. Better still, almost all students said it was wrong even to try a drug like cocaine.

With all the headlines about how we're losing the drug war, let's keep in mind the progress we've made. Many drug-related problems now are not because more people are turning to drugs -- in fact, the number of users has leveled off and may be falling -- but because so many got hooked when the message went out that illegal drugs were acceptable.

This conference couldn't have happened 8 years ago -- not enough people cared. Now almost everyone cares. Your communities are looking to you for leadership. So, let me ask you to take back home the message that illegal drugs are one thing no community in America can, should, or needs to tolerate -- in schools, in workplaces, in the streets, anywhere. America is already starting to take that message to heart. That's why I believe the tide of battle has turned, and we're beginning to win the crusade for a drug free America.

Reagan. Thank you, Mr. President. I know who's boss in the family. [Laughter] I can't tell you how good it feels to be here at this conference with so many people united in a common purpose. Although the drug problem is still destructive, the Nation has come a long way in its battle against drugs, and your presence here today proves it.

At least we realize there is a drug problem today. In Saturday's Washington Post, there was one page in which every article was a local drug story. And there was another local drug story on the front page. We must face the fact that drugs are tearing our communities apart.

I've been deeply concerned about this problem since my days in Sacramento, over the past nearly 8 years, I've focused mainly on education, on prevention, and on the need to change attitudes. Although we're making progress, still many ignorant ideas persist. And one of the worst is the casual user's justification that drug use is a victimless crime, that drugs don't hurt anyone except the person who's using them. Yet there are consequences to drug use beyond an individual's personal and selfish high. And that's what I'd like to talk to you about this morning.

A few weeks ago the drug cartel murdered Colombia's Attorney General, Carlos Mauro Hoyos, who was active in trying to halt cocaine traffic to the United States. Half a dozen men in 3 jeeps ran his car into a curb, sprayed it with machine gun fire, and killed his two bodyguards. Mr. Hoyos was later found, blindfolded and handcuffed, his skull shattered with bullets. And, ladies and gentlemen, the people who casually use cocaine are responsible, because their money bought those bullets. They provided the high stakes that murdered those men plus hundreds of others in Colombia, including supreme court justices, 21 judges handling drug cases, and scores of policemen and soldiers.

The notion that the mellow marijuana user doesn't hurt anyone is just as phony. As a result of an intensive effort by the Drug Enforcement Administration in Guadalajara, Mexico, and particularly Special Agent Enrique Camarena, over 10,000 acres of marijuana that were ready for harvest and eventual sale in the United States were destroyed. And this caused a major financial loss for a notorious trafficking group. On February 7, 1985, less than 3 months after the destruction of the 10,000-acre plantation, Special Agent Camarena was kidnaped by the traffickers. He was tortured and beaten to death. And this country's casual marijuana users cannot escape responsibility for their fellow American's death, because they, in effect, bought the tools for his torture.

As you know, many others have had their lives taken to protect our society from the corruption of drugs. Two DEA agents in California were killed just this month. Last week, while guarding the home of a witness in a drug crime, a rookie policeman in New York was assassinated in a patrol car. The traffickers and dealers will murder anyone who stands in their way. Recently an innocent young girl in Los Angeles was shot to death in the crossfire between two rival drug gangs. And who will tell the grief-stricken families that drug use is a victimless crime?

The casual user may think when he takes a line of cocaine or smokes a joint in the privacy of his nice condo, listening to his expensive stereo, that he's somehow not bothering anyone. But there is a trail of death and destruction that leads directly to his door. The casual user cannot morally escape responsibility for the action of drug traffickers and dealings. I'm saying that if you're a casual drug user you're an accomplice to murder. The casual user also cannot morally escape association with those who use drugs and then endanger the public safety. The message from casual use is that drugs are acceptable, that they can be handled, that somehow it's simply a matter of dosage. Casual use sets the tone for tolerance and that tolerance has killed.

Anne and Arthur Johnson are from Potomac, Maryland. They're with us today, and I'll introduce you to them later. On January 4, 1987, the Johnson's daughter, 20-year-old Christy, was taking the train to New York to visit her sister before heading back to classes at Stanford University. The Sunday afternoon Amtrak train was crowded with students returning to school and families returning home from Christmas and the New Year's holidays. Unknown to the passengers, a Conrail locomotive passed several warning signals and crossed into the path of the Amtrak train. The crash killed 16 innocent people and injured 175 others. Christy never made it to her sister's; she was killed in the crash.

The investigation determined that the engineer and brakeman on the Conrail train were smoking marijuana prior to the crash -- 16 people killed because of an engineer's personal indulgence in a joint of marijuana. Now, don't tell the Johnsons that casual drug use is a victimless crime. And don't try to tell the Johnsons that drugs hurt no one but the user. Several of the families of the victims who were killed in the wreck testified before the Senate last week in favor of mandatory drug testing for railroad personnel. The engineer and the brakeman also called for such testing, saying that alcohol and drug use was widespread within the industry.

Ladies and gentlemen, I want to make it impossible for casual users to escape responsibility for any innocent death due to drugs. I want to make them fully face the brutality of drug use. I don't mind admitting that I have reservations about telling the following two stories, because they're real stories of anguish and inhuman brutality. Yet Betty Jean Spencer and Vince and Roberta Roper can't ignore the brutality of drugs. They live with it every day. They're with us today, and if they can't forget, neither should we.

They were 14, 16, 18, and 22 years old. Four men barged into the house, men out on bail on drug trafficking. The men didn't know her. They didn't know her sons. Mrs. Spencer says they were obviously high on something. They were laughing about the other people they were going to kill when they finished there. They ordered Mrs. Spencer and her four sons to line up face down on the floor, and then the men began shooting them at point-blank range with a shotgun. Mrs. Spencer miraculously survived two shotgun blasts to the back of her head, but her sons were murdered. And the men are in prison.

That's a brutal, brutal story. And it makes me angry. And no one -- absolutely no one -- should be allowed to say that drug use is a victimless crime. No one should be able to get away with the argument that drugs are a harmless, private indulgence.

Their daughter, Stephanie, a 22-year-old student, was returning to school in Maryland when her car broke down. Two men offered assistance. They drove her a short distance in their car, pulled a gun on her, and each raped her. They drove to another location and raped her again. They then decided to kill her. I don't want to repeat what they did to her, but we can't ignore the brutality of drugs. One of the men whipped Stephanie on the head with a chain, and as she tried to run away, he shot her. He then poured gasoline on her and set fire to her. Both men were users of PCP, LSD, amphetamines, barbiturates -- virtually any drug they could obtain.

Now, who would dare stand before the Ropers and tell them that drug use is a victimless crime? What apologist for casual drug use will look the Ropers in the eye and say it's all a matter of moderation? Who could be so brazen? Yet the attitude prevails.

You know, in the field of drug and alcohol abuse there's something called the enabling concept: If I don't do something about your behavior, then I enable it to happen. Society's attitude has enabled the casual drug user to avoid facing his role in the murder and brutality behind drugs. We can no longer let the casual user continue without paying the moral penalty.

There's no middle ground. We must be as adamant about the casual user as we are about the addict. And whereas the addict deserves our help, the casual user deserves our condemnations, because he could easily stop, and yet he chooses not to do so. He must be made to feel the burden of brutality and corruption for which he's ultimately responsible. We must get the message out: We will not stand for illicit drug use of any kind -- period.

You're the people who will eventually turn the tide. You're the ones who will make the difference. Many of you have been with me from the very beginning in one capacity or another. And I want you to know that when my husband and I return to California I'm not giving up my interest and concern about this. You can't get rid of me. In fact, I'll be actively involved in the Nancy Reagan Center in Los Angeles to be run by Phoenix House. The center will include a residential high school for young people in treatment, a training unit, and a research unit. I hope that the center will become a place where we can develop new methods, test new approaches, and discover new answers.

But as you may know, I'll be traveling to Brussels tomorrow to attend a summit with the leaders of the North Atlantic alliance. But I wanted to stop by here first to talk about our hopes and plans for the alliance, because it is, after all, many of you and the servicemen the Legion represents who made that alliance possible, who with their courage and sacrifice brought 40 years of peace to Europe and security to the United States.

Coming here, I was reminded of something Ernie Pyle wrote in France during the final days of World War II. I suppose there are more than a few of us here who remember Ernie Pyle and his simple, honest words that meant so much. Sitting under an apple tree in a lovely green orchard, he thought of the end of the war. Peace would come, he knew, but there would be no return to innocence.

A pattern so firm and so fair -- before Ernie Pyle, friend of the GI, was laid to rest on Okinawa, the United States and the war-ravaged democracies of Europe set about that great enterprise. We embraced our old enemies and made them friends. We set about reconstructing a continent, replacing hurt and harm with a helping hand. Soon would follow the Marshall plan, an example of national charity and generosity unparalleled in history.

I've often said that there is something unique about the American form of patriotism, the kind so gloriously on display here at the Legion. It is not an exclusive attachment; it is not jealous or chauvinistic: It's the affirmation of man's deepest desires for the rights and liberties given him by his Creator.

American patriotism is, quite simply, the call to freedom, everywhere, for all peoples. And that's why the American flag is more than a national flag. It has been, throughout our history, the hope and encouragement of freedom-loving peoples everywhere.

There's an account of two of America's greatest postwar statesmen traveling to Hungary soon after the war. Budapest lay devastated by weeks of street fighting, but there was rejoicing in the city. The Soviet occupiers had allowed a free election, and the anti-Communists had won a clear majority.

The jubilation, of course, didn't last. The Hungarians did not have long to celebrate their freedom before it was snatched away from them. Soon, to use Winston Churchill's famous phrase, an iron curtain was to descend across Europe. While we had defeated one form of totalitarianism, another -- just as implacable, just as greedy -- threatened our hopes for a new world living in peace and freedom, a new pattern so firm and so fair that it would forever be secure.

Churchill wrote: ``In war, one must show resolution; in victory, magnanimity; in peace, good will.'' In this new cold war, as it was called, in this uneasy peace, we would be called upon to match our good will with resolution not just for today or tomorrow but for the long haul. We would be called upon to match the magnanimity of the Marshall plan with the tough realism and determination of NATO.

Congress and the American people, have shown a clear resolution to our adversaries: A free and democratic Europe is essential to a free and democratic America. We have let there be no doubt in the Soviets' minds: An attack on free Europe would be the same as an assault on the United States. The core of our foreign policy and of our national security is our permanent partnership with our fellow democracies in the Atlantic alliance, on which the cause of freedom so critically depends. We will never sacrifice the interests of our allies and friends in any agreement with the Soviet Union.

Our commitment to the Atlantic alliance has not been inexpensive, but the tragic lessons of two world wars teach us that it has been cheap at the price. Today a rebuilt, prosperous, free Europe is taking on more of the burdens of defense. In the event of a short-warning attack, 90 percent of the defending troops would be European. And despite sluggish economies on the continent, two-thirds of our allies will be increasing their defense contributions this year.

Military aggression is not the only threat from the East. The Soviets' time-honored tactic of political intimidation designed to split the alliance was never better seen than at the time of NATO's INF deployments in response to the Soviets' SS - 20's. Threatening to boycott negotiations, the Soviets mounted the most intensive campaign of political pressure any of us can remember. For a while it appeared they might be successful. The papers were full of predictions that our allies would cave. So-called peace movements sprang up trumpeting a line very close to that of the Soviets. If they had had their way, of course, the Soviet SS - 20's would remain permanently in place, pointed at every major city in Europe.

But the Soviet effort to split the alliance failed. The allies refused to be intimidated and went ahead with the deployments as planned. The result -- the historic treaty signed last December that, for the first time, eliminates an entire class of U.S. and Soviet nuclear missiles. Let me say one thing about the treaty: It is not based on trust. We can't forget that the very reason for NATO was the Soviets' aggressive expansionism in Eastern Europe and abrogation of their sworn commitments under the Yalta agreement.

So, we've learned from experience, too. And as I said to General Secretary Gorbachev -- and I think the point struck home -- when it comes to treaties with the Soviet Union, our policy is dovorey no provorey, which, as everyone knows by now, I think, means trust, but verify.

During the years of these negotiations, new realities have come into play -- new realities that present new opportunities. In particular, in recent years we've seen the emergence among some of our European allies of a willingness, even an eagerness, to seek a larger, more closely coordinated role for Western Europe in providing for its own defense within the overall framework of the alliance. And we Americans welcome this.

We will continue to push for verifiable 50-percent reductions in the strategic arsenals of the U.S. and U.S.S.R. and for a verifiable and truly global ban on chemical weapons. But at the same time, the serious imbalance of conventional forces in Europe must be addressed as an equally high priority. This imbalance represents an unacceptable threat to the West. Warsaw Pact tanks and artillery far outnumber our own. Ours are positioned for defense, theirs for an offensive attack.

There is a role for arms control negotiations here, but as a supplement to a policy of strength, not as a substitute. We have learned from experience: The only effective way to negotiate with the Soviets is from a position of strength. The Warsaw Pact's numerical superiority and the Soviet strategy, which emphasizes surprise attacks, means that our remaining nuclear forces are fully capable of supporting NATO's flexible response strategy. At the same time, we must modernize our chemical weapons to deter Soviet first-use, and we must provide for conventional forces that are capable of protecting free Europe.

And when talking about our efforts to secure a peaceful future, nothing could be more important than our Strategic Defense Initiative, SDI -- a strategic defense that threatens no one, that could someday make nuclear weapons obsolete. The technology for SDI is developing more rapidly than many would have thought possible. No, technology isn't holding SDI back, but year after year Congress cuts our budget requests for SDI. General Secretary Gorbachev has stated publicly, before the American people, that the Soviets have their own SDI program, that they're doing everything we're doing. Now is not the time to cut back on SDI.

Secretary Gorbachev talks about perestroika, or restructuring at home. Well, it's time for some perestroika in the Warsaw Pact. It's time for the removal of Soviet troops from Eastern Europe and the abandonment of Soviet offensive strategy on the continent. On my last trip to Europe, I went to Berlin and visited that infamous wall that cuts such an ugly scar through the heart of Europe. The wall that encircles the free sectors of that city is part of a vast system of barriers -- of barbed wire, guard towers, dog runs, and machine guns -- that divides the continent, divides nations, peoples, families.

For years, especially in the seventies, the cognoscenti spoke of the so-called superpower conflict in value-neutral terms, as if there was no essential difference between Western democracies and Soviet communism. Any suggestion that a system that denies its people their God-given liberties was fundamentally evil was met with ridicule. Well, I challenge those people to go to Berlin and look upon that wall, look upon the works of tyranny.

The question can be asked: How can we ever achieve a lasting peace with a regime that is so scared of its own people that it must imprison them behind barbed wire? And that's why I said to Mr. Gorbachev: If you really want glasnost, if you really want openness, tear down that wall.

The unnatural division of Europe remains one of the major sources of tension between the West and the Soviet Union. We accept no spheres of influence. We accept no legal division of Europe. Our policy can be based on only one principle: the right of people everywhere to self-determination, to freedom, and to the basic rights granted them by their Creator. So, the meeting of the Atlantic democracies in Brussels this week will come at a time when, in many ways, our alliance has never been stronger or more unified -- also at a time when the challenges before us have never been greater.

Let me just say a few words here about Congress and defense spending. It seems ironic to me that so many of those who welcome, as they should, our historic agreement to eliminate an entire class of U.S. and Soviet INF missiles in Europe and Asia continue to undercut our ability to negotiate from strength by voting year after year to cut necessary defense spending. In the seventies we tried dealing with the Soviets and their clients from a position of weakness.

The result: Angola, Cambodia, Afghanistan, Nicaragua, and at the negotiating table an arms control treaty so flawed that a Senate controlled by the President's own party spiked it. If Congress continues to unilaterally make major defense cuts that amount to strategic concessions to the Soviets, we could find ourselves back in the position we were in during the late seventies: dangerously weak and ill-prepared.

We don't have to stretch our memories back too far to remember that the American people twice, by overwhelming majorities, voted clearly and emphatically for something that all of us here believe in: They voted for peace in the only way it can ever be secured; they voted for peace through strength.

Today the people of Afghanistan are setting an example for all of us -- of courage, heroism, and strength. I can assure you: We will not let them down. We will not agree to any steps that put the Afghan freedom fighters or Afghan hopes for self-determination at risk. And the fact there's progress now in the Afghan diplomacy -- because we stood by our friends -- should teach a lesson in another similar situation closer to home.

As you know, Congress will be voting again on continued aid to the freedom fighters in Nicaragua. I hope Members of Congress will remember one thing: Those freedom fighters are inside Nicaragua today, because we made a commitment to them. Are we going to cut them off now and leave them defenseless against the Sandinistas? If we do, who will ever trust in the United States of America again? How long can we remain a world power if we gain a reputation for pulling the plug on the people who have placed their trust in us, people fighting for their own freedom and for our national security?

Before the last vote, I warned Congress: You may cut off aid to the freedom fighters, but Soviet deliveries to the Sandinistas won't stop. And in fact, Soviet military assistance to the Sandinistas was nearly doubled in the first 2 months of this year compared to the same period in 1987. Congressional opponents of aid argued that the peace process would flourish and the Sandinistas would democratize if we cut off our assistance to the freedom fighters. Well, it's been 3 weeks, and exactly the opposite has happened.

Obando y Bravo was forced to suspend the most recent round of peace talks because of Sandinista obstructionism. And Sandinista rhetoric has become ever more warlike, full of promises to crush the resistance. And the Sandinistas continue to tighten their grip on the suffering country -- threatening La Prensa; sending out the government directed turbas, or mobs, to harass dissidents; and expanding their system of political prisons. That's the Sandinistas for you. At the same time they promise a general amnesty, they're building more political prisons. They've gone from 2 to 16 prisons.

Recently a document was found on a Communist terrorist killed in battle in El Salvador. And let me quote a few lines: ``The defeat of the contras would be a grave strategic defeat for the United States,'' it says, and goes on, ``The failure of the contras and the acceptance of the Nicaraguan revolution for the United States can be a total global strategic change.'' I could not have said it better myself, except to add, of course, that this total global change will not be in our favor. Unless the freedom fighters remain a viable force, the peace process will quickly become what it was before: an empty charade, dragging endlessly and fruitlessly on, while the Soviets continue their military buildup on the American mainland.

American people are watching, and Congress knows it. And some say they're willing to support some type of humanitarian aid but are doing everything they can do to disband the freedom fighters. But there's nothing humanitarian about asking people to go up against Soviet attack helicopters armed only with boots and bandages. Whatever package emerges from the Congress must include a provision for expedited procedures that would allow us to request additional military aid to the freedom fighters should the peace process break down.

We will not leave the freedom fighters to be picked off one by one -- picked off by Sandinistas heavily equipped by the Soviet Union. With our help, the freedom fighters have been winning major victories in the field. With our help, they can keep the pressure on the Sandinistas to force them to democratize.

Preventing the consolidation of a pro-Soviet regime on the American mainland is a crucial test of national security. If Central America goes Communist, it would be a setback for America of incalculable proportions. I won't stake the future of the Western Hemisphere on Sandinista promises.

And finally, I'd like to turn to another side of the world: Asia. I understand you'll be hearing today about our efforts to account for our missing servicemen in Southeast Asia and Korea. Many of you here today were their comrades-in-arms. You fought the same battles, flew the same missions. Those men were fighting a noble cause. They were fighting for America and for freedom. We will never forget them. And that's one reason why I'm renewing today the personal commitment I made to the families of our POW's and MIA's: We will not give up. We will not relent until we bring our American heroes home.

I transmit herewith, for Senate advice and consent to ratification, the Supplementary Protocol Modifying and Supplementing the Convention between the United States of America and the Kingdom of Belgium for the Avoidance of Double Taxation and the Prevention of Fiscal Evasion with Respect to Taxes on Income, together with a related exchange of notes. The Supplementary Protocol and the exchange of notes were signed at Washington on December 31, 1987.

Pending the successful conclusion of a comprehensive new income tax convention, the Supplementary Protocol will make certain improvements in the existing convention intended to promote the development of economic relations between the United States and Belgium.

St. Patrick's Day I seek to remind America and the world of the debt we owe to the Irish people, who through the ages have created and perpetuated a unique heritage of faith and freedom, of humor and hope, of scholarship and sanctity and sacrifice.

With faith and fearlessness St. Patrick brought Christianity to Ireland a millennium and a half ago. The annals reveal the Irish people's eagerness to embrace the faith and to keep it; that trait remains to this day, a tribute to the Apostle of Ireland and to his flock in every generation.

I was in this room, not too many weeks ago, was for the National Prayer Breakfast. And I hope that what was said then and what I did then has had some lasting effect. I'm especially pleased to have been introduced by my longtime personal friend, Mayor Bill Hudnut.

I understand and appreciate the part your organization has played in the Pennsylvania Avenue development plan here in Washington. The new 12-story building you've constructed overlooking Western Plaza is a fine example of what can be done to revitalize the inner city. It should serve to stimulate others to invest in such worthwhile efforts.

As you're well aware, rejuvenation of the American economy is the number one priority of my administration. This, I believe, was the mandate of the voters last November. It was a mandate that I sought, yet something all elected officials should understand, because it's a mandate for all of us. The election did not commission me to attempt economic reform alone, but to work with elected officials -- Federal, State, and local -- to put America's economic house in order. And that's why I'm here.

We've got a job to do together, and I believe we should open a clean, clear line of communication now. Our job, of course, is to get the economy of the United States moving again. It's essential for you as representatives of the cities; it's essential for all of us as Americans. One thing is certain: The time for business as usual has passed.

In the last two decades, Americans have suffered oppressively increased taxation, inflation, unemployment, and interest rates. The middle class, the life-blood of democracy and the American way of life, cannot withstand these pressures indefinitely. And the economic tremors rippling through our economy suggest that these people are near the breaking point. I don't know how many of you earlier this morning might have had an opportunity to watch on television as some citizens were being interviewed who publicly have stated they are simply going to rebel at paying their income tax, and they're going to appeal to others to do the same.

We're suffering the worst inflation in 60 years. Almost 8 billion -- million -- Americans are continuing to be out of work. I've been here only a month, and I'm beginning to talk in billions when I mean millions. [Laughter] Interest rates have climbed to an unprecedented 20 percent, with home mortgage rates of 15 percent destroying for millions the dream of home ownership.

Investment in industry is lagging behind our major competitors, with too much of the personal savings of our people flowing into nonproductive inflation hedges instead of job-creating, long-term investment or savings.

Millions of Americans feel that for them the standard of living is actually going down, and it is. It's shocking and a depressing fact that after being adjusted for the continued cheapening of the dollar by inflation, the hourly earnings of American workers have dropped by 5 percent in the last 5 years. This is a complete reversal of the American experience and will have profound impact on the spirit of our people if something isn't done and done quickly.

And while our workers have been experiencing a decline in their standard of living, government has continued to spend money like there's no tomorrow. And come to think of it, that could be a self-fulfilling prophecy. In those same 5 years, those workers' taxes went up by 67 percent.

In fiscal year 1980 that deficit was $59.6 billion, the second largest in history. And we face another deficit of similar magnitude in this year of fiscal 1981. Now, this kind of irresponsibility can't go on. What most Federal officials have been afraid to admit is that Federal spending has been for some time increasingly out of control. If left unchecked, the current situation would lead to a redoubling of the Federal budget within 5 years.

Just conceiving of a program that might help someone somewhere was itself reason enough to pass a law and appropriate money. Eventually, with so many programs, safeguarding public funds became an impossible task. One government estimate suggested that between 1 and 10 percent of all spending on social programs was, and probably still is, being lost to fraud alone, at a cost of up to $25 billion. When that cost or the cost of waste is added to that sum for fraud, the figures are even more appalling.

Of course, spending isn't the only aspect of government that seems out of control. In the last decade, American business and, yes, local government, has had to deal with an avalanche of Federal regulation. Between 1970 and 1979, expenditures for the major regulatory agencies quadrupled. The number of pages published annually in the Federal Register nearly tripled, and the number of pages in the Code of Federal Regulations increased by nearly two-thirds. The cost of this has been staggering. An estimated $100 billion per year -- now I can say billion -- is added on to the cost of everything we buy, just to pay for the cost of Federal regulations. And then there's the unseen cost which is harder to calculate but nonetheless devastating: Regulation tends to smother innovation, discourage new investment, increase labor costs, and reduce competition.

This Federal Goliath, unleashed and uncontrolled, brought us to the economic brink that is now confronting this Nation. Too many officials appear to feel totally helpless in the face of the monumental task of restoring order to the Federal Government's economic policies. Perhaps no one had the clout to get the job done. Whatever the reason, we now have much work to do.

We must realize that the economic crisis confronting America is not the result of a natural disaster or a catastrophe beyond our control. Inflation, unemployment -- all of it -- was basically caused by decisions that we, as a people, made. Now the only power needed to restore America's strength is willpower.

You may have heard a rumor to the effect that I've submitted a program to Congress, a four-part program which will get this country moving in the right direction again, I believe, increase the standard of living for our people, and cut the inflation and unemployment rates.

First, I've asked for a substantial reduction in the growth of Federal expenditures. Second, I've asked for a significant reduction in Federal tax rates. And third, I've asked for the prudent elimination of excessive regulation. Fourth, while recognizing the independence of the institution, I have pledged to work with the Federal Reserve Board to develop a monetary policy which is consistent with those policies.

Let me refer back to the second of those points and just add this one fact. All of us must accept the fact which has been proven in this century, proven here in our own country several times, that a reduction in Federal tax rates does not necessarily result in a reduction in tax revenues. The economy expands, it reduces the burden for the individual, but the overall share goes up as the base of the economy is broadened.

Now, these four complementary policies form an integrated and comprehensive program, the details of which have been examined by the best economic minds in the country, people who are working with me on a daily basis. However, this program now faces a political gauntlet of interest groups. And, may I say, I know that in many instances there's legitimate concern, concern that some worthwhile program is now going to be unable to meet the purpose for which it was founded. And yet at the same time, I'm finding it increasingly difficult not to call some of the interest groups selfish interest groups, because we are not cutting at the muscle fiber of these programs.

Capitol Hill, but also because you are looking out for the interests of millions of citizens who inhabit the great urban areas of America. You and I have shared goals. We both want what is best for those who live in our cities, just as I'm sure we both want what is best for the people of this country, wherever they reside.

Now, I know that you, like all Americans, recognize the importance of getting our economic house in order. The plague of inflation and stagnation is brutalizing this country. I don't have to remind you of the effects on local government: The cost of every service you provide skyrockets; tax revenue declines when businesses close their doors; and when coupled with the increased unemployment, the economic burden reaches a critical stage. Local government was not designed to withstand this kind of economic upheaval. Unless something is done to turn the economy around, local governments will suffer right along with many other respected American institutions.

We've suspended for 2 months the flood of last-minute rulemaking done by the previous administration so that we can look closely at it. We've eliminated the ineffective and counterproductive wage and price standards of the Council on Wage and Price Stability. We accelerated the decontrol of domestic oil. We have concentrated our efforts to enhance the effectiveness of the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980. We placed a freeze on Federal hiring.

We've also begun taking action on particularly controversial rules. For example, rules mandating extensive bilingual education programs, passive restraints in large cars, the unnecessary labeling of chemicals in the workplace, controls on garbage truck noise, and increased overtime payments for executives have been withdrawn or postponed. These actions alone are expected to save the American public and industry almost $1 billion annually.

Presidential task force to clear away many regulatory roadblocks, as many as possible. His role in our regulatory reform effort should suggest the importance that we place on this issue. I'm aware that Bill Hudnut is circulating a questionnaire regarding regulatory relief which will be presented to the Vice President and the Task Force on Regulatory Relief this afternoon.

Now, there are those who oppose almost everything in the economic program. They oppose the program, but for the most part they offer no alternative. Well, hoping things will get better won't make it so. I've been told that some Members of Congress disagree with my tax cut proposal.

Nevertheless, the real threat to recovery comes from those who will oppose only a small part of the overall program, while supporting the overall effort. Needless to say, the small portion these parochial groups oppose always deals with the cuts that affect them directly. Those cuts they oppose. They favor cutting everybody else's subsidy as an important step in ending inflation and getting the country moving again. The accumulative effect of this shortsightedness can be damaging. We're all in the same boat, and we have to get the engines started before the boat goes over the falls.

Now, we've tried to be as fair and evenhanded in developing our package as was humanly possible. It's important to remember, when someone says that the administration is planning to cut the budget, what we really mean is we're planning to cut the growth in the fiscal year '82 budget from 16 percent to 7 percent. And even with our cuts, that 7 percent means that spending in fiscal year '82 will go up over fiscal year 1981 by about $40 billion.

Within this restructuring that we've proposed, some programs are eliminated, but others are strengthened. And we did nothing to weaken the social safety net which protects the truly needy in this society. As a matter of fact, when we reformed welfare in California, we discovered that the really truly deserving people that we were trying to help weren't helped as much as they should be helped, simply because of excesses administratively, duplication, and people who were not truly needy. We had spread ourselves so thin, that we didn't have the resources available to really take care of those with great need.

Full retirement benefits for more than 31 million social security recipients will be continued, along with an annual cost-of-living increase. The Medicare program will not be cut, nor will veterans pensions, nor supplemental income for the blind, aged, and disabled. The school lunch and breakfast programs will continue for the children of low-income families, as will nutrition and other special services for the aging. And, yes, there will be no cut in Project Head Start or summer youth jobs. When considering these essential programs, please remember the very best thing that can be done to strengthen things like social security is to get the American economy going and put people back to work, so they will be paying into the trust fund once again.

In our attempt to be evenhanded, we tried, whenever possible, to cushion the budget blows. In the case of money going to the cities, yes, undeniably, we're cutting the amount of money the cities could have expected had we continued through the economic crisis with a business-as-usual attitude. But while we are reducing some of these subsidies, we are at the same time converting many categorical grants into block grants, thus reducing wasteful Federal administrative overhead and giving local governments more flexibility and control. And corresponding to that, we're working to end duplication of Federal programs and reforming those that are not cost-effective.

As I said, we will be funding this new community support function at a slightly smaller amount than before, but we will be providing greater flexibility and autonomy to localities which show the abillity to run these programs effectively. We believe the reduction will be largely covered by the elimination of administrative overhead. We're cutting fat, not muscle.

We're giving local government the power to decide what will be done with the money. Handled efficiently, the level of benefits may not suffer as might be suggested at first glance. However, there could well be something in local government that can and should be cut back during these times of economic hardship. If so, you will set your own priorities. You, not some Washington bureaucrat, will decide where the cuts will be made if cuts are necessary.

I know that accepting responsiblilty, especially for cutbacks, is not easy. But this package should be looked at by State and local governments as a great step toward not only getting America moving again but toward restructuring the power system which led to the economic stagnation and urban deterioration.

He described a land and a people which seem a far cry from those of today. But why? We're the same people. If we're not, what is different? Well, the answer to that is the increased intervention by Federal authority. Only 50 years ago, Americans still felt they could accomplish anything, and they did. Today, the descendants of these pathfinders peer through a maze of government regulations and often give up even before they've tried.

Local officials who once saw the local voters as boss now look to Washington, D.C., before considering a move. And what once was a Federal helping hand is quickly turning into a mailed fist. Instead of assistance, the Federal Government is giving orders. They call them mandates.

More often that not the command comes from Washington, but few funds to implement the order can be found in the envelope. Mayor Koch of New York has detailed the problem of mandates better than anyone. Last year, he said his city was driven by 47 Federal and State mandates, with a total cost of $711 million in capital expenditures, 6.25 billion in expense-budget dollars, and $1.66 billion in lost revenue. And people wonder why New York sings the blues.

Not only are the funds not available to meet all these mandates, often the mandates themselves are impossible to fulfill. In Fairfax County, Virginia, for example, students come from 50 different language backgrounds, 15 of which are spoken by more than 20 students. Were it able to follow the former HHS guidelines, the county would incur the expense of sponsoring bilingual programs in 15 different languages, including Urdu, Hindi, and Laotian.

Now, bilingual education -- there is a need, but there is also a purpose that has been distorted, again at the Federal level. Where there are predominantly students speaking a foreign language at home, coming to school and being taught in English, and they fall behind or are unable to keep up in some subjects because of the lack of knowledge of the language, I think it is proper that we have teachers equipped who can get at them in their own language and understand why it is they don't get the answer to the problem and help them in that way. But it is absolutely wrong and against the American concept to have a bilingual education program that is now openly, admittedly dedicated to preserving their native language and never getting them adequate in English so they can go out into the job market and participate. [Applause] Thank you.

Today, I renew a pledge I made to your conference in Atlanta in December. I will examine the mandates issued by the Federal Government and take action to remove any undue burden placed upon local governments throughout this country.

First, there are so many strings attached that Federal projects take a lot longer to complete. And second, local money pays the bill anyway. Once the Federal vacuum cleaner gets through with the pockets of the local taxpayers, there isn't enough spare change left to run local government.

American cities. We can start by reestablishing the proper relationship between the Federal, State, and local governments. The block grant program in our package is the first step. It cuts considerable redtape and returns power and decisions to the cities for money taken by the Federal Government. It is something that we, in the years ahead, can build upon.

Shortly, my administration will announce the creation of a federalism task force to find out, specifically, what can be done to reestablish the balance between the levels of government. Your input and participation will be important in this process. Working together, we can establish a dialog about the proper functions of the respective levels of government and go about restructuring the federal system to maximize efficiency and freedom.

That is, as I've said, just a start. But it is a step, a first step, in the right direction. I hope in the years to come we'll be in direct communication. It'll take teamwork to get this country back on the right track, and it won't happen overnight. You can count on my cooperation to make the cities of America once again the thriving areas of commerce, culture, and freedom that once attracted the attention of people the world over. If we don't start now, who will, and when?

As minority education counsel, Mr. Clohan had primary responsiblility for issues concerning child nutrition, School Lunch program, Community Schools program, education innovation and support, Fund for Improvement of Postsecondary Education, and many others.

Since 1971 Mr. Knapp has worked as chief legal officer for National Kinney Corp., a publicly held corporation engaged in building maintenance, construction, parking lot ownership, and housing development.

In 1980 Mr. Harris was reelected to a second term in the Indiana State Senate. He served on and chaired the Senate Standing Committee on Natural Resources, Environment and Agriculture. He also served as ranking majority member of the Senate Standing Committee on Elections and Apportionment and as a member of the Senate Standing Committee on Finance.

Mr. Johnson has authored many articles on the Commodity Exchange Act. He serves as a member of the board of directors of the commodity industry's national trade association, the Futures Industry Association.

Mr. Cronkite. Mr. President, with your administration barely 6 weeks old, you're involved now in, perhaps, the first foreign policy crisis -- if it can be called a crisis yet; probably cannot be, but it is being much discussed, of course -- much concern about El Salvador and our commitment there.

The President. No, Walter, I don't. I know that that parallel is being drawn by many people. But the difference is so profound. What we're actually doing is, at the request of a govenment in one of our meighboring countries, offering some help against the import or the export into the Western Hemisphere of terrorism, of disruption. And it isn't just El Salvador. That happens to be the target at the moment. Our problem is this whole hemisphere and keeping this sort of thing out.

Now, we have sent briefing teams to Europe, down to our Latin American neighbors with what we've learned of the actual involvement of the Soviet Union, of Cuba, of the PLO, of, even Qadhafi in Libya, and others in the Communist bloc nations to bring about this terrorism down there.

Now, you use the term ``military advisers.'' You know, there's sort of technicality there. You could say they are advisers in that they're training, but when it's used as ``adviser,'' that means military men who go in and accompany the forces into combat, advise on strategy and tactics. We have no one of that kind. We're sending and have sent teams down there to train. They do not accompany them into combat. They train recruits in the garrison area. And as a matter of fact, we have such training teams in more than 30 countries today, and we've always done that -- the officers of the military in friendly countries and in our neighboring countries have come to our service schools -- West Point, Annapolis, and so forth. So, I don't see any parallel at all.

And I think it is significant that the terrorists, the guerrilla activity in El Salvador was supposed to cause an uprising, that the government would fall because the people would join this aggressive force and support them. The people are totally against that and have not reacted in that way.

The people have not risen. This last offensive of the guerrillas did not work, and therefore aren't we likely to exacerbate the situation by American presence there now, therefore sort of promoting a self-fulfilling prophecy by coming down there and getting the guerrillas and the people themselves upset about ``big brother'' intervention, and therfore losing the game instead of winning it.

The President. Well, no, and we realize that our southern friends down there do have memories of the ``great colossus of the North'' and so forth -- but no, his government has asked for this because of the need for training against terrorist and guerrilla activities, has asked for materiel such as helicopters and so forth that can be better at interdicting the supply lines where these illicit weapons are being brought in to the guerrillas, and this is what we've provided. And some of these teams that have been provided are also to help keep those machines in the air and on the water -- patrol boats and so forth -- to try to interdict the supply by water of weapons and ammunition. They need help in repair. They get laid up for repairs, and they don't have the qualified techinicians.

Mr. Cronkite. What really philosophically is different from our going down to help a democratic government sustain itself against guerrilla activity promoted from the outside -- Soviet and Cuban aid, as we believe it to be; your administration says it is -- and Afghanistan? El Salvador is in our sort of geopolitical sphere of influence. Afghanistan, on the border of the Soviet Union, is certainly in their geopolitical sphere of influence. They went in with troops to support a Marxist government friendly to them. Why isn't that a parallel situation?

The President. Well, I don't think there can be a parallel there, because I was in Iran in '78 when the first coup came about, and it was the Soviet Union that put their man as President of Afghanistan. And then their man didn't work out to their satisfaction, so, they came in and got rid of him and brought another man that they'd been training in Moscow and put him in as their President. And then, with their armed forces, they are trying to subdue the people of Afghanistan who do not want this pro-Soviet government that has been installed by an outside force.

The parallel would be that without actually using Soviet troops, in effect, the Soviets are, you might say, trying to do the same thing in El Salvador that they did in Afghanistan, but by using proxy troops through Cuba and guerrillas. And they had hoped for, as I said, an uprising of the people that would then give them some legitimacy in the government that would be installed -- the Communist government -- but the people didn't rise up. The people have evidenced their desire to have the government they have and not be ruled by these guerrillas.

Mr. Cronkite. Secretary of State Haig has said that we'll not have a Vietnam in El Salvador, because the United States will direct its action toward Cuba, which is the main source of the intervention, in his words. But Cuba is a client state of the Soviet Union. It's not likely to stand by and let us take direct action against Cuba, is it?

The President. Well, that term ``direct acton,'' there are a lot of things open -- diplomacy, trade, a number of things -- and Secretary Haig has explained his use of the term, the source with regard to Cuba means the intercepting and stopping of the supplies coming into these countries -- the export from Cuba of those arms, the training of the guerrillas as they've done there. And I don't think in any way that he was suggesting an assault on Cuba.

The President. Well, this depends. If you intercept them when they're landing at the other end or find them where they're in the locale such as, for example, Nicaragua, and informing Nicaragua that we're aware of the part that they have played in this, using diplomacy to see that a country decides they're not going to allow themselves to be used anymore. There's been a great slowdown -- we're watching it very carefully,Nicaragua -- of the transfer of arms to El Salvador. This doesn't mean that they're not coming in from other guerrilla bases in other countries there.

Mr. Cronkite. You've said that we could extricate ourselves easily from El Salvador if that were required at any given point in this proceeding. I assume you mean at any given point. How could we possibly extricate ourselves? Even now, from this initial stage, how could we extricate ourselves without a severe loss of face?

The President. Well, I don't think we're planning on having to extricate ourselves from there. But the only thing that I could see that could have brought that about is if the guerrillas had been correct in their assessment and there had been the internal disturbance. Well, then it would be a case of we're there at the behest of the present govenment. If that government is no longer there, we're not going there without an invitation. We're not forcing ourselves upon them, and you'd simply leave -- and there aren't that many people to be extricated.

Mr. Cronkite. Even if the Duarte forces begin to lose with whatever military materiel assistance we give them, whatever training advisers we give them, are you pledging that we will not go in with fighting forces?

The President. I certainly don't see any likelihood of us going in with fighting forces. I do see our continued work in the field of diplomacy with neighboring countries that are interested in Central America and South America to bring this violence to a halt and to make sure that we do not just sit passively by and let this hemisphere be invaded by outside forces.

Mr. Cronkite. Moving on. Your hard line toward the Soviet Union is in keeping with your campaign statements, your promises. But there are some who, while applauding that stance, feel that you might have overdone the rhetoric a little bit in laying into the Soviet leadership as being liars and thieves, et cetera.

The President. Well, now, let's recap. I am aware that what I said received a great deal of news attention, and I can't criticize the news media for that. I said it. But the thing that seems to have been ignored -- well, two things -- one, I did not volunteer that statement. This was not a statement that I went in and called a press conference and said, ``Here, I want to say the following.'' I was asked a question. And the question was, what did I think were Soviet aims?

And then I said we're naive if we don't recognize in their performance of that, that they also have said that the only morality -- remember their ideology is without God, without our idea of morality in the religious sense -- their statement about morality is that nothing is immoral if it furthers their cause, which means they can resort to lying or stealing or cheating or even murder if it furthers their cause, and that is not immoral. Now, if we're going to deal with them, then we have to keep that in mind when we deal with them. And I've noticed that with their own statements about me and their attacks on me since I answered that question that way -- it is the only statement I've made -- they have never denied the truth of what I said.

Ambassador Dobrynin of the Soviet Union drove over to the State Department for the first time after the administration came in, his car was turned away at the entrance to the basement garage, which he had been using, told that he had to use the street door like all the other diplomats had been doing. It was obviously tipped to the press that this was going to happen.

The President. Well, I think it isn't a case of -- well, there are some things that I think would help bring that about. The main thing is you don't just call up and say, ``Yeah, let's get together and have lunch.'' A summit meeting of that kind takes a lot of preparation. And the first preparation from our standpoint is the pledge that we've made to our allies, that we won't take unilateral steps. We'll only do things after full consultation with them, because they're involved also. And I've had an opportunity to talk a little bit about it just -- it only came to light, his statement, a short time ago -- with Prime Minister Thatcher when she was here. So, we haven't had the opportunity for the consultations about that that would be necessary.

I have said that I will sit and negotiate with them for a reduction in strategic nuclear weapons to lower the threshold of danger that exists in the world today. Well, one of the things -- you say ``conditions'' -- I think one of them would be some evidence on the part of the Soviet Union that they are willing to discuss that. So far, previous Presidents, including my predecessor, tried to bring negotiations to the point of actual reduction, and the Soviet Union refused. They refused to discuss that. I think that we would have to know that they're willing to do that.

I think it would help bring about such a meeting if the Soviet Union revealed that it is willing to moderate its imperialism, its aggression -- Afghanistan would be an example. We could talk a lot better if there was some indication that they truly wanted to be a member of the peace-loving nations of the world, the free world.

Mr. Cronkite. Isn't that really what you have to negotiate? I mean, is it really conceivable that you're going to get such a change of heart, a change of statement that you could believe on that part of the Soviet Union before you ever sit down to talk with President Brezhnev?

I remember when Hitler was arming and had built himself up -- no one's created quite the military power that the Soviet Union has, but comparatively he was in that way -- Franklin Delano Roosevelt made a speech in Chicago at the dedication of a bridge over the Chicago River. And in that speech he called on the free world to quarantine Nazi Germany, to stop all communication, all trade, all relations with them until they gave up that militaristic course and agreed to join with the free nations of the world in a search for peace.

The President. No, I haven't put that as a hard and fast condition. I'm just saying that in discussing with our allies, it would make it a lot easier if we were able to say, ``Well now, look, the've shown some signs of moderating their real imperialistic course.'' You know, when we look at where they are and with their surrogates, Qadhafi in Chad, Cuba in Angola, Cuba and East Germans in Ethiopia, in South Yemen, and of course, now the attempt here in our own Western Hemisphere.

Mr. Cronkite. Well, I hate to belabor this, but since the whole world is looking forward, I think, to eventually some negotiations to stop the arms race, to get off of this danger point, it is an important thing, and I gather that the Soviet Union has to make a unilateral move -- to their point, it would be backwards, that they'd, let's say, get out of Afghanistan. Do they have to get out of Afghanistan before you'd meet?

The President. No, I haven't said that. And, Walter, I can't really say a specific answer to any of these things unless and until I have met with and discussed this whole problem with allies who, you know, are only a bus ride from Russia.

Mr. Cronkite. They seem to be saying, as near as we can tell, in their press and elsewhere, that they're saying they're anxious for you to meet on arms control. They're anxious to get arms control discussions going. They're terribly concerned about that. They're fearful that you're not going to want to negotiate until such time as you get your defense program and your economic program through Congress and feel that you're negotiating from strength, and that they're fearful that that's going to be some time -- and too late.

The President. Well, too late for what is the question. No, I don't know, but I do believe this: that it is rather foolish to have unilaterally disarmed, you might say, as we did by letting our defensive, our margin of safety deteriorate, and then you sit with the fellow who's got all the arms. What do you have to negotiate with? You're asking him to come down to where you are, or you to build up to where he is, but you don't have anything to trade.

Mr. Cronkite. You campaigned on lifting the grain embargo -- the Soviet Union. You delayed doing that so far, because you, I gather, feel it would send the Russians the wrong message, perhaps, if you did. Senator Helms has suggested perhaps that the grain embargo should be extended to a general boycott of all U.S. trade with the Soviet Union. Is that an option that you're studying?

The President. Well, I don't think you rule out anything. Actually, my campaigning was more on my criticism that the embargo shouldn't have taken place the way it did in the first place, that if we were going to go that route, then it should have been a general embargo. We shouldn't have asked just one segment of our society -- and not even agriculture, just the grain farmers -- to bear the burden of this, when at the same time we knew we could not enforce or persuade friendly nations to us who would be tempted to take over that market. And many of them did, started supplying the grain that we weren't supplying. So, the question was: Were we hurting ourselves worse than we were hurting them? Certainly it didn't stop the invasion of Afghanistan. And I criticized this.

At the same time -- and we have made no decision now on it -- I would like to lift the embargo. I think all of us would. But at the same time, now and with Poland added, the situation in Poland to Afghanistan and all, we have to think very hard as to whether we can just go forward unilaterally and do this.

Wouldn't you think sometime they would take a look at their system and say, ``We can't provide enough food to feed our people,'' to say nothing of other consumer items that are still rationed and scarce in supply under that system? And yet, we can look at these other countries in the world, all the countries that chose this way -- not only the United States but South Korea, Taiwan, all the countries that choose the free marketplace -- their standard of living goes up and up. Our problem isn't one of not raising enough food; it's not finding enough places to sell it.

The President. I think human rights is very much a part of our American idealism. I think they do play an important part. My criticism of them, in the last few years, was that we were selective with regard to human rights.

We took countries that were pro-Western, that were maybe authoritarian in government, but not totalitarian, more authoritarian than we would like, did not meet all of our principles of what constitutes human rights, and we punished them at the same time that we were claiming detente with countries where there are no human rights. The Soviet Union is the greatest violator today of human rights in all the world. Cuba goes along with it, and yet, previously, while we were enforcing human rights with others, we were talking about bettering relations with Castro's Cuba.

The President. No, I think what I'm saying is that where we have an alliance with a country that, as I say, does not meet all of ours, we should look at it that we're in a better position remaining friends, to persuade them of the rightness of our view on human rights than to suddenly, as we have done in some places, pull the rug out from under them and then let a completely totalitarian takeover that denies what human rights the people had had.

Mr. Cronkite. Doesn't that put us in the position rather of abetting the suppression of human rights for our own selfish ends, at least temporarily, until such time as we can make those persuasive changes?

Department is Mr. Ernest Lefever, of course. He testified to the House Subcommittee in '79, ``In my view, the United States should remove from the statute books all clauses that establish a human rights standard or condition that must be met by another sovereign nation.'' Do you agree with that flat statement?

The President. Well, I've never had a chance to dicuss with him just how he views that or what he believes the course would take. I do, however, believe that contrary to some of the attacks against him, that he's as concerned about human rights as the rest of us. But I think what he means is that basic human rights and the violation of them are being ignored by us where they take place in the Communist bloc nations.

Mr. Cronkite. He says also that we should not be concerned with South Africa's racial policies, but should make the country a full-fledged partner of the United States in the struggle against Communist expansion. Should we drop all of our concerns about human rights in South Africa?

The President. No, no, and I think, though, that there's been a failure, maybe for political reasons in this country, to recognize how many people, black and white, in South Africa are trying to remove apartheid and the steps that they've taken and the gains that they've made. As long as there's a sincere and honest effort being made, based on our own experience in our own land, it would seem to me that we should be trying to be helpful. And can we, again, take that other course? Can we abandon a country that has stood beside us in every war we've ever fought, a country that strategically is essential to the free world in its production of minerals we all must have and so forth?

Mr. Cronkite. The Argentinian Government has just arrested internationally respected heads of the principal human rights organization there, seized their list of 6,000 persons who've disappeared under this government. Is the United States going to protest that?

The President. I have not had an opportunity -- that just happened, as you know, and I haven't had an opportunity to meet with Secretary Haig on this. In fact, the only information that so far has been presented to me is that it did happen.

Mr. Cronkite. Let's move to some domestic affairs, which I think you're rather interested in these days -- and the whole country is of course. Now that they face the stone-hard reality of it all, 150 liberal organizations have gotten together to campaign against your budget cuts in social welfare programs. Middle Western and Eastern, Northeastern States are concerned that the programs favor the Sunbelt. Some farm organizations are concernced that the subsidies are being cut, of course, all across the board. Now these people who are beginning to see that they're going to get hurt a little bit on these cuts. Are you still optimistic in the face of all of this opposition that it can be done?

The President. Yes, I expected that opposition. And one of the reasons, I'm optimistic is because we've received 100,000 letters and telegrams since I made the speech on the 18th. We so far have only been able to open and read and catalog about 5,339, I think the figure is. And of that first 5,000-plus messages, 92-and-a-fraction percent are totally in support of our program of what we want to do. I know that polls have been taken, and a national poll recently has shown an even higher percentage of people in support of the program. I know from my own experience in the few times that I get out of here and can meet the citizenry, I find the same thing. It just is true, you feel it, you sense it, you hear it among the people out there.

It's, I'm afraid, a little bit like Senator Long said, that when you start to cut in the budget the slogan in Washington had been for too many years, ``Don't cut you and don't cut me, cut that fellow behind the tree.'' And I think these various groups are representing a lot of people behind the trees.

The President. Well, I have to say that I believe our package has been so carefully worked out that they endanger it if they start picking off any parts of it. Our program is aimed not only at reducing a budget but, with the tax feature of it, at stimulating the economy, increasing productivity, which means more jobs for our people, and which will reduce inflation. And I believe in our program. Yes, there'll be a $45 billion deficit, but just think what that means. That means that that deficit would be double that without our program. And this is why we're presenting it literally in a package.

Mr. Cronkite. Well, do you see a parallel there? There is a conservative government, came in with much the same sort of a plan you did to turn back the clock on socialistic advances, a revolutionary approach to change, and it has failed miserably there. Unemployment is higher than any time since the Great Depression. Thousands of small businesses have folded.

The President. Well, you see, I think in her case, we have to recognize how much farther down the road England had gone. She has great indutries now that are government-owned monopolies and losing their shirts as a result, because government doesn't run businesses very well. She was up against -- well, we've now seen the Labor Party split in its own convention, and the left wing take over -- she was up against that powerful left wing element that was sabotaging. I don't think her experiment is over. I have confidence in her, and I admire her greatly and her courage, and she's still going at it.

I think we might have the same problems, but we still have the infrastructure. We still have this great industrial capacity of ours here. And if people would only look at it, what we're trying to correct that's gone wrong is: Some years ago when things were going better, government was only taking 19 percent of the gross national product; it's been increasing, it's on an upward line if we don't head it off. And so that cost of government plus the fact that the only way we can maintain that is by continued borrowing to the point that we're close to having a trillion dollar debt -- a trillion.

Mr. Cronkite. Mr. President, let me ask you about Congress again though. This is the whole core of the thing right now, of course, is getting that program through. Now, you say you need 100 percent of it. Of course you do. That's what you're after. But realistically -- and you're a realistic man -- you can't really expect to get all of it through. I mean, there's got to be some failure somewhere along the line of getting it all through there. Are you going to be in the position, politically at any rate, of saying all those thousands out there who are for you to get the cuts made that if Congress cuts this one cent or adds one cent to it, that it's not your responsibility any longer. Congress has failed you and failed the people.

The President. Well, Walter, I virtually have to say that because if I said anything else -- I played in the line when I played football -- it's like giving the play away and indicating to your opponent where the play's going.

No, I can't -- I have to stay with it. I think our package is designed -- and the thing that is significant to me about all those people that you mentioned a moment ago that are opposed to the plan, as well as some of those on the Hill who are opposed: No one has brought up an alternative.

Those are the people who have been dictating the policies of this country for the last three of four decades, that have put the country in the economic position it is in. Unless they can come up and say, `` We are now recommending a change in this direction or that direction to cure what has happened,'' how can they stand and oppose a program that is designed to cure the economic chaos that they created?

Mr. Cronkite. The supply-siders feel that their program, your program, should get its first results through psychology, that the mere approach to these problems being made in a frontal assault by your administration will encourage people to get out and do the things necessary -- invest and save and do the things necessary. The'll have faith in this. Do you see any early results of that yet?

The President. Well, one of the things that the mail we get and one of the things that I hear from pollsters and so forth is to the effect that there is a different attitude, that there is a kind of glow out there among the people and a confidence that things are going to be all right, where, a short time ago, polls were revealing that the people didn't think things were going to get better. Now, maybe that's what they meant.

But also there is this in our package that isn't just psychology. Maybe by a stretch you could call it that. But our program gives a stability down the road ahead. A person can say, ``I know what's going to happen for the next few years,'' even in the 3-year implementing of the tax program.

Someone can say, ``I have confidence to do this, because I have been told and I know that this is what's going to happen to my tax situation in the years ahead.'' Business will know that they can invest in plant and that they're going to be allowed a better break in writing off the depreciation and so forth.

Mr. Cronkite. The cuts to be announced March 10th -- we've seen some advance information on it. Whether it's entirely correct or not, we have no way of knowing, but the agricultural cuts to be announced, we understand, will cut back Agriculture Department's supplemental food programs, which include milk to children and pregnant women and that sort of thing, dairy products, fruit, to low-income families. Is that in there? Is that the cut?

But, no, what we're talking about, though, in programs of that kind -- and this has to do with food stamps too -- is not taking those things away from the people who would have no other means of getting them. But program have a way to expand. Bureaucracy has to justify its existence. So, they spread and they accumulate barnacles, and what we're doing is taking a look at some of those barnacles. And you suddenly find and say, ``Well, why are we, at taxpayers' expense, providing milk for this particular segment, who are perfectly able to provide it for themselves and other people of no better circumstances are providing it for themselves.'' The same [is] true of food stamps. These are where we're trying to make the cuts.

The President. Well, the safety net is where it should be. But it isn't so much of lowering or raising it, it is a case of finding that around the edge of that safety net, we had acquired a group of people who were benefiting from it who didn't need to be there.

Mr. Cronkite. Well, they say in New York, now -- of course, these figures are suspect too in a way because nobody knows precisely -- but they're talking about a cut of 20,000 children off the Aid to Dependent Children; there's 30,000 old people off the help to the elderly. Is it your intention that that many people are on this fringe area? And even if they are, isn't it going to create a considerable hardship for them? They're not that much above poverty level.

The President. Walter, I hadn't seen those figures of people doing that. But let me just tell you an experience from California, again which is one that we're going to ride herd on very closely. The permanent structure of government, what we commonly call the bureaucracy, has a great ability of slef-defense, to preserve itself. And we found sometimes in our own welfare reforms there that in an effort to focus attention and try to build a case against what we were trying to do, they would deliberately pick out the people who could be harmed the most and interpret what you were trying to do as denying aid to that particular person.

Now, we've had a little example of that: the so-called retroactive freeze on employment and suddenly the terrible stories -- and I'm sure many of them true -- about people who sold their homes, gave up their jobs, and came to Washington to get a job. But I can't deny the fact or overlook the fact that before November 4th I was saying that one of the first things I would do in the first 24 hours is put a freeze on the hiring of replacements -- Federal employees. And, indeed, in the first hour, when after I took the oath and walked back into the Capitol building, I signed that Executive order [memorandum], and suddenly we find thousands of people who were recruited, beginning November 5th, and yet for some reason had not yet been put in their jobs by January 20th. And then the uproar that this was retroactive to November 5th -- we didn't say anything about November 5th, but we also didn't realize that they could actually hold people for that long, leaving them to think they had jobs, and yet had not processed them and put them in the jobs. I have to be suspicious of this.

Now, the truth is, many of those people were victims, not of us, they were victims of what I think was a bureaucratic trick. And where we are finding real cases of distress because of that, we are making exceptions, because it wasn't their fault. They didn't know they were being victimized.

Mr. Cronkite. On your tax cuts, you cite the experience of the 1961 Kennedy tax cut to prove that it will hype up the economy. But that cut was specifically to stimulate buying, whereas your objective is to stimulate savings and investment. Now, how do you justify that?

The President. Well, whether he said to stimulate buying or not, remember he brought down the top bracket from 91 percent to 70 percent in that -- it was over a 2-year period. Actually, he didn't implement the tax cuts, they followed his tragic death and were implemented, but they had been passed.

There is a page from a June issue of U.S. News and World Report, 1966, that I recommend as must reading, because the whole article on that page is about the strange paradox that the 2-year period of phased-in tax cuts, which is somewhat similar to what we're trying to do over 3 years, did not result, as the economists said they would, in an $83 billion loss of revenue to government.

They couldn't explain the paradox that ever since the cuts went into effect the government itself was getting more revenue, because the economy, the economic base, had been broadened and stimulated so each individual had the benefit of the cuts. But there were more individuals involved, so the government even profited. And as I say, that's 1966, in this 2-year program.

We can come up to 1978. The Steiger-Hansen bill that cut the capital gains tax, and the very first year, the government got more revenue from the capital gains tax at the lower rate than it had gotten at the higher. Why? Because suddenly capital gains, we'd removed some of the penalty, and capital gains, for those people who could invest and use capital gains for revenue, had become attractive again. And they did more of it.

The President. Well, no. Some polls have been taken on that, and they find at the very bottom of the ladder, yes, people say there are things that they will use it for in buying. But from there on up, the overwhelming majority in those polls reveal that they will use it for savings and investment.

Mr. Cronkite. Secretary of Treasury Regan argues that this is not so, because the tax cut will benefit the upper bracket, and the rich will be saving and investing. And yet, the propaganda has been, oh, now, it's going to benefit the lower brackets more than the upper. So, isn't there a dichotomy there?

The President. Well, it's across the board. And there's no question about it. If it's 10 percent, it's a reduction of the rates, the tax rates, 10 percent right from the basic rate of 14 percent now right on up to the top rate and then 10 percent the following, 10 percent the next. And a cut in the tax rates does not follow that dollar for dollar there will be a reduction in government's revenues as these other things that I've given illustrate. But, it's where you define the rich.

The simple truth is that in the income bracket between $10,000 and $60,000 -- now, I think you have to say, in today's inflated world, we're talking about the great middle class of America, the people who really make this country go -- that bracket from ten to sixty thousand is paying today 72 percent of the income tax. They are going to get 73 percent, which I guess is about as close as you could get it, of the benefits of our tax bill. Now, I would say that in there, maybe when you get to 15, and from there up, you're going to be talking to people who will be able to save, invest, buy insurance, things that they're perhaps not able, and then that money becomes capital in the hands of the financial institutions for reinvestment.

The President. I have to say that those high interest rates, I'm afraid, are the result of inflation, because it's as simple as this if you really look at it, although they're going to cooperate in a monetary policy that is geared to what we're trying to do. But if you're asking somone to lend money, when you look down the road and see nothing being done to curb inflation and inflation is running back to back now for 2 years, the person that's lending the money has to get an interest rate that will show that when he gets his money back he's getting back as much or more than he loaned. So, it is inflation that dictates that high interest rate. The interest rate has to be higher than the inflation rate or on one can afford to lend the money.

Mr. Cronkite. Illegal immigration is one of the major problems we have in the country today, and the congressional task force has just come in with a study on it. One of its recommendations, besides putting responsibility on employers not to hire illigal aliens, is to provide some means of identification for the aliens so that the employer will know who he's hiring. Would you support some form of national identification that could help attack this problem?

They have met together on this problem. We have to remember we have a neighbor and a friendly nation on an almost 2,000-mile border down there. And they have an unemployment rate that is far beyond anything -- a safety valve has to be some of that that we're calling ``illegal immigration'' right now. What these Governors have come up with -- and I'm very intrigued with it -- is a proposal that we and the Mexican Government get together and legalize this and grant visas, because it is to our interest also that that safety valve is not shut off and that we might have a breaking of the stability south of the border.

At the same time, that would then make these people in our country -- an employer could not take advantage of them and work them at sweatshop wages and so forth under the threat of turning them in. They at the same time, then, would be paying taxes in this country for whatever they earned. They would be able to go legally back across the border if they wanted to, and come back across. But the border would become a two-way border for all people.

I'm not surprised by the amount of work. As I've often said, I'm not surprised about the confinement of living in the White House. I lived above the store when I was a kid, and it's much like that. So, I guess I can't find anything other than that.

Maybe it all started due to some of you gentlemen on the air on Election Day. You'd think that that'd be a very dramatic moment, and I was worrying that it was going to be a moment that would last all night, waiting for the returns to come in. I was in the shower and was called out of the shower, just getting ready to go out, late afternoon, when the President was on the other end of the phone. I was wrapped in a towel and dripping wet, and he told me that he was conceding.

As products made in this country compete successfully in world markets, we contibute to the strength and stability of our dollar, the expansion of our industry and fuller employment of our labor force.

For these reasons, the United States remains firmly committed to an active world trade role in the context of an increasingly interrelated international economy. A reciprocal spirit of world cooperation, permitting fair trade and investment between our country and the rest of the world, is indispensable to all of us.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this third day of March in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and fifth.

As President, I have expressed in the strongest terms my outrage regarding this crisis, and as a citizen, I continue to share the boundless hurt suffered by the stricken families and the community at large.

Vice President Bush has been deeply involved, at my personal request, in overseeing the Federal efforts -- now being coordinated by an Atlanta task force -- in both the investigative aspects of the cases and in providing needed heatlh and community services.

To further support this continued Federal affort and the efforts of local officials and agencies, I am announcing that an additional $979,000 in Federal funds for a variety of programs requested by Mayor Maynard Jackson will be forthcoming from the Justice Department and other Federal agencies.

These funds will be used to provide after-school guidance and care for 1,000 youths in six areas where most of the murders have occurred, to establish a 24-hour hotline to provide counseling for parents and children, and to provide facilities to house disadvantaged or homeless teenage youths.

Part of the money will be used also to effectively coordinate and adminster the thousands of offers of aid that have been generously made from corporations, private citizens, State, Federal, and local agencies.

Today I'm instructing the Office of Management and Budget to include in the budget package that we will send to Congress next Tuesday a plan for the reduction of nondefense personnel in the Federal Government. Under this plan we will replace the temporary hiring freeze with new, permanent ceilings that will reduce Federal employment by nearly 33,000 this fiscal year and another 63,100 in 1982 compared to the personnel projections of the last administration. In just 2 years these reductions will save the taxpayers $1.3 billion.

Millions of Americans today have had to tighten their belts because of the economic conditions, and it's time to put Washington on a diet, too. Gaining control of the size of govenment, getting our economy back on track, will not wait. We'll have to act now. And we'll continue to search for ways to cut the size of government and reduce the amount of Federal spending and achieve a trimmer, more efficient, more responsive government for all the people.

Q. Mr. President, your Secretary of State has said that you would strongly oppose a right-wing takeover of the government in El Salvador, while your own White House spokesman has been less definite. Just how strongly would you oppose such a coup, and would it result in a complete cutoff of American aid, both economic and military?

The President. Well, I think what we're all intending to say is that we would have to view very seriously such an attempt and such a coup. We're there at the request of the government. We're supporting a government which we believe has an intention of improving the society there for the benefit of the people, and we're opposed to terrorism of the right or left. And so, we would have to view very seriously -- I can't answer the last part of your question as to exactly what we would do, but it would be of the gravest concern to us if there were such a thing.

Q. Mr. President, we know you don't like to tip you hand on legislation before it arrives at your desk, but Mr. Stockman, who speaks with great authority for this administration, and others who've talked to you recently, say that you are considering a veto of the tax bill if it is changed substantially. Do they know whereof they speak?

The President. Well, the veto is a tool of government that belongs to the President, and I've never been reluctant to use it. But you were right in your first statement: I never talk about in advance whether I will or will not veto.

First of all, I think I should say that I am reasonably optimistic. I'm not looking for a confrontation with the Congress, and I have, I think, sufficient reason to believe that there is great bipartisan support for our program in the Congress. And I'm going to keep trying to work with them so that we won't face that particular problem.

Q.Mr. President, I'd like to ask you a two-part question on El Salvador. First, is a naval blockade an option you are considering? And second, given the fact that several Americans have been murdered in El Salvador in the last several weeks and the advisers you're sending there could well be a special target for terrorists, how do you intend to provide for the personal safety of those advisers? And do you envision the need for American troops as any sort of a security force for those advisers?

I won't comment on anything we might be considering in the line of an action with regard to the safety of our personnel. We're taking every precaution we can. We realize that there is a risk and a danger. None of them will be going into combat. None of them will be accompanying El Salvadoran troops on missions of that kind. They will be in what has to considered as reasonably safe a place as there can be in that country in garrison.

The President. No, that is not in our reckoning at all. We think we're abiding by what is -- nor has it been requested. We've had requested the people that we have sent there already, and we don't foresee the need of any American troops.

Q. Mr. President, several of your advisers say that you're going to be in deep political hot water if the public doesn't get conclusive evidence, at least by the end of the year, that your economic program is leading to a slowdown in inflation and in reducing unemployment. How long do you think Americans should wait before making a judgment on your program on your program, and to win a good mark from the public, in your mind, what specific progress must be made on the economic front?

The President. I think that one of the -- and I hope that the public would understand this -- that one of the things that must be realized is we're not promising any instant cure. We don't believe that in the matter of several months or probably even in the first year we're going to see more than beginning signs of recovery, because, remember, we have inherited one budget that still has never been passed -- the Government is operating without a passed budget -- but in a year that is pretty well gone. So, our first savings in this year are going to be reduced by that fact. October 1st the '82 fiscal year begins.

I think it would be premature, and I think no one should indicate that we are promising an instant cure of these problems. These problems have built up over several decades, and they're not going to go away overnight. But we do believe that as the -- if the economies are passed, which -- and they should be -- and the tax program, we should begin to see some effects, I would think, by the end of the '82 year. First of all, we would see a drastic reduction in the deficit that will take place in the fiscal year '82.

Q. The United States role there is being compared with its role in Vietnam 15 to 20 years ago. Do you think that's a valid comparison? And also, how do you intend to avoid having El Salvador turn into a Vietnam for this country?

The President. I don't believe it is a valid parallel. I know that many people have been suggesting that. The situation here is, you might say, our front yard; it isn't just El Salvador. What we're doing, in going to the aid of a government that asked that aid of a neighboring country and a friendly country in our hemisphere, is try to halt the infiltration into the Americas by terrorists, by outside interference and those who aren't just aiming at El Salvador but, I think, are aiming at the whole of Central and possibly later South America -- and, I'm sure, eventually North America.

But this is what we're doing, is trying to stop this destabilizing force of terrorism and guerilla warfare and revolution from being exported in here, backed by the Soviet Union and Cuba and those others that we've named. And we have taken that evidence to some of our allies. So, I think the situation is entirely different.

We do not foresee the need of American troops, as I said earlier, in this, and we're sending, what, some 50-odd personnel for training. Well, we have such training squads in more than 30 countries today. So, this isn't an unusual thing that we are doing.

Q. Thank you, Mr. President. Despite what Budget Director Stockman says about sharing the burden of the proposed budget cuts, I don't understand how the nation's poor are going to survive with almost across-the-board cuts in social programs. Can you explain this, since your proposed economic plan is not an immediate quick-fix?

The President. Yes, I think I can. We're not cutting into the muscle of a program where it is going to require taking aid away from those people that must have it. First of all, by putting many of the programs that are now categorical grants into block grants, we are getting fid of a rather expensive administrative overhead, which will account for part of the savings. Part of the savings also is going to be the manner in which these programs tend to expand. And then government loosens the regulations a little bit and says, ``Well, we ought to include the benefits of the program to people over here or these people over here.'' And we find that we are giving the benefits of the program to people who do not have real need and for which the program was not originally intended.

I speak with some confidence of this, because this is very much what we did in California with our welfare reforms. We never had a single case turn up after our welfare reforms, and some 350,000 people in that one State disappeared from the welfare rolls. We never had a single case of anyone suddenly appearing and saying, ``I am destitute. I've been cut off welfare.'' As a matter of fact, most of those people disappeared of their own free will, which led us to believe that under the regulations which bound us in our administrative ability, we were unable to really pin down how many people might be getting more than one welfare check. And when they just disappeared as the spotlight began to be turned on, possibly out of recognition that they were now going to be caught, the rolls just shrank. And it's this theory that is behind what we are doing.

Our safety net of programs, the seven we spoke of, is intact. I'm quite sure there will be attempts by those in the bureaucracy who are involved in some of these programs to suggest that there is great distress being caused by them. And we had the experience in California of seeing them actually attempt to penalize some of the truly needy until we could intervene simply to create cases of that kind. We'll be on guard for that.

Q. Sir, the White House is taking a somewhat unusual step of asking private groups to raise money to promote your economic program and to refurbish the White House. Could you tell us why the names of contributors to these programs are not being disclosed? Wouldn't disclosure of the names be a way of assuring the public that there is no conflict of interest?

The President. Well, there can't be any conflict of interest, because we didn't have anything to do with it. We know that such a program is going forward, and we have no contact with it all. But these are people that were so enthused after the presentation was made of the program that, apparently, they are enlisting support just as those who are opposed to it are massing their forces together to oppose the program.

Q. Mr. President, there appears to be a debate within your administration over whether to have mandatory or voluntary limits on Japanese auto imports. Have you decided which you would recommend going with?

Transportation Drew Lewis. We've had one meeting with the task force, a Cabinet meeting, and the second meeting is scheduled for next week, and until then, no decisions have been made. Such things are part of the considerations as well as whatever special things we can do, mainly in the lifting of regulations that have made it more costly to build Amiercan cars and so forth. All of this is going to be discussed and a decision made when we have the final report in from the task force.

Q. Mr. President, I'd like to ask this question in context of the campaign. One of the major issues was what was called the ``war issue'' at that time, in fact the question of whether you would be more toward war than Mr. Carter. And in fact, exit polls showed that some of those who voted did feel that you might get us into one faster. The first major issue in foreign policy has been El Salvador, which has been called risky and reckless by some, and which the allies -- who you have shown in your many times that are very important and key to any question -- have not jumped on the bandwagon supporting you in El Salvador. In fact, in Canada there's some controversy. Aren't you worried about that fact, especially since you go to Canada this week?

The President. What steps to be sure that human rights violations will not be repeated? As you know, an investigation was going forward with regard to an episode that happened before I took office. But in addition to the military aid, we are also supplying general aid and they know our position with regard to the reforms that the Duarte government has been trying to implement -- the land reform, creating of farms for the former tenants -- and we support all of that. And one of our reasons for the support of this government is because we believe that they do hold out the best hope for improving the conditions of the people of El Salvador.

So, we're mindful of that, and we think that the -- when the terrorists themselves, the guerrillas, boast of having killed -- and they give a number somewhere above 6,000 people in the last year -- and that's their own claim of what they've accomplished, we think that we are helping the forces that are supporting human rights in El Salvador.

No, Sarah, no. Ms. Bailey was one of the names under consideration, and she did have the backing of Senator Baker and some others on the Hill. But we also had forces that were supporting other candidates, and we hear everyone's case for -- who recommends someone for a position, and then comparing them all we just make our decision based on who we believe should have the job. And there had been no decision made one way or the other until we made the final decision.

Q. Mr. President, sir, in advance of your trip to Ottawa next week, the most serious bilateral tension between Canada and the United States remains the unratified east coast fishing and boundaries treaty. Are you committed to finding a solution acceptable to the Canadians, or are you prepared to see the fishing portions of the treaty, at least, put into diplomatic limbo?

Mr. President. No, I don't want to see them in diplomatic limbo, and I want to see a settlement of this whole issue and have so informed our people on the Hill of that. But this meeting -- there is going to be the first meeting, and it's going to be one of kind of establishing a base for future negotiations. I don't know whether we will get down to hard issues and make any settlements in a first meeting of this kind, but we'll certainly lay the groundwork for trying to eliminate anything that could divide us or remain a stumbling block to better relations. This is part of what I talked about all during the campaign, from my first announcement on, and that is to start here in the Western Hemisphere with building an accord between the three great countries of North America -- Canada, the United States, and Mexico.

Canadianization of oil interests in that country and also added taxation of their production. It's a plan that has caused some shift of production from Canada, I mean, of exportation from Canada to the United States. What will you be advising Mr. Trudeau next week when you visit with him on that plan? And how is it going to affect U.S. investments in that country?

With regard to energy, I am determined that the proper goal for us must be energy independence in the United States, not that we would take advantage of either of our neighbors there with regard to energy supplies.

Q. Mr. President, in light of what appears to be a growing concern about the drug abuse problem, especially among teenagers, what will your priorities be and specifically, do you expect to have a White House policy on drug abuse?

The President. Yes, I do. In fact, it can be stated as clearly as this: I think this is one of the gravest problems facing us internally in the United States. I've had people talk to me about increased efforts to head off the export into the United States of drugs from neighboring nations. With borders like ours, that, as the main method of halting the drug problem in America, is virtually impossible. It's like carrying water in a sieve.

It is my belief, firm belief, that the answer to the drug problem comes through winning over the users to the point that we take the customers away from the drugs, not take the drugs, necessarily -- try that, of course -- you don't let up on that. But it's far more effective if you take the customers away than if you try to take the drugs away from those who want to be customers.

We had a program in California -- again, I call on that. We had an education program in the schools. We had former drug users who had straightened out. We found that they were most effective in talking to young people. You could go in, I could go in, anyone else and try to talk to these young people and tell them the harm in this and get nowhere. But when someone stood in front of them who said, ``I've been there, and this what it was like, and this is why I'm standing here telling you today,'' we found they listened.

The President. Yes, but I mean I can't recall where our figures stand in comparison to that, but I know that basically our philosophy is one of continued aid. And knowing the problems that have existed between Turkey and another friend and ally of ours, Greece, we are hopeful that whatever we can do in resolving any of the differences there we want to do. But both countries are vital to us. I consider them the southern flank of the NATO line. And, yes, I think there will be improved relations.

Q. Mr. President, if you get the personal income tax cuts that you want and if people use their tax savings to just simply pay their bills, as many of them may do, and make down payments on consumer goods instead of investing the money in things that increase productivity, where does that leave us? Wouldn't inflation then be worse than it is now?

The President. It might be if that happened. And we have done as much studying as we can of that, including a thorough study of the 2-year program of tax cuts under President Kennedy -- well, President Kennedy started them, and they went into effect following his tragic death. And we have been very interested to note -- because there is a parallel between that type of tax cut and what it is we're proposing -- at the bottom of the ladder, spending, yes, there were people pressed as they are by inflation who found that they needed that money for purchases. But as you went up for the scale of earnings, there was a great savings -- in following that 2-year program, during the program and following -- a great increase in personal savings and investment by the American people.

Q. Mr. President, this morning's wholesale price figures seem to indicate that the fuel prices are still one of the prime motivating forces behind spiraling inflation. In light of this, are you having any second thoughts about your decision to decontrol the price of domestic oil, especially in light of some estimates by economists that it has caused the price of gasoline to rise as much as 14 cents a gallon?

The President. No, because we only advanced decontrol. It was supposed to take place in a few months anyway. And the increase in the price of gasoline today is only partly due to that decontrol. Part of it was due to the decontrol that had begun under the previous administration.

The major part of it was the latest increase in OPEC prices, and our decontrolling now only amounts to 3 or 4 cents of the increase in the price of gasoline, and that would have taken place in October anyway, that same decontrol.

We do believe that as time goes on, though, we're going to see increased exploration and development of oil in this country, and that is the road toward lower prices when supply begins to match demand more. So, we don't see any reason, and I don't have any regrets about the change we made. I think the increase in drilling that has taken place, the wells that were unprofitable to pump -- in 1976 we had some 400 wells in California that were closed down simply because at the price that the government would allow them to charge they could not bring the oil to the surface for that price and sell it. Well, wells like that now under decontrol go back into production.

Q. Mr. President, at your first press conference you were asked about the Soviet grain embargo, and you said there were really only two options, either to abandon it or broaden it. Can you tell us which it's going to be, and if you haven't reached a decision yet, can you tell us what factors are still at play here?

But now we have to look at the international situation, the way it is, and see what would be the effect, not just on the use of grain but the whole effect and what would it say to the world now for us to just unilaterally move.

Q. Mr. President, since you've become a strong supporter of the right-to-life movement whose leaders in Congress have introduce an amendment that human life begins at conception rather than birth, how can parents or election boards determine a person's date of conception for purposes of registration and elegibility for running for public office?

The President. Well, I think with the matter that's before the legislature now, there is going to be testimony by medical authorities, theologians, possibly, legal authorities also, and I think what is necessary in this whole problem and has been the least talked of in the whole question about abortion is determining when and what is a human being.

Now, I happen to have believed and stated many times that I believe in an abortion we are taking a human life. But if this is once determined, then there isn't really any need for an amendment, because once you have determined this, the Constitution already protects the right to human life.

No, as I say, I think the idea of human life, once it has been created, and establishing that fact -- and maybe I should have just taken your ``thank you'' and left here on this -- is the whole issue that we have to determine.

It seems strange to me that we have a law, for example, in California, a law that says that if someone abuses or mistreats a pregnant woman to the point of causing the death of her unborn child, that individual will be tried for murder. We know that the law of the land gives an unborn child the right to inherit property, and the law protects property rights. Isn't it time we determined -- if there was some question, if you found a body on the street and you didn't know whether it was dead or alive, wouldn't you opt on the basis that it was alive and not start shoveling dirt on it?

Until we determine and make to the best of our ability a determination of when life begins, we've been opting on the basis that, ``Well, let's consider they're not alive.'' I think that everything in our society calls for opting that they might be alive.

Mr. Wick has been an independent businessman involved in the financing and operation of motion picture, television, radio, music, health care, and mortgage industries in the United States and abroad. He is president and chief executive officer of Wick Financial Corp., and Mapleton Enterprises, which he founded in the early 1960's. He was cochairman of the 1981 Presidential Inaugural Committee.

The President. Well, the Vice President and I are delighted to be here. I know he's speaking to your entire group tomorrow, but I appreciate the opportunity for a dialog with you, who are county officials, and to reaffirm that, if you haven't been told already, that we really intend a working partnership with you as we attempt to solve our nation's economic problems.

Restoring a balance between the Federal Government and other levels of government is and will continue to be the policy of this administration. And the White House Intergovermental Affairs Office, under the leadership of Rich Williamson, will be playing a key role as liaison with you. As a part of restoring the balance, we intend to establish a coordinating task force on federalism and have already been in touch with representatives of your organization to seek advice on how that task force should be organized.

In developing the economic package that -- today's the day it goes up there -- we've tried to be fair and evenhanded. We created a special safety net to protect the truly needy. And we have just one department that, as you well know -- because it's been heralded in the press a number of times -- the Defense Department, that will not be cut back. But even there, Cap Weinberger -- you can count on it -- has already identified and gone to work to make cuts of $3 billion that he believes are unnecessary in there, which, thus, reduces the net increase that we would have for the improved weapons that we think are necessary.

I know there's been a great deal of talk and your concern about the UDAG function. That has not been eliminated. It's combined into a community development support program, and we're sending legislation up to the Hill to carry that out.

With respect to payments -- if this hasn't come up this morning -- in lieu of taxes, the Department of Interior has restructured its budget authority to allow for payments in lieu of taxes for counties which have Federal lands within their jurisdictions. We feel that making payments in lieu of taxes by the Federal Government is part of a being good neighbor. Responsibility of ownership requires landholders to pay their fair share of the cost of local government, and Federal Government shouldn't be exempt.

Now, Vice President Bush will be addressing, as I said, tomorrow, and I'll jump the gun and tell you, he's in charge of a task force on regulatory relief, and I think that indicates the importance we place on that. Now, most of the attention seems to be given when this is discussed to what it's done to the private sector and to business and so forth, but you, county government, know how much unnecessary paperwork has been generated by the Federal Government, and we intend to change that.

The President. The President's Commission on Women -- you know, I have to say I don't know whether that subject has even come up, so I would assume that we probably are. I think so, yes, because I have -- being notorious for not supporting the amendment, during the campaign I made it plain, and I meant this very much -- having passed 14 statutes in California where, to eliminate particular discriminations that we found in State law, I said then that we are going to have liaison with the States to pursue that course and someone in the White House to direct this and to help other levels of government find, where maybe in their own regulations without their realizing, they have such discriminatory practices. And it worked just fine for us -- changing those 14 statutes.

Q. Mr. President, we support your program to cut Federal spending, especially the CETA/PSC jobs, but we'd like to know what kind of programs you're proposing to take the disadvantaged off of welfare and to give them meaningful work.

The President. Well, one of the things that we're talking about now is based on something we did in California in our welfare reforms. As we give the States more authority in administering these programs by way of block grants, we are working on legislation right now that would further give flexibility to the States and allow them to require able-bodied welfare recipients to work at useful community projects in return for their welfare grants. And in California, even though the 1974 recession was coming on -- in the '73, '74 recession -- and unemployment increasing, in only 35 counties of California would they permit us to have an experiment of that kind. And we funneled 76,000 people through that program into private enterprise jobs.

What we did was not only require the work in useful community projects but then we assigned -- and I throw this out for a suggestion -- we assigned people from our labor department, State labor department, as what we called job agents to be given a list, a group of these people, to keep an eye on them, and then to go to work to see how quickly, based on what they saw of their abilities and so forth, they could move them out into private employment. And as I say, it was 76,000, and we think that this was the best thing that we had found in all the years that we were battling with this particular problem. So, if we can get that through, that will be one of the further flexibilities that you will all have. And, remember, we only had it in 35 counties. They wouldn't even let us have it in the great metropolitan areas like San Francisco and Los Angeles County.

Q. Mr. President, I don't know if sitting in the back is an advantage or not, but first of all, we appreciate very much your taking time to visit with us this morning. I'm Bob Eckels from Harris County. In the conference which we had with you, several of us, a few weeks ago, we mentioned two things: One was the creation of the position which Rich Williamson is doing now, and we appreciate that very much and look forward to working with him. The second thing that we were looking for was as these cuts are instituted, that they be done in a slow fashion, not a cold turkey, necessary situation, but allowing the local governments time to find a method for either substitution or elimination of the program without the catastrophic political effects that it can have on the local offices. Has anyone in the staff had an opportunity to review the time factors in coming into this?

The President. I'm sure that is being considered. I can't say that I participated in a meeting where that has been discussed, but I'll tell you now, I will look into that, see what I can find out about it.

Q. Al Delbello, Westchester County, New York. We're having a great deal of trouble in sustaining our mass transit system in that metropolitan New York area, particularly the commuter rail and the commuter bus services. I'm very unclear with regard to the direction you will be taking on commuter rail subsidization programs in the near future.

The President. Well, I have to tell you that I know, I can't give you the detail on all that -- I know, however, that there are going to be cutbacks in that, and some features will be incorporated in the block grants for your own discretion about using those.

It's been 5 for many years and most helpful. I wonder if there would be any chance of the administration reconsidering maybe 7 or 7\1/2\ percent money. This has a great effect on rural homes and our water and waste water treatment systems, and this money does flow back. I would like for the President, if you would, to respond to those interest rates.

The President. Let me say this one thing on those loans and where we felt that we had to come up closer to the market rate on them. At the time, the original 5 percent was in keeping with what was pretty much the private interest rate, and no change was ever made. Now, the situation for us and for all the citizens is this: that when we approve those loans at that lower interest rate, the Treasury Department doesn't have any money to loan, running in a deficit situation, it has to go out into the market and borrow the interest at the high-interest rate and then turn around and lend it at this lower rate. And, perhaps not in this particular program, where homes and things are involved, we've actually found that there are some people that have discovered that it's just fine to get one of those loans, and then they go around on the other side and buy the government securities at the higher rate. And it makes a nice circle and a profitable one for them.

But we feel that what we're doing -- whether that's the right figure or not, I'm sure that will be discussed and debated on the Hill -- but to bring it up, because it always had been pretty much consistent with the going rate of interest. And the main purpose of it was not to give low-interest money; it was for those people that did not have the assets that they would need to cover going into the private fund market. Well, that provision still remains, but we believe that it is fair to bring that up closer to the going rate.

Kansas. And my biggest concern for the rural problem or the rural counties is that for the producers of food and fiber, the price has been -- continuously since the first of the year, been going down. All the commodities and the prices of everything that they purchase has been going up considerably. We've had 10-percent and probably and average of 12-percent increase in everything they buy. And they feel that we sure need to open up some export markets or something to get this thing moving. For instance the price of wheat has dropped 75 cents since the first of the year back at the local elevators, and this is causing a lot of sale bills to go up on the wall. And I'm very concerned about the younger generation that's just trying to get into the operation of farming.

The President. Sir, I wish right now that I had John Block here, because we've got a working farmer today as Secretary of Agriculture, and he's completely aware of these problems. And all of us have been made aware that in food pricing, with all of the talk of prices up and down -- it's an amazing thing that what happens from after it leaves the farm until it gets to the customer at the supermarket shelf, the fluctuations in price and so forth. But it hasn't been reflected for the farmer.

You're going to cut the budget and balance it at the Federal level. But the bad news is that it looks like those programs are headed our way, and we don't really see the revenue sources that were supposed to come with them yet.

The President. We think that the block grants and the flexibility they give you is going to be more helpful than we realize, because a lot of the cuts that are being made in the overall size are in administrative overhead that was accumulated from this end, and giving you the flexibility to set your own priorities without the rigid requirements of the past would help. But I only tell you what -- and we can get over this hurdle and get this government back down to the size it should be and start.

No, I have a dream of my own. I think block grants are really only an intermediate step. I dream of the day when the Federal Government can substitute for those turning back to local and State governments the tax sources that we ourselves have preempted here at the Federal level so that you would have those tax sources.

Region and chairman of a four-county district in economic development. You had made reference to UDAG being integrated with, perhaps, an expansion block grant. Is that similar approach in mind for at least funding of those things that are in the pipeline and had the communities' expectation raised that they would get funding for it -- basic economic development grants?

The President. I don't know that I have the answer to that. We're dealing right now, of course, with 1981. We're making some cuts, but as far into the year that we are, it isn't anything like the cuts that we intend for the 1982 budget. So, I can't believe that there would be too much of a change for things that are already in the pipeline at all. You have a better answer to that?

Mr. Williamson. That's right. See, eventually it'll percolate up to the man, but the work that's being done, that Ed Meese mentioned earlier with Dave Stockman, the UDAG function -- the existing grants that have been committed and those applications in the pipeline would be funded enough within the ceiling that the President has established so that the administration would meet the existing commitments and be able to process the commitments that are now in the pipeline.

Q. Okay, I understand that with regard to UDAG. I think that was explained to the mayors or the city people when they met. I'm talking about the Economic Development Administration's funded programs that have been so important in helping to be the seed money for long-term productive employment in the private sector, because we know for every 1 percent of unemployment, it's going to cost the Federal Government maybe upwards to $25 billion a year. And I have a report of our four-county district which indicates that the seed money has been less than $1,000 per job created from the EDA grants. And there's about 15 projects that are in the pipeline that have been prioritized locally, and I'm sure that's true all across the country. And our concern is that they might not be able to all be funded out of the '81 allocations, and it might need to run into '82 before it's phased out.

Mr. Williamson. Well, just to respond to that quickly, and I'll sit back down. [Laughter] The task force that Ed Meese has together with Dave Stockman and Malcolm Baldrige and Sam Pierce working on the details of the community development support program for, hopefully, as soon as possible, to pass on to the President -- that has been discussed with respect to the economic development grants and, in fact, met with the mayor of San Juan with respect to a particular problem they had just last week, and we're attempting to get a resolution. The only one that there's been a final signoff within the task force for recommendation to the President has to deal with the UDAG aspect. But there are three other aspects that will go into the larger block grant community development, and there's not been a resolution. It would be very helpful if at the end of today you would pass that on to me, because no decision finally has been made yet.

The President. Let me just say, if I seem to be flying blind here, it isn't that. We've had hours and hours of Cabinet meetings -- and the major issue on each one of these cuts does come there, and all of the input and sometimes pro and con within the Cabinet discussion -- and based on all of that input I finally make a decision. But coming from 739 billion down to 695, I have to tell you honestly, some of the details on these things I can't remember. I just have to assume we've made the decision with the information that we have.

Officials. Since the thrust of the block grants has been directed toward the States, what kind of direction is going to be provided to the States to make sure that they filter down through local governments kinds of moneys that we need to provide the programs that we're most responsible for?

The President. Well, very obviously, I think I can say -- if I interpret what might be your concern there -- obviously, the State government, who wants to give all the flexibility it can, is certainly not going to hold still for anything being used at a different level of government in a discriminatory fashion. We won't permit that. And I think we have a right to say that.

So, I have every confidence that the flexibility that is given will be one that will allow the utmost in economies and so forth. But that will not allow any retreat from where we are and what we are and what we want to do for all the people of this country.

Q. Elizabeth Cofield, from Raleigh, North Carolina, county commissioner. And I haven't heard anything pertaining to education, and I'm very concerned about that. And I know that education in the terms of grants and loans have to suffer just as all others. But I would like to encourage you, Mr. President, to encourage those who will be making the reduction in loans and grants and other titles to look at it very carefully so that we don't throw the babies out with the wash water.

The President. I couldn't agree more, and I assure you, we're not going to do that. Now, I just heard someone on the air yesterday and talking about tremendous cuts in educational funding and so forth. What they forget is that Federal funding of education only amounts to 10 percent of the cost of education, and they don't make that plain. This man was talking as if, why, there's going to be a 25-percent cut in the overall support for education. Well, 25 percent of 10 percent is 2\1/2\ percent. And we feel that a lot of the Federal Government's aid to education has resulted in unnecessary interference in education, which, in reality, has probably undone a lot of the help that the money would be by forcing added expense on the schools.

I had a college president tell me the other day that the paperwork, the administrative work required now for government help in his college has made his administrative cost for that go from $50,000 a year in his campus to $650,000 a year. Now, that'd hire a lot of professors that could teach. And so, we feel that we're not going to do anything to hurt education, and we think we are going to put it back in the hands of people that are closer to the scene and out of here. And I'm confident -- we have an educator as the Secretary of that department right now. So, believe me, education has a good voice in our circles.

Mr. Orr. I just want to say, Mr. President, on behalf of the National Association of Counties, that we appreciate you very much for taking your time. We realize that it's tough to face this many people -- the directors of our national association, that reaches from the south to the north, to the east, to the west -- and have all the answers that everybody wants. But we assure you that we want to be a good partner, and we will. And you thrill us when you say that you're going to return some of the authority back to the States and back to the local authorities and back to the counties, where we know that we're the government that's closest to the people.

The President. Well, thank you. You've inspired me with that pothole. I'm just going to take one second and tell you my first -- [laughter] -- as a small boy, my first experience with hearing about county problems.

My brother, who was just a few years older than me, had gotten a job, he and another teenage kid, sitting on the back of a truck. And there was a fellow running for the Illinois State Legislature, and he was campaigning. And while he was speaking in each town, at outdoor rallies, they were to get off and pass out the leaflets in the town. He came home that night scared to death. They'd gotten out of town under a shower of rocks and paving stones and so forth.

In this position, he has specialized in liaison with Federal departments and agencies and has represented the company's position on matters before the Congress, particularly energy, energy tax, environmental, regulatory, and wage-price issues. He is president of the firm of Manarin, Odle, and Rector, Inc., in Alexandria, Va.

Today I'm signing a message to the Congress that adds hundreds of savings to the 83 major reductions that we announced on February 18th, and this brings our proposed budget outlay savings for 1982 to $48.6 billion. In addition, I'm proposing changes in user charges and off-budget payments that will save another $7.3 billion. Now, these are unprecedented cuts to meet an unprecedented situation, and they mark the end of an old era and the beginning of a new one. We're determined to enable the American people to gain control of the runaway government which threatens our economic vitality.

The details of this program, which have been drawn up and completed during the past 6 weeks, will be released tomorrow when the official budget goes to Congress. Like the first round of cuts, these reductions are evenhanded, and the safety net of basic income suport programs remains intact. Although it is now up to the Congress to act on these proposals, I believe that the Congress and the executive branch have a responsibility to involve the American people directly in these deliberations. We must see to it that the voice of the average American, not that of special interests or full-time lobbyists, is the dominant one.

If we can control spending and shave a few points off the inflation rate, we can do more good for the poor, the elderly, and the finances of State and local government than any package of Federal programs ever could. The reductions contained in this message are part of a longer term program designed to stop inflation, reward enterprise and initiative, and put America back on the road to prosperity. As I've said many times, our ultimate goal is to make government, again, the servant of the people by cutting its size and scope and ensuring that its legitimate functions are carried out efficiently and justly.

I pledged then to take the action necessary to alleviate the grievous economic plight of our people. The plan I outlined will stop runaway inflation and revitalize our economy if given a chance. There is nothing but politics-as-usual standing in the way of lower inflation, increased productivity, and a return to prosperity.

Government programs. Instead, it recognizes basic economic facts of life and, as humanely as possible, it will move America back toward economic sanity. The principles are easily understood, but it will take determination to apply them. Nevertheless, if inflation and unemployment are to be curtailed, we must act.

Further, I am proposing changes in user charges and off-budget payments that will bring total fiscal savings to $55.9 billion. This compares with $49.1 billion in fiscal savings announced on February 18.

The budget reductions we are proposing will, undoubtedly, face stiff opposition from those who are tied to maintaining the status quo. But today's status quo is nothing more than economic stagnation coupled with high inflation. Dramatic change is needed or the situation will simply get worse, resulting in even more suffering and misery, and possibly the destruction of traditional American values.

While recognizing the need for bold action, we have ensured that the impact of spending reductions will be shared widely and fairly by different groups and the various regions of the country. Also, we have, as pledged, maintained this society's basic social safety net, protecting programs for the elderly and others who rely on Government for their very existence.

Budget cuts alone, however, will not turn this economy around. Our package includes a proposal to reduce substantially the presonal income tax rates levied on our people and to accelerate the recovery of business with capital investment. These rate reductions are essential to restoring strength and growth to the economy by reducing the existing tax barriers that discourage work, saving, and investment. Individuals are the ultimate source of all savings and investment. Lasting economic progress, which is our goal, depends on our success in encouraging people to involve themselves in this kind of productive behavior.

When considering the economic recovery package, I urge the Members of Congress to remember that last November the American people's message was loud and clear. The mandate for change, expressed by the American people, was not my mandate; it was our mandate. Together we must remember that our primary responsibility is to the Nation as a whole and that there is nothing more important than putting America's economic house in order.

The next steps are up to Congress. It has not been easy for my Administration to prepare this revised budget. I am aware that it will not be easy for the Congress to act upon it. I pledge my full cooperation. It is essential that, together, we succeed in again making this Nation a land whose expanding economy offers an opportunity for all to better themselves, a land where productive behavior is rewarded, a land where one need not fear that economic forces beyond one's control will, through inflation, destroy a lifetime of savings.

You come to us, Mr. President, representing the country that is both our nearest neighbor and also which the history of this twentieth century has made our closest ally. Through the long years of our association, Canada and the United States of America have met and overcome many challenges and problems together. We have, I believe, acted effectively as partners, confident that our differences make our combined efforts that much more effective.

Mr. President, I am confident that your visit to Canada will serve to strengthen the firm and rational ties of friendship and practical cooperation which exist firmly and historically between our two countries. While here, I hope that beyond the sometimes formal aspects of state occasions that you will also encounter something of the human, kindred dimension which gives relations between Canada and the United States, and as between the millions of individual Americans and Canadians, their deeper meaning and their unique character.

The President. Your Excellencies, Nancy and I are happy to be here. One can receive no warmer greeting than the heartfelt welcome of a trusted friend. And yes, we, the people of the United States and of Canada, are more than good neighbors; we're good friends. We citizens of North America, while respecting the sovereignty and independence of our respective national identities, are without question friends that can be counted upon. Whether in times of trial and insecurity or in times of peace and commerce, our relationship has never weakened. The faith between us has never wavered.

We each play a separate and important role in international affairs. We have economic interests that bind us in cooperation and, in some cases, put us into competition. But these separate roles are respected by our two peoples and have never diminished the harmony between us.

I hope this visit will make clear my commitment as President of the United States to work in close cooperation with the Government of Canada. Whether in trade or defense or protection of our environment and natural resources, our two nations shall continue the unique relationship that has been the envy of the world, a relationship that has enhanced the standard of living and the freedom of our people. Let us continue, and let us move forward.

Like Americans, Canadians are used to welcoming Americans. Last year, Mr. President, some 75 million border crossings were recorded between our two countries. That's about three times, more than three times, the entire population of Canada. So, Canadians know Americans, and Canadians like Americans. We like you because not only have we shared this continent together with our friends and neighbors, the Americans, with our friends and neighbors, the Mexicans, who have spanned this New World from one ocean to the other, but we also enjoy this neighborhood because we share the same values -- individual liberty, justice, democratic values.

Mr. President, more than two centuries ago a great band of the brotherhood of man wrote the most revolutionary script since the New Testament. I'm talking of the American Constitution. And not content with that, they went on in the same sweet breath of humanity to write a Bill of Rights.

Mr. President, those two documents, the words in there, the ideas in there, were heard around the world. Indeed, more than the shot fired at Lexington, it is these ideas and these values which have made America, the United States of America, the first great modern nation.

And that is why, Mr. President, the winds of freedom which first began to blow in your country and which then spread all over the world make that Canada and Canadians. As you can see from these signs and as you can hear from some of these lonely voices, Canadians expect much of Americans. But more important, Canadians have faith in the Americans. We know that our long relationship has been based on more than neighborhood; it's been based on friendship and on a sharing of these values. That is why we are happy you have come to visit us, to exchange ideas with us, and to seek solutions to the problems that often develop between two great nations and two neighbors.

Mr. President, we owe it to this friendship between our nations -- I love hecklers; I don't know about you, Mr. President. This could go on for a long while, because to each of these manifestations, to each of these concerns, there are answers. You and I, your government and ours, your people and ours, will find the answers because we have faith in the people of the United States. As you have said, Mr. President, the greatest asset of the United States is the freedom of its people. This freedom we enjoy and this freedom you will feel amongst us.

It was said once of this place that it grasps and materializes the beauty of Canada, the vastness of its lands, its loneliness, its youth, and its hope. And yet Parliament Hill is more than an imposing symbol of your nation; it is also a landmark of the New World, a monument to the right of self-government and the value of human freedom that even sometimes, as you yourself have pointed out, makes raucous behavior permissible. This belief in self-rule and the rights of the individual springs from a common heritage that formed the backdrop for our discussions in the next 2 days.

Now, Mr. Prime Minister, there is important work on the agenda before us -- improving our trade, protecting our environment, safeguarding our freedom. But before we begin our public business, I did want to address one other matter between us that should be dealt with early on.

It spoke with great affection about people of the United States, their generosity, their inner strength. That testimony in our land was reprinted many times in magazines and newspapers, played on radio stations and even in nightclubs in my country. It touched the American people deeply that anyone should think so kindly of us. But I don't think it surprised us to learn that the journalist who wrote those very kind words was a Canadian.

And so, Mr. Prime Minister, before we discuss the other important matters before us, I want to take this occasion not to talk about the affairs of state, but to speak from the heart to the heart, to say to the Canadian people, the people of the United States do not merely value your friendship, we cherish it. We are here today not just to seek friendly ties with a neighboring nation and a world power but to strengthen instead the deep, unbending bonds of trust between old and devoted friends.

Following the remarks, the President and the Prime Minister met privately in the Prime Minister's office in the Centre Block. They then went to the Prime Minister's residence for a luncheon. Later in the afternoon, the President and the Prime Minister and their delegations held a meeting in the Cabinet Room at the Centre Block.

The Governor General. Mr. President, when such close neighbors as your charming wife and yourself come to visit, I've found that the planned protocol gives way, at least in part, to a natural hospitality. Only recently you and I both would probably have used the expression ``good old western hospitality,'' but in current circumstances for you and me perhaps some other term is to be found. In any case, it is the rapport that exists between the entirety of our two nations that matters and which obviously has motivated you to make such an early visit to Canada. For this we are greatly appreciative in all parts of the country, and that you have chosen to do so within the first 2 months of your new administration is something which compounds our feeling.

In addition to your discussions on specific items, there is, I suggest, a very powerful and positive symbolic purpose in this visit as well. For the past seven decades or more, which happens to coincide with the creation by your country and ours of the International Joint Commission, the relationship between our two countries has been a model for others. Despite occasional differences, the overwhelming momentum in all this time has been always toward positive, productive friendship.

In the past 60 years or so, every President of the United States, with only one or two rather circumstantial exceptions, has visited here and, may I say, obviously and hopefully for the future, with honorable and good mutual result. You are continuing in that tradition, which I believe has produced a bond which was unique and still is almost unique among sovereign states everywhere.

We on both sides of the border, I think, often refer to the 4,000 miles and more of virtually unpatrolled border, to the kindred cultures and affinities, to the scientific and technical cooperation -- as in the space shuttle, to mention just one example -- to our political systems which, despite interesting and intriguing and subtle differences, produce an impressively similar stability for fundamental freedoms and due process and equality before the law. Ironically, visits by their very nature often tend to focus greater attention on those far less numerous issues which divide us, on which we have differences. And I suppose this is a normal part of the day-to-day of the bilateral relations in this world of reality. But if that be so, then that is precisely why it is so ultimately important that this visit demonstrate to all, so there can be no misreading or misunderstanding, that beneath the complexity of some of the issues -- and some of them, goodness knows, are complex enough -- lies a very firm bond of friendship, proven to be so by history and based upon constitutional restraint of power and motivated by plain decency and love of freedom.

Given all this, Mr. President, we can surely withstand the differences and, I would suggest, even the occasional ribbing which we know very well goes on, both at the officials' level and among the millions of our respective citizens. I won't try to relate some anecdote or examples of this ribbing that I refer to. In fact, I don't know if it's wise to relate any of them. But I think I could say as an aside that no one is excluded from this, including some present and former Prime Ministers and Presidents themselves.

Now, as between sisters, I'm not so sure; I don't really know. But those of you who have brothers will know very well how imaginative and descriptive some of this language can become in otherwise rather fraternal relations. Maybe it's just as well that I not elaborate further.

Still, I must mention that some Canadians are defensive about our winters, particularly since in very recent years the expression ``Canadian snowbirds'' became widespread in your country among some of your countrymen. But then our retort could well be to quote from a famous American poet, Walt Whitman. He said, and I quote, ``I have often doubted whether there could be a great and sturdy people without the hardy influence of winter in due proportion. ``I don't know, Mr. President, what your response or sequel to that might be, but I don't urge you to come up with it tonight necessarily.

In closing, I should like to say -- and with all the emphasis that I can muster -- that a remarkable relationship indeed has been created between our two countries. And it has been sustained, despite some tangible differences, because of human decency and fair play and by the rational resorting in complex matters and circumstances to procedures and mechanisms that were once and are still today exemplary to the whole world. I have mentioned the IJC. I refer to the scientific and defense research cooperation arrangements, et cetera, et cetera.

Earlier today I tried with words en francais de meme qu'en anglais to express for the Canadian people the kind of welcome that they would want to extend to you. If, as I said, the planet is becoming a global village, then this is the house next door. You are both, both of you, as plainly and as fully welcome as that. And then to find that hosting you could be enjoyable as well, well, that's a bonus which we shall keep in our memory and treasure.

The President. Your Excellency, I think this matter of humor and laughing or ribbing that may take place -- I know that in World War II, Winston Churchill said of your fighting men and ours and his own that we seemed to be the only people in the world that could laugh and fight at the same time. Now, I don't think he had in mind carrying that over into peacetime. So, we won't try to do that. But Nancy and I want to thank you for your warm words and generous welcome to this land of friends.

Friendship is not easily defined, but today I think I gained a better understanding of what our friendship means to each other. As we arrived this morning on Parliament Hill, we crossed Ottawa's Rideau Canal. The old canal, now nearly 150 years old, winds through Ottawa as a reminder of our relationship. I learned that it was built by an engineer who planned it as a military defense to protect Canada from the United States. [Laughter] Once intended to protect your nation from mine in war, it's now a place of serene peace. In the winter it becomes one of the longest skating rinks anywhere, and in the summer it charms visitors, I've been told, with the weeping willows that arch over it. But I didn't see that portion of it where there were weeping willows, but I trust they are there.

Our people know that our nations were forged in this like heritage. Our people inherited the resilience of those who first opened the mighty waterways which cross and thus give life to our continent -- the Mississippi, the Columbia, the Saint Lawrence, the Great Lakes. We've grown up with our own national characters, but we share the independence and self-reliance of courageous pioneers such as Cartier, LaSalle, Lewis and Clark, and Mackenzie. Yet we also share the frontiersman's dependence on his neighbor, a trait that came to us early when settlers turned to each other to clear a forest, to raise a house, barter their goods. This North American spirit is a bond between our people, and we must never take it for granted.

New ways must be found to reinforce our special relationship. We live on the strongest, most prosperous continent on Earth. But as we develop our resources, we must protect the environment around us. We will never shirk our responsibility to defend our way of life when it is threatened. Prime Minister Trudeau, while visiting the United States, said that our nation was once the hope of the New World. Well, he's right. And I would like to add that our New World of freedom and democracy is now the hope of the entire world.

As we work to keep this spirit of cooperation fresh, we will continue to respect each other's sovereignty, recognize our distinct national interests, and maintain our individual commitments to greater self-sufficiency.

Robert W. Service lived in Canada for many years and wrote about the taming of our continent and about the wild Canadian northlands. The law of the Yukon Road is that only the strong shall thrive, only the fit will survive. This is the challenge to our nations in the world today. Our national characters were forged on such a frontier. I'm confident that Canada and the United States, independent but together, can meet the test.

Mr. President, yesterday I welcomed you to Canada. Well, I repeat that welcome now because in this chamber Canada's democracy finds its ultimate expression. Here, in a special way, we speak on behalf of the people of Canada. And here, the people of Canada are honored to receive you, sir.

Nations do not choose their neighbors; geography does that. The sense of neighborhood, however, is more than a product of geography; it is a creation of people who may live as far apart as California and Quebec. It is what makes neighbors of Canada and Mexico, for instance.

North America but the New World. We share the dreams that have made this continent a beacon, a hope, and a haven for people everywhere. We share the courage and joy in hard work that enabled us to build two great federal states side by side, from our first landfalls on the Atlantic to our last frontiers on the Pacific. We cherish what we have made. We are determined to preserve it, but at the same time we have been glad to admit others to the bounty and freedom we have found here.

We are only now finishing the work of writing ours and bringing it home. You fought a tragic civil war. We have recently undergone the experience of a referendum that involved no violence, but nonetheless touched the very fiber of this country. The differences of history affect our relations today because they affect our perceptions, our approaches, our priorities.

The character of the Canadian people, Mr. President, has also made Canada. But here in Canada, our own realities have sometimes made it necessary for governments to further enterprise. Those realities and that necessity are still with us today.

In the years ahead, the United States will face a dynamic neighbor to the north. As we put our house in order, we in Canada will grow in self-confidence. We will see our interests more clearly and pursue them more vigorously. What will not change, however, is our deep friendship with the United States. Indeed, the relationship between our two countries will grow as Canada grows.

Certainly, we will have some lively discussions over the back fence. But we have always spoken plainly to each other, plainly but with mutual respect, because that is the way sovereign equals and close friends should speak to each other.

I believe that we must neither cower before reality nor oversimplify it. Yet complexity should not obscure plain truth. On this most favored of continents, we can not simply turn our gaze inwards and ignore poverty, ignorance, and injustice elsewhere.

To the East, Mr. President, we face a system that seems ill-designed to respond to change and growth. Nevertheless, the Soviet Union and the Eastern European states may come to accommodate themselves at least to the dynamics of their own region. If, for example, the Polish people are able to work out their own destiny within a framework accepted by their neighbors, then they will have matched revolution with a no less remarkable evolution. Through courage and restraint they will have begun the process of making their reality more Polish and their system more responsive, more adaptable, and ultimately more stable.

In the West, Mr. President, we have a long familiarity with the pressures of change. In the past decade our economies have undergone a severe test, as trusted assumptions have been found wanting. In the 1970's we were buffetted by the rude shock of rapid energy price increases. We were forced to recognize that the old monopoly of economic power was coming to an end. And yet for all the strains upon us, our political and economic framework has survived, survived at least as well as the chicken and the neck to which Winston Churchill once referred in this chamber.

Each of the Western countries has met the challenge of change in its own way. Since all of us have our own distinctive economic strengths and weaknesses, our solutions have had to be diverse. We have found no simple answers. We've fashioned no single way. With cooperation and consultation, however, we've been able to complement our various approaches.

At another level, though, we do have a single approach. Let there be no doubt about our unity in the defense of our most precious heritage -- that democracy which is envied by those who rightly crave it and feared by those who wrongly deny its force.

As to North and South, we are not dismayed by the complexity of the problems. The poverty of the developing countries does not have to be permanent, nor is it unalloyed. The gap between the two groups is neither racial nor unbridgeable. In the growth of the oil-producing states, in the vigor of the newly industrialized countries, there is convincing evidence of the dynamism and potential of the developing world. In the unity of the South, there's not so much an identity of circumstances as an idea, a point of view, a shared sense of injustice. The poorer peoples are at the mercy of circumstances that leave them out of balance, often out of hope, and too often vulnerable to opportunists who come poaching in troubled waters. The industrialized democracies have not only a human duty but a strategic obligation to help developing countries in their struggle, their survival, and their success.

Mr. President, humanity will prevail. We in the New World can never be pessimists, for we are, in a very real sense, the custodians of the future. You have reminded us of this, sir, on both sides of the 49th parallel. You've done so by evoking a past in which both our peoples have been the architects of change, not its victims. I wish you well in your task and comfort in your burden. May part of that comfort come from the assurance of Canada's abiding friendship for your country and for your people.

Some years ago, Nancy and I both belonged to a very honorable profession in California. And as I prepared for these remarks today, I learned that among those in the motion picture industry in Hollywood, it has been estimated that perhaps as many as one out of five are of Canadian origin.

Now, many of those whom I counted as close professional colleagues and, indeed, close personal friends did not come from America's heartland, as I did, but from the heart of Canada, as did most of you in this historic chamber. Art Linkletter, Glenn Ford, Raymond Massey, Walter Pidgeon, Raymond Burr are but a few of your countrymen who are celebrated in our entertainment industry.

I believe I know the very special relationship between Canada and the United States, but with all respect to those few that I have mentioned, I can do better than that. A young lady once came to Hollywood from Toronto, and before long little Gladys Smith was embraced by our entire nation.

Affinity, heritage, common borders, mutual interests -- these have all built the foundation for our strong bilateral relationship. This relationship has grown to include some of the strongest economic links among the nations of this Earth. Some 16 percent of America's total world trade is done with Canada. Our joint trade amounts to about 90 billion Canadian dollars annually. This is greater than the gross national product of some 150 countries. It's estimated that three-quarters of a million United States workers are employed in exports to Canada and, in turn, Canadian exports to the United States account for one-sixth of your gross national product. Not only is the vast bulk of this trade conducted between private traders in two free economic systems, but more than half crosses our borders duty-free. Our seaways, highways, airways, and rails are the arteries of a massive, interconnecting trade network which has been critically important to both of us.

These strong and significant mutual interests are among the reasons for my visit here. Already, I have shared with Prime Minister Trudeau very helpful discussions across a range of issues -- to listen and to ensure that these important ties shall not loosen.

I'm happy to say that in the recent past we've made progress on matters of great mutual importance. Our governments have already discussed one of the largest joint private projects ever undertaken by two nations -- the pipeline to bring Alaskan gas to the continental United States.

We've continued our efforts, begun with the Great Lakes Water Quality Agreement of 1972, to protect our joint heritage in the Great Lakes. We want to continue to work cooperatively to understand and control the air and water pollution that respects no borders.

For more than two decades now, NORAD has bound us together in our common defense with an integrated command structure symbolizing our interdependence. This agreement represents continued progress in our relations and mutual security.

And second, we have concluded an agreement regarding social security benefits between those of our citizens who combine work in both nations. And with this new agreement, these people who are employed in both countries, they can then be eligible for the combined benefits. And the workers will be eligible for those benefits in whichever country they choose to live.

Five weeks ago, I reported to the American people that the U.S. economy faced the worst economic mess since the great worldwide depression. We're a proud people, but we're also realists. The time has come for us to face up to what I described as a potential economic calamity.

I raise this issue today because America holds a genuine belief in its obligation to consult with its friends and neighbors. The economic actions that we take affect not just us alone but the relationships across our borders as well.

Federal Government has grown explosively in a very short period of time. We found that there had grown up a maze of stifling regulations, which began to crush initiative and deaden the dynamic industrial innovation which brought us to where we are. We saw unbelievable deficits -- this year alone reaching up to nearly $80 billion, including off-budget items. And we found that these deficits got in no one's way, because the Government found it easy to fuel inflation by printing more money just to make up the difference.

The American taxing structure, the purpose of which was to serve the people, began instead to serve the insatiable appetite of government. If you will forgive me, you know someone has once likened government to a baby. It is an alimentary canal with an appetite at one end and no sense of responsibility at the other. [Laughter] But our citizens were being thrown into higher tax brackets for simply trying to keep pace with inflation. In just the last 5 years, Federal personal taxes for the average American household have increased 58 percent. The results: crippling inflation, interest rates which went above 20 percent, a national debt approaching a trillion dollars, nearly 8 million people out of work, and a steady 3-year decline in productivity.

We decided not just to complain, but to act. In a series of messages and actions, we have begun the slow process of stopping the assault on the American economy and returning to the strong and steady prosperity that we once enjoyed. It's very important for us to have friends and partners know and understand what we're doing. Let me be blunt and honest. The United States in the last few years has not been as solid and stable an ally and trading partner as it should be. How can we expect certain things of our friends if we don't have our own house in order?

Americans are uniting now as they always have in times of adversity. I have found there is a wellspring of spirit and faith in my country which will drive us forward to gain control of our lives and restore strength and vitality to our economic system. But we act not just for ourselves but to enhance our relationships with those we respect.

United States. We're proposing that instead of having our national budget grow at the unacceptable rate of 14 percent per year, it should rise at a more sensible 6 percent. This enables us to maintain the kind of growth we need to protect those in our society who are truly dependent on government services. Just yesterday, I submitted our proposed budget for the coming year -- and then immediately crossed the border. [Laughter] With extraordinary effort, we've isolated some 83 items for major savings and hundreds more for smaller savings, which together amount to $48.6 billion in the coming fiscal year.

Our second proposal is a 10-percent cut across the board every year for 3 years in the tax rates for all individual income tax payers, making a total cut in tax rates of 30 percent. This will leave our taxpayers with $500 billion more in their pockets over the next 5 years and create dramatic new incentives to boost productivity and fight inflation. When these personal cuts are combined with tax cuts to provide our business and industry with new capital for innovation and growth, we will be creating millions of new jobs, many of them ultimately on your side of the border.

Our third proposal is to eliminate those unproductive and unnecessary regulations which have slowed down our growth and added to our inflationary burdens. We shall do this with care, while still safeguarding the health and safety of the American people and, I might add, while mindful of our responsibility to have equal regard for the health and safety of our neighbors.

As I said, America's program for economic recovery is designed not merely to solve an internal problem; it is viewed by my administration as part of an essential effort to restore the confidence of our friends and allies in what we're doing. When we gain control of our inflation, we can once again contribute more helpfully to the health of the world economy. We believe that confidence will rise, interest rates will decline, and investment will increase. As our inflation is reduced, your citizens and other world citizens will have to import less inflation from us.

As we begin to expand our economy once again and as our people begin to keep more control of their own money, we'll be better trading partners. Our growth will help fuel the steady prosperity of our friends. The control we regain over our tax and regulatory structures will have the effect of restoring steady growth in U.S. productivity. Our goods will go into markets not laden down with the drag of regulatory baggage or punitive levies, but with a competitive edge that helps us and those who trade with us.

Now, such new, sustained prosperity in an era of reduced inflation will also serve worldwide to help all of us resist protectionist impulses. We want open markets. We want to promote lower costs globally. We want to increase living standards throughout the world. And that's why we're working so hard to bring about this economic renewal.

There are, of course, other very important reasons for us to restore our economic vitality. Beyond our shores and across this troubled globe, the good word of the United States and its ability to remain stable and dependable rely in good part on our having a stable and dependable economy.

Projecting solid internal strengths is essential to the West's ability to maintain peace and security in the world. Thus, our national interests, our bilateral interests, and our hemispheric interests are profoundly involved in truly international questions. That's why we must act now, why we can no longer be complacent about the consequences of economic deterioration. We've entered an era which commands the Alliance to restore its leadership in the world. And before we can be strong in the world, we must be once again strong at home.

Now, with our other friends, we must embark with great spirit and commitment on the path toward unity and strength. On this side of the Atlantic, we must stand together for the integrity of our hemisphere, for the inviolability of its nations, for its defense against imported terrorism, and for the rights of all our citizens to be free from the provocations triggered from outside our sphere for malevolent purposes. Across the oceans, we stand together against the unacceptable Soviet invasion into Afghanistan and against continued Soviet adventurism across the Earth. And toward the oppressed and dispirited people of all nations, we stand together as friends ready to extend a helping hand.

I say to you, our Canadian friends, and to all nations who will stand with us for the cause of freedom: Our mission is more than simply making do in an untidy world. Our mission is what it has always been -- to lift the world's dreams beyond the short limits of our sights and to the far edges of our best hopes.

This will not be an era of losing liberty; it shall be one of gaining it. This will not be an era of economic pessimism, of restraint and retrenchment; it will be one of restoration, growth, and expanding opportunities for all men and women. And we will not be here merely to survive; we will be here, in William Faulkner's words, to ``prevail,'' to regain our destiny and our mutual honor.

Sometimes it seems that because of our comfortable relationship, we dwell perhaps a bit too much on our differences. Now, I too have referred to the fact that we do not agree on all issues. We share so many things with each other; yet, for good reasons, we insist on being different to retain our separate identities.

I'm not here today to dwell on our differences. When President Eisenhower spoke from this spot in 1953, he noted his gratitude as Allied Commander in World War II for the Canadian contribution to the liberation of the Mediterranean. This touched my curiosity, and even though I'd participated in that war myself, I did a little research.

In the Second World War, there was something called the 1st Special Service Force, a unique international undertaking at the time. This force was composed of Canadians and Americans, distributed equally throughout its ranks, carrying the flags of both nations. They served under a joint command, were taught a hybrid close-order drill, and trained together as paratroopers, demolition experts, ski troops, and then as an amphibious unit.

The 1st Special Service Force became famous for its high morale, its rugged abilities, and tough fighting in situations where such reputations were hard earned. Alerted to their availability, General Eisenhower requested them for special reconnaissance and raiding operations during the winter advance up the Italian peninsula. They were involved in the Anzio Beachhead campaign in Italy and were at the spearhead of the forces that captured Rome. The 1st Special Service Force made no distinctions when it went into battle. Its men had the common cause of freedom at their side and the common denominator of courage in their hearts. They were neither Canadian nor American. They were, in General Eisenhower's term, liberators.

So, let's speak no more of differences today. Certainly your Ambassador, Ken Taylor, didn't when he first sheltered and then spirited six Americans out of the center of Tehran and brought them to their freedom. Their daring escape worked not because of our differences, but because of our shared likenesses.

A final word to the people of Canada: We're happy to be your neighbor. We want to remain your friend. We're determined to be your partner, and we're intent on working closely with you in a spirit of cooperation. We are much more than an acquaintance.

President Reagan and his ministers and officials. We want to report briefly this morning on the conversations and discussions that took place between us. I would merely preface them by saying that at the beginning of a new administration we were surprised and delighted that so much ground could be covered in such a positive way. There's no subject and no grievance, if I could use the word, which the United States wasn't prepared to discuss and indicate a will to settle.

Central America. And on El Salvador in particular there was agreement, as I could sense it, that the solution there should be a political solution and that we would work in whatever way we could to ensure that the moderates were those who took over and not the extremists of the right or of the left.

We, as you know, reached an agreement on NORAD, which will be signed imminently. We reached an agreement on social security, also. Much of the work in these two areas had been done before we even sat down to talk, because you realize, as we do, that every day of the week there are contacts between officials of both governments on a multitude of subjects. And what we concentrated on in our brief meetings was mainly in the area of disagreement or a need to clarify our respective positions, and I would say that on the two main areas of bilateral concern we were very pleased with the ultimate response of the President of the United States.

It began, of course, with an expression of our deep disappointment at the fact that the fisheries treaty had been withdrawn from the United States from ratification, because from the outset we had argued, when these discussions began several years ago, that linkage between the boundaries settlement and the fisheries was not only necessary, but it was obvious from the very nature of the two agreements. And we are disappointed at the delinkage, and that has been expressed very clearly to the United States. But as I said in the House of Commons a few days ago, I think it's fair to put the best possible light on this, and that is certainly in keeping with the attitude that the discussions assumed.

States gesture of withdrawing that treaty as an indication of their determination to solve the problem in other ways, because we made it quite clear that the two problems have to be solved. It is not just a matter of having the courts determine the boundaries; it is a matter of making sure that though there will be no fish war -- we gave each other the assurance of that, and we will take measures to make sure it doesn't happen -- no one would benefit if the fish ultimately were fished out by the extraordinary capacities of the Canadian fishermen to go ahead and fish if they see that there are no limits and that the Americans are not respecting them. So, in this sense, we are very happy that the United States administration has undertaken to assure fish conservation measures in that area. And we are hopeful that the problem will be settled in that way. Indeed, we're more than hopeful; we are confident that it will.

And on all these matters I think it's fair to say that the United States, as the President had occasion to repeat in the House of Commons a few moments ago -- we have the assurances that the United States has the will and the determination to cooperate with us in preserving the environment for ourselves and for posterity.

States give us the assurance that they were determined to see it to its successful completion and therefore to carry on the undertakings we'd had from the previous administration. We talked about many other bilateral subjects in the area of trade. We said that the auto pact discussions should be pursued and continued. In the area of mass transit transportation, the United States has agreed to consider ways in which agreement and the buy-American provisions can be made to operate in a fair way to Canada.

We discussed other economic subjects. But I think it's important, in conclusion, to remind you that the impression that I got from our discussions with the American President and ministers was that we were doing this in the best possible of spirits and attitudes. We didn't approach this as a zero-sum game. We think that there can be beneficiaries on both sides in all these areas, whether it be from the environment or trade.

We don't see the negotiations as terminating in a victory for one and some losses for the other. On the contrary, the spirit and reality of these discussions and, I am convinced, of the future of our relations with President Reagan and his administration will be that both sides can come out the gainers if we solve problems of the environment, problems of boundaries or of fisheries, problems of trade, problems of social security, and that both sides have it to their advantage to look at international problems in that same light, too, because we share the main objectives of liberty and justice.

United States and the President of Mexico and the Prime Minister of Canada, if we could have such meetings to try and share common views of people who inhabit the New World, particularly as we regard international developments.

We will be meeting again, the President and I and the other summiteers, in July. And I think that we have shown at least by our meeting in this past day and a half that we intend to continue our consultations. I did make the point -- and I think the President agreed -- that our reaction to tensions in Poland, as different from our reaction to events in Afghanistan more than a year ago, show that we had learned from the lesson of Afghanistan and that we understood that one of the most important things we could achieve as like-minded countries was to consult in order that we not react in disarray to crises or possible tensions in other parts of the world, but that we act, in fact as we are in spirit, with unison and with dedication to the spirit of freedom.

The President. Well, Mr. Prime Minister, I'm sure they are. You gave certainly a very thorough summing-up of the wonderful meetings we've held. I would like first, however, to remark on the kind of welcome that I have received here. That welcome went beyond careful planning and beyond a sincere and warm reception by the Governor General and the Prime Minister. It was truly a welcome, a meeting between neighbor and neighbor.

Understandably, on some issues, we see things differently. Each country has its own national interests and objectives. Each country brings to international issues a distinct point of view. But what has impressed me is the degree to which we are in agreement and, where we have differed, that we have discussed our differences with the kind of openness and understanding that exists between neighbors.

Eastern Europe, the Middle East, Latin America. We considered carefully the Ottawa Summit, which will be held here in July. That meeting will be a very useful opportunity to share views on relationships between the industrialized democracies and the Soviet Union on energy cooperation and on economic relations within the developing nations.

In addition to discussing these world issues, we carefully considered the bilateral U.S.-Canadian relationship. We agreed wholeheartedly that consultation is vitally important to our close and cooperative relationship, and we agreed to foster frank and informal consultation at all levels and at all times. Our bilateral discussions took us into the areas where our two nations are closest. We discussed matters affecting the environment, fisheries, as you've been told, energy, trade, and defense. In each of these areas we were, I believe, able to deal with the issue squarely, in an atmosphere of frankness and understanding. And we did, yes, discuss the pipeline, the Canadian national energy program, took up the continuing problems, as the Prime Minister told you, of east coast boundary and fisheries treaties.

On the environment we addressed the Garrison project and continued joint efforts to deal with both transboundary air pollution and the cleanup of the Great Lakes. We agreed to continue consultations on the auto industry and on reciprocal opportunities for urban mass transit trade.

I look forward to continued contacts between us at the Prime Minister-President level, at the level of Cabinet officers, and at all levels below. To sum it up, our meetings have been, as he said, frank and constructive, and I intend to do all in my power to see that we continue to deal with each other in the same way in the years ahead.

Minister Trudeau, and, through them, to the people of Canada for the warm welcome that I and my associates have received here this week. I can assure you we will not forget it. We will remember it with great warmth and pleasure.

The Prime Minister. We're going to see the signature of a couple of these agreements. I understand that Secretary Haig and Minister MacGuigan [Mark MacGuigan, Canadian Secretary of State for External Affairs] will stay on to answer any questions, and Madame Begin [Monique Begin, Minister for National Health and Welfare] also will answer questions. She may even ask some, if I know her. [Laughter] I personally will be giving a press conference tomorrow, and I'll be happy to answer any questions that may not have been dealt with today.

Sec. 2. In carrying out the functions delegated to him, the United States Trade Representative shall consult with the Secretary of Agriculture and the Secretary of State. The United States Trade Representative may redelegate some or all of those functions to the head of another Executive agency with the consent of the head of such agency.

All Executive agencies shall cooperate with the Tahoe Regional Planning Agency with respect to their activities which take place within or affect the Lake Tahoe Region. All such cooperation should be coordinated through the Representative of the United States serving on the Governing Board of the Tahoe Regional Planning Agency, Zane G. Smith, Jr., Regional Forester of the Pacific Southwest Region of the United States Forest Service.

Washington, D.C. He specialized in representing radio, television, domestic and private radio stations throughout the United States before the Federal Communications Commission. He was a guest speaker over the past 5 years at more than 20 conventions of broadcasters, sponsored by the National Association of Broadcasters and various State broadcaster associations. He was codirector of the legal and administrative agencies group in the office of executive branch management during the transition.

Since the first days of this administration, we've been deeply concerned and involved in assisting the city of Atlanta and its citizens in attempting to bring an end to one of the most tragic situations that has ever confronted an American community. Twenty children have been murdered, and another is still missing. This nightmare has continued for more than 19 months, and I'm determined to continue to assist the city of Atlanta in bringing it to an end.

Today I'm directing that $1\1/2\ million be provided for the city of Atlanta for the increased costs of the investigation conducted by local law enforcement officials. This is in addition to the $979,000 in Federal funds that I asked be sent to the city on March 5th for the purpose of providing needed social and health services to the citizens of the area.

I want the people of Atlanta and the Nation to know that this administration is doing and will continue to do what we can to help bring an end to this tragedy. Presently we have nearly 40 FBI agents in the field working on the case along with scores of others throughout the country who are deeply involved. The Departments of Justice, Health and Human Services, and Education are providing investigative and social services requested by Mayor Maynard Jackson and other local officials.

Tomorrow Vice President George Bush will travel to Atlanta as my emissary to meet with the mayor, the members of the task force which we created nearly 4 weeks ago, and other concerned members of the community to convey the deep feelings and convictions that we both share regarding this crisis.

And finally, on a personal note, I'm deeply touched by the depth of concern and compassion being expressed by Americans in every area of our land. The American people are responding with offers of funds, personal commitments, and with other expressions of assistance. They've joined all of us with their prayers as they continue to display the kindness and the decency and the generosity of spirit that has historically been the hallmark of our people.

The President. Well, we moved as quickly as we could and were aware that there was a need for outside help. The mayor contacted us and asked, and we immediately went to work with these funds and appointed the Vice President right then, asked him to take charge. So, we've been doing it from the first that there was anything that we could do to help.

I am today directing the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA) to begin the first purchase program for the national defense stockpile of strategic and critical materials in over 20 years. These purchases of strategic materials, estimated initially at $100 million, are a step to restructure the existing $15 billion stockpile in critical areas of deficiency.

It is now widely recognized that our nation is vulnerable to sudden shortages in basic raw materials that are necessary to our defense production base. Our vulnerabilities have been highlighted in a number of congressional hearings and panels concerning the industrial base. Thus, this overdue addition to our stockpile constitutes a necessary hedge against any supply disruptions.

In addition to strategic stockpiling, I am considering other measures to decrease the Nation's vulnerability, including ways to expand domestic capacity to produce strategic and critical materials. This acquisition program is a necessary first step. It is expected that larger purchases will be made as funds from sales of excess materials build up in the stockpile fund.

The care and protection of children is a primary responsibility of all parents. This task should not be taken lightly because the stakes are high and, often, irreversible. Such is the case when dealing with poisons and other potentially hazardous material.

Thanks to child-protection packaging and greater awareness of parents, in the past two decades we have witnessed a reduction in the accidental poisoning of children. While progress has been made, we must remain vigilant. The death of even one child due to the ingesting of poison is too many.

A tragedy involving any family's child is a tragedy for us all. Parents around the Nation should be keenly aware that the danger of accidental poisoning knows no boundary and that only parental attention to the hazards around them will protect their children from needless suffering and possible death. Even heightened community awareness, even new safety packaging, even new laws on the books are less important than strict parental supervision when avoiding a tragedy from the misuse or abuse of common pharmaceutical and household products.

The President. Well, in the first place, New York City -- there are some areas in the country that will probably -- well, those that are trying to start new rapid transit that will not fare as well as New York will, where there is an established system. So, we don't think anyone's really going to be hurt too badly. And we've also given the green light to Westway.

Westway Highway, a building project that will serve to restore and revitalize an area that sorely needs the help. I am pleased to announce today, on the occasion of my first visit to New York City as President, that many of the Federal financial and regulatory roadblocks that snarled the Westway Project have been cleared away.

Now that we've responded at the Federal level, any further action awaits decisions by State and local officials here in New York. I know there are differences among the various parties, but those differences are best resolved by the level of government closest to the people.

And now they tell me that they're going to take me inside and feed me. [Laughter] And I heard so much last night about how I'm going to be fed, I haven't had any breakfast yet. [Laughter] I've been waiting for this.

The President. Well now, officially, welcome. This all resulted from a luncheon, a very enjoyable one we had on January 6th at Blair House. A number of you said that that was your first time to see Blair House, and I asked about this other house over here, and told you at the time that we'd do it again here. And I've been looking forward to this, and here we are.

Millicent [Representative Millicent Fenwick of New Jersey was attending a luncheon hosted by Mrs. Reagan in the Red Room] is across the hall in the Red Room. But I am pleased, also, by the fact that one of the things we discussed the first time was the position of women in government, and I told you what we were going to try and do. Now, I don't know whether we've completely satisfied you yet, but we're not through yet. But I'm just wondering how close we're coming now to having as many ladies present who are members of the administration as there are who are Members of the Congress.

So, I haven't had an opportunity to -- I'll tell you what. [Laughter] I know you've all met each other at each table, but all of you who work in our end of the shop, in the executive branch, please just stand up and let the ladies see you. And there is one in particular who I'm going to ask to stand again so you'll be able to recognize her, because you may want to contact her, and that is Wendy Borcherdt [Associate Director of Presidential Personnel], who is here for the very purpose of seeing that your numbers increase.

But it's been a very busy time. And someone told me the other day by actual count that I have met with, in these couple of months, more than 350 of the Members of Congress in an effort to have a liaison and -- you notice I said liaison. I was taken to task in the press the other day for calling it lay-ison. And they thought that I just didn't know, but I'll tell you, I'm guilty. The Army has some words of its own, and when I was a reserve cavalry officer, the Army called it lay-ison, just like they call oblique ob-like in the Army. [Laughter] But now I'm a civilian, so I'll call it liaison.

You know the importance that we place on the economic program, and you weren't invited to lunch now for us to try and con you into anything. But maybe you might want to engage in a discussion or talk about any of the things that might be on your mind, as we did before in Blair House, and if so, we can have a dialog instead of a monolog here. At Blair House I was able to call on George Bush, but he is in Miami, Paula [Senator Paula Hawkins of Florida] tells me.  I knew as far as Atlanta, because we had him there on that very tragic situation there. And he's delighted that he and Barbara went down and have met with some of the families that have known the tragedy of what's happening there, but also to make it plain that we're going to do everything we can from this end for what we think is the most unusual, tragic situation in the country. And while law enforcement is supposed to take place at the local level, we think this is the time when the whole country would like to have Washington doing whatever it could also to help. So, we are doing that.

Q. Mr. President, I appreciate very, very much our being able to be here and ask questions. And I think as a working mother -- I have always felt very strongly that all mothers are working mothers -- one of the things that worries me a lot about the budget cuts is the fact that displaced homemakers and women who have done what we've really told them to do and tried to encourage them to do, stay home and take care of their family, may be running a tremendous risk. And it appears that the displaced homemaker program, allowing their getting back into the workplace if something should happen to their spouse or family that they need to and so forth, really is going to impact upon them. And I think when we tell them to do this, to say to them all you get for that is honor, it's hard to wear it or eat it -- [laughter] -- if you know what I'm saying.

The President. Well, and I will take some help if I can get it here, because with all the facets of all of these programs, I can't claim that I can keep everything in the front of my mind. But I think maybe we're talking about some programs that are not so much disappearing as are going to be part of block grant programs where, we believe, there could be more efficient administration of them and less administrative overhead.

You know, it's a very discouraging thing. If you would start at the very local level of government and compare the dollars it spends -- it takes for a city or town to deliver a service to a community, then move up to the county level and find out how much higher the percentage is, move up to the State level and it's higher, and move up to the Federal level and it is the highest of all, the overhead in performing a service. And we believe that by transferring many of these things and incorporating them into block grants, where we give the local community the ability to set its priorities and to operate without regulations that have been imposed from thousands of miles away, here by a group in Washington -- I'm speaking now of the permanent employees of government, of bureaucracy that tries to make rules that will fit everything from New York and Chicago down to South Succotash -- [laughing] -- out there in the country. And, so, I don't think those programs are going to disappear.

Q. Well, I guess my fear is that sometimes when they go to the local level, you'll find that if you don't have any constraints on how they spend the block grant, very often the money that they save money on is women and children. Very often when there's budget cuts, it's kind of women and children first. And it happens at all different levels. And I would hope that we'd see some real direction; that if that's going to be the focus of the thing, that we make sure when they take the block grant money that they don't cut out displaced homemakers or something because they don't have the political clout in the city hall to fight back. And I guess that's what I'm really saying. Let's make sure people don't get hurt or that certain things don't totally disappear if we're going to restructure how they're administered.

Q. Mr. President, I want to thank you for having us. I represent Cleveland, Ohio, the scene of your debate victory. And I was very pleased in the debate when you talked about and mentioned the inequities of poor women in the social security system, and I think millions of American women were. My focus of concern, of course, is older women and, in particular, problems that the Northeast and the Midwest are experiencing. In the State of Ohio, Mr. President, we get only 71 cents out of the dollar back to our State. And I'm wondering, if we go to a block grant approach to the States, like my own State, can we be assured that we'll get our share of jobs in the defense area and in energy and so on that by and large would help our State of Ohio and other Midwestern and Northeastern States? And then we'd have the money on a State level to do the kinds of things that you're suggesting we ought to be doing on a local area. Is there any concentration on bringing more jobs to our States so that we get one dollar for every dollar in taxation we give to the Federal Government?

The President. Well, I have to say with regard to jobs of that kind and government jobs, that we think the whole program is geared at the kind of jobs that really count, and that is the revitalization of industry, the renewal of industry. And I know that Ohio is hurt worse than a great many States represented here today. Your unemployment rate is way above the national average.

But that's true also of Michigan and several other of the industrial States. And the whole function of the program is geared to increasing productivity, making it possible for business and industry to invest the capital that is necessary to be able to compete once again with our foreign competitors.

So, that part will have -- whether you can substitute with defense spending -- actually there, I think, the first rule is what is the best and most efficient and economical way to build up our defenses.

I think that too often in the past we have confused military spending with, let's say, trying to attain a social aim at the same time. Now, I can see if there are two States or three States, that any one of them is in a position to meet the military contract, then I think you've got to use some fairness and honesty in spreading it around. But it is true that there are some States that are just heavier in defense -- States along the coast with shipbuilding yards and so forth. And I can only say we try to be fair with the other. But the real thing that you need is the private industry put back on its feet to provide that kind of job for the people.

Q. Mr. President, first, I'd like to thank you for again giving us this opportunity to meet with you over this hour, and then I want to bring you two messages from the 61 counties in Nebraska that I represent.

In the first place, my mail is very, very heavy in favor of your program. Our folks are in favor of the block grant program. We don't think that there's a monopoly on compassion nor on good judgment and efficiency here in Washington. We think that out in Nebraska, we can use those dollars better, and that the 75 or 80 percent of the money would do just as much for the programs that really are needed in Nebraska, and our folks will know better what is needed.

Our second message is our folks are saying, ``Save on that budget across the board.'' Don't -- let's try not to be distracted by -- [inaudible]. This economy has got to be shaped up, and if we came here and are fairhanded across the board, we'll all be better off, and we'll all be glad to go home.

Q. Mr. President, I happen to represent a district in Illinois, and in Illinois, particularly in my district, we're not that pleased with your budget cuts. We find that many of our people feel that they're going to be hurt. My particular district has a lot of people who are very poor. We have a lot of people who are unemployed. We don't get a fair return on our tax dollars. So, I wish I could say the same as my colleague from Nebraska has said, but my remarks would be quite the contrary.

The President. Well, Ms. Collins, I appreciate that. But I think also that -- and I'm aware of the feeling of a great many people that this is going to happen. It isn't. What we've called the safety net are the seven programs that really deal with the truly needy. They're not going to be hurt, and we're not going to permit them to be hurt. What we are trying to do is -- well, let me just give you an example. I speak from a little personal history on this.

When we reformed welfare in California, there had not been a cost-of-living pay raise for the people on welfare in California for almost 20 years. And because we were spread so thin, what we reformed and reduced the rolls by, more than 350,000 people, not by throwing people off, they just disappeared.

We found out, in our reforms, that we were spread thin because there were people that are attracted to and take advantage of regulations, complicated regulations, to get on programs they don't deserve to be on. And so, we were spread thin by trying to take care of these undeserving people.

And I just told at our table, and I told Ms. Boggs [Representative Lindy Boggs of Louisiana] here, about the one newspaper in our State that didn't know whether my horror stories that I was telling were true about what was going on in the line of undeserving people getting in these programs. They sent a reporter out to get on welfare. He got on welfare four times under four different names in the same office on the same day.

The President. Well, I think you're going to be happily surprised. I think our situation has been greatly distorted. I want to remind all of you of one thing. We're not reducing government's cost down to below what they've been getting in the previous year. We're reducing the rate of increase that has been built into them. And, no, it will stop short of the needy. I should have added to that story about California, some 350,000 people disappeared from the rolls. But we were able to increase the grants to the truly needy by 43 percent, and that was the first raise they'd had since 1958. And I think you're going to find that -- well, I have to say that I think that some of the purveyors of these programs, the dispensers of the programs are more worried about losing their position than they are about the people they represent. And they're trying to create an image that we are picking on the poor, because they don't want to lose their clientele and possibly their position.

Q. Mr. President, I would like to thank you as well for your graciousness today, and certainly for what is, I think, a new beginning in terms of the relationship with the women in Congress. We've been invited to the White House on many occasions, and I've served over four administrations.

Q. I feel very strongly. I feel that you have had a brilliant new beginning. I think that the morale of the free world has been increased, with reason, and that we have a very good and valid justification for holding our head high in terms of world leadership. And domestically, the confidence of the American people, now suddenly, is beginning to bud again. Certainly, we do not all agree on everything. But I think that we can find an accommodation that is a just one with our mutual goals.

Q. Mr. President, I'm Loret Ruppe, your Director-designate of the Peace Corps. We want to thank you very much for your most kind message of support that you sent to us on the occasion of our 20th anniversary. We are working hard on our budget. We realize that if the economy were in shreds, as it is in my home State of Michigan, there would be no money to send any volunteers overseas. And the Peace Corps and VISTA are doing the best job with what it has, and we're here at your service. Thank you.

Q. Mr. President, I read recently that the Speaker of the House, Tip O'Neill, has decided to try to organize those who oppose your economic package. I'm concerned about it, because when I was back in Los Angeles over the weekend, I began to see evidence of hearings that were to be held, and I believe the intent is to undermine it. What are we going to do to try to counter that kind of an effort?

Q. I'm the Senator from Florida, and I'd like to tell you that we have all of your problems en masse. We have the refugees. We have the largest number of senior citizens. We have the largest influx of veterans. Those States here that are losing citizens and losing voters and losing congressional seats -- Florida's gaining for it. So, we'd like to think they're the same people moving South.

Now, I think 18,000 is a fantastic sample. We're going to run it in the weeklies this week, and we're going to run it in the shoppers next week, because we have a tremendous number of citizens in our State cannot even afford a daily paper, so they take the shopper. It's a throwaway, and it has a lot of space in there. So, I'm going to deliver to the Congressmen in their district -- we had six young people sorting them all weekend by congressional district. And when we run these ads, I'm going to deliver those to the Congress where I feel we're really going to have a problem.

Our mail, from what we've opened so far in the White House, and it's been coming in in floods, is running about 100 to 1 in support. And as I told here, and I tell the rest of you, some of the letters are just -- they're treasures. But one of them the other day that I opened -- this was a retired civil service employee. And in there, endorsed over to the Department of the Treasury, was his whole month's check for his pension that he was contributing. He wants the program, and he just wanted to give this back to the Government to be of whatever help he could.

But Bob's letter was from a man -- I went to school 20 miles away from Peoria, so I know about the Caterpillar Tractor Company. They have never before laid off employees. They now are having layoffs. He's laid off. His wife has lost her job. And yet, he wrote to tell Bob Michel that that was all right, and they'd do without their unemployment insurance if it would help get a program in that would put the country on the right track, so that we'd have the stability of knowing that the private jobs are out there.

Now, someplace along the line, we're going to find that a lot of our problems maybe come from well-intentioned programs, but that have militated against solving the problems that we need to solve. If industry is out there with jobs to offer -- and I know they're not in Ohio in the steel industry, and I know that the automobile plants are closed down and you've got to solve those problems by restoring the whole economy, but maybe we've missed the boat someplace along the line, and maybe we're encouraging people to delay in taking jobs.

Q. Mr. President, I'm from New Jersey. And I think one of the most valuable aspects of this meeting here today, besides the lovely lunch, is the fact that we have the opportunity to speak directly to you. And if we're all doing our jobs correctly, we are speaking directly to our constituents. So, I want to give a little report, a person-to-person report, from my constituents in New Jersey. They are very much in support of this program. There is tremendous consensus for the cuts. They want them to be evenhanded and fair. They perceive them at this point in time to be, and they know that there are going to be modifications. They want tax reform. The size and the shape of that tax package is still an open question, but they are strongly supportive of the whole direction and the leadership that you're showing.

There is one area that -- and I just returned from New Jersey an hour or two ago -- one area that almost everyone in talking with me this weekend, and primarily the hardcore of my Republican support, that is being questioned. And that -- and I think you should know it -- and that is the area of the size of the defense request. It's not a question of whether we make up for our neglect in this area. I think there's broad consensus and agreement on that and, in fact, that was the heart of my campaign. But they're questioning whether we can absorb this size defense expenditure in a relatively short period of time.

And I think you should know that, and I think that you should know it because it is saying -- word from the homefront -- and also because you should have the opportunity, and your advisers and your secretaries of the departments involved should be planning extensive explanation of the need and the justification for the program.

Q. Well, that may very well be. I think there just needs to be a lot of work done in terms of understanding the program, the total numbers of dollars and how it will be phased in and how it will be targeted, in which areas. And certainly, they're all for the volunteer -- putting those expenditures in the volunteer program.

The President. All right. I won't argue. All right. Well, we shall do it again. And it has been wonderful to have you back here -- back here? -- here for the first time. The first time was at Blair House. I'm sorry we can't take any more, but good to talk to you, and thank you very much for coming.

In the name of every American, we gratefully honor the contributions of Irish Americans in every walk of life down through our nation's history. Just as St. Patrick brought the light of faith to Ireland, so Ireland, in turn, has given many gifted men and women to America.

On this St. Patrick's Day, let us remember all our great Irish Americans. And let all sons and daughters of Erin keep green their Irish heritage, for their own sake and for the continued enrichment of American life.

Well, President Cianchette, members of the Associated General Contractors, this is indeed an honor. An award from you is much more than a recognition from the business community; it's a tribute from the people who literally built America. Your hard work and the hard work of builders before you took an American wilderness and turned it into a citadel of productivity and commerce. And I don't have to tell you that our country somehow then went astray somewhere along the line. But I pledge to you tonight, together we can get this country going again, and we're going to do that.

President Cianchette spoke of regulations. A fellow in my neighborhood, building his own home not too long ago, gave me a line for my campaign speeches. He got so fed up finally with the paperwork that he pasted them all together to just to build his house; strung them up on two poles. And he had a strip of paper 250 feet long. [Laughter] We're going to do something about that. We have a task force that's assigned to it.

You know, there was a little tad that was in court in New York, bandaged from his toes to his chin, suing for $4 million as the result of an accident, and he won the suit. The lawyers for the insurance company went over to him, and they said, ``You're never going to enjoy a penny of this.

Well, your endorsement of our economic recovery package is even more meaningful, because I'm aware that some of the proposed spending reductions affect your members directly. By thinking of the nation as a whole rather than monetary, financial interests, you're demonstrating the kind of spirit that made this country great. And it's the kind of spirit that will make it great once again.

But it's going to be a tough fight. There are those who would rather get theirs now than cure inflation. They're going to do everything they can to preserve the status quo. And I ask you, after 2 years of double-digit inflation and economic stagnation, do you really want to keep the status quo?

Thank you again for the honor you've paid me tonight. And don't worry, we're going to get the job done. And let me just tell you something, an example of the spirit that's alive out there in America matching yours.

I got a check from a retiree the other day -- I mean a letter from a retiree. I gave the punchline away. [Laughter] In there was his check for civil service retirement, a full month's retirement endorsed over to the Treasury Department, because he said he just wanted to help us get the job done. So, we can't lose.

Prior to his remarks, president Ival Cianchette of the Associated General Contractors of America presented the President with the organization's Man of the Year Award for skill, integrity, and responsibility.

Yet we must not take the miracle of American agricultural abundance for granted. An unacceptable number of farm accidents cripples people and threatens production. Last year, nearly 400,000 farmers and ranchers were injured or killed in accidents at work, at home, during recreation, or on roads.

Powerful equipment, chemicals and variable working conditions are potential agricultural hazards, but safe work practices, protective equipment and other measures can minimize the risks. Special vigilance by the agricultural community is also necessary to reduce the toll of off-the-job injuries.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 16th day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and fifth.

Well, I thank you both, and I thank you all. I think the very evidence of our meeting here this morning, in the eyes of the public, this early in the morning is an indication that we are prepared to work together, and I'm looking forward to it. And I also appreciate this opportunity to thank all of you, because you not only have been cooperating, you have put it on a fast track, this program of ours. A schedule already has been agreed to and set as to where we're going to go with it.

White House and anytime we go out among the people -- we find that they are in support of this program. They know that something has to be done, different than we've been doing things from some time past.

So, I'm convinced that together we're going to be able to get this problem and get the economy of this country back on the upturn where it should be, take our rightful place once again out in world competition. And that means, for our people, bringing to an end the inflation that's been destroying them at every level and putting our people back to work who are out there who know now the indignity of unemployment.

St. Patrick's Day is not only the feast day of a great man of God, it is a symbol of the commitment of the Irish people to freedom, to justice, and to the values upon which Western civilization is built.

But we are also conscious of the violence, bloodshed, and despair which now haunt all of the people of Northern Ireland. This tragedy cannot go unnoticed by the United States, which owes so much and has such close ties to the Irish.

As an American proud of his Irish ancestry and as President, I recognize the vital importance to our nation and the Western alliance of a peaceful, just, and swift solution to current problems in Northern Ireland.

The United States will continue to urge the parties to come together for a just and peaceful solution. I pray and hope that the day will come when the tragedy of history which now afflicts Northern Ireland will be overcome by faith, the courage and the love of freedom and justice of the Irish.

Ireland's problems. I call on all Americans to question closely any appeal for financial or other aid from groups involved in this conflict to ensure that contributions do not end up in the hands of those who perpetuate violence, either directly or indirectly.

It goes without saying that I'm delighted to be here on this very special day for the Irish and all who wish they were -- [laughter] -- and for the lovely music and the young lady who sang so beautifully, your daughter, Mr. Ambassador. You know, it's been said and I've heard it all my life that when the Irish sing an Irish song, all who listen wish they were Irish, too.

I don't know whether what I'm going to say now could be called a gift or not, and he doesn't know that he is going to be the gift, but I think this is the most appropriate occasion I can think of to introduce to you the designate as Ambassador to Ireland for the United States, Bill McCann.

But I wonder how many realize, even here where you are so versed in the background, how many realize how far back in our history of this country the contribution of the Irish to this land really goes.

Mr. Ambassador, I know the courage with which you've worked to help bring peace to your land, and we here, in this land, have no deeper wish than that by the next St. Patrick's Day, if not before, the conflict and violence in North Ireland will have been replaced with reason and good will. And your efforts and those of others in bringing this about will have the full backing of the American people and their President.

Neighbor Day'' for observance by Montana and Alberta, Canada, citizens. He chaired a highway committee to build better roads between Montana and Canada and initiated good will tours from Montana to Canada.

Knauer has been chairman of the Council for the Advancement of Consumer Policy, a nonprofit, nonpartisan educational organization, and served as a member of the executive committee of the Board of the Council of Better Business Bureaus, Inc., and many other consumer organizations.

In accordance with the Impoundment Control Act of 1974, I herewith report 81 proposals to rescind a total of $11.1 billion in budget authority previously provided by the Congress. In addition, I am proposing to reduce authority to incur obligations for direct loans by a total of $751.8 million and I am reporting one new deferral of $3.4 million. These proposals are an integral part of my plan to reduce government spending.

I am glad to have had this chance to meet and talk wih President-designate Viola on the eve of his inauguration as President of Argentina. We have had a good discussion on bilateral and multilateral issues of concern to our respective countries. I look forward to efforts by both governments to further improve our relations, and I have extended to General Viola my best wishes for his tenure as President.

The President. I learned in public speaking you're never supposed to open with an apology, but my schedule has kind of gotten jammed up with two things happening almost simultaneously, so I only have a few minutes. But I did want to come here and, first of all, thank you and commend you for you who selected to honor tonight, Secretary of Agriculture John Block and his lovely lady.

All of you are engaged in what is really the energy industry that is the most important of all, because the energy you produce or that you have to do with that is produced -- if it isn't, we are out of business.

Agriculture on the way through the room. It gladdened my heart, because I can tell you, already you've heard that we have a kind of Cabinet system of government; we do. And they don't just come in, or one at a time speak on their particular problem and no one else does this. We really debate all the issues around the table, everybody's department, and get a consensus and find out all the various opinions, and we don't take a vote. Then I know the monkey gets on my back, and I have to make a decision. But I can assure you, farming and agriculture in America is darn well represented in this administration by John Block.

So, I am pleased to be here and to just add my voice to yours in honoring him tonight, to thank all of you for being here. And naturally, we know that you're all going to be in total support of our economic package. [Laughter] With that, thank you all.

Mr. Smith was deputy director of the office of executive branch management, legal and administrative agencies, in the office of the President-elect. He was chief counsel to the Reagan for President Committee in 1979 - 80.

Mr. Sowle is president of Don Sowle Associates, Inc., a diversified management consulting firm specializing in the fields of acquisition management, procurement, logistics, contract administration, business organization and planning, and management information systems.

Mr. Sowle was the Director of Studies for the Commission on Government Procurement. He was a group vice president, Gulf & Western Industries, Inc., with full management responsibility for three operating divisions engaged in commerical and defense work, primarily related to the aerospace industry. He was also assistant director of the Jet Propulsion Laboratory, California Institute of Technology, with responsibilities for the direction of JPL's divisions of financial management, procurement, material services, and the management systems and data analysis office. Mr. Sowle was Director, Contract Administration Services, Office of the Secretary of Defense.

He was graduated from Central Michigan University and the University of Chicago. He is a trustee of the National Contract Management Association and former Executive Director of the Government Procurement Commission. Mr. Sowle is an adjunct professor at American University.

It was the hard work of our people, the freedom they enjoyed and their faith in God that built this country and made it the envy of the world. In all of our great cities and towns evidence of the faith of our people is found: houses of worship of every denomination are among the oldest structures.

Prayer is today as powerful a force in our Nation as it has ever been. We as a Nation should never forget this source of strength. And while recognizing that the freedom to choose a Godly path is the essence of liberty, as a Nation we cannot but hope that more of our citizens would, through prayer, come into a closer relationship with their Maker.

The President today met with members of the Auto Task Force. He was presented with a series of options. The discussion focused in part on the current situation in the auto industry, pending legislation on Capitol Hill, the overall U.S. trade posture, principles underlying American trade, and U.S. relations with Japan.

President. The President told the group he wanted to have an opportunity to meet with others before making a decision on the import issue. The earliest possible time we could expect that would be late next week.

The President reemphasized he remains committed to the principles of free trade and, in general, he believes the Government should not become deeply entangled with the economic fortunes of any company or industry. He believes the auto industry is now involved in a situation that is not entirely of its own making and the forces of Government bear some degree of responsibility. The Government must now bear part of the responsibility for helping the auto industry back on its feet.

The President today announced the appointment of John F. W. Rogers to be Special Assistant to the President for Administration and Director of the Office of Administration. Mr. Rogers was most recently Special Assistant for Management and Acting Director of the Office of Administration.

In his new position, Mr. Rogers will be responsible for the day-to-day administrative operation of the White House, including finance, facilities, personnel information management, correspondence, and central records. He will also supervise the operations of the White House Visitors Office.

Administration, a separate agency of the Executive Office of the President. In this position, he will be responsible for providing common administrative support to the entire Executive Office of the President, including such functions as library support, personnel, and financial and management information systems. He will act as liaison with the General Services Administration for the White House and the Executive Office of the President.

Before joining the White House transition team, Mr. Rogers was executive assistant to the president for administration at the American Enterprise Institute for Public Policy Research. He joined AEI in 1977 to help launch a new periodical, Public Opinion. He served on the editorial staff until he moved into the administrative ranks of the Institute. In 1974 he joined the White House staff as a researcher and later became an assistant to the Director of the Office of White House Communications, a post he held until January 1977.

Mr. Chairman and Congressman Mickey Edwards, thank you very much. My goodness, I can't realize how much time has gone by, because I remember when I first knew Mickey, he was just a clean-shaven boy. [Laughter] But thank you for inviting me here once again. And as Mickey told you, with the exception of those 2 years, it is true about how often I've been here. So, let me say now that I hope we'll be able to keep this tradition going forward and that you'll invite me again next year.

And in the rough days ahead, and I know there will be such days, I hope that you'll be like the mother of the young lad in camp when the camp director told her that he was going to have to discipline her son. And she said, ``Well, don't be too hard on him. He's very sensitive. Slap the boy next to him, and that will scare Irving.'' [Laughter] But let us also, tonight, salute those with vision who labored to found this group -- the American Conservative Union, the Young Americans for Freedom, National Review and Human Events.

It's been said that anyone who seeks success or greatness should first forget about both and seek only the truth, and the rest will follow. Well, fellow truthseekers, none of us here tonight -- contemplating the seal on this podium and a balanced budget in 1984 -- can argue with that kind of logic. For whatever history does finally say about our cause, it must say: The conservative movement in 20th century America held fast through hard and difficult years to its vision of the truth. And history must also say that our victory, when it was achieved, was not so much a victory of politics as it was a victory of ideas, not so much a victory for any one man or party as it was a victory for a set of principles -- principles that were protected and nourished by a few unselfish Amricans through many grim and heartbreaking defeats.

Now, you are those Americans that I'm talking about. I wanted to be here not just to acknowledge your efforts on my behalf, not just to remark that last November's victory was singularly your victory, not just to mention that the new administration in Washington is a testimony to your perseverance and devotion to principle, but to say, simply, ``Thank you,'' and to say those words not as a President, or even as a conservative; thank you as an American. I say this knowing that there are many in this room whose talents might have entitled them to a life of affluence but who chose another career out of a higher sense of duty to country. And I know, too, that the story of their selflessness will never be written up in Time or Newsweek or go down in the history books.

You know, on an occaision like this it's a little hard not to reminisce, not to think back and just realize how far we've come. The Portuguese have a word for such recollection -- saudade -- a poetic term rich with the dreams of yesterday. And surely in our past there was many a dream that went aglimmering and many a field littered with broken lances.

But our memories are not just political ones. I like to think back about a small, artfully written magazine named National Review, founded in 1955 and ridiculed by the intellectual establishment because it published an editorial that said it would stand athwart the course of history yelling, ``Stop!'' And then there was a spritely written newsweekly coming out of Washington named Human Events that many said would never be taken seriously, but it would become later ``must reading'' not only for Capitol Hill insiders but for all of those in public life.

How many of us were there who used to go home from meetings like this with no thought of giving up, but still find ourselves wondering in the dark of night whether this much-loved land might go the way of other great nations that lost a sense of mission and a passion for freedom?

There are so many people and institutions who come to mind for their role in the success we celebrate tonight. Intellectual leaders like Russell Kirk, Friedrich Hayek, Henry Hazlitt, Milton Friedman, James Burnham, Ludwig von Mises -- they shaped so much of our thoughts.

It's especially hard to believe that it was only a decade ago, on a cold April day on a small hill in upstate New York, that another of these great thinkers, Frank Meyer, was buried. He'd made the awful journey that so many others had: He pulled himself from the clutches of ``The God That Failed,'' and then in his writing fashioned a vigorous new synthesis of traditional and libertarian thought -- a sythesis that is today recognized by many as modern conservatism.

It was Frank Meyer who reminded us that the robust individualism of the American experience was part of the deeper current of Western learning and culture. He pointed out that a respect for law, an appreciation for tradition, and regard for the social consensus that gives stability to our public and private institutions, these civilized ideas must still motivate us even as we seek a new economic prosperity based on reducing government interference in the marketplace.

Our goals complement each other. We're not cutting the budget simply for the sake of sounder financial management. This is only a first step toward returning power to the States and communities, only a first step toward reordering the relationship between citizen and government.

Because ours is a consistent philosophy of government, we can be very clear: We do not have a social agenda, separate, seperate economic agenda, and a separate foreign agenda. We have one agenda. Just as surely as we seek to put our financial house in order and rebuild our nation's defenses, so too we seek to protect the unborn, to end the manipulation of schoolchildren by utopian planners, and permit the acknowledgement of a Supreme Being in our classrooms just as we allow such acknowledgements in other public institutions.

Now, obviously we're not going to be able to accomplish all this at once. The American people are patient. I think they realize that the wrongs done over several decades cannot be corrected instantly. You know, I had the pleasure in appearing before a Senate committee once while I was still Governor, and I was challenged because there was a Republican President in the White House who'd been there for several months -- why we hadn't then corrected everything that had been done. And the only way I could think to answer him is I told him about a ranch many years ago that Nancy and I acquired. It had a barn with eight stalls in it in which they had kept cattle, and we wanted to keep horses. And I was in there day after day with a pick and a shovel, lowering the level of those stalls, which had accumulated over the years. [Laughter] And I told this Senator who'd asked that question that I discovered that you did not undo in weeks or months what it had taken some 15 years to accumulate.

Now, during our political efforts, we were the subject of much indifference and often times intolerance, and that's why I hope our political victory will be remembered as a generous one and our time in power will be recalled for the tolerance we showed for those with whom we disagree.

But beyond this, beyond this we have to offer America and the world a larger vision. We must remove government's smothering hand from where it does harm; we must seek to revitalize the proper functions of government. But we do these things to set loose again the energy and the ingenuity of the American people. We do these things to reinvigorate those social and economic institutions which serve as a buffer and a bridge between the individual and the state -- and which remain the real source of our progress as a people.

And we must hold out this exciting prospect of an orderly, compassionate, pluralistic society -- an archipelago of prospering communities and divergent institutions -- a place where a free and energetic people can work out their own destiny under God.

I know that some will think about the perilous world we live in and the dangerous decade before us and ask what practical effect this conservative vision can have today. When Prime Minister Thatcher was here recently we both remarked on the sudden, overwhelming changes that had come recently to politics in both our countries.

At our last official function, I told the Prime Minister that everywhere we look in the world the cult of the state is dying. And I held out hope that it wouldn't be long before those of our adversaries who preach the supremacy of the state were remembered only for their role in a sad, rather bizarre chapter in human history. The largest planned economy in the world has to buy food elsewhere or its people would starve.

We've heard in our century far too much of the sounds of anguish from those who live under totalitarian rule. We've seen too many monuments made not out of marble or stone but out of barbed wire and terror. But from these terrible places have come survivors, witnesses to the triumph of the human spirit over the mystique of state power, prisioners whose spiritual values made them the rulers of their guards. With their survival, they brought us ``the secret of the camps,'' a lesson for our time and for any age: Evil is powerless if the good are unafraid.

This is the real task before us: to reassert our commitment as a nation to a law higher than our own, to renew our spiritual strength. Only by building a wall of such spiritual resolve can we, as a free people, hope to protect our own heritage and make it someday the birthright of all men.

There is, in America, a greatness and a tremendous heritage of idealism which is a reservoir of strength and goodness. It is ours if we will but tap it. And, because of this -- because that greatness is there -- there is need in America today for a reaffirmation of that goodness and a reformation of our greatness.

They cannot keep the promise of tomorrow. The encrusted bureaucracies and the engrained procedures which have developed of late respond neither to the minority or the majority. We've come to a turning point. We have a decision to make. Will we continue with yesterday's agenda and yesterday's failures, or will we reassert our ideals and our standards, will we reaffirm our faith, and renew our purpose? This is a time for choosing.

I made a speech by that title in 1964. I said, ``We've been told increasingly that we must choose between left or right.'' But we're still using those terms -- left or right. And I'll repeat what I said then in '64. ``There is no left or right. There's only an up or down:'' up to the ultimate in individual freedom, man's age old dream, the ultimate in individual freedom consistent with an orderly society -- or down to the totalitarianism of the ant heap. And those today who, however good their intentions, tell us that we should trade freedom for security are on that downward path.

Those of us who call ourselves conservative have pointed out what's wrong with government policy for more than a quarter of a century. Now we have an opportunity to make policy and to change our national direction. All of us in government -- in the House, in the Senate, in the executive branch -- and in private life can now stand together. We can stop the drain on the economy by the public sector. We can restore our national prosperity. We can replace the overregulated society with the creative society. We can appoint to the bench distinguished judges who understand the first responsibility of any legal system is to punish the guilty and protect the innocent. We can restore to their rightful place in our national consciousness the values of family, work, neighborhood, and religion. And, finally, we can see to it that the nations of the world clearly understand America's intentions and respect for resolve.

This reformation, this renaissance will not be achieved or will it be served, by those who engage in political claptrap or false promises. It will not be achieved by those who set people against people, class against class, or institution against institution. So, while we celebrate our recent political victory we must understand there's much work before us: to gain control again of government, to reward personal initiative and risk-taking in the marketplace, to revitalize our system of federalism, to strengthen the private institutions that make up the independent sector of our society, and to make our own spiritual affirmation in the face of those who would deny man has a place before God. Not easy tasks perhaps. But I would remind you as I did on January 20th, they're not impossible, because, after all, we're Americans.

This year we will celebrate a victory won two centuries ago at Yorktown, the victory of a small, fledgling nation over a mighty world power. How many people are aware -- I've been told that a British band played the music at that surrender ceremony because we didn't have a band.

It is this heritage that evokes the images of a much-loved land, a land of struggling settlers and lonely immigrants, of giant cities and great frontiers, images of all that our country is and all that we want her to be. That's the America entrusted to us, to stand by, to protect, and yes, to lead her wisely.

Tonight, in this room, everyone is deserving of a thank you -- not only these fine talented artists who are going to perform for us tonight but all the rest of you who are here because you are generous patrons, not alone of charities but of cultural and artistic activities and in the preservation of historic treasures. And you're carrying on a tradition that is uniquely American, because in this land we have maintained by private and voluntary contributions more orchestras, more opera, more ballet, more nonprofit theater, more libraries, and other cultural activities than all the rest of the world put together.

Nancy and I have been very honored to be a part of this, and I think that I speak for everyone here when I say a heartfelt thanks to these fine artists who have given their time and their talent to make this evening so wonderful.

You know, some people were mentioned, some credits given; you couldn't name all of the people here in this theater that have had a hand in making this very wonderful evening. One was mentioned, Frankie Hewitt, and she certainly deserves it. There were two ladies that I don't think any of the others will mind if I mention, who worked long and tirelessly together to make this a success -- Mrs. Tip O'Neill and Mrs. Howard Baker. They worked so well together that I've got a couple of projects I'm going to suggest to their husbands. [Laughter] It's worth a try.

Now, again, I'll say a thank you myself to all of you who have made this possible -- and not only this evening but the restoration of this theater. And for all of you, a heartfelt thanks again to these wonderful people. Thank you.

On this Pan American Day of 1981, the people of the United States extend warm greetings to their neighbors in the Americas, and reaffirm their commitment to the spirit of solidarity, the ideals and purposes of the Inter-American system, and their active support of the Organization of American States.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 20th day of March in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and fifth.

While cancer is often called the disease Americans fear most, it is also now one of the most manageable chronic diseases in our country. We are approaching the day when, through surgery, chemotherapy and radiotherapy, half of the most serious forms of cancer can be cured.

In addition to improving treatment for cancer patients, we must also reduce the incidence of this disease. In view of increasing evidence that a majority of cancers are related to environment and lifestyle, the major effect of Federal research today is in these areas.

To give emphasis to this serious problem and to encourage the determination of the American people to meet it, I also ask the medical and health professions, the communications industries, and all other interested persons and groups to unite during this appointed time in public reaffirmation of our Nation's abiding commitment to control cancer.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 20th day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and fifth.

I am submitting herewith a preliminary report of this study which is being conducted by an interagency task force of the President's Economic Adjustment Committee. Additional portions of the study are underway, and will be reflected in a final report which I will forward to the Congress as early as practicable. I will defer offering any recommendations on organizational and budgeting approaches to community and impact assistance until that time.

The study's initial findings suggest that the near-term local economic benefits of a major new military base may not be sufficient to offset the cost of required additional community facilities and services, and that special Federal assistance to affected States and localities may sometimes be justified. At the same time, States and localities should be expected to meet their share of community facility and service costs in defense growth areas.

As a general proposition, therefore, any special Federal community assistance should be limited to the minimum level required to mitigate the adverse effects of extraordinary growth directly resulting from major new bases. In addition, I would oppose any such assistance taking the form of Federal guarantees of State or municipal indebtedness where the interest is not subject to Federal income tax.

With specific reference to the MX weapon system and the East Coast Trident base, Section 802 of the Military Construction Authorization Act contains a wide range of authorities to provide impact assistance for affected areas. If additional legislation is required, I will request it at a later date.

Georgia, and Florida have participated fully in preparation of this report. I am confident that, working together, we can meet legitimate State and local concerns about defense growth impacts, while at the same time satisfying national security requirements.

Two centuries ago in this country, small business owners -- the merchants, the builders, the traders -- rebelled against excessive taxation and government interference and helped found this Nation. Today we are working to bring about another revolution, this time against the intolerable burdens inflation, over-regulation, and over-taxation have placed upon the Nation's 12 million small businesses, which provide the livelihood for more than 100 million of our people.

To revitalize the Nation, we must stimulate small business growth and opportunity. Small business accounts for over 60 percent of our jobs, half of our business output, and at least half of the innovations that keep American industry strong. The imagination, skills, and willingness of small business men and women to take necessary risks symbolize the free enterprise foundation of the American economy and must be encouraged.

I urge all Americans who own or work in a small business to continue their resourcefulness and successes, for these efforts contribute so much to the entrepreneurial spirit which made this Nation great. It is with justifiable pride that the American small business man can point to himself as the backbone of our Nation.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 23rd day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and fifth.

The Greek War of Independence which was launched on March 25, 1821, had a special significance for Americans of that time. Only forty-five years before, the American colonies, too, had declared their independence. For Americans, the Greek struggle was that of a people whose ancient heritage was the source of fundamental ideas of free government on which the American Republic was founded.

Our friendship has continued to flourish and to strengthen, immeasurably enriched by the millions of Greeks who have come to our country to add their unique heritage to the fabric of American life. I am confident that Greek-American friendship will continue to grow and to produce even greater mutual benefits in the future.

The purpose of this team is to coordinate and control all appropriate Federal resources in responding to emergency situations both foreign and domestic. The type of incident that might be involved ranges from an isolated terrorist attack to an attack upon United States territory by a hostile power.

During any emergency, the President would of course be available to make all critical decisions and to chair the crisis management team as his presence may be needed. Vice President Bush's role is to chair the team in the absence of the President. Of great importance, he will also engage in forward planning for emergency responses, develop options for Presidential consideration, and take the lead in the implementation of those decisions.

The President. Well, you are going to have a press briefing in just a few minutes in there, I understand, with my friend Mr. Brady, and this is a statement that I have left with him to read to you. But I will read it to you now, myself or give it to you -- my own statement. And then he will take the questions there in the press briefing that you might have.

The President. Yes. That is why I have authorized such an office. It has no conflict whatsoever with what I just said. Crisis having to do -- it could be with an earthquake, it could be with a flood in any one of our States, a disaster of that kind. There has always been such an office in the White House, and normally the White House adviser, the national security adviser, has chaired that. We thought it was more appropriate to have the Vice President, if I am not present -- to have the Vice President do that.

This Treaty is necessary to settle the overlapping claims of jurisdiction resulting from the establishment of a 200 nautical mile fishery conservation zone off the coasts of American Samoa in accordance with the Fishery Conservation and Management Act of 1976, and the establishment by the Government of New Zealand of a 200 nautical mile zone around Tokelau.

The Treaty satisfies the interest of the peoples of Tokelau and New Zealand that the Tokelauan claim to sovereignty over three of these islands, inhabited by natives of Tokelau and administered by New Zealand, will not be encumbered by a conflicting but inferior claim by the United States.

Island, which had been claimed by Tokelau, and by securing a maritime boundary in accordance with equitable principles. It further serves United States foreign policy interests in the area by promoting friendly relations with New Zealand and with Tokelau.

While hundreds of thousands of government employees are working honestly and competently to serve their nation, there is also a very small minority of dishonest -- and sone frankly incompetent -- individuals who are costing the taxpayers perhaps billions of dollars in fraud and waste.

This is not my money; it is not the Congressmoney; it is the people's money. Our failure to stop this fraud, waste, and mismanagement has led to growing public cynicism about the ability of government to control itself. It raises fundamental questions about the integrity of government.

This Executive order I have signed brings together in one body the Inspectors General of the various agencies of Government so that they can focus their total efforts in the places that will do the most good. This will also include the efforts of the Justice Department and its resources in the FBI.

Bringing together these efforts will permit all agencies to share knowledge of fraudulent and wasteful activities. They will exchange information on the kinds of investigations which will provide the most promising results. And they will be ready to move in quickly with tough and effective criminal prosecutions where such prosecutions are warranted.

I am also announcing the appointments of the first 6 of the 16 Inspectors General that are authorized by law. When I exercised my prerogative as a new President to terminate the appointments of the incumbent inspectors, I announced that we would seek the very best people we could find, including those who previously held these positions. Five of the six individuals I am announcing today were previously serving as Inspectors General, and I hope this puts to rest suspicions that have been voiced that politics has anything to do with these appointments. We sought the best people available -- individuals with experience who have uncovered cases of fraud and waste in government and have saved or recovered millions of dollars.

I am pleased to announce that the FBI has just concluded a major investigation in New York relating to fraud in the summer lunch program. FBI Director William Webster will be here later today to give you a complete briefing on this matter.

Sec. 3. Responsibilities of the Chairman. (a) The Chairman shall, in consultation with the members of the Council, establish procedures for the Council; and, he shall establish the agenda for Council activities.

Sec. 5. Administrative Provisions. (a) The Director of the Office of Management and Budget shall provide the Council and the Conference with such administrative support as may be necessary for the performance of the functions of the Council and the Conference.

The reduction of fraud and waste in all Federal programs is a major commitment and priority of my Administration. Today, I am establishing, by Executive Order, the President's Council on Integrity and Efficiency to focus and improve our efforts to deal with the problem. The Deputy Director of the Office of Management and Budget will chair this Council which will include all of the statutory Inspectors General and other key officials.

The establishment of this Council is an integral part of a broader plan to attack fraud, waste and inefficiency in Federal programs. This plan will involve a combination of key officials and organizations, coordinating mechanisms, and priority projects operating under active OMB leadership on my behalf.

I expect each of you to provide the necessary support and cooperation to assure that our objective is accomplished. One specific action I am asking you to take is to designate an individual at the Assistant Secretary level or higher who will have the responsibility for following up on the recommendations of your Inspector General and the General Accounting Office.

The reduction of fraud and waste in the operation of all Federal programs is a major commitment and priority of my Administration. Today, I am establishing by Executive Order, the President's Council on Integrity and Efficiency to focus and improve our efforts to deal with the problem.

The commitment to reduce fraud and waste cannot be limited to those departments and agencies where statutory IGs have been established. I have asked the Chairman of the Council to ensure that other departments and agencies are actively involved in this most important undertaking. The Executive Order directs the Chairman to convene all of the agencies not on the Council at least four times a year to share information on Council policy initiatives.

The President announced today the appointment of six Inspectors General for Government departments and agencies. Five of the six have previously served as Inspectors General. Three of those appointed today will resume their positions at the same agency as before and two will be in different agencies.

There are 16 statutory Inspectors General, including that of the State Department, which has a slightly different statutory basis. President Reagan announced that the remaining 10 positions will be filled shortly and that previously serving Inspectors General are under consideration for some of those positions.

Inspectors General, exercising the prerogative of a newly inaugurated President. He announced at that time that he would seek the most qualified appointees for these important positions and that the former incumbents would be among those considered.

Each of the IG's appointed today has compiled an excellent record of uncovering fraud and other abuses in the programs under their surveillance. In some cases, their investigations have led to criminal indictments, and in all cases they have produced recoveries of moneys falsely expended or other savings.

The United States has watched with growing concern indications that Polish authorities may be preparing to use force to deal with continuing differences in that country between the authorities and labor unions. We are similarly concerned that the Soviet Union may intend to undertake repressive action in Poland.

We would like to make clear to all concerned our view that any external intervention in Poland, or any measures aimed at suppressing the Polish people, would necessarily cause deep concern to all those interested in the peaceful development of Poland, and could have a grave effect on the whole course of East-West relations.

At the same time, we would emphasize our continuing readiness to assist Poland in its present economic and financial troubles, for as long as the Polish people and authorities continue to seek through a peaceful process of negotiation the resolution of their current problems. It is in this spirit that we shall receive Deputy Prime Minister Jagielski in Washington next week.

Well, it's been almost 17 years since I told a group of Young Republicans once that we had a rendezvous with destiny, and now here we are. [Laughter] But you've helped, you've added representatives at every level of government to strengthen our forces, and now for us to go forward and try to realize our ideals and the things that we've been talking about all these years.

And let me warn you now, you're going to have to help, because they're going to have to realize that the people of this country want what you have just applauded. And some of those who have evidenced their dislike of this program, whether it had to do with the cuts or the tax reductions, have fuzzed up the issue to the place that we have got to convey to the people that first of all, those who have brought about the present economic crisis are not automatically, by virtue of doing that, qualified to bring an end to it.

And the other thing they must realize is that in our tax cuts, we are faced -- and as of January 1st, it began, last January 1st -- that the American people today are burdened with the biggest single tax increase that has ever been imposed on the people of this country. And our tax cuts, major as they may seem to some, are actually not reducing the tax burden below what it was before January 1st. We are simply reducing the increase. The people will still be facing an increase, and we have to make that plain to everyone that these tax cuts are not taking us back to some poverty level of government. As a matter of fact, the tax increase that I've mentioned, unless we get our cuts, in the next 5 years will take an added $500 billion out of the pockets of the American people. And we're just trying to reduce that -- although, I'll tell you this, we've got a second package in mind that when it begins to show some effect and we can afford it, we'll be going back until we get rid of the rest of that increase too, later on.

Mr. Abell. It's such an honor to be here on behalf of all the Young Republicans across the country and about a half a million of us that wished we could all have been here today, and we're glad we're here. And Mr. President, thank you for having us, and I'd like to say that -- I'd like to thank you for having us and especially on our 50th anniversary. And I'd like to have our national chairman present you a bowl from Tiffany's that we got for you so you might be able to use it in your your home in California.

Thank you for being here, and thank you for all that you've done. I know you didn't start with the organization 50 years ago -- [laughter] -- but for all that YR's means -- and you certainly are keeping alive the tradition and the level of activity, and we're all grateful to you.

In 1972 he was Personal Representative of the President, with the rank of Special Ambassador, to head the United States Delegation at the ceremonies commemorating the 12th anniversary of the independence of the Gabon Republic.

Among its responsibilities, the Office of Communications is to coordinate the activities of public affairs officers of Government agencies or departments, provide research and information services to the President and White House staff, and to assist the television networks in their coverage of the President.

President Ford. He was television production coordinator for the 1976 Presidential debates, and during the 1980 Presidential campaign, served Governor Reagan as television production coordinator and advanced coordinator for the Presidential debates.

I'm delighted -- well, I can't tell you how thrilled to have you all here. And over there at the other table is a ballplayer who is delighted to be here, Vice President George Bush, and he did play. But I want to tell you, you span the years for me, and all these young gentlemen here that are growing up as ballplayers. It's a delight to have all of you here.

The nostalgia is bubbling within me, and I may have to be dragged out of here because of all the stories that are coming up in my mind. Baseball -- I had to finally confess over here, no, I didn't play when I was young. I went down the football path. But I did play in a way, as Bob Lemon well knows, I was old Grover Cleveland Alexander, and I've been very proud of that. It was a wonderful experience.

And I remember one day when they wanted some shots of me pitching, but kind of close up -- so, they wanted me to throw past the camera, and they had a fellow back there -- well, Al Lyons, one of the ballplayers that was there, was going to catch the ball back there and then toss it back over the camera to me. And the cam was getting these close shots for use wherever they could use them. And he was on one side of the camera, and my control wasn't all that it should be at one point, and I threw it on the other side of the camera. And he speared it with his left hand with no glove on. He was a left-hander, and after he brought the ball to me, and he said, ``Alex, I'm sorry I had to catch your blazer bare-handed.'' [Laughter] He didn't suffer any pain, I am sure of it.

But you know, I've always been sorry about one thing. Alex is in the Hall of Fame and deservedly so. Everyone knows that great 1926 World Series, when he had won two games, received the greatest ovation anyone's ever received, and then was called on in the 7th inning with the bases loaded, no one out, and one of the most dangerous hitters in baseball at the plate. And he came in and saved the game. The tragedy that I've always regretted is that the studio was unwilling to reveal in the picture, was afraid to reveal what I think was the best kept secret in sports.

A bad habit of Alex's was widely heralded and took something away from his luster. But they wouldn't let us use the actual word of what was behind, maybe, his bad habit. Alex was an epileptic. And when he was arrested and picked up for being drunk in a gutter, as he once was, he wasn't at all. But he would rather take that than admit to the disease that plagued him all his life.

But he also, early in his baseball career, was hit in the head going from first base down to second on a throw from second; they caught him right in the head. And he was out of baseball for a while, and they didn't know whether forever, because he had double vision. And he kept experimenting, trying to find out if there wasn't some way that he could pitch. And he went to a minor league club and asked for a tryout, and the manager got up at the plate and said, ``Well, go on out on the mound and throw me a few.'' Alex broke three of his ribs on the first pitch.

But there are men in this room that were playing when I was broadcasting, and I promised to say something here to a great Cub fan that we have at the table that would make him feel good. I was broadcasting the Cubs when the only mathematical possibility -- and Billy Herman will remember this very well -- that the Cubs had of winning the pennant was to win the last 21 games of the season. And they did. And I was so imbued with baseball by that time that I know you're not supposed to talk about a no-hitter while it's going on because you'll jinx them. So, there I was, a broadcaster, and never mentioned once in the 21 games -- and I was getting as uptight as they were -- and never mentioned the fact that they were at 16, they were at 17, and that they hadn't lost a game, because I was afraid I'd jinx them. But anyway, they did it and it's still in the record books.

Well, I saw him start to type, and I started -- Dizzy Dean was on the mound -- and I started the ball on the way to the plate -- or him in the wind-up and he, Curly, the fellow on the other side, was shaking his head, and I thought he just -- maybe it was a miraculous play or something. But when the slip came through it said, ``The wire's gone dead.'' Well, I had the ball on the way to the plate. [Laughter] And I figured real quick, I could say we'll tell them what had happened and then play transcribed music. But in those days there were at least seven or eight other fellows that were doing the same ballgame. I didn't want to lose the audience.

But, I can't take any more time doing this or we'd be here all day. They tell me that I'm supposed to go out there in front of the door to the Blue Room, and because I haven't been able to say hello to all of you in here and, as I say, there are many of you that were playing when I broadcast in those telegraphic report games, and not only recreated but -- as I just told you -- now and then created some of the ballgame. But I understand that we're going to have a chance outside here -- kind of a line where I can say hello and goodby at the same time to each one of you.

Mr. Kuhn.(Bowie Kuhn, Commissioner of the American Baseball Association)  Okay, fine. I just wanted to take a moment on behalf of all of us gathered here together to thank the President for his great kindness in having us all here today.

Before the luncheon, the President greeted the commissioner and myself in the Oval Office and was very gracious to sign our historic Presidential baseball, which we have on display at the Baseball Hall of Fame in Cooperstown. He added his signature to the baseballs that have been signed by all the Presidents since William Howard Taft. And tomorrow morning, it'll be on display in Cooperstown for the millions of visitors to see when they come through the shrine.

I'd like to ask the President to accept from us a couple gifts. The first gift that we have to present is something that Billy Martin sent from Oakland. Bill heard about the luncheon and asked that I present this to the President. And if he could open it and show the audience, I think he'll enjoy it.

Mr. Stack. The veterans' committee of the Hall of Fame met recently in Tampa, Florida, to elect new members to the Hall of Fame: Johnny Mize, who's in the room today, was elected just a couple weeks ago. At the meeting, the veterans' committee wrestled with other candidates, the many candidates to the Hall of Fame. President Reagan's name came up, because we all knew that he was a baseball player in the movie ``Grover Cleveland Alexander.'' But he didn't make it on this go around. So, the veterans' committee asked me to arrange for the Hall of Fame to present to the President today a remembrance from the Hall of Fame.

Mr. Kuhn. I'd like to make just one announcement. The Baseball Hall of Famers who are here, after the receiving line, if you could remain for a minute, we will have a group photograph. I'm pleased to announce that this is the largest assembled group of Hall of Famers that ever been in one place together at any time.

Well, I am most pleased. I understand that I'm the honorary chairman now. Well, I'm very proud to be here with you who are on the board of directors of this wonderful, international cities program -- 702 American cities with -- some of them have got more than one sister, because there's 951 foreign cities in 77 nations, and it totals about 86 million people in population. But the greatest thing is, what an evidence it is on this, the 25th anniversary of this, that you've come that far and done that -- I'll have to start saying ``we'' now -- in 25 years. But what an evidence it is of what people in their home communities and at the local level can accomplish that I think should give all of us confidence that there aren't any problems we can't lick if we go at them that way.

This is indeed an honor, Mr. President, for us to be here today and to thank you personally for accepting honorary membership in Sister Cities International. I just can't tell you how much this is going to mean to the thousands of people that volunteer their time and their money to help in spreading world understanding and peace. It's really going to be a big boost in our program. And you mentioned 700 cities. As a fellow Californian, I want you to know how proud I am that 166 of those are from California.

But this a great occasion and we are celebrating our 25th anniversary. We'll have the big celebration in August in Kansas City, Missouri. And on behalf of the board, I would like to invite you or a delegate to attend our conference.

But we are very delighted, and we just can't thank you enough. And on behalf of the board, I would like to make a presentation. This is the ``Treasures of the Library of Congress.'' It's a limited edition. And it's presented to you on occasion of the 25th anniversary of this great program that was started by President Eisenhower, and I'm sure that he is looking down on us today and being very happy with what we have accomplished since he started this program.

But bless you all again. And I'm very proud to have these, proud to have the honorary chairmanship that you've offered. And you're confirming with this a very deep-seated belief of mine. I have always believed that a lot of the problems in the world would disappear if people would start talking to each other instead of about each other.

Mr. Niskanen will have the primary responsibility within the Council for the analysis of policies, such as regulations, subsidies, labor, and trade policies, that affect selected sectors of the economy. He will report to Murray Weidenbaum, Chairman of the Council.

Mr. Niskanen is a founder of the National Tax Limitation Committee and has contributed to the drafting of several tax limitation amendments. He also participated in several of the President's economic task forces during the 1980 campaign.

Mr. Richardson is a professional lobbyist who has been involved in a number of lobbying campaigns. He was chief lobbyist for the Associated General Contractors, the Liberty Lobby, the National Right-to-Work Committee, and the National Lumber Manufacturers' Association. For the past 3\1/2\ years he has managed his own independent lobbying firm, Richardson, Randall and Associates. Previously he served as an attorney in the Justice Department and the General Accounting Office.

On January 22, 1981, I directed all Executive departments and agencies to reduce obligations for advisory committees by five percent for 1981. As part of the annual review of advisory committees, which will begin in April, we will scrutinize the activities and responsibilities of each advisory committee to determine whether it should be renewed or abolished.

There's been a lot of talk in the last several weeks here in Washington about communication and the need to communicate, and the story that I haven't told for a long time -- but somehow it's been brought back to me since I've been here --  about communication and some of the basic rules of communication.

Rams, and then later became a sports announcer, and Danny told me that one night as a sports announcer, he was having a young ballplayer with the Los Angeles Dodgers over to the house for dinner. And the young wife was bustling about getting the dinner ready while he and the ballplayer were talking sports, and the baby started to cry. And over her shoulder, the wife said to her husband, ``Change the baby.'' And this young ballplayer was embarrassed in front of Danny, and he said to his wife, ``What do you mean change the baby? I'm a ballplayer. That's not my line of work.'' And she turned around, out her hands on her hips and she communicated. [Laughter] She said, ``Look, buster, you lay the diaper out like a diamond, you put second base on home plate, put the baby's bottom on the pitcher's mound, hook up first and third, slide home underneath, and if it starts to rain, the game ain't called, you start all over again.'' [Laughter] So, I'm going to try to communicate a little bit today.

America. They also are an important part of the industry in which  my union plays a part. Now, it's true that grease paint and make-believe are not tools of your members' trade, but we all know the meaning of work and of family and of country.

For two decades or more, I participated in renegotiating our basic contract when it came renewal time. And here, too, we have much in common. Sitting at the negotiating table, we were guided by three principles in our demands: Is it good for our people? Is it fair to the other fellow and to the customer? And is it good for the industry?

Samuel Gompers was repudiating the socialist philosophy when he made that statement. No one worked harder to get or believed more in a fair shake for the people who sweat as the fuel of our country, but he didn't believe that this should or could come from government compulsion.

America depends on the work of labor, and the economy we build should reward and encourage that labor as our hope for the future. We've strayed far from the path that was charted by this man who believed so much in the freedom and dignity of the worker. We are in today's economic mess precisely because our leaders have forgotten that we built this great Nation on rewarding the work ethic instead of punishing it.

We've gone astray from first principles. We've lost sight of the rule that individual freedom and ingenuity are at the very core of everything that we've accomplished. Government's first duty is to protect the people, not run their lives. What have been some of the results of this straying from basic principles? Well, for one, violent crime has surged 10 percent, making neighborhood streets unsafe and families fearful in their homes. We've been left with a legacy of almost 8 million people out of work -- 666,000 of them construction workers. All of these people have been robbed of a basic human dignity and forced into the humiliation of unemployment. The annual inflation rate has soared to nearly 12 percent, making a mockery of hard work and savings. And our national debt has grown to more than $950 billion despite taxes that eat up an ever-increasing share of the family dollar.

This deficit has particular meaning for you, because when government has to borrow to pay its bills, it competes for private capital, driving interest rates up and construction starts down. So, when people ask me why we have to cut down the budget deficit, I think the answer is pretty clear. If we don't get control of the budget and stop wild and irresponsible spending, we will repeat past intolerable prime interest rates of more than 20 percent, rates which have played havoc with the lives of your fellow workers. And when we do not have economic security at home, our national security is threatened. We've let our defense spending fall behind and our capability to defend ourselves against foreign aggressors is not what it should be. These trends not only must stop, believe me, they will be stopped.

Every American and especially all the working people of our country have an enormous stake in what we do. You pay the most taxes. You believe in a work ethic but subsidize a government that does not. You, who have traditionally saved to provide for your futures, today cannot save. You, who most want to work, are most likely to be laid off. You, through taxes on your hard-earned wages, pay for what could be as much as $25 billion each year in Federal waste, abuse, and outright fraud in government programs. Franklin Delano Roosevelt spoke of ``the forgotten man at the bottom of the economic pyramid.'' Well, today it's safe to say that the people at both ends of the pyramid are getting attention. The man who's forgotten is the fellow who built it.

Such a man wrote his Congressman a few weeks back, and that letter landed on my desk. I've gotten tens of thousands of letters about our plan for economic recovery. I appreciate all of them, but a few of them really stand out, and this man's letter is one of them.

Right now we have the highest peacetime deficit in living memory. Federal personal taxes for the average American family have gone [up] 58 percent in the last 5 years, and regulations by the government cost consumers an estimated hundred billion dollars a year. The man in Peoria is right. Across the country, there are millions of people like him yearning for a different approach.

They're yearning for us to reach for our hopes and make room for our dreams, and to put it bluntly, they want something different for a change. Instead of halfway solutions, jerry-built programs tied together with redtape, they're ready for an overhaul to make the engine work again.

I've heard the complaints coming often from those who had a hand in creating our present situation. They demand proof in advance that what we've proposed will work. Well, the answer to that is we're living with the proof that what they want to continue doing hasn't worked and won't work. I believe what we proposed will work simply because it always has. We must get control of the budget monster, get control of our economy, and I assure you, get control of our own lives and our own destinies.

What has been submitted to the Congress is a four-point comprehensive program or package for economic recovery. If only part of the package is passed by Congress, we'll only ease some of our problems, and that isn't a solution at all.

We must first get government spending under control. And let me make something plain. We're not asking that government spend less than it has been spending, although that might not be the worst idea in the world. We're simply proposing that government increase its spending in 1982 over 1981 by 6.1 percent, not 14 percent, as has been advocated. If we keep spending at the present rate of increase, our budget will double again in 6 years.

Now, I propose cutting $48.6 billion from the Federal budget in fiscal year '82. Now it's true these are the largest spending cuts ever proposed. But even with these cuts, that budget will still increase by $40 billion next year, and there will probably be a $45 billion deficit. Without our cuts, the deficit will be more than $90 billion.

This is the most sweeping tax incentive program in the last 20 years, the largest tax rates cuts ever proposed. And again, we're not asking government to get along on less money than it's been accustomed to. Our largest-in-history tax cut will only reduce te largest-in-history tax increase that was imposed on all of us at the beginning of this year.

Now, I have a feeling that in all the arguing and rhetoric, many Americans have lost sight of the fact that they're not facing taxes as usual, but a gigantic tax increase that will take $770 billion extra out of our pockets over the next 6 years. We think that's too much. This Government, without taking a single vote in Congress, has raised billions of dollars from taxpayers in the last few years, just through inflation. The system keeps kicking people up into higher brackets, that they try to keep up with the cost-of-living increase, bleeding their earnings, sapping their incentive, and quite frankly, making a mockery out of the tax system. Not too long ago, only 3 percent of the people who work and earn in this country were in a 30-percent tax bracket. Today, 33 percent are in that bracket, and they have no more purchasing power now than they had before when they were in a much lower bracket.

Well, it doesn't. It's your money. It's your sons' and daughters' money that they're hoping to use for a new home. It's your parents' money that they need for a decent retirement. And if we do nothing else in this administration, we're going to convince this city that the power, the money, and the responsibility in this country begins and ends with the people and not with some cinderblock building in Washington, D.C.

The third measure we've called for is elimination of excessive regulation. Now, I know you have no experience with regulation. [Laughter] Overregulation affects every industry. Many of you know people who are out of work because of the way it affects yours. It's estimated that total regulations have added as much as 20 percent to the cost of a home. Indeed, I've seen the figure more recently put at 22 percent, as the cost.

I've told before, I have a neighbor out in my neighborhood in California who was building his own home. And he got so fed up with all the paperwork and the regulations required that he pasted them all together into one strip of paper, put up two poles in front of the half-finished house, and strung them up across there. The strip of paper was 250 feet long.

And, finally, we're determined to work with the Federal Reserve Board to develop a monetary policy consistent with the economic program designed to stabilize the money supply, reduce inflation, and allow interest rates to come down.

People who hold down jobs in the building trades probably understand better than anyone -- well, that is, better than anyone except someone who's just lost his job in the building trade -- the need for a stable monetary policy. Fewer than 1 in 11 American families can afford to buy a new home.

The main source of strength in this fight is going to be the people themselves. The idea is to unleash the American worker, encourage the American investor, and let each of us produce more to make a better life for all. After all, why should we pay for some luxuries that are not truly essential to our well-being, pay by way of a subsidy when the man and his wife in Peoria are out of work? Why should we subsidize increased production of some things that we already have in surplus? And why should we go in debt to pay for school lunches for children of upper-income families when borrowing by government may cost you your job? We not only shouldn't do those things, we no longer can afford to do them.

We'll continue to fulfill our obligations to those who must depend on the rest of us. Those who are deserving can rest assured that they'll not be cut adrift, but the rest of us will feel the impact of the budget cuts, which have been distributed through the economy, as evenly as possible.

There is one area, however, where we must spend more and that is for our national defense. Now, don't get me wrong. Cap Weinberger, Secretary of Defense, has shown me programs in his department where we can and will realize substantial savings. We'll cut $2.9 billion in next year's budget alone, and the cuts will accumulate to more than $28 billion by 1986 in the Defense Department. But those savings will be applied to the necessary things we must do, thus reducing the amount of additional spending that we'll need.

Since 1970 the Soviet Union has undergone a massive military buildup, far outstripping any need for defense. They've spent $300 billion more than we have for military forces resulting in a significant numerical advantage in strategic nuclear delivery systems, tactical aircraft, submarines, artillery, and anti-aircraft defense. And to allow this defense or this imbalance to continue is a threat to our national security. It's my duty as President, and all of our responsibility as citizens, to keep this country strong enough to remain free.

As union members and as concerned citizens of the world, we watch with great interest the struggle of our fellow workers in Poland. Their courage reminds us not only of the precious liberty that is ours to nourish and protect but of the spirit in each of us everywhere. The Polish workers stand as sentinels on behalf of universal human principles, and they remind us that on this good Earth, the people will always prevail. They serve to show us how trust and unity keep alive the very purpose of our existence and to remind us that man's work is not only directed at providing physical sustenance but that the toil of men and women everywhere must also have the goal of feeding the spirit of freedom.

We may even find strength in mutual trust. For too many years now, we've trusted numbers and computers. We've trusted balance sheets, organization charts, policies, and systems. We've placed trust in rules, regulations in government, government dictates. Well, I think it's about time that we placed trust in ourselves.

I'm here today because I salute what you've done for America. In your work you build. In your personal lives, you sustain the core of family and neighborhood. In your faith, you sustain our religious principles. And with your strong patriotism, you're the bulwark which supports an America second to none in the world. I believe the American people are with us in our cause. I'm confident in our ability to work together, to meet and surmount our problems, and to accomplish the goals that we all seek.

Now, I know that we can't make things right overnight. But we will make them right. Our destiny is not our fate. It is our choice. And I'm asking you as I ask all Americans, in these months of decision, please join me as we take this new path. You and your forebears built this Nation. Now, please help us rebuild it, and together we'll make America great again.

A decision is now being made whether or not to operate to remove the bullet. The White House and the Vice President are in communication, and the Vice President is now en route to Washington. He is expected to arrive in the city this afternoon.

Note: Mr. Gergen, Assistant to the President and Chief of Staff, made the statement at 3:37 p.m. to reporters assembled in the Briefing Room at the White House, following initial reports that the President had left the hotel unharmed by the assassination attempt.

Secret Service agents at the scene apprehended John W. Hinckley, Jr., 25, of Evergreen, Colo. He was initially charged with attempting to assassinate the President and assaulting a special agent and an employee of the Secret Service.

We have informed our friends abroad of the situation, the President's condition as we know it -- stable, now undergoing surgery. And there are absolutely no alert measures that are necessary at this time or contemplated.

White House. Later in the afternoon, the White House announced that the President went into surgery at approximately 4 p.m. and that doctors' preliminary reports to Mrs. Reagan, who was at the hospital, indicated that the President's condition was good and stable.

O'Leary's report on the President's condition, that he has emerged from this experience with flying colors and with the most optimistic prospects for a complete recovery. I can reinsure this Nation and a watching world that the American Government is functioning fully and effectively. We've had full and complete communication throughout the day, and the officers of the Federal Government have been fulfilling their obligations with skill and with care.

And finally, let me add our profound concern on behalf of two brave law enforcement officers who served to protect the President and then, of course, for a friend of everybody here, dedicated public servant, Jim Brady. We're going to watch their progress with all our prayers and with all our hopes.

Dr. O'Leary reported that the President had been wounded by a single bullet which penetrated his left lung, that the President was awake and in stable condition following surgery, and that the prognosis for his recovery was excellent.

The Vice President. The medical reports were very good. I had a very short visit with him. He'd taken a nap. When I walked in there he was awake, and I had a very good talk with him. What he really needs is rest. I tell you, the report from [Physician to the President] Dr. Ruge, when he briefed the Cabinet and briefed the leadership, was extraordinarily good. The President, to me, looked well and was very responsive, asked with his unfailing courtesy about Barbara, my wife.

So, I feel the same thing the country feels, a great sense of relief and feeling that he is on the road to recovery. It's a turmoil around there. I thought in intensive care that everybody would be whispering, but it's like Grand Central Station.

But he's doing very well. Very well. And everything seems to be proceeding. I just want to go up and walk out on the Senate floor, chat with some of my friends there, and tell them about this visit, and then go back. I have to get back to meet with The Netherlands Prime Minister.

Q. There is a report that there's something of a rift among some of the Cabinet members, particularly Secretary Haig and Secretary Weinberger. Is your role in any way involved in trying to heal that rift?

The Vice President. No, and I don't detect any such rift. And I think -- the thing, I think, from my vantage point, which admittedly, with some of it at 30,000 feet traveling back, was that things proceeded smoothly, in an orderly fashion. I sense a real, calm determination to go ahead. The President -- there's no need for any emergency procedures, the power of the Vice President to do anything. And I have not detected, nor do I believe there's any such rift.

The Vice President. No. Absolutely not. And it's orderly, and just to do what I can to assist, I will be taking over some of the meetings that the President would have participated in. But I'm in most of them anyway, so, business as usual to the best we can do it.

The Vice President. We've just had a delightful visit with Prime Minister van Agt, and I told him how much the President had been looking forward to seeing him. And I know from having visited the President in the hospital, prior to this visit, that today how much our President regrets not being able to receive this very, very distinguished visitor on this beautiful day here at the White House.

Our talks, we think, on the American side, have been extremely useful, despite the overlying concerns that everybody feels about our President. But these talks do testify to the continuing importance which the United States places on our transatlantic ties, including those with all of the members of NATO.

And the Prime Minister also comes to us as Chairman of the European Council. I have welcomed this opportunity to exchange views on issues of concern to the Community and, of course, bilateral concerns to the United States. And I know we feel -- and I'm sure I speak for Secretary Haig and all that were privileged to meet with the Prime Minister -- that there is a mutual understanding on many issues.

There is a mutual understanding, for example, in the Middle East and of our efforts there, efforts in which they have played a key role. The Netherlands and the United States are also allies in NATO, which I mentioned, and which, of course, remains the backbone of our mutual security. In our talks, I reiterated the U.S. determination as President Reagan has made clear, to pursue vigorously the two tracks of NATO's December '79 decision on theater nuclear weapons, both modernization and arms control.

We discussed Poland and were in strong agreement that the Polish people must be allowed to work out a solution to their own problems. Outside intervention or internal suppression in Poland would have severely -- you'd have severe negative effects on East-West relations.

We discussed, to some degree, El Salvador. I explained that American policy is designed to help that country defend itself against attacks from Marxist guerillas that are supported and trained by Communist countries. The Duarte government must be given the opportunity to institute its reform programs.

And so these are some of the subjects. We had a very fruitful meeting. I expressed my regrets to the Prime Minister that he did not have the opportunity to be received and to meet and to discuss these issues with our President. But it was a tribute to our friendship that, our President being absent, the Prime Minister was willing to accord us every courtesy and come here and to have these fruitful discussions.

The meetings we had today have no doubt further contributed to the excellent relations between the United States and Europe. Our historic relationship has proved to be essential at the most crucial moments in our past and will continue to be so in the future. Today we are strongly united in an alliance aimed at our common, single goal -- preserving peace and freedom in the world. At the same time, we are dedicated to contribute to national and international efforts to improve the quality of life for the millions in the world who are in the most serious need.

The European Council meeting in The Netherlands last week further emphasized the need for the closest possible cooperation between the European Communities and the United States in solving the extremely serious economic problems we are facing. The only way to win the economic fight is through well-coordinated, joint efforts.

Mr. Vice President, you mentioned the fact that our countries are preparing for the celebration next year of the 200th anniversary of our diplomatic and trade relations. They are the oldest, unbroken, continuously peaceful relations between the United States and any other foreign power.

Queen Beatrix to visit your great country in 1982 fills us with a great sense of gratitude. Your gracious invitation will enable our Queen to continue a tradition which has become a symbol of our friendship in all times. We regard your invitation as a seal on that unalterable and unique relationship between our countries across the ocean.

Mr. Vice President, I'm convinced that these celebrations, highlighted by your visit of our Queen, will serve their high purpose in contributing to an increased recognition of our respective shares in efforts to improve the lot of mankind.

May I, repeatedly, thank you, Mr. Vice President, for your willingness to receive us today under such extraordinary, exceptional circumstances. I said to you already, we would not have been surprised in case you would have cancelled entirely, or at least partly, the program which had been prepared for the visit long before. Now, the gratitude is ours. We had very valuable and instructive talks. We spoke as allies and friends. And I'm sure these talks will contribute to our common efforts.

The Vice President. May I just share, Mr. Prime Minister, with the people here on the lawn what I told you. I did visit the President in the hospital this morning, a very short visit, but I was very pleased at the way he looked. He, in his typical, unfailing thoughtfulness, asked me to convey his regards here and then also asked about my wife, and everything seemed so normal. And I just thought I'd tell this group what I've told you, that we feel very relieved in this country at what appears to be a very speedy recovery. And I know he would want me to say, as you leave these grounds, farewell and Godspeed and come back, sir.

Assistant Secretary of State-designate for African Affairs Chester A. Crocker will leave next month for an extensive round of consultations with African governments concerning the problems of southern Africa. He will report to Secretary Haig when he returns.

Africa. The broad objective we seek is to strengthen the security of southern Africa, a region of growing importance to our interests. The United States strongly supports negotiated solutions to the problems of this region. The path of violence serves no one's interest except that of our global adversary. We seek a peaceful solution of the Namibian problem leading to a genuinely independent and democratic Namibia recognized by the international community. To this end, we will work with all interested parties.

This administration intends to maintain and strengthen ties with the states of Africa. We wish to strengthen mutual understanding and cooperation between the United States and all African states. There can be no question of American support for apartheid, which is repugnant to our multiracial and democratic society. We intend to make our views plainly known, not in a spirit of confrontation, but of constructive help.

We're not alone; the miracle of American technology links us with millions of moviegoers around the world. It is the motion picture that shows us all not only how we look and sound but -- more important -- how we feel. When it achieves its most noble intent, film reveals that people everywhere share common dreams and emotions.

We just made another mistake we make too often in there -- that's why I'm late. I apologize. We scheduled a meeting with Members of the Congress that was then to end in time for me to get here on time. And I have learned in this year and few months here that we should always leave an empty space behind a meeting with the Members of the Congress, because it'll always run over.

Well, thank you very much for a very warm welcome, and we're delighted you could all come for these briefings and for the signing of this first report on the state of small business. We'll be urging the Congress to read and act on the report, not bury it, and you have my pledge that small business will never be relegated to a back seat, not in this administration.

We're not members of that Washington fraternity that believes that profits for business are dirty, but profits for government should be guaranteed. Nor am I a pessimist, as you can see in the report. I happen to believe that with help from our program, small business will not only survive, but you'll lead us to economic recovery, and you will make this great country number one again. I have confidence in you and in our program, because I think the two of you were made for each other. Our program is about rebuilding America, and America is small business.

You know, I said last year that those who claim America has no heroes just don't know where to look. I think entrepreneurs are the forgotten heroes of America. Most of them contribute far more to this country than they get back, and they rarely receive the recognition they deserve. When you're talking about the strength and character of America, you're talking about the small business community, about the owners of that store down the street, the faithful who support their churches and defend their freedom, and all the brave men and women who are not afraid to take risks and invest in the future to build a better America.

Entrepreneurs have always been there as nation builders and community builders. From the beginning it was little people with big dreams who sparked the revolt against taxation and regulation and led the fight for our independence. They and future generations pushed back the frontier and developed our incredible land of plenty.

You know, when you stop to think, when we opened the West, it was a people that were willing to hitch up that wagon and start out across those prairies, bet the house and farm and all the family on the outcome. They didn't have an area redevelopment plan or urban renewal going for them, they just headed out there and said they'd make it. And always they were striving to create, to build, to succeed, and excel. Sometimes they failed, but in America you could pick yourself up and try again, a little wiser than you were the first time.

We got into trouble when we started turning our backs on this great heritage. We forgot that government should work for us rather than the other way around. Winston Churchill, I think, summed it up. He said that ``some see private enterprise as a predatory target to be shot at, others as a cow to be milked. But few are those who see it as the sturdy horse pulling the wagon.'' Well, I believe the business community's been milked and shot at long enough. It's time to go back to common sense and set you free to do what you do best.

I just have to interject here a little incident that happened to me in the first real ranch that I ever -- after dreaming of it -- owned. So, I had 50 head of steers, grazer cattle there. And one day I got a notification from the State that I was to get them all in a corral, because the State veterinarians were going to come in and check them. I was in a brucellosis area.

You know, it's small business -- to go on with my remarks -- not the Federal Government, which creates four out of every five new jobs, employs more than half the work force, provides the livelihood for some 100 million Americans, and gives us new technology and real hope for our future -- and that's not bad. It's small business, not the Federal Government, which can best rebuild our inner cities and help those at the bottom of the ladder begin their climb to the stars.

Small business people produce big progress, and they deserve a ``must-be-given priority'' consideration in the making of economic policy. You and I know the root cause of our problems -- government has been spending and taking too much of the gross national product for itself.

So, we haven't had the capital pool we need to finance government spending and still make funds available for home mortgages and business investment. We resorted to more and more borrowing, financed by too much easy money. Inflation and interest rates zoomed, and growth sputtered. The entire business community has been hurt. But small business is most vulnerable and has been hurt the most.

Last year, thanks to your support, we began the long overdue reforms that will lead us back to prosperity. The chorus of criticism we're now hearing rings a little hollow when you know the truth. We haven't slashed government spending. We just slowed it's growth by cutting nearly in half the inflationary increase in spending, which was at a rate of 17 percent a year in 1980. Nor have we cut our regulations. But under the leadership of Vice President Bush, I'm proud to say we've cut by a third the increase in new regulations.

And despite everything you hear, we didn't pass massive tax cuts. Our tax program will barely offset a built-in tax increase of some $300 billion condoned by my predecessor. Our tax program provides real help for the small business community, and I believe it will prove to be one of the best things we've done for our economy and our people. It's the first time in nearly 20 years that you've even had the hope of getting ahead.

Americans now have powerful incentives to save, which will replenish our capital pool and help bring down interest rates. The provisions for accelerated depreciation will benefit small business firms ranging from agriculture to construction -- retailing, real estate, services, and wholesale. The 25-percent reduction in personal tax rates could easily be called a small business tax cut -- at least 85 percent of all U.S. firms pay their taxes by personal rates, not the corporate rates. So, they have a real stake in that part of the program. And of special interest, I would think, to farmers and family businesses, the estate tax exemption will increase to $600,000 by 1987, and of even greater help, there will be no estate tax for a surviving spouse.

Federal spending tripled in the last decade alone. Would you agree that by trying to break runway spending, by trying to control the so-called uncontrollables, that we are doing the right thing and that we should stick to it? [Applause] I should have brought those Members of Congress with me.

We'll bring the deficit and the interest rates down, and we'll keep them down, but only by encouraging growth and reducing government's share of the gross national product. If we resort to that moth-eaten argument of raising taxes, we'll only destroy the incentives we need to stimulate savings and give government the excuse it needs to keep spending more than it should.

It didn't work in the past, and it won't work now. So, I'm putting -- not putting, I should say, my faith in higher taxes. I'm keeping it where it's always been, in people like you out there beyond the Potomac and the principles that you stand and strive for. And it's you who will rebuild America.

President Calvin Coolidge, a man I greatly admire, said, ``In all our economic discussions we must remember that we cannot stop with the mere acquisition of wealth. The ultimate result is not the making of money, but the making of people. Industry, thrift, and self control are not sought because they create wealth, but because they create character.'' Well, you've lived the meaning of those words; you understand the challenge we face. It's the power of millions like you that will make America great again. We've come so far together, let's not stop now.

The success of the American economy is critically dependent upon preservation of real opportunity for small business. Historically, small business has provided much of the growth in jobs and innovation as well as being the supplier of services and deliverer of goods to virtually every farm, village, town and city in our nation. Although there are many definitions of small business, the one agreed upon by the 1980 White House Conference on Small Business was that of businesses employing 500 employees or less. Currently, approximately 15 million businesses, or 99 percent, of the total number of businesses fall into this category.

Published statistics from the Internal Revenue Service show that most small businesses are sole proprietorships. Still, significant numbers of partnerships and corporations are also small. Bureau of the Census statistics show that small businesses appear in all industry categories: manufacturing, transportation, insurance, wholesale and retail trade, and every other kind of industry. Small businesses vary in size: many have no employees (reflecting either family-owned and operated or individually-owned and operated businesses); over two million have between one and 20 paid employees. They are located all across our nation; many are in our large cities but a significant portion are in small towns. In truth, our small businesses are as diverse and disparate as our population.

This Administration is committed to assuring unrestricted access for small business to all segments of our economy. By unleashing small business from the burdens of unnecessary taxation and regulation, we enable men and women small business owners to increase their contributions to our society's economic and employment growth. In addition, we will continue to help expand the opportunities of today's struggling business aspirants, disadvantaged ethnic and racial groups, and to blend their skills and abilities in creating a better life for themselves and a stronger America.

It is the objective of this statement to describe how this Administration is establishing an economic environment conducive to small business formation and growth. It first describes the economic contributions of small business. Second, it explores the foundations of this Administration's small business policies. And last, examines problems and policies of special interest to small business.

The roots of the American economy are to be found in the history of small business. In America's early years virtually all businesses were small. It was not until the advent of the industrial revolution in this country that large businesses emerged to take advantage of economies of scale in production, distribution, and marketing. Since the 19th century, the share of our national output of goods and services accounted for by small business has declined. The decline leveled off during the 1950's, with small business responsible for producing just over half of all private production. In the early 1960's, small business' share began another decline, and today it is responsible for slightly less than half of the production of goods and services in our economy.

Despite these trends, small business plays a key role in the U.S. economy. The contributions of small business to innovation and employment have been particularly noteworthy. In 1976, research for the National Science Foundation showed small business had been a more prolific source of innovations per research and development dollar than medium or large business.

Inventors have often chosen to market their innovations through small business. Small business is, after all, ideally suited for such ventures by virtue of its greater flexibility and greater willingness to assume substantial risks in the pursuit of potentially large rewards.

Most small firms are labor intensive, and over half of our labor force is currently employed by small businesses. Small businesses remain among the leaders in employment creation. According to research at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology, between 1969 and 1976, more than 86 percent of new jobs were provided by small businesses employing fewer than 500 employees.

Some eighty percent of new jobs were provided by firms having 100 employees or less. Almost 66 percent of the new jobs were provided by businesses with fewer than 20 employees, and of the jobs provided by small businesses, 75 percent were attributable to firms that were less than five years old.

Small business has also played an important role in providing economic opportunities for minorities and women, both as employees and as entrepreneurs. Minority-owned business enterprises are predominately small businesses. Minorities control about 4 percent of all businesses and are concentrated in industries affording easy entry such as retail trade, services, and construction. Women control about 5 percent of all businesses and are also in those industries affording easy entry.

Given our nation's economic difficulties we cannot afford to ignore the resources and potential contributions of small business enterprises. Their innovative spirit, their flexibility to meet new challenges, are crucial to our economic progress. At the same time, the employment and entrepreneurial opportunities presented by this sector are too important to be less than fully realized. The bottom line is quite straightforward: America needs small business formation and growth.

The basic problem of the United States economy is that it is not growing fast enough. Since 1973, the U.S. economy has grown at a real rate of less than 2.4 percent, barely two-thirds of the 3.8 percent real growth rate experienced from 1950 to 1973, and far below the 4.5 percent rate achieved between 1962 and 1969. Why are we not growing? An important reason is that sources of growth have been obstructed by past Federal policy errors. Those errors involve the tax code and its interaction with inflation, the excessive appropriation of resources by the government, and distortions in the use of resources by unwise government intervention in the workings of the free market.

The fundamental tenets of small business policy are thus quite clear. Government should promote a strong, vibrant, private economy with policies that primarily rely upon free market forces to organize and allocate our economic resources. Economic growth and full employment must be restored while reducing inflation and interest rates, and, at the same time, Federal impediments to the free and efficient use of resources must be reduced or eliminated. The end result should be an economy characterized by free and open markets giving all of its participants the opportunity to contribute to, and share in, the high and rising standard of living such a system will produce.

Monetary policy has been aimed primarily at reducing inflation. Our goal is a moderate and steady growth of the money supply at rates consistent with stable prices. The excessive money growth of the 1970's has left us with double digit inflation. That inflation has increased interest rates to record levels. Lenders have had to add an inflation premium to the real interest rate in order to protect their principal from erosion. They have also had to add a risk premium to compensate for the increased uncertainty of sharp and sudden policy changes and wild market swings such as have occurred in the past three years.

Generally high interest levels, coupled with wide swings in interest rates, have been a source of special concern for small business. More stable monetary policy is needed to make financial markets more predictable and to prevent discontinuities in the availability of capital. This will result in lower, less volatile interest rates.

Regulatory relief is needed to reduce unnecessary costs imposed by government. Government regulations, including paperwork, have become a major source of market interference, reducing competition and efficiency within most industries. Moreover, regulations often have disproportionately adverse effects on small businesses, and the result is all too frequently an impaired ability of small businesses to compete effectively.

Fiscal policy has been aimed at promoting real growth. Lower production costs and more goods on the shelves help combat inflation, but the main purpose of the tax and spending reductions is to improve the incentives to work, save, and invest. Over the years, inflation has destroyed incentives by raising marginal tax rates on individuals and businesses, thereby reducing the rewards to labor and capital. Both the business and personal tax reductions in the Economic Recovery Tax Act of 1981 (ERTA) are essential elements in restoring these rewards to promote growth.

Small business will benefit from the general individual tax rate reductions and the indexing of tax brackets after 1984. Millions of small businesses are partnerships, proprietorships and Subchapter S corporations, the income from which is taxed at personal rates. In addition, the personal rate reductions will help restrain increases in labor costs, a prime concern of labor intensive small businesses. Small businesses will benefit from other features of ERTA as well. Among the more important provisions will be the Accelerated Cost Recovery System, the ability to expense limited amounts of depeciable assets, increases in the Investment Tax Credit for used property, lower corporate tax rates for small businesses, increases in the allowance for accumulated earnings, and simplified last-in-first-out (LIFO) inventory accounting. The estate tax reductions in ERTA significantly enhance the ability of small, family-owned enterprises to be perpetuated beyond the present generation, instead of being liquidated to meet excessive estate tax obligations. Other important provisions include the expansion of the funding limitations of the Keogh Plan and individual retirement accounts (IRAs). These provisions are helpful to small business in that they allow for increased tax deductions for the more profitable businesses, and at the same time generate more capital for institutions to lend to small business.

Spending restraint is needed to return the real and financial resources now being absorbed by the government to the private sector for use in investment and growth. The capital needs of the private sector, and of small business in particular, have been squeezed by the growth of the government sector. The problem manifests itself most directly in the competition for funds in the credit market, where the growing deficits must be financed.

Deficits are the evidence of the deeper problem of growth of the public sector. When purchases and financial claims of government increase relative to Gross National Product (GNP), it means fewer real and financial resources are available for use by the private sector to expand capacity and production. Improving access of small business to needed resources requires curtailing this government preemption of the country's work force, capital goods, raw materials, and productive capacity, as well as credit. Government spending ``crowds out'' the private sector's access to these resources whether that spending is financed by taxes or borrowing.

By the very nature of their structure, resources, and to some extent the types of activities in which they participate, small firms tend to be highly susceptible to the ups and downs of overall economic activity. Small businesses have fewer resources than large businesses to survive cyclical downturns and are more likely to fail.

Return of economic growth, coupled with substantial moderation of inflation expected from implementation of our economic program, is therefore of particular interest to small business. In addition, reduction of the uncertainties associated with wide swings in Federal economic policy should result in a business climate more conducive to formation, growth, and success of small business ventures. Stabilization will pay dividends for us all but most particularly for small businesses because of their greater susceptibility to business cycles.

For the men and women who own small businesses, inflation is a particularly serious problem. It earns this distinction essentially by exacerbating the other problems of small business, such as need for capital, the cost and availability of investment funds, and increased uncertainty concerning the behavior of the economy and the posture of economic policies. Small businesses often are in competitive markets where they tend to have little control over the costs they must pay and the prices they are able to charge, leaving them especially vulnerable to adverse price movements.

The economic program of this Administration should provide small business with relief from inflation in several ways. First, adherence to a policy of stable and limited monetary growth should eliminate the primary engine of inflation in our economy. Second, the improved incentives and reduced labor costs flowing from the reduction in Federal personal income tax rates should result in improved labor productivity, a matter of great importance to small businesses given their tendency to be labor intensive. Finally, help in controlling other costs of doing business will be derived from the elimination of unnecessary and inefficient regulatory burdens. Taken together, therefore, our policies should reduce the extent of the inflation problem at the same time the ability of small businesses to cope with the inflation problem is being enhanced.

Interest rates are also a very serious problem for small business. High interest rates cause severe cash flow problems which are particularly threatening to small businesses. The heightened sensitivity to high and volatile interest rates stems from the tendency of many small businesses to be undercapitalized and/or to be facing substantial capital needs to finance growth. The volatility of interest rates associated with the higher levels also works a hardship by raising the risk associated with investment and growth. The cost of capital is a significant cost of production, and wide swings in interest rates are easily capable of producing ruinous cost structures for small businesses. Moreover, the deductibility of interest expense is of less help to small businesses since they frequently generate insufficient income (particularly new ones just starting up operations) to take full advantage of the tax deduction.

When the inflation rate is high, interest rates are pushed up directly by the need for an inflation premium to protect the real value of the loaned funds. In addition, the economic instability suggested by the presence of high rates leads to a larger risk premium as well. Because interest rates are clearly influenced by inflation, and because the rate of inflation depends heavily upon the growth rate of money, major improvement is expected through our policy of moderate growth of money and credit. Short-term movements in interest rates may evidence little progress at first, as was illustrated early in the summer of 1981, but continued easing of inflation is evidence that conditions will improve as this policy is more firmly established.

There are many impediments reducing access to adequate capital, and unfortunately some of these work to the particular detriment of small business. Saving in recent years has been depressed by the interaction of inflation and the marginal tax rates. Inflation pushes taxpayers into higher income brackets which are subject to progressively higher rates of taxation. The result has been reduced incentives to save and to work. Small business has suffered not only from the general lack of saving, but also because entrepreneurs have historically looked to family and friends to supply the equity investment funds used as seed capital to form new businesses. When saving becomes difficult, these sources are materially diminished.

Small businesses also operate under something of a handicap in the competition for business funds. As mentioned earlier, small size translates into somewhat greater vulnerability thus raising the risk associated with any given investment in a small business. In addition, economies of scale tend to preclude small business participation from the more impersonal mechanisms of our financial system. Registration requirements associated with the public issuance of stock, for example, can only be afforded if the cost is spread over a large number of shares. In the same vein, loans from insurance companies, large banks, and other major sources of investment capital are rendered less economic by the costly information requirements required by the prospective lenders. Access of small businesses to investment capital is thus frequently limited to individuals and small banks which have a personal relationship with the entrepreneur.

Unfortunately, depressed saving rates and limited access are not the only problems. The past tendency of the Federal government to rapidly expand its claims on resources caused either the reduced saving rates when those claims were financed by taxation, or became a direct, competing claim on available saving if financed through deficits. That is, deficits themselves absorbed funds that would otherwise have been available for investment, making all access points to the flows of financial capital less able to meet the demands placed upon them by the private sector. Since small businesses have had relatively few access points, their hardship has been particularly acute.

Understanding the implications of the deficits projected for the next few years, however, is somewhat more complex. The deficit alone does not determine the amount of crowding out taking place in the financial market. What matters is the relationship between the deficit and the supply of savings needed to finance it. The first thing to note, therefore, is that the recently enacted tax reductions and the new higher Keogh Plan and IRA allowances will provide a powerful stimulus to saving. Business tax reductions for 1982, for example, will increase business saving; this is money that business will not need to borrow from financial markets. Personal tax reductions should promote substantial reallocation of income from consumption to saving, in addition to the normal saving increase from income growth alone. Year-over-year, there should be an increase in total private saving from 1981 levels in excess of 60 billion dollars.

The Economic Recovery Tax Act will improve small business access to capital in other ways as well. For example, the amount of earnings which may be retained in closely held corporations without being penalized by the accumulated earnings tax has been increased from $150,000 to $250,000. The change makes it possible for the men and women who own small firms to accumulate a larger amount of investment capital without incurring an accumulated earnings tax.

Another feature of ERTA is an increase in the maximum number of shareholders in Subchapter S corporations from 15 to 25 plus allowance of certain kinds of trusts to be treated as shareholders in such corporations. The provisions strengthen the attractiveness and utility of the Subchapter S provisions.

Still, the pressing need among many businesses is for equity capital, not debt. Repayment burdens of large loans, regardless of whether government or private in origin, inhibit the growth and formation of new businesses, especially those owned by women and minorities.

We recognize the need that small business has for new mechanisms of constructive finance. We also recognize that some of the mechanisms available, such as participating debentures, may require accommodative tax changes if they are to be effective.

Federal economic and financial policy plays a crucial role in small business viability. Thus, it is important that Federal departments involved in these areas be consistently sensitive to small business needs. I am directing the Commissioner of the Internal Revenue Service to include representatives of small business in advisory groups which review administration of the tax system.

Changes in Federal policy affecting financial institutions will also take into account the impact on small business needs. The trend of Federal financial reform movements has been toward providing a broader array of sophisticated financial services from strengthened and modernized institutions of all types in a competitive and cost minimizing market. These reforms should continue to insure further gains in services for depositors and borrowers of all sizes, at lowest possible cost, throughout the country as well as in financial centers. The result may well be the creation of important new access points for small business to the flows of investment capital.

The Economic Recovery Tax Act seeks to provide incentives to increase asset purchases as well as to encourage employment growth. Small business has less than one-fourth of total business assets, but employs over one-half of the work force. Asset-based tax incentives will provide some direct economic stimulation to small business.

As noted earlier, general reductions in the marginal personal income tax rates and tax indexing will be beneficial for small businesses. Since most small firms are labor intensive, their cost structures should benefit as the impact of the tax reduction helps restrain increases in labor costs.

By reducing, if not eliminating, bracket creep, indexing will also moderate employee wage demands. Improvements in wage cost pressures will be realized by big businesses as well, but the labor intensive character of small businesses means this provision will be even more important in their case.

The direct share of this benefit going into small business, while important, may be relatively small since these firms use less depreciable property per dollar of sales. On the other hand, to the extent small businesses are suppliers to large capital intensive firms (and in many cases are producers of depreciable assets themselves), the capital investment favoring provisions of ERTA should improve the market and profit positions of major parts of the small business sector, e.g. firms in the construction industry.

Within ERTA there is also an extensive list of special provisions targeted specifically to small business. Small businesses will benefit from the lower tax rates on the two lowest income brackets, the simplification of LIFO inventory accounting, the increased allowance for accumulated earnings, more liberal treatment of stock option plans, the liberalization of Subchapter S provisions, expanded expensing of depreciable assets, the larger allowance for the investment tax credit on used property, and the expanded funding allowances on Keogh plans and IRAs. And family-owned and closely held small business owners are assured of continuity of ownership through the liberalized estate and gift tax laws. The aggregate amounts of the tax relief afforded by these tax provisions can involve significant reductions in marginal tax rates and thus provide powerful incentives for growth and development.

Security Act, and others, have served important national objectives but have also introduced distortions in the operations of the free market, impeded competition, and increased costs of the regulated businesses. Most of these regulations have stipulated the same compliance requirements for small business as for large corporations. The relative burden is much greater, however, because compliance costs cannot be spread out over larger quantities of output. In short, small business has found itself at a competitive disadvantage because of the existence of efficiencies of scale in regulatory compliance.

The problem is a particularly difficult one. On the one hand, regulations frequently address important social objectives which cannot be dismissed lightly. On the other hand, their application to small business is frequently of only marginal importance to the social objectives involved, or they are applied in ways which are inappropriate in a small business context.

Nevertheless, difficult as the job may be, this Administration is committed to a major effort in regulatory reform. The problem has been approached with a two-pronged effort: regulatory relief and use of regulatory flexibility. So far regulatory relief has been the major policy tool. During this first year, regulatory relief has been actively pursued in every regulatory agency and the number of new regulations issued has been significantly reduced.

Agencies will be expected, following their review, to propose changes in these regulations in order to lessen the regulatory burden on America's small businesses. It also is timely to accelerate the review of all existing regulations imposed on the business sector to determine whether maximum flexibility is being provided to accommodate the uniqueness of small businesses.

Legislation enacted by the last Congress, the Regulatory Flexibility Act, provides the mechanism for undertaking this effort. The objective will be to assure that existing regulations do not unnecessarily impede growth and development of small businesses. At the same time, we will keep in place those regulations that are beneficial to society -- such as health and safety in the work place, and a healthy environment.

Full utilization of the provisions of the Regulatory Flexibility Act will be a principal theme of our regulatory reform efforts over the next three years. I will direct each Federal department and agency to accelerate the time for completion of the review of existing regulations as specified in the Regulatory Flexibility Act from ten to five years.

Regulatory flexibility may not be adequate to deal with the regulatory relief efforts that we have already launched in the areas of banking and finance. It is important that the interests of small business be given special attention. I am directing the Controller of the Currency and asking the Chairs of the Federal Home Loan Bank Board, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, and the Federal Reserve Board to follow the Regulatory Flexibility Act guidelines for assessing the small business impact of their proposals for changing our financial institutions.

The Securities and Exchange Commission has already established an admirable record of proposing regulatory reform that will allow small business men and women to meet their equity capital needs more cheaply and easily through the issuance of equity securities. I encourage them to continue their activities.

In summary, four economic problems plague small business, cyclical sensitivity, inflation, interest rates and access to capital. We addressed these problems with our four-part Economic Recovery Program: Federal spending cuts, tax reforms, regulatory relief and stable monetary policy. The results are beginning to show -- substantial decline in inflation, a start toward long-term decline in interest rates and increases in savings to expand the supply of capital. This is not the time to deviate from our program. We are breaking the back of stagflation. We have a solid economic program and we reject pleas for ``quick fixes'' like those used in the past. Our program will pull us out of this slump and put us on the road to prosperity and stable growth by the latter half of this year.

Small businesses rely upon the free functioning of markets to compete and prosper. Our antitrust laws -- the Sherman and Clayton Acts -- protect the competitive markets upon which our free enterprise system is based. The ability of our economy to remain free of illegal and anticompetitive practices is properly a major concern of small business.

Frequently, levels of concentration are considered an inverse barometer of the health of competition and the small business community. The concentration problem, however, may be somewhat less than meets the eye. One type of concentration, aggregate concentration (the extent to which productive assets, across all industries, are held by a limited number of firms of large size), has not been adequately documented because the statistics are less than perfect reflections of the exercise of control over establishments across industrial groupings.

Another type of concentration, market, or industrial, concentration (the extent to which total sales of a particular industry are concentrated in several or a few producers), may occur naturally where producers find economies of scale in production, distribution or marketing. History also reveals that market concentration has waxed and waned in many industries depending upon developments in technology.

There are numerous weaknesses in the statistics bearing on the concentration question. For one thing, they vary tremendously from industry to industry; the service sector is highly unconcentrated but growing, while the manufacturing sector is more concentrated and shrinking (as a share of GNP). Generalizations about market power are therefore quite difficult. Existing statistics on concentration ratios also tend to focus on manufacturing, ignoring the service, construction, and other sectors where small businesses predominate.

At the theoretical level it is also legitimate to question whether concentration ratios are, in fact, reasonable indicators of the degree of market power being wielded by the participants. Market power is, after all, determined by the availability of acceptable substitutes, barriers to entry, and the practical geographic limits of the market area. The sole dry-cleaner in a small remote town, for example, could conceivably excercise more market power than a major auto manufacturer facing international competition. In the final analysis then, it must be recognized that concentration ratios tell us very little about the competitiveness of the markets within which small businesses operate.

Federal government protects the economy from illegal combinations of market power. The interests of small business are best served by an economically sensible and clearly stated merger policy that carefully examines each specific transaction, and inhibits those transactions that clearly threaten to restrain competition. The Attorney General will vigorously prosecute anticompetitive behavior -- including, where appropriate, the use of criminal sanctions -- to protect competition and eliminate artificial barriers to entry. To the extent that Federal antitrust enforcement can influence competition, this Administration will use its enforcement powers consistently and without hesitation.

This Administration also recognizes that there is a variety of economic and governmental factors which contribute to the competitive capability of small business and perhaps influence the levels of concentration observed in the economy. Tax, regulatory, and fiscal policies appear particularly critical, and are areas over which the Federal government has major influence. Our primary mission in restoring a healthy economy and the premium for hard work and entrepreneurship, is to ensure that the unconcentrated small business sectors can continue to grow.

The Federal government is the largest single purchaser of industrial research and development in our economy. Until recently, government purchased more research and development than all other buyers combined.

In its pursuit of efficiency in research and development procurement, the government has gradually concentrated its purchases in larger firms and universities. As government budgets have become tighter, procurement officers have found it more immediately efficient to spend research and development funds in fewer large contracts rather than many small contracts. At a minimum, we need to assure that the internal efficiency achieved by such procurement practices are justified since the continuation of these practices will inevitably lead to increasing market concentration, at least among suppliers of contract research and development. Last fall, I indicated my support for Senate Bill 881, the Small Business Innovation Research Act, as it was passed by the Senate. I call upon Congress to pass this Bill for my signature this year.

For small business firms, cash availability is a serious limitation on the amount of research and development they can undertake. The Economic Recovery Tax Act provides an incentive for research and experimentation by allowing a 25 percent tax credit for certain research and experimentation expenditures in excess of a three-year moving average base period. The credit will be in addition to the immediate expensing or 60 month amortization of research and experimentation expenditures permitted under present law. Thus, small businesses' ability to finance their own programs should be materially improved.

I have also requested the Attorney General to examine antitrust laws to ensure that they do not interfere with the ability of patent and copyright holders, including those in the small business sector, to reap the proper rewards for their innovative contributions.

The phrase ``industrial policy'' has come to mean some form of elaborate industrial planning. But our industrial policy is one of establishing and maintaining competitive markets. We remain convinced that this policy will encourage and support the viable small business sector of our economy. Consistent with this philosophy, the Administration is taking steps to encourage competition in the Federal sector.

The Administration has made a major priority the policy of withdrawing wherever possible from competition with private industry in providing goods and services to be used by the Federal Government. Activities of all departments and agencies are being examined to see which can be converted to the private sector. For instance, in a review of 440 activities conducted by military departments, it was found that 264 of these, or 60 percent, could be turned over to private enterprise. As these and other requirements are filled by the private sector rather than government itself, a principal beneficiary will be small business.

The Administration is taking action to ensure that payments are made promptly to Federal contractors. Small business contractors are least able to wait for payment and will gain the most from prompt payments by the government. Accordingly, we have directed that all government contracts contain clear and specific instructions as to the procedure to be followed to obtain prompt payment. Further, contracts must now state precisely when the contractor can expect to be paid. Additionally, one of the criteria we will be using to evaluate Federal employees who are involved in the payment process will be their performance in paying government vendors promptly. Again, the Administration strongly believes that Federal contract payments should be made on time. Also, we agree with the basic concept of authorizing through law the payment of penalty interest when the government unreasonably delays payment of a bill.

Export trade plays a vital role in our economy. In part, it brings social benefits of our society's technology to other nations of the world and it also benefits our people with increased employment and returns to investment and helps pay for our imports. Unfortunately, small business has not participated in this activity to the fullest possible extent. Thus, our existing foreign trade promotion efforts must be more conscientiously targeted to small businesses, to assist them in access to foreign markets. I am directing the Department of Commerce in cooperation with the Small Business Administration to emphasize programs that encourage export promotion among small businesses.

This Administration is committed to pursuing unrestricted access for all business persons to all segments of the economy. Clearly, women and minority community members represent the largest underutilized resource of economic activity in our nation today. We are committed to unleashing this potential by removing barriers to their participation in business ownership.

Success of minority and women-owned business is dependent upon access to resources and knowledge of business management methods. The government has traditionally assisted minority and women business owners with management and technical assistance to help overcome social and prejudicial barriers.

We intend to expand the level of services delivered to the minority business community by improving the quality and effectiveness of service. To accomplish this, the Cabinet Council on Commerce and Trade is reviewing all government assistance programs for minority business to determine how they can be made more efficient and effective.

This Administration is dedicated to the systematic elimination of regulatory and procedural barriers which have unfairly precluded women from receiving equal treatment from Federal activities, including those activities affecting the opportunities of women in business. The Attorney General is systematically reviewing Federal laws and regulations in order to identify gender-based discrimination. He shall, on a quarterly basis, report his findings to me through the Cabinet Council on Human Resources. The Task Force on Legal Equity for Women, which I created recently by Executive Order, will then be responsible for implementing changes ordered by me.

Administration remains an effective and vital force advocating on behalf of present and potential women business owners. Also, the SBA's Office of Women's Business Enterprise will emphasize equal credit opportunity for women business owners.

Existing Federal data derived from administrative records and data collection agencies are simply not adequate for policy analysis and decision making. Yet, we are committed to reducing the paperwork burden of small businesses and therefore reject any proposal to add data collection mechanisms to those currently in existence. At the same time, existing Federal data may be better organized and coordinated among agencies to help build a data base more suitable for small business policy making. To this end, the proposal for Federal agencies to compile statistics on business size on a comparable basis will enhance analyses of the small business sector. We are planning for agencies to provide business size data on this uniform basis. Analysis of the small business sector would also be furthered by sharing of selected data among statistical agencies, and we are examining ways of accomplishing this within the constraints of privacy and confidentiality requirements.

SBA's data base, which is drawn from commercially available data, places no additional paperwork burden upon small business, allows maintenance of confidentiality commitments to small business, and provides policy relevant data. Thus, this data base must be continued and we have given it priority in our 1983 budget proposals. I am asking the Congress to enact my budget proposal for SBA's small business data base. Also, I am requesting the SBA to increase the resources allocated to this work and to include minority and women-owned business data within its data base.

In conclusion, the importance of the small business sector cannot and should not be ignored. For me, small business is the heart and soul of our free enterprise system. The small business sector has played, and continues to play, an important part in providing innovative drive and employment growth in the American economy. To help small business realize its full economic potential, this Administration is pursuing an economic policy aimed at getting the American economy growing again, together with programs designed to assure unrestricted access by everyone to economic resources and markets.

The essential parts of such an economic program are already in place. An effective mechanism for achieving regulatory reform has already been established. A policy of stable, moderate, monetary restraint must be followed. A fiscal policy calling for budgetary restraint coupled with important new tax incentives for work, saving, and investment is being put into practice. Moreover, within the context of this four-part program, the major problems of particular interest to small business are being effectively addressed. These problems range from inflation, high interest rates, access to capital, and regulation to research and development, export and equal business opportunities.

This statement and the following report are the first presented to Congress as required in Title III of Public Law 96 - 302. It has been prepared to meet both the letter and intent of the law and provide a comprehensive description of the state of small business. It is hoped the report will establish a spirit of cooperation with Congress to assist us in jointly pursuing economic growth and prosperity through our mutual recognition of the importance of small business in America.

The construction industry is one of the largest sectors of the economy of this nation, providing jobs for five percent of our workforce. Over the decades, this industry has played a vital role in our lives, helping us meet the need for more homes, schools, hospitals, roads, subways, factories, and recreation facilities. The American construction industry has always met the challenge, supplying us with the highest quality craftsmanship in the world and pioneering countless advances in the field.

Construction labor and management alike have historically taken pride in their spirit of rugged individualism, a spirit that has enabled them to overcome the adversities imposed upon a seasonal and cyclical industry.

Because of its unique nature, however, the construction industry is also unusually affected by downturns in the economy. It is with pride that I salute the hearty individuals who persevere in the face of tough obstacles, and I reiterate my commitment to revitalize the construction industry and bring it back to an environment of prosperity.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereby set my hand this first day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

In addition, he has served in the Office of Protocol as visit officer and was responsible for the coordination of all official and state visits by foreign heads of government and in the Office of Security as a Special Agent for Dignitary Protection.

The President announced today that he will not ask Congress to accelerate the current schedule of partial natural gas decontrol at this time. After extensive consultation with congressional leaders and groups representing producers and consumers, the President concluded that much-needed changes to the Natural Gas Policy Act of 1978 would overload an already heavy legislative agenda.

But, you know, before I go on, I have to tell a little story here. As that plane was coming in to land and I was looking out, suddenly my memory went way back -- and I mean way back. I was a sports announcer, Des Moines, Iowa, WHO. And one day I received an offer of a contract at a studio in Hollywood. And so, I packed up in an old Nash Lafayette convertible everything that I owned in the world and took off in the morning from Des Moines. And my first stop that night was Cheyenne, Wyoming.

I checked in at a hotel. I had dinner, and then I went to a movie. And the movie just happened to be a thing called, ``A Star is Born.'' Not the remake, the first time they'd made it. [Laughter] And those of you who might have seen it remember that it was a picture about the horrors and the vicissitudes of someone trying to get started in Hollywood. I didn't sleep very well that night.

I've been looking forward to coming home to the great American West. While Washington, as usual, seems paralyzed by handwringers, the people here are filled with just what Malcolm was talking about -- frontier spirit. And I'm still sure that the future is ours to shape.

United States Senate. He's working hard to restore incentive and productivity to our economy and accountability to our system of government. He sounds the Wyoming call for fiscal responsibility loud and clear in Washington. But the economic mess that we're in has been piling up for decades, and it's going to take some time to straighten out. That's why the people of Wyoming and all Americans need Malcolm Wallop's service and dedication for another term in the United States Senate.

America and in tomorrow. Together we'll get control of this economy, strengthen our defenses, and restore health to our nation. And we'll do it by returning our economy and our government to the American people. With the help of leaders like Malcolm Wallop, Alan Simpson, and Dick Cheney, we'll guide our country out of this dark tunnel of recession and decline. But we must stick to our course -- a difficult but straight road to recovery.

Incidentally, just a moment ago in the other room before we came in, attention was called to the fact that of all the total State delegations in the Congress in Washington, none has a higher record of support of what we've been trying to accomplish than the delegation that sits before you here today.

Those who would have us return to the failed policies of yesterday, offering only the equivocating and uncertain leadership that got us into this mess, would take us once again down a garden path that's laid out like the traffic circles of Washington: We would continue going around and around getting nowhere, constantly in motion yet neither coming nor going. This nation has turned away from the dizzying years of tax and spend and tax and spend. We will not go back.

Some of the same people who ran this country for the last 20 years -- who pushed us to the brink of economic disaster -- now want to steal your tax cut before you even get it. And let me point out that the so-called tax cut, historic as it is, only lessens the previous tax increase. The government is still taking in more money every year. Yet some say that raising your taxes more is the only way to balance the budget. Well, I don't think they've gotten the message yet.

Washington, our taxes went up more than 200 percent in the last 10 years, and in the last 10 years we ran up a string of gigantic deficits. We don't have a budget deficit because we don't tax enough; we have a budget deficit because we spend too much.

You know, the people that are complaining the loudest because now, yes, this recession which came upon us and was coming upon us for the last several years has increased what even our conservative estimates of the deficit was going to be, because every time you add 1 percent to the unemployment rolls, you add 25 to 27 billion dollars to the deficit. And yet, I don't recall any of them in those past years, when they were in control of both Houses of the Congress, ever protesting much about deficits. It seems to me that I remember hearing them say, ``Oh, we don't have to worry about the national debt. We owe it to ourselves.'' And I remember them saying, ``A little inflation each year is good for us. It maintains prosperity.'' Well, listening to the born-again budget-balancers moan about deficits now is kind of like hearing a mugger in Central Park complain about crime in the streets. [Laughter] I don't believe that I was sent to Washington to raise your taxes, and neither was the new majority in the United States Senate.

Others say the way to balance the budget is to cut back on defense. But the very survival of our nation requires that we go forward with the defense spending program. And one of the reasons we must go forward can be seen in these young people that I'm so happy are here today. It is not because we envision someday sacrificing them on a battlefield. We want that defense so that someday a generation of young Americans or in no future day will ever have to go and do that anyplace in the world.

The rate at which the Soviet Union is increasing its capabilities leaves us still a number of years before we'll even begin to close the gap. Now, this is one subject on which the man holding the job that I now hold is practically the only one who has all the facts with regard to our national security. And I tell you we dare not reduce our defense budget.

The bulk of our increase is not going for fancy new planes or elaborate weapons systems. Most of that money is going for basic essentials now in dangerously short supply. It's going for manpower, maintenance, and readiness. If we eliminated all the major weapons systems, all the programs that are scheduled in the present budget, it would only reduce next year's deficit by $6\1/2\ billion in an economy that will be $3 trillion. I don't think Americans want their American forces held together with chewing gum and baling wire, unable to move for want of spare parts.

We must not resign ourselves to life as a second-rate power, tempting aggression with our weakness. America has never gone to war because it was too strong. We must rebuild our defenses and secure our freedom so that once again America will be second to none in the world.

We have submitted to the Congress a budget that will reduce deficits, rebuild our defenses, and begin to control the runaway costs of so many of our Federal programs. We're open to suggestions and alternatives from the Congress. We welcome ideas for spending even less. But as the volume of voices rises in debate, there's one thing I want to make very plain: My commitment to cutting taxes and rebuilding our defenses is every bit as strong today as it was the day I took office. There will be no retreat in those areas.

America today is at a turning point. For too long we've been stalled in history, repeating mistakes of yesterday because our leaders have been afraid to share a new tomorrow. But our people are ready. Our people know that they can solve any problem, that no challenge is too great. They're fed up with promises and platitudes. They're calling for the government to have faith in the governed.

And then just yesterday a packet of letters all came in one little bundle, each letter from a little girl, and each little girl -- they live in Tennessee -- writing to tell me how much they love America, how beautiful America is, how much they can see the opportunities that lie before them. Every one of the little girls is a refugee from the Communist invasion of Laos. They're children of the boat people that came here for sanctuary -- and now telling us how much they love this country.

Unshakable faith in the American people is at the heart of our program for economic recovery and our proposal to return power and resources to the levels of government closest to the people. The principle is the same. There's no one in Washington who should enjoy an open season spending your hard-earned money. And there's no one in Washington with a corner on the compassion and wisdom that it takes to run this city or this State.

In the last 2 weeks mayors, city councilmen, legislators, and Governors from both parties, county officials have applauded our overall proposal to strengthen the partnership between the levels of government. Americans by a 2-to-1 majority favor more power closer to home. I think it's time we listened to the millions of voices west of Washington.

It's time we tapped the well of human spirit that runs so deep in our land. We'll find more than the strength of numbers and the strength of resources. We'll find the strength of individual courage, know-how, and love of country.

I believe the American people are with us in our cause. We can't make things right overnight, but we will make them right. I'm asking you, as I'm asking all Americans in these long months of decision, to stay with us as we hold to this new path.

You and your forebears, as Malcolm said, tamed a wild frontier. And, believe it or not, you did it without an area redevelopment program or urban renewal. [Laughter] So now, load up the musket and help us conquer this wild growth and centralization of power which threatens all that we've created.

I'm counting on the advice and support of Malcolm Wallop in the months ahead and the years ahead as we return this country to our first well-charted course. Now, I'm going to say that I'm sure we probably don't agree on every issue. No two people do. But we share the overriding philosophy that individual freedom, individual integrity, and individual ingenuity made us the greatest country the world has ever known. And I know that these gentlemen you sent to Washington who are here with us, I know Malcolm and myself, we put our trust in God and in the American people.

Jack Schmitt, I came to Albuquerque today to tell you something that I now realize is absolutely unnecessary to tell you, and that was how lucky you are to have a Senator like Jack Schmitt. You already know that. And you're lucky that, among other things, he's a geologist, because let me tell you, Washington has more than a few people with heads that only a rockhound can handle.

Education, he played an instrumental role in enacting last year's budget cuts. They were, incidentally, the biggest cuts that have ever been made in the history of this country. And let me say he handled those budget cuts with as much skill and precision as he flew the spacecraft that took him to the Moon. He was careful, and he did no harm to the programs that genuinely serve the needy or provided sound education value to our children.

You know, right now, because of some changes that we're making with regard to the Department of Education, there seems to be spreading in a kind of a wave among some people that -- well, we're trying to do away with or lower educational quality. Not so. There are those in Washington who, ever since they turned to Federal aid to education, intended Federal control of education, and that interference by the Federal Government has hurt the quality of education from coast to coast in this country.

The Congress is now beginning to study the administration's 1983 budget proposal, and this proposal provides a solid framework for congressional consideration. You've been hearing a lot about so-called alternatives to the budget that we've presented. Well, many of these are not genuine budget alternatives at all, but political documents designed for saving certain legislators' political hides rather than saving the economy.

This administration is willing to consider any comprehensive program as long as it does not compromise the fundamentals of our tax cut program. The American people have been promised tax relief. Last year the Congress passed tax relief, and as long as I have any say in the matter, no one's going to take it away from us.

It is true that we've only had the first installment and a small one that hardly made a dent in the built-in tax increases which we had inherited. But the next installment will come in July 1st, and then there will be a further one in the following year. Incentive must be returned to those who work and save and invest.

Senator Schmitt has worked for a stronger defense. He has read the studies. He knows that our relative military imbalance with the Soviets will be at its worst -- in spite of our buildup, it will be at its lowest point by the mid-eighties. He's familiar with the horror stories of recent years -- fighter planes that couldn't fly because they didn't have the spare parts, Navy ships that couldn't leave port, a Rapid Deployment Force that was neither rapid nor deployable and not much of a force. He knows that a major conflict involving the United States could occur without adequate time to upgrade United States force readiness.

For years, he has advocated substantial increases in the defense budget, and this administration agrees wholeheartedly. An increase is essential. Defense has been starved for years. And yet it is not true, as some charge, that we're splurging extravagantly on unnecessary defense spending while we are neglecting our other Federal responsibilities.

In 1962 President Kennedy's budget, to give you something to judge this by, called for defense spending that amounted to 44 percent, almost half of the national budget. Even with our increases, defense spending this year will only be 29 percent of the overall budget. That's right halfway between one-fourth and one-third of the budget.

These young people who are here today, there isn't any one of us who is anticipating the day or thinking in terms that they should some day be called upon to bleed their lives into some battlefield somewhere in the world as other young people have before them. No, if we have the proper defensive strength, no young Americans will have to bleed their lives into a battlefield. A cutback in defense would be a cutback in our chance of peace and security.

As much as I detest the idea of deficits, as President I must accept a large deficit if that is what it takes to buy peace for the rest of this century and beyond. With every improvement in our military readiness that we make today, we're saving the life of some young American who'll be serving our country tomorrow.

As you well know, Senator Schmitt is one of the very few men on this Earth who has walked on the Moon. It must be quite a sight up there, looking back on this beautiful blue planet hanging in the void. I would think that seeing the Earth from a quarter of a million miles away must change a man forever. He must look at everything ever after from a different perspective, a larger perspective. And I think Jack Schmitt has brought that perspective to the Senate.

Being a scientist, Jack has that analytical, independent mind. When the facts support our case, he'll support the administration. When the facts don't support us to Jack's satisfaction, well, he can be as stubborn as those burros the prospectors use to lead around New Mexico's mountains.

That illustrates a certain independence there. But whether Jack agrees with us or not, he always listens -- or we always listen to what he has to say, because we know that he speaks for New Mexico and her citizens and for this country.

Let me just say one or two more words. Jack told you about some of the figures and some of the changes that have occurred in this last year with regard to interest rates, with regard to the rate of inflation.

We're faced with, yes, a large deficit -- larger than we had anticipated because of the recession that has hit this country. How does such a figure change? Well, when you add 1 percent to the unemployment rate in this country, you add 25 to 27 billion dollars to the deficit, and we're in a recession. We think that we're going to turn the corner in that recession in the coming months.

But today, with this being an election year, there are people on the opposite side of a Jack Schmitt who are going to make a great issue about this deficit. I would ask you to remember only one thing: Remember, they are the same people who for over the last 40 years have told us the national debt isn't important; we owe it to ourselves. They are the same ones that have piled up deficits, except once in the last 25 years. They've had deficits every year but that one, and they never mentioned them, they didn't seem to be bothered too much by them. Suddenly now the deficit is the all-important issue of the coming election. Well, we hate deficits too. We hated them all of the time they were piling them up. We're going to whittle at these deficits until we're down to government spending within its means.

And I just finished saying to some people over in Cheyenne, we don't have deficits because of our tax cuts. We have deficits because the government is spending too much, and we're going to change that.

So all I ask of you -- you've applauded all these things that I've said we're going to do. We'll do them a lot easier and a lot better if you send him back to Washington for another 6 years. We'd like to have him.

We count upon the Red Cross for vital health and safety knowledge, the collection and distribution of blood, services to members of the Armed Forces, veterans and their families, and training our young people to undertake leadership responsibilities.

Within the Federal Government, the Red Cross is a part of the Combined Federal Campaign, but more than half of its 3,000 chapters raise all their funds in March. All chapters use the month to inform the public of Red Cross services and to recruit new blood donors and volunteers.

As President of the United States and Honorary Chairman of the American Red Cross, I urge all civilian employees of the Federal Government and members of the Armed Forces to support this voluntary effort to the best of their ability.

But it was a little more than a year ago -- 13\1/2\ months to be exact -- that I gathered with many of you at the Biltmore Bowl and Los Angeles City Hall to say our goodbyes. I must admit that I was a bit scared. But all of your good wishes and genuine expressions from the heart made me realize that I wouldn't be in the Oval Office alone. And I want you to know how grateful I am for the back-home support that you've given me. Even when we disagree, I know our friendship remains.

America was faced with economic chaos. Inflation had been running at double-digit levels for 2 consecutive years with no relief in sight. Unemployment had reached almost 8 million. The savings rate had plummeted to the lowest among leading industrial nations, and interest rates were going through the roof -- 21\1/2\ percent. Even worse, many Americans had lost hope. Some of our leaders were throwing up their hands, claiming nothing could be done, that can-do optimism so characteristic of America was being replaced with a notion that our greatest days were behind us.

With the support of the people and some find bipartisan cooperation in the Congress, we've managed to lay a foundation that will bring better days to America. We targeted those things that had to be done to make lasting economic recovery possible. First on the list was slowing Federal growth. When I arrived there, Federal spending was increasing at an annual rate of 17 percent.

As Federal spending skyrocketed, so had Federal taxes. Uncle Sam's tax haul doubled just between 1976 and 1981. By the time the Federal Government had soaked up its share, there was little left for consumers or for State and local governments and for business to invest and create new jobs.

The solution was as straightforward as it was essential. To get the economy moving again we had to reduce taxes as well as spending. So, we set in place a three-year tax reduction program that will, if we just stick with it, give us stronger growth, more jobs, and the revenues we need to reduce the deficit. And as far as I'm concerned, we're sticking with it.

In the last decade another problem loomed before us. Federal regulation grew from a neighborhood pest into a nationwide monster, preying everywhere on initiative and incentive. Our regulatory relief program under the able direction of Vice President Bush has tackled this bureaucratic quagmire head-on. The number of new pages in the Federal Register, the book which lists new regulations, has been cut by a third. The Federal Register now has 23,000 fewer pages than it had a year ago.

It took a year to do, but we've set in place a program that attacks the basic problems that have stagnated the American economy and demoralized the American people. Already there are signs that, while we have a long way to go, the program is beginning to work. Inflation is down. In fact, it's fallen faster than anyone predicted -- 8.9 percent average for 1981 and only about 4\1/2\ percent for the last 3 months. Savings are up, and the main incentives to save are just coming on line. What does that mean to the American economy?  Well, a 1-percent increase in personal savings adds $20 billion to the investment pool of available capital.

We believe the economy is poised for recovery, but this time we will not let inflation take off as it did in the past. All this does not ease the economic hurt being felt today from decades of misguided government policies, but it does prove that the medicine is beginning to work.

The deficit, of course, remains a cause of major concern, and it certainly is taking its toll on the nerves of those on Capitol Hill. We've begun to hear a chorus of ad-hoc alternatives to our economic recovery program from some who never muttered a word about deficits over the years, even when past deficits represented a far larger portion of the gross national product than today's do. Let me point out that in the years we were coming out of the 1974 recession, deficits averaged 3\1/2\ percent of gross national product. Our projected deficit, big as it is, will only be 2.7 percent of the gross national product.

Now, no one sympathizes more with the idea of a balanced budget than I do -- you may remember that I've mentioned that a few times over the years. But the deficits we propose are much larger than I would like, but they're a necessary evil in the real world today. And bear in mind, they would not be significantly reduced, if at all, by raising taxes, which is the common element in most of the curb-the-deficit proposals that are being bandied about.

I said yesterday to some people -- and I'll repeat to you -- deficits are not caused by our lowering taxes. Deficits are caused by government spending too much. I believe that decreasing and postponing the tax cut that we originally proposed damaged our chances of nipping this recession in the bud. A tax increase now might well stall recovery further, suppressing tax revenues and ensuring permanently high budget deficits.

There's only one answer to large and growing Federal deficits, and that is, as I said a second ago, to slow the growth of Federal spending. And to that end I'll talk with anyone in or out of Congress with constructive suggestions.

The unprecedented growth of Federal spending of the past two decades did more than precipitate economic stagnation. The expanding Federal monolith undermined the system of checks and balances and the division of power that long protected the freedom of our people. The people, who, after all, were meant to be in charge, are now so far removed from the decisionmakers that they have little say in policies that dramatically affect their lives. And, all too often, those policies don't work. Thomas Jefferson said, ``Were we directed from Washington when to sow and when to reap, we should soon want for bread.'' More and more people realize that things don't seem to work anymore, because too much power flows to too many unaccountable people in Washington, D.C.

I agree, and I would add that those who ignore the federalism debate do so at their peril. This is an issue that transcends party politics. It is an issue that begs to be addressed. And those who don't participate in the debate will be left behind.

As local officials, many of you bear the brunt of the problem. The Federal Government has undercut your local tax base, and in return for some of what it takes, the Federal bureaucracy demands the right to tell local and State authorities how to manage their affairs. That's not representative government; that's not democracy.

Early in the last century, Chief Justice John Marshall likened the power to tax with the power to destroy. Well, that's what's happened. Federal co-opting of tax resources has destroyed the separation of powers that once was the hallmark of our system.

President Calvin Coolidge -- I happen to respect him greatly; he had horses on the White House lawn. [Laughter] He was known more for his silence than his rhetoric. But when silent Cal had something to say, it was usually worth hearing. ``Our country,'' he once said, ``was conceived in the theory of local government. It has been dedicated by long practice to that wise and benevolent policy. It is the foundation of our system of liberty.'' Well, I believe it's time for honest men and women who work in all levels of government to begin a dialog about reversing the power flow and returning some of the authority usurped by the Federal Government.

A starting point for that dialog is the broad proposal that I outlined during my State of the Union address. Briefly, it suggests the transfer of 45 categorical programs to the States. ``Categorical'' -- let me interrupt and say -- means that the Federal Government issues the grant, mandates the program, and then tells you at the local level exactly how you have to run it and what you have to do. And there's no way that people 3,000 miles away can tell every diverse section of this country to abide by the same rules and regulations. Along with the funding sources, flexibility and authority to manage them has gone. Now, this list includes everything from education to community development, from transportation to social services, programs that have traditionally and rightfully belonged at the State level.

Now, what I've described as the centerpiece of the federalism initiative is the almost dollar-for-dollar swap of the two largest areas of welfare. The Federal Government takes on the cost of Medicaid, and in exchange, the States would assume responsibility for Aid to Families with Dependent Children and food stamps. Now, this proposal isn't set in concrete. But we think it is basically on target, or we wouldn't have presented it.

The proposal allows for an orderly transition, and sensitive to your concerns in local government, we include a 100-percent pass-through provision for all those programs that have traditionally shared a Federal-local relationship. That must be a part of the plan.

Now, this plan maximizes State flexibility and minimizes risk. The Medicaid program, for example, is the fastest rising cost to State and local government. AFDC and food stamps, under current law, on the other hand, will grow at only about one-sixth the rate of the cost of Medicaid.

In these last few weeks, I've visited city, county, and State officials and was gratified by their sincere desire to discuss this issue. My meeting just last week with the National Association of Counties was amicable and productive. So was my meeting with the Governors. The news media said sparks would fly, but the Governors wanted to cooperate, establish a dialog, and move ahead.

There are some, raised in an era when ``States rights'' was a cover phrase for racism, who are fearful that returning power to the States will result in discrimination. For the record, this administration will not support any legislation returning programs to States that undermines the Federal Government's continuing role of protecting the civil rights of all Americans. The new federalism is not meant to be and will not be permitted to be a step backward in our nation's commitment to civil rights.

The implication is that State and local governments are filled with heartless incompetents and that all the talent and compassion resides in the halls of bureaucracy in Washington. Well, I've heard all that before, and it doesn't wash.

Our attempt to clean up California's welfare mess received the same shrieking response a few years ago. It was just 11 years ago today at a townhall luncheon in Los Angeles that I unveiled our welfare reform program. My, how the cries and howls filled the air. One rather partisan gentleman claimed if our welfare reform program was enacted, the State would have to legalize begging in the streets and revive State operated poorhouses. Well, as it turned out, our welfare reform program became a model for States all across America.

You know, Will Rogers once said that ``government has never been accused of being a businessman.'' Well, that's for sure, but we can still make it more businesslike. One of the first actions that I took as Governor of California was to conduct a complete survey of the management and administrative practices in all the areas of our State government. I didn't do that personally. Two hundred and fifty or more skilled private sector professionals volunteered to come in and give us recommendations on how to make our State government operate more efficiently. You'll remember there were task forces organized on the basis of their particular knowledge in business and industry and the professions.

Veterans of the hotel industry told us how better to utilize the space in our prison system, how better to run the hotel-keeping functions, the buying of food and so forth. Other business executives showed us how to improve our filing system and cut down on costs at the same time.

They gave 117 days full-time as volunteers to this task. It was charged that the State employees would resent this outside interference. But instead, those employees were more than anxious to help, and some said they had never before been asked how to improve efficiency. In all, about 2,000 cost-saving recommendations were made by these task forces, volunteering their time, working with responsible State employees.

We believe those efforts in California can and must be duplicated at the national level. And this morning, I have just met with J. Peter Grace, who will be the new Chairman of the Private Sector Survey on Cost Control in the Federal Government. Mr. Grace is an outstanding businessman, chairman and chief executive officer of W. R. Grace and Company. And he promised me that he and his new team will work like tireless bloodhounds, leaving no stone unturned in their search to root out inefficiency and waste of taxpayer dollars.

Well, my experience in California and in Washington has given me now a unique perspective on the predictions of gloom and doom that always precede needed reform. It also gave me a better understanding of Federal interference and an abiding respect for what can be accomplished at the State and county level when people set out to better manage their affairs.

I have faith that given the authority, State and local governments are more capable of handling their own affairs than the bureaucracy in Washington. Well, you've just confirmed the polls that suggest that the American people agree with that, too.

In California and in Los Angeles County, there are numerous examples of creative and innnovative government which reinforce that conclusion. The use of millions of hours of volunteer service is a fine example of what can be accomplished by involving the people with their government.

Over 2 million hours of annual voluntary service are contributed to the libraries, museums, medical clinics, and mental health facilities of Los Angeles County. And there's a new experimental program to attract volunteers, including those retired county personnel who may want to help but didn't know how to get back into the picture. In the sheriff's department, there are 1,783 volunteers giving 417,278 hours of volunteer time per year, saving the county $5 million. The Los Angeles Police Department has a voluntary reserve program that saves the city of Los Angeles $5 million annually. In fact, one of your county supervisors, Mike Antonovich, is a reserve officer in the South Pasadena Police Department and still serves 3 nights a month.

This use of volunteers by the State, county, and city level is an example of government by the people in the truest sense of the word. But methods of saving must go beyond the use of volunteers. County use of prisoners to clean the beaches deserves recognition, as does a program that sounds a bit familiar, the use of able-bodied welfare recipients to perform unskilled but necessary chores.

Perhaps one of the most innovative of its programs is the contracting out of services with the private sector. Contracting out everything from attorney's duties to maintenance of paramedical equipment, from the collection of debts to doing custodial services, has saved the people of Los Angeles County about $10 million. Translated into real terms, that's what it would cost to build 5 neighborhood health centers or pay the salaries of 320 street patrol officers.

All of this -- the use of volunteers, contracting out of services, the use of welfare recipients and prisoners -- is the kind of innovation that is possible when the Federal Government gets out of the way and lets local and State government do what it's supposed to do.

Ten years ago yesterday I made an appointment of which I've always been proud. There was a seat open on the Los Angeles County Board of Supervisors, and I selected a member of the California Assembly named Pete Schabarum for the position. And as many of you discovered, he's a man of high principle; and, even more, he's tough. [Laughter] And it takes tough leaders like Pete and the other members of the board to make government work.

Two centuries ago, Thomas Jefferson is supposed to have said, ``Eternal vigilance is the price of liberty.'' He didn't just mean vigilance against foreign attack. The greatest threat to freedom, even in today's perilous times, comes from no foreign foe. It comes from a dangerous habit many of our leaders fell into over several generations -- letting the power and the resources that are the basis of freedom slip from the grassroots America into the hands of a remote central authority.

I thank you for providing this forum. I assure you once again that in our program of federalism we're depending on State and local officials to work with us on fleshing out that plan and that we intend not only to pass on the responsibility for the programs but the sources of revenue to pay for them.

Mr. Grace is chairman and chief executive officer of W. R. Grace and Co., an international chemical company founded more than a century ago. He joined W. R. Grace and Co. following his graduation from Yale University, holding the positions of secretary, director, vice president, president, and chief executive officer. He was elected to his present position in May 1981.

He is a trustee of the University of Notre Dame, member-trustee and president of Grace Institute, treasurer and trustee of the National Jewish Hospital and Research Center/National Asthma Center, and president and director of the Catholic Youth Organization of the Archdiocese of New York. He has been awarded honorary degrees by 11 institutions of higher learning and has been decorated by the Governments of Colombia, Chile, Ecuador, Panama, and Peru for his services to those nations. Mr. Grace is president and a member of the board of founders of the American Association of Master Knights of the Sovereign Military Order of Malta, a knight Grand Cross of the Equestrian Order of the Holy Sepulcher of Jerusalem, and a member of the Cardinal's Committee of the Laity.

She is a graduate of Vassar College, class of 1950, and took her degree with honors in international relations. In Washington in the 1950's she wrote a column for the Washington Star called ``Diplomatically Speaking,'' in which she covered the State Department, the diplomatic corps, and official and state visits of dignitaries from all over the world.

Country 3 years ago. From time to time, Mrs. Roosevelt has written about the art and significance of entertaining, especially in Washington. Her journalistic assignments have taken her to many countries in Europe, South America, North Africa, and the Middle East. She speaks fluent Spanish and has studied French.

Cancer Center for the past 6 years and has written a number of medical articles, particularly about cancer and cancer research. Recently she was invited to join the board of the American-Italian Foundation for Cancer Research.

Her special Washington interests are the Folger Shakespeare Library, where she serves on the council, and the Children's Hearing and Speech Center (of Children's Hospital), where she was a board member for many years.

We are the first generation in history to have seen the Earth from space, and it has given us new understanding. As seen from those great distances, the dominant colors of Earth are blue and white; blue for the great oceans, and white for the canopy of clouds that replenish the land with fresh water, forming rivers and streams that lead again to the oceans. Earth is primarily a water planet.

As the world economy grows, the wise use of all resources, including fresh water, becomes increasingly important. The direct human suffering caused by severe droughts and floods is monumental and can affect the global economic and political system. Man's technological and economic response to the challenge of new demands on our water needs to be shared and demonstrated.

There is inspiration, too, in the power and majesty of the world's rivers and their role in shaping the culture and history of so many different peoples. This celebration of the World of Rivers will be a celebration of the human experience itself.

The First Lady. Thank you. Well, good afternoon, and welcome to the season's last program of the Young Artists in Performance at the White House. To the viewers at home, let me say, if you hear bellowing in the background that's not my husband and Congress debating the budget.

Just as the beauty of this ranch is different from that of the White House, the beauty of the music that we're about to hear is distinctive from that of earlier shows. While country and western music isn't classical, it is classically American. It's downhome, down to earth, and downright fun.

Our guest artist today is the great country and western musician, Merle Haggard, a performer who has won every major country music award. He once recorded an album called ``The Best of Merle Haggard,'' and as you'll soon hear, that's exactly what we're going to get this afternoon.

In a few minutes, Merle will introduce you to the members of his band, The Strangers, but whenever country and western music is played there really are no strangers. So get your boots ready to stomp and your heart ready to romp and enjoy the music.

I think the music we've heard today reaches the heart of America. Merle, you've taken the hopes and heartbreaks of our people, combined them with the freedom and beauty of our land, and ended up with the music of America. I can't think of a better setting for this last of our series of performances for young American artists. Here on this magnificent ranch in the spectacular Santa Ynez Valley, we can remember our roots and feel the power and strength of our past. Inspired by the artists today and tomorrow, we can rest assured that we have every resource we need to conquer the future.

I would add: In those dreams, you'll find their future. If the American people stop long enough to understand the strength, the morality, and the courage that runs deep in our national character, then I believe we will have turned the corner in our struggle to renew our national life.

I'd like to thank Beverly Sills for bringing together such an outstanding group of stars as she has this season, and for the wonderful young American talent. Nancy and I have enjoyed this program very much. We hope that everyone viewing it has, and that all of you have. And I hope the rising generation of American artists, this generation of artists, will be encouraged to meet the challenges ahead of them and aspire to surpass the high standards of the American artists who've come before. But most of all, I hope all our countrymen will take pride in the American cultural heritage -- the respect that is rooted in the creativity that can only come from freedom.

Ladies and gentlemen, just one last word that has to be said here -- and I hate to be interrupting the music, but we now have to go. But I think all of us here should understand, here on this magnificent ranch, this beautiful valley, who we're indebted to -- Mr. and Mrs. Gildred, for making this place available for the day. Why don't you come up here where they can see you?

Incidentally, the reason that Nancy and I were late for lunch was we were up here on the hill watching him [Stu Gildred] on a cutting horse out here demonstrating cutting a calf out of the herd. And he leaned over while he was doing it and took the bridle off of the horse -- no reins -- just the horse, nose to nose that horse -- that's the principle of cattle-cutting -- nose to nose with that calf, kept it from rejoining the herd.

But it's a great pleasure to be here with all of you again. I thank you. And may I express my appreciation to the first Republican Majority Leader in 26 years, Howard Baker, who I think has been doing a magnificent job. And I've been most appreciative of the cooperation that we have had. And I for one am going to do all I can do to see that there is still a majority of you in the Senate next year.

I'd like to pay tribute also to your chairman, John Tower. I think of him as a statesman whose judgment I deeply respect. And I have been most pleased to call upon him for his vast knowledge and his good judgment with regard to our national security affairs.

But seriously, we are still faced with problems, social and economic, which have been piling up for almost half a century. Last year, we put together a bipartisan coalition, and for the first time in that half century, we charted a new course for this country. We've only barely set foot on that new path that we chose for the country. But those who had much to do with the policies of the past were now shouting, ``Turn back!'' Members of the other party -- they haven't even waited to see where the path goes.

There will always be room for improvement in any budget or economic policy, but we must have a budget. Where further savings are to be found or a better way of meeting agreed-upon goals can be worked out, I pledge my full cooperation to you, and I want to hear from you. But our first obligation must be to the American people.

We're coming out of a long night of government mismanagement and blundering. There's no quick fix. But I cannot accept the idea that a program which hasn't really started is responsible for the displeasures of today. Planned deficits and deliberate inflation as a supposed means of preserving prosperity was the policy of the Democrat-controlled Congresses for most of this last half century. Has there been any indication that they are not demanding a return to those past policies?

These aren't easy times, as I said before. But together I believe we can hold down taxes. We can hold down spending and ensure a national defense that is able to preserve the peace. I'll be glad to consider any comprehensive congressional plan that meets this crucial standard. And I promise you that where we have honest differences, you can count on me to be willing to listen and a sincere partner.

We can and we will bring interest rates down. And that is the absolute must in the problems confronting us. And we must continue to return the resources and responsibilities to the people that will mean more savings, more freedom, more economic opportunity, and more jobs.

I think that for the first time in this the eighth recession since World War II, it is the first time that there has been in place, before the recession started, a program that is designed to bring us out of that recession and bring us out, not with an artificial fix -- the kind of thing that we've seen seven times before and each time the next time we dive, it's deeper -- but will bring us out, back to a sound economy, and with our people who want jobs, having jobs, and with this government on the track that it should be on.

Nuclear proliferation is the most essential issue of modern times. With Soviet cooperation, we could substantially reduce the grim threat of nuclear war that hangs over Europe. We could lift the great weight that the people of Europe currently feel pressing down upon them. I have urged the Soviet Union to join with us in serious and determined negotiations to ease the nuclear burden. I remain hopeful the Soviets will respond positively to our proposals for lessening the prospect of nuclear conflict.

I have determined that failure to continue peaceful nuclear cooperation with EURATOM would be seriously prejudicial to the achievement of United States non-proliferation objectives and would otherwise jeopardize the common defense and security of the United States. I intend to sign an Executive Order to extend the waiver of the application of the relevant export criterion of the Nuclear Non-Proliferation Act for an additional 12 months from March 10, 1982.

Community would be seriously prejudicial to the achievement of United States nonproliferation objectives and would otherwise jeopardize the common defense and security of the United States, and having notified the Congress of this determination, I hereby extend the duration of that period to March 10, 1983.

The Secretaries of Commerce and Energy have advised me that the threat to the national security posed by imports of petroleum continues. The Secretaries, in conjunction with the Secretaries of State, Defense, and Treasury, advise that we no longer consider Libya to be a reliable supplier of United States energy needs, and that we must ensure we are not vulnerable to Libyan action in this area. Libyan policy and action supported by revenues from the sale of oil imported into the United States are inimical to United States national security. The Secretaries recommend that I take steps immediately to eliminate the dependence of the United States on Libya as a source of crude oil.

Sec. 11(1). The term ``imports'', when applied to crude oil other than that produced in Libya, includes both entry for consumption and withdrawal from warehouse for consumption, but excludes unfinished oils and finished products processed in the United States territories and foreign trade zones from crude oil produced in the United States.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this tenth day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

I can't help but say -- thank you all very much -- but I can't help but recall that I was in Iran on the day that the first coup took place by the Soviet Union in their overthrow there of the government.

The Afghans, like the Poles, wish nothing more, as you've just been so eloquently told, than to live their lives in peace, to practice their religion in freedom, and to exercise their right to self-determination. As a consequence, they now find themselves struggling for their very survival as a nation. Nowhere are basic human rights more brutally violated than in Afghanistan today.

The Afghan people have matched their heroism against the most terrifying weapons of modern warfare in the Soviet arsenal. Despite blanket bombing and chemical and biological weapons, the brave Afghan freedom-fighters have prevented the nearly 100,000-strong Soviet occupation force from extending its control over a large portion of the countryside.

Their heroic struggle has carried a terrible cost. Many thousands of Afghans, often innocent civilians, women and children, have been killed and maimed. Entire villages and regions have been destroyed and depopulated. Some 3 million people have been driven into exile -- that's one out of every five Afghans. The same proportion of Americans would produce a staggering 50 million refugees.

We cannot and will not turn our backs on this struggle. Few acts of international aggression have been so universally condemned. The United Nations has repeatedly called for the withdrawal of Soviet forces. The Islamic Conference, deeply troubled over this assault on Moslem religion, has four times condemned the Soviet occupation. The nonaligned movement has added its voice to the demands for withdrawal of foreign troops.

Most recently, as you've been told, the European Parliament took the leadership in advancing the idea of a worldwide commemoration of Afghanistan Day. On behalf of all Americans, I want to thank the members of the European Parliament for this action and welcome today the participation of Egon Klepsch, Vice President of the European Parliament, and his distinguished colleagues.

I also want to express the hope that people the world over will respond with eagerness and determination. And in that connection, I want to express my particular appreciation that we're joined here today by members of the parliaments of Japan, Kenya, Panama, Thailand, and Austria.

We must go beyond public condemnation of the Soviet puppet regime in Kabul to bring relief and an early end to the Afghan tragedy. We have a human responsibility to the Afghan refugees. The United States has given generous support to the U.N.'s refugee effort. And I'm pleased to announce today an additional commitment of $21.3 million worth of food. This contribution will bring the total U.S. support for the refugees to over $200 million in the past 2 years. But I ask that all Americans supplement these funds with personal donations to organizations which work with Afghan refugees and the cause of a free Afghanistan.

Soviet Union to the negotiating table. We and our allies have made clear that Afghanistan will remain a central issue in U.S.-[Soviet] (FOOTNOTE)  Government and East-West relations as long as Soviet forces continue to occupy that nation. We have used, and will continue to use, every available opportunity, including the last meeting between Secretary Haig and Soviet Foreign Minister Gromyko, to urge the Soviets to enter into genuine negotiations for a peaceful settlement of the Afghan crisis.

Afghanistan and must remain there as a result of foreign intervention against the Kabul government. The world is well aware that this is nothing more than propaganda designed to divert international attention from the sordid reality. The foreign interference in Afghanistan comes from the nearly 100,000 Soviet armed invaders. The United States has consistently followed a policy of noninterference in Afghanistan's internal affairs. We similarly supported the nonaligned character of the previous Afghanistan Governments. The fire of resistance in Afghanistan is being kindled and sustained not by outside forces, but by the determination of the Afghan people to defend their national independence.

Soviets both publicly and privately that we have no objectives in Afghanistan beyond those set forth in the U.N. General Assembly resolutions. These are the withdrawal of the Soviet forces, the free exercise of self-determination for the Afghan people, the restoration of Afghanistan's nonaligned status, and the safe and honorable return of Afghan refugees to their homes.

Moscow to discuss a political solution. In 1981 it was the British foreign minister who was rudely rebuffed when he presented a very sensible proposal of the European Community for a two-tiered international conference, which is still on the table. Finally, the Soviets have evaded the issue, insisting that the U.N. Secretary-General seek a solution in Kabul, Islamabad, and Tehran rather than at the source of the aggression in Moscow.

The Soviet Union bears a grave responsibility for the continuing suffering of the Afghan people, the massive violations of human rights, and the international tension which has resulted from its unprovoked attack. The Soviet Union must understand that the world will not forget, as it has not forgotten the peoples of the other captive nations from Eastern Europe to Southwest Asia -- who have suffered from Soviet aggression. This is the meaning of Afghanistan Day, that the Afghan people will ultimately prevail.

Coincidentally, the day after Afghanistan Day, this country plans to launch the third Columbia space shuttle. Just as the Columbia, we think, represents man's finest aspirations in the field of science and technology, so too does the struggle of the Afghan people represent man's highest aspirations for freedom. The fact that freedom is the strongest force in the world is daily demonstrated by the people of Afghan. Accordingly, I am dedicating on behalf of the American people the March 22d launch of the Columbia to the people of Afghanistan.

And in that same spirit I call on all Americans to observe Afghanistan Day in their thoughts, their prayers, their activities, and in their own renewed dedication to freedom. With the help of those assembled here today, the unanimous backing of the Congress, and the support of the American people, I'm confident that this day will mark a true celebration, and not just for freedom in Afghanistan, but, for freedom wherever it is threatened or suppressed the world over.

In December 1979, the Soviet Union invaded Afghanistan without provocation and with overwhelming force. Since that time, the Soviet Union has sought through every available means, to assert its control over Afghanistan.

Their villages and homes have been destroyed; they have been murdered by bullets, bombs and chemical weapons. One-fifth of the Afghan people have been driven into exile. Yet their fight goes on. The international community, with the United States joining governments around the world, has condemned the invasion of Afghanistan as a violation of every standard of decency and international law and has called for a withdrawal of the Soviet troops from Afghanistan. Every country and every people has a stake in the Afghan resistance, for the freedom fighters of Afghanistan are defending principles of independence and freedom that form the basis of global security and stability.

It is therefore altogether fitting that the European Parliament, the Congress of the United States and parliaments elsewhere in the world have designated March 21, 1982, as Afghanistan Day, to commemorate the valor of the Afghan people and to condemn the continuing Soviet invasion of their country. Afghanistan Day will serve to recall not only these events, but also the principles involved when a people struggles for the freedom to determine its own future, the right to be free of foreign interference and the right to practice religion according to the dictates of conscience.

We have a problem that's been 40 years in the making, and we have to find ways to solve it. And I didn't want to ruin your appetites, so I waited till now to tell you this, but during the hour we're together here eating and talking, the Government has spent $83 million. And by the way, that includes the price of your lunch. [Laughter] Milton Friedman is right. There really is no such thing as a free lunch. The interest on our debt for the last hour was about $10 million of that.

When I was Governor of California, one of the first actions I took was to conduct a survey of this kind, and I made a similar request then. And about 250 private sector top people from every line of activity in our State volunteered to come in and give us recommendations. They also came through with some contributions and donations of hardware and equipment to support the activities of the survey. But that's the least important thing. That isn't really why you're here. What we're here for today is we want your blood. And we had veterans there of the -- in case you're curious about how this operates -- of the hotel industry, for example, the top men in California in the hotel business.

They went into our prisons and into our State institutions, and they looked at them as a kind of hotel and looked at that type of operation, not what the warden was doing. And it was amazing the things they found that from their standpoint and their expertise could be done to not only improve the conditions but improve them at a much lower price than the State had been accustomed to paying.

We had business executives that found fantastic savings just in such routine things as filing, storage files that weren't utilized but were stored in expensive, per-square-foot office space, when they could have been out in much lower-cost warehouse-type space.

We had teams of people who were experts in fleet buying of automobiles, and we discovered that the State had no such plan, had never had any system for buying. Any department, when it was ready, just went out and got rid of what they had and bought new ones on their own.

And that was changed as a result of these task forces and created such a stiff system, so efficient in the State, that we then were able to offer the service to counties and cities that had the same problem, and we'd do the job for them.

At the same time, when all this was going on, there were people who charged that while the State employees would resent this outside interference -- and I'm sure that they did kind of look down their nose for a little bit to see what this was and whether this was just some new thing that was going to wind up with some papers on a shelf -- but when they saw that it was for real, they came out of the woodwork. They were delighted to help. And many times we heard repeated this statement from them. They said, ``Well, no one before has ever tried to make things more efficient and more economical in this way.'' And they, from their own experience, came up volunteering suggestions.

All in all, they brought in about 2,000 cost-saving recommendations after about 117 days. We implemented more than 1,600 of those recommendations. And that is exactly what we have in mind. We need your help, that of the groups that you represent, to make this effort every bit as successful as the California project was, if not more so.

In reality, we have a task force that's looking for waste and fraud and that sort of thing, and very successfully. But what we need from you and your expertise and your associates is to literally come in to the various departments and agencies of government and look at them as if you were considering a merger or a takeover, and to see how modern business practices could be put to work to make government more efficient and more effective. And if you find those things, I assure you, we'll break down the doors in implementing them, bringing them about.

Now, you've talked about this for a long time at the 19th hole -- [laughter] -- and now you've got a chance to really get in and do something about it. And I just have to tell you; I can't resist. I have to tell you just one little experience.

There are a million things that you think of and take for granted every day in your business that you'll find they don't take it for granted in Washington, and it isn't done that way, and that's what it's all about.

The President today announced his intention to appoint the following persons to be members of the Commission on Presidential Scholars. He also intends to designate Beverly Fisher White to be Chairman of the Commission.

Trident II missile, he informed the British Government that it would be available for purchase by the United Kingdom. In an exchange of letters today, Prime Minister Thatcher formally requested that the United States sell the Trident II missile, and the President agreed.

Nassau, President Kennedy agreed to assist the British in the development of their strategic nuclear forces by selling Polaris missiles to the United Kingdom. Today's announcement signals a continuation of this longstanding cooperation, which is a central element in the close cooperation between the United States and the United Kingdom.

The primary reason for the British choice of the Trident II missile over the Trident I is to maintain commonality with the United States Navy. Although the performance of the Trident I was adequate for British purposes, there would be a long-term logistic and cost penalty associated with the uniqueness of the system once the United States Navy made the transition to the Trident II missile.

Kingdom in the maintenance of a modernized, independent British deterrent force into the twenty-first century. In addition, the President's letter welcomes the Prime Minister's commitment to use savings from cooperation in the strategic nuclear field to strengthen British conventional forces, which are also vital to the NATO deterrent.

The United States readiness to provide these systems is a demonstration of the great importance which the United States Government attaches to the maintenance by the United Kingdom of an independent nuclear deterrent capability. I can assure you of the United States' willingness to cooperate closely with the United Kingdom Government in maintaining and modernizing that capability.

I attach great importance to your assurance that the United Kingdom TRIDENT II force will be assigned to NATO and that the economies realized through cooperation between our two governments will be used to reinforce the United Kingdom's efforts to upgrade its conventional forces. Such nuclear and conventional force improvements are of the highest priority for NATO's security.

I wrote to your predecessor on 10 July 1980 to ask whether the United States Government would be ready to supply Trident I missiles equipment and supporting services to the United Kingdom on a similar basis to that on which the Polaris missiles were supplied under the Polaris Sales Agreement of 6 April 1963. President Carter replied on 14 July confirming that the United States Government were prepared to do so, subject to and in accordance with applicable United States law and procedures.

In the light of decisions taken by the United States Government in 1981 to accelerate their own programme to procure Trident II missiles, and to phase out the Trident I programme earlier than had hitherto been intended, the United Kingdom Government have carried out a review of their nuclear deterrent programme. In the light of this review, I am now writing to ask whether in place of Trident I missiles the United States Government would be ready to supply Trident II missiles, equipment and supporting services on a continuing basis and in a manner generally similar to that in which Polaris was supplied. The United Kingdom Government would wish to purchase these missiles complete with multiple, independently targettable re-entry vehicles but without the warheads themselves. I propose that, as in the past, close co-ordination should be maintained between the executive agencies of the two Governments in order to assure compatibility of equipment.

Organisation; and except where the United Kingdom Government may decide that supreme national interests are at stake, this successor force will be used for the purposes of international defence of the Western alliance in all circumstances. It is my understanding that co-operation in the modernisation of the United Kingdom nuclear deterrent in the manner proposed would be consistent with the present and prospective international obligations of both parties.

I would like to assure you that the United Kingdom Government remain wholly committed to the strengthening of the Alliance's conventional forces. The United Kingdom Government have in recent years substantially increased their defence spending and further increases are planned for the future in order to sustain the United Kingdom's all-round contribution to allied deterrence and defence. The economies made possible by the United States Government's co-operation with respect to the supply of the Trident I missile system will be used in order to reinforce the United Kingdom Government's continuing efforts to upgrade their conventional forces.

If the United States Government are prepared to meet this request, I hope that as the next step you will be prepared to receive technical and financial missions to pursue these matters using the framework of the Polaris Sales Agreement where appropriate.

In the exchange of letters between the President and the Prime Minister of today's date, it was agreed that the United States Government would supply Trident II missiles to the United Kingdom. I am writing now to record our joint understanding on specific aspects of the agreed arrangements for the sale of the Trident II (D - 5) missile system and associated equipment.

It is agreed that the United Kingdom will pay a total contribution to research and development for the Trident II (D - 5) system equivalent to $116 million in Fiscal Year 1982 dollars, subject to actual payments being adjusted to reflect an agreed inflation index.

It is understood that the United Kingdom acknowledges that waiver by the United States of all charges (other than the administrative charge) in excess of $116 million will fully satisfy the requirement that the United States Government give defense assistance to the United Kingdom defense budget in return for manning by the United Kingdom of Rapier air defense of United States Air Force bases in the United Kingdom, and support and servicing for these Rapier systems. In addition it is understood that the United Kingdom will employ additional savings represented by the remainder of the United States waiver to reinforce its efforts to upgrade its conventional forces.

Government of an independent nuclear deterrent. I am, therefore, pleased that it has been possible to reach this agreement between our two countries. I regard this arrangement as a significant contribution to the maintenance of stability and peace.

Determine that in fiscal year 1981 there were an insufficient number of agricultural and rural development projects which qualified for assistance under Title III of the Act and that therefore the humanitarian purposes of the Act were better served by furnishing financing under other provisions of the Act. Therefore, I waive the minimum requirement of Section 302(c)(1)(C) of the Act with respect to fiscal year 1981.

When it became apparent that requirements for wheat imports to Bangladesh had decreased greatly, vegetable oil was included in the agreement to keep the level of Title III financing closer to the level initially allocated, but the original target could not be reached.

During the year, efforts were made to help other eligible countries identify appropriate Title III projects. In some cases considerable progress was made, but the process of negotiating agreements and supplying commodities could not be completed in fiscal year 1981.

In one country, a Title III project was being designed when a food crisis required that food be supplied rapidly under a Title I agreement. In another country, the team sent to do a feasibility study reported that although good prospects exist for a Title III program, a considerable amount of time and effort for planning and negotiating the project will be required.

My policy statement on non-proliferation and peaceful nuclear cooperation last July highlighted the key elements of continuity in United States policy to prevent the spread of nuclear explosives and those areas where we need to adopt new directions or different approaches. We will continue our efforts to strengthen the non-proliferation regime and the framework for peaceful nuclear cooperation, and we look forward to working closely with Congress toward these shared objectives.

Well, to tell you the truth, I don't think we've been doing any imitations since we've been here. I think we've cut the growth in Federal spending almost in half. We've reduced the size of the Federal Register. That's the thing, you know, that carries and lists all the regulations. Well, it's a third smaller than it used to be. Inflation has been down, running at 4\1/2\ percent now, or less, for the last 3 months. I hope we can keep it there or continue to reverse it. And savings are up since October 1st, when the first phase of the tax cut went into effect. It's the first time they've risen in a very long time. And we're really just getting the incentives of our program on line.

I'm getting kind of tired of those people that are saying, ``Well, we've tried the program and it doesn't work.'' They were saying that before it started. And it really hasn't started yet, and it'll really, I think, begin to feel the first effects July, when the next tax cut, the 10 percent, goes into effect. The prime rate is -- the interest is still too high. We all know that. But at least it's four points lower than it was when we took office. And yes, the deficit is of great concern to all of us here -- larger than we had thought because of the recession that we're in. You know, one percentage point of additional unemployment increases the deficit by anywhere from $25 to $27 billion. And this is the great problem that we have to solve.

But there are different ideas about managing the budget. I met with some of our Senators just the other day up on the Hill, and we had a very good talk, because I'm ready to meet the Congress in a legitimate effort to have a program that will treat with our economic problems and not just have them go on padding the budget.

But some of those who are protesting about the deficit -- an informal poll has been taken among some of the chairmen of the subcommittees in the House and some of the regular committee chairmen. And so far, between them, they're discussing and entertaining proposals to add $29 billion to the spending of the budget as we've sent it up. Our budget has been proposing quite a sizable additional cut in spending. I think they're the ones that are doing imitations, imitations of just what's been done for the past years that led us to this business-as-usual and politics-as-usual kind of a situation. They will, if allowed, bring higher inflation, higher taxes, and, yes, bigger deficits.

But I don't believe the American people want that. I don't think they want to go back to the excesses that caused the mess that we're in right now. We want and we need a bipartisan cooperation, a bringing down of the deficit and getting this country moving again and getting industry back at full steam again where it can provide the jobs that our people must have. And, as I say, I'm open to any comprehensive plan that they might be able to present that we can discuss, but I don't believe in just raising taxes and I don't believe in letting our country remain defenseless in the face of the great Soviet buildup of military power.

Lilliputians. And this administration and this Congress, working together, I think can unleash that power and can end the things that are causing so much tragic sorrow among the people who are unemployed, and for small businesses that are struggling to stay alive, for the American farmers who are caught in a cost-price squeeze. And all we have to do is kind of forget politics for a little bit and get together on what the people need. And I think what the people need is less government spending and continue to have tax reductions for the people of this country so there's an incentive for people to work and earn.

And at the same time, I think we have to maintain the strength we need to not only keep the peace, but -- my dream of one of the reasons why we're trying to redress our defensive structure is so we can sit down at a bargaining table with the Soviet Union for once in which they'll have a legitimate reason for wanting to engage in arms reduction along with us. So far we've had nothing to offer them. They are so far ahead. But if they find out that we mean it, then maybe we can reduce those threatening weapons, particularly those nuclear weapons that are aimed back and forth at each other. And that's my dream.

Emerald Isle has given much to the world, but she has blessed America abundantly with her most precious gift: her children. And like so many of the indomitable Irish, the Reagan family came to the United States seeking the liberty and bounty of this great land.

Every American gratefully acknowledges the many contributions of Irish Americans in every walk of life down through our nation's history. But, most of all, the sons and daughters of Erin upheld a fine old Irish tradition by making their mark in American letters and politics.

President Reagan. This has been a very unusual friend-to-friend meeting and one for which I'm very grateful. President Mitterrand and I have had a very productive day. In the Oval Office and during our working lunch, we covered a very broad range of subjects which naturally included our preparations for two major summit meetings in June.

President Mitterrand will host this year's economic summit in Versailles, and we are, along with the other participants, committed to a conference which will help the industrial democracies deal more effectively with today's economic challeges. With that in mind, I look forward with special pleasure to my visit to France, America's oldest ally.

We also touched on the Atlantic Alliance summit and the need to demonstrate allied unity and resolve in response to Soviet expansionist pressures. I will attend that summit in Bonn with the greatest of interest and commitment.

As I indicated a moment ago, our talks were comprehensive. Since President Mitterrand has just returned from Israel, I was particularly interested in his assessment of the peace process in the Middle East.

United States policy objectives in that troubled region. Our discussion on this subject was particularly candid and thorough. President Mitterrand shares my concern that the failure to promote the evolution of democratic government in this region would have the most serious consequences. The principles and goals that we share suggest that we will be able to work together on this problem in the months ahead.

Our exchange of views on the economic concerns of our two countries was equally frank and productive. President Mitterrand made a forceful and thorough presentation of his government's views on outstanding trade and financial issues. While it would be impossible to resolve our economic differences in one day, I think we've made tangible progress toward better communications on these important issues.

Republic. The welcome extended to us was, as is in the very nature of things, of course, both friendly, open, and frank. We were able to talk about a number of problems. Some of them had been prepared, of course, by the continuous exchanges which exist among our ministers, our embassies, and representatives of all kinds.

European political leaders and following my recent visit to Israel and in the light of the events that take place each day in Europe, in Africa, in Latin America -- well, because of all these reasons, it was natural that our talks today were brought to bear on a number of very topical problems, and indeed such talks are in themselves very fruitful. And indeed, this certainly fully justified making this trip.

Now, the prime reason for my visit to the United States was to prepare, in more specific terms, the so-called summit of the industrialized nations which will be meeting in Versailles, in France, at the beginning of June. And the conference will be an opportunity of considering the economic, monetary, and financial problems that our countries have to face, and the purpose, the exercise being that we should harmonize our goals so as to be able to lend each other mutual assistance and not hindrance. And it is clear that in that, we see very much eye-to-eye.

Then we talked of the other summit meeting that will take place a few days afterwards in Bonn, which will be the summit meeting of the Atlantic Alliance. And so, naturally, that led us to discuss East-West problems and, in particular, the relationship with the Soviet Union and the need to demonstrate our force so as to be able to further the possibility of negotiations; and so as to be able to work towards peace while asserting our rights and the rights of the peoples of the world and, in particular, of Europe.

And as President Reagan has just said, we also talked about Central America. And I repeated what I have often stated in France and in Europe, that our first duty is to fight against poverty and the exploitation of human beings and the domination on the part of bloody dictatorships. And as has just been said, we must work in order to find the way of furthering -- and this is not always an easy path to discover -- but the way of furthering the cause of democratic government. And there, there is something that we have in common and that leads to a meeting of the minds between us.

And I feel that we should do everything that can enable the democratic powers of the West to achieve a better understanding and to be able to give more assistance to the peoples that are rebeling against their fate and that can lead to peace, civilian peace, and more freedom, is a good thing. And, as I said when I was receiving Chancellor Schmidt, that I appreciated the economic proposals made in the context of the Caribbean plan which would also apply to Central America.

It is clear that what is needed is more aid and consistent aid. And I think that what is being suggested is a step in the right direction. The path to be followed will clearly be a long one, but everything that is done that can show us where that path lies and can enlighten us in that respect can but be a good thing.

And as far as the Near East is concerned, I was in the area recently. And only last week, I indicated what my feelings were on the subject. And it was, therefore, only natural that, in talking with the President of the United States, that we should, in fact, also discuss those very serious questions. And we found that the assertion of the rights of Israel and the rights of all peoples of the region should make it possible to define, with patience and tenacity, the policies that will lead to peace. Now, our two countries are not the ones to pass judgment on such policies, but they are policies which should be of interest and concern to the countries directly involved in the area.

Now, lastly, on bilateral matters -- well, there we were talking among friends. And there, of course, that is a long story that goes back many years. But we were able to discuss these matters frankly, as friends and allies, whose calling it should be in the world to express their views clearly, so as to be able to bring them closer together when they are not the same and in order to be able to assert them with greater force when one's positions do converge, so as to be able to give the right kind of orientation to the peoples of the world who are waiting with anxiety for the outcome.

Now, as to the hospitality that has been extended to me, I would like to say that it has given me, again, the opportunity of feeling the real depth of the ties between our two countries. And I certainly intend on the next occasion, which will be in my own country, to continue along the very same lines. In such talks, we have been able to discuss matters. And we must continue to do so, to talk about these issues with method, in order to be able to indicate clearly the areas on which we can move forward together and in order to be able to serve, to the best of our ability, the cause of world peace.

The President. What they were talking about is that the thought of those deficits hanging over us is what's keeping the money market -- they're keeping the interest up because of their reluctance to lend money in fear of possible return to inflation. And incidentally, we received word this morning that the producer's cost index, for the first time in I don't know how many years, is not only down, it is negative. It's below an inflation rate. Prices are going down.

The President. I won't give you a specific date, but I think the fact that interest rates came down the other day a little bit is an encouraging sign. The fact that inflation seems to continue to be falling is also an encouraging sign.

The President. I've got a plan in there, and I believe the fundamentals of our plan will bring about a recovery. I think it's the first time in all the eight recessions since World War II that there's been a plan in place. But I certainly am willing to hear any suggestions anyone can make that might be an improvement.

Well, the greatness of America and the solutions to her problems begin here with your people -- not in Washington, D.C. You know, when you think of those ancestors who settled your State, they were willing to hitch up their wagons, venture across mountains, and sometimes bet the house, the farm, and all the family on the outcome. They didn't have much more than their hands, their heads, their hearts, and their friends. And they made it work without an area redevelopment plan, a subsidy from HUD, or even a go-ahead from OSHA. They did it the same way that Bear Bryant won more games than any college coach, the same way that Alabama set a record last year of attracting new industrial investment, the same way that Jeremiah Denton endured an eternity inside hell. They did it the old-fashioned way -- they earned it. Dreams, drive, courage, refusing to quit made the difference then, and they make the difference now.

Alabama has a serious unemployment problem. But I'm sure you believe the future is yours to shape, not just endure. The growth plan you're now implementing will pay tremendous dividends in the months and years ahead.

Governor, Fob James, your mayors, your councilmen, your county commissioners, other local officials and courageous members of this legislature who stand willing and able to accept their rightful responsibilities. We'll work together and build for the future. Our commitment to strengthen our defenses, increase spending on NASA-related projects, complete the Tennessee-Tombigbee Waterway, and move ahead with enterprise zones will add to the jobs that you're creating.

And then, too, there's something else -- those values and principles I spoke of that are so strong here. Faith in God, patriotism, freedom, the love of freedom, family, work, neighborhood -- the heart and soul of America's past and the promise of her future. If we stand together and live up to these principles, we will not fail.

Thomas Jefferson said, ``I know no safe depository of the ultimate powers of the society but the people themselves. . . .'' And that conviction is embodied in our 10th amendment -- the Federal Government will do only those things called for in the Constitution, and all others shall remain with the States or the people.

Would you not agree that we have strayed much too far from that noble beginning and that the whole idea of our Revolution -- personal freedom, equality of opportunity, and keeping government close to the people -- is threatened by a Federal spending machine that takes too much money from the people, too much authority from the States, and yes, too much liberty with our Constitution?

According to polls, Americans -- by more than 2 to 1 -- trust their State and local officials to administer programs more efficiently than the Federal Government. But those who have controlled our government for nearly three decades haven't listened. Prisoners of the past, they remain shackled to the myth that all wisdom, morality, and compassion begin at both ends of Pennsylvania Avenue.

A few weeks back, a leader of the liberal old guard said he would resist returning the responsibilities and resources that belong to you. He claimed to know of a dozen States that would shirk their responsibilities. Now, just which States did not measure up to his standards, he wouldn't say. But the meaning was clear: He and his colleagues don't believe in you or trust you.

But aren't they the same folks who gave us a trillion dollar debt, double-digit inflation, and the highest interest rates in more than a century? The big spenders would have been right at home with Oscar Wilde. He's the one that said he knew of only one way to get rid of temptation -- yield to it. [Laughter] And that reminds me, you know, that someone once said that a woman flees from temptation; a man gets down on his knees and crawls away, hoping it will jump on his back.

Come to Alabama and see how concern for education and commitment to equal opportunity, including a war on illiteracy, consumes almost two-thirds of State spending and ranks Alabama fifth in the Nation in spending on elementary and secondary education.

Come and see how Alabama will take the nearly $450 million it received from leasing public lands and invest it in a super trust fund for the future, and the principal will not be touched. Then a general obligation bond issue is forthcoming to build roads, bridges, schools, and prisons, eventually creating an estimated 100,000 jobs.

I think I understand now what Jeremiah Denton meant when he said, ``Mr. President, Alabama is the best kept secret in the world.'' You're not frightened by the challenge of regaining control of your destiny. You're excited by it. You've come together to work together.

Only two blocks from where I stand, a courageous American named Martin Luther King organized a struggle for racial equality that led to historic changes in our society nationwide. The sacrifice that he made brings tears of sorrow, but the good that he did brings tears of salvation.

You don't need convincing that the Federal Government has, at great cost, been attempting to perform tasks that are not its proper function. The only people still defending this indefensible system are special interest groups and their protectors.

The underlying purpose of our whole federalism initiative is to wrest control of government from the hands of special interests and return it to the American people it was always intended to represent and serve. I'm talking about average citizens here in Alabama and across the country -- and nowadays they don't know who to blame when government services go wrong -- citizens who no longer control even the services closest to them, such as schools, libraries, police and fire protection, and even pothole repair.

Think about it. In today's tangle of overlapping Federal agencies, departments, and regulations, who really is accountable? Who can people take their troubles to? And if you do find a sympathetic listener, will it really do any good? If you have a problem with, say, the quality of instruction in your son or daughter's grade school, who's to blame? The teacher? The principal?

Well, the answer today is: everybody and nobody -- and that's no way to run a government. We want to make government work again, to make it accountable to the people it serves. And the only way to do that is to return the appropriate resources and responsibilities to the people and their grassroots representatives. This means asking some basic questions about many areas in which the Federal Government, often with the best of intentions, has injected itself. The first question is, of course, should a particular function be the responsibility of government at all?

The Federal Government should only do what the people cannot do for themselves or through their locally elected leaders. As one Governor put it recently, ``. . . we can no longer afford -- either fiscally or politically -- to have every level of government involved in the delivery of the entire range of public services.'' To put it another way, the buck and the tax dollar should stop at the closest possible level of responsibility. It shouldn't be automatically kicked upstairs to Washington, because for every step up, the cost of overhead becomes greater.

I know that some have accused advocates of this new balance in government of wanting to turn back the clock to the bad old days. They claim that the injustices of other generations will recur if Washington's unelected regulators and bureaucrats lose their stranglehold on government. Well, that simply isn't true. Reapportionment and the Voting Rights Act have eradicated once and for all the most glaring inequities in State representation. In fact, today, black Americans are better represented in State and local governments than they are in the national Congress.

Well, as you probably know, our plan to restore the proper State-Federal balance has two major components. Starting in fiscal 1984, the Federal Government will assume full responsibility for the cost of the rapidly growing Medicaid program, in exchange for the States picking up Aid to Families with Dependent Children and food stamps. Now, the other aspect of the plan is a turnback of responsibilities to the States for over 40 Federal programs in education, community development, transportation, and social services -- along with the resources to pay for them. In 1984 the Federal Government will apply the full proceeds from certain excise taxes to a grassroots trust fund that will belong in fair shares to the States. By 1988 the States will be in full control of these grant programs.

Now, we're not wedded to every detail of this proposal. We want a dialog. And I've been very grateful to have Governor James' strong support. And you'll be pleased to know that when the other Governors met with me in Washington recently, they were in broad agreement with what we're trying to do.

One thing we're not trying to do is balance the Federal budget on the backs of the States. There will be no need for net tax increases on citizens at the local level. Also, our proposal will not cause needy Americans to migrate to States with high welfare benefits. People migrate for jobs, for a handup, not a handout. Low-income Americans want more opportunity; they need more opportunity. And if we work together, we'll make sure they get it.

Last year we put together a bipartisan coalition, and for the first time in half a century, we charted a new course for the country. We're coming out of a long night of government mismanagement and blunders which caused this recession. Those who are unemployed are living a tragedy, and I want nothing more than to see them working again. But I'm convinced the course we've embarked on offers the best hope, and I cannot accept the idea that a program which is just beginning, and which in fact began after the recession was already underway, is somehow responsible for that recession.

Then, after pressure from the Congress last year, the first part of the tax cut was delayed and reduced so much that taxes rose again. Now, this only aggravated the recession, causing more unemployment spending and a bigger deficit.

Now, let me explain. Our original plan called for a 10-percent reduction across the board in income taxes, retroactive to January 1st, 1981. Well, to get the program we had to compromise, reducing that first cut to only 5 percent, not effective until October 1st, 1981. Three months later, there was an automatic increase in the social security tax which almost nullified that 5-percent cut.

Americans today need strong backs and deep pockets to shoulder the highest tax burden in peacetime history. And yet some in Washington still want more. Now, we don't have deficits because our people live too well and are not taxed enough; we have big deficits because government lives too well and spends too much.

And those big tax increases I just mentioned never balanced the budget, because Federal spending tripled in the last decade alone. The more Congress taxed, the more it spent, and the more it went further and further into the red. In fact, government spending increased faster than the growth of our economy and even faster than the paychecks of the working people.

The solution is as obvious as it is urgent: Reduce government's share of the gross national product by slowing the growth of spending and help the economy grow by rewarding Americans who produce, save, and invest.

Now, I think that's what we've begun to do. We didn't really slash spending; we just cut, nearly in half, the inflationary increase in spending, which was climbing at the rate of 17 percent a year in 1980. We reduced the growth of new regulations by a third, and we enacted a strong program of tax incentives. Now critics charge that it's too large, but as I've explained, it barely offsets the built-in payroll tax increases that were adopted in 1977.

Our tax program is just beginning. Most of the benefits will go to average citizens in your hometowns. The 25-percent tax rate reduction, indexing of tax rates to prevent bracket creep, and strong new incentives for retirement savings will provide major tax savings. Accelerated depreciation schedules for business, both big and small, will encourage the investment we need to make our products and workers more competitive. Productivity growth -- producing more and better for less -- is the basis for all real gains in wages and living standards.

Most new jobs in America are created by small business, and most small businesses pay their taxes by the personal rates, not the corporate rates. So the personal tax cut will create jobs. Those who oppose it would only handcuff employers and further hurt the unemployed. We also address a special problem for farmers and family-owned businesses. It's not right that widows and children must lose, just to pay Uncle Sam what generations of love and toil have created. So the estate tax exemption will increase to $600,000 by 1987, and of even greater help, there will be no estate tax for a surviving spouse -- the widower or widow.

Now, I'd like to say something here to ``Main Street'' America -- to the millions who work so hard to support their families and keep our country together, but who sometimes feel like forgotten Americans. You know, we hear an awful lot about compassion -- in the guise of who has it and who doesn't have it. Well, I believe that a safety net is essential for people who cannot help themselves. And I believe that most of us in this country have a real compassion for such people.

We're the most generous people on Earth. But how about having a little compassion left over for those Americans who sit around the table at night after dinner, trying to figure out how to pay their own bills, keep the kids in school, and keep up with higher inflation and higher taxes year after year? I realize that our cure for the mess we inherited is not always easy or popular or painless. But I must say this: It is an honest cure, not a quick fix; it's the only way we'll produce a lasting economy, a lasting recovery, without a new burst of inflation.

We've brought inflation down dramatically. Last year's drop in inflation meant that a family of four, here in Alabama, if they were around the $20,000-level of earnings, had a $626 increase in purchasing power than they would have had if inflation had not come down. And this would vary with incomes, on down to the poverty-level incomes, and their purchasing power was increased.

If I could interject here for just a moment and call something to your attention. I know we talk a lot, and we're very proud of the fact that we have brought inflation down to where for the last 5 months it's been averaging less than 5 percent. When we started, it was up around 13 percent.

And yet, the people don't recognize it. All they know is when they go to the store, the prices are still up from what they were before. Now, they're not up as much as they would be if we hadn't lowered this, but our goal has to be to bring inflation to an end, so they start going in and finding that the dollar buys just as much as it bought last month or last year when they went in.

There is one other obligation that all of us as citizens must face up to if we are to preserve our freedom: We must restore the security of America. Without that security, survival itself is in doubt.

The bulk of our defense buildup is for manpower, maintenance, and readiness. I know that some would have us get at the deficit by reducing defense spending. I'm sure some savings can be made in any government program just by improved efficiency -- and we have a plan to do that, beginning with the Defense Department -- but not by eliminating weapons systems, the planes that we've ordered, the tanks that are on order, the missiles, et cetera. If we canceled outright all those weapons systems, canceled them all, we'd only reduce next year's budget by $6\1/2\ billion, and we would also send a very dangerous signal to the world that we were unilaterally disarming again.

It wasn't long ago that we had fighter planes that couldn't fly for lack of spare parts, fully half of them; navy ships that couldn't leave port; a rapid deployment force that was neither rapid nor deployable and not much of a force. For the sake of our children and their children, I consider it my duty as President, and all of our duties as citizens, to make sure that America is strong enough to remain free and at peace.

And I know here that you will agree with me that standing up for America also means standing up for the God, who has so blessed our land. I believe this country hungers for a spiritual revival. I believe it longs to see traditional values reflected in public policy again. To those who cite the first amendment as reason for excluding God from more and more of our institutions and everyday life, may I just say: The first amendment of the Constitution was not written to protect the people of this country from religious values; it was written to protect religious values from government tyranny.

Thank you for inviting me into your house today. You are the public servants who offer us the best hope for our future. America has given us so much, but now it is she who needs us. Will you answer her call? I believe in you, and I believe that together we can restore the faith of our people in their government and that we will rebuild this blessed land. And then, when our work is done, we can say that we've fought the good fight, we've finished the race, we have kept the faith. And to our children and our children's children, we can say we did all that could be done in this moment that was given us here on Earth.

Note: The President spoke at 11 a.m. in the House Chamber of the Capitol. His address was transmitted live via satellite to State legislatures in Georgia, Mississippi, and South Carolina, and to a group in Washington, D.C. The Republican National Committee was responsible for the plans for the satellite broadcast and the cost of transmission.

Senate so ably and whose leadership is key to the bipartisan solution or coalition that we must have to bring progress to our nation. Together with the rest of your fine congressional delegation and your innovative State leadership, we have the chance to make government work again, to finally get it off our backs and out of our pockets. And let me add a special ``thank you'' to Representative John Bragg for his help in working on our Federal initiative.

You know, flying in here this afternoon, looking out over your beautiful countryside bordered by the blue Smokies on one side and Old Man River on the other, I was reminded of how many great leaders this State has shaped and how much our country has relied on them. Some of our nation's greatest heroes -- Davy Crockett, John Sevier, Sam Houston, Andrew Jackson -- all were Tennessee volunteers. It's a history to be proud of.

All were known for their bravery and resourcefulness, but chief among them was the man whose birthday we celebrate today. The first United States President to be born in a log cabin, Jackson spoke for the average citizen and fought the vested interests. And just a short time ago, before coming here, I was proud to lay a wreath on his grave.

It was Jackson who reminded us that ``One man with courage makes a majority.'' Throughout his stormy life he lived by that motto, defending his honor, our Union, and the inalienable rights of every American citizen, regardless of station.

Our Federal Government has become so bloated and fat that Jackson wouldn't recognize it. Lines of responsibility between the levels of government have blurred beyond distinction. The tax and spend policies of the past have dragged this economy into a painful recession, throwing millions of Americans out of work and sending interest rates soaring. I have just come, today, from addressing the legislature in Alabama, where the unemployment rate is 14.3. I know while it's not quite that bad, it's very severe here in your State.

We've strayed far from the path that was blazed for us by this frontier President who believed so much in the freedom and dignity of the common man. We got in this predicament precisely because our leaders forgot what you know so well in Tennessee: that we built this nation on individual genius, courage, and effort. Our greatness comes from the kind of character found in the people who made their homes in the hills and fields of Tennessee, not far from the handiwork of professional spenders dispensing the Federal dole in Washington, D.C.

We've gone astray from our first principles. The Federal Government has, at great cost, been attempting to perform tasks that are not its proper function. Oh, those who led us down that path had good intentions; they just didn't see how far they were taking us from the Constitution. So, today we seek to restore the 10th amendment, which says the Federal Government will do only those things called for in the Constitution and all other powers shall remain with the States or with the people.

Government's first duty is to protect the people, not run their lives. While the Federal Government has been assuming an even larger role in our daily lives, it has devoted a smaller and smaller portion of its resources to the one area for which it is clearly, solely responsible -- our national defense.

Nothing tells the story half so well as our changing budget priorities. In 1962 defense spending took 46 percent of all Federal spending, while social programs accounted for 29 percent. Today those numbers have been reversed. Today 29 percent of the budget is for defense, while more than 50 percent is spent on the social programs that mushroomed during the Great Society.

Medicaid and Medicare have gone up by more than 500 percent. Food stamps, in 15 years, have increased by 16,000 percent. And while this was going on, our soldiers were cannabalizing equipment for spare parts, and the readiness of our Armed Forces began to decline.

I grew up in the Depression. I watched one Christmas Eve as my father opened what he thought was a greeting from his employer, only to find out it was a pink slip and that he no longer had a job. I know the humiliation that every family feels when the head of the household can't find work, and I know there are times when only government can help.

But let us not confuse the ideals that launched the last 40 years of uncontrolled government growth with the mismanagement and waste that has resulted. We must recognize the good we have done, but also the damage that is mounting so fast we soon may be unable to undo it.

These are not easy times for any of us -- whether we're elected officials trying to do our best for the people we serve, or average, working Americans trying to make ends meet and build a better future. But that's exactly why this is such an important time for us and our country. It has fallen to our generation, in our day, to make basic choices and right basic wrongs that will affect not only our futures but the futures of so many American generations to come.

To the young couple who wants to buy their own home but can't afford today's interest rates, I have a simple message: Our whole program for economic recovery is geared to a healthier economy that will have lower interest rates and make the dream of your own home come true.

To the laborer looking for work in a tight job market: It isn't easy today, because we're suffering from generations of government over-taxing and over-spending. Our whole program is geared to generating new jobs and new opportunity for you and for all the working people of this nation.

To the pensioners and senior citizens who are pinched by inflation: We've finally begun to break the back of inflation. I promise you, we're going to hold the line on government spending and taxing so that inflation will never again become a nightmare for the working and retired people of America.

To the young and the disadvantaged of our country who may fear that government is ``turning its back'' on them: We are not. We're doing everything we can to create an economy and a society in which there are work and opportunity for all who are willing to try, compassion for those who cannot, upward mobility for all who still dream the American dream.

Ours is not a negative administration trying to turn back the clock. That's what some of our opponents would like to do -- to go back to the bankrupt policies of the past. Our goal is to undo the damage of the big-taxing, big-spending policies that have put average Americans of every race and creed, from every part of the country, into the financial bind they feel today.

The budget monster has been raging out of control. We've proposed a plan to rein it in, to cut back the growth of spending. We welcome any proposal to cut even more, as long as it doesn't jeopardize our security. We can no longer choose between national security and national welfare -- the two have become one and the same.

We must strive to balance the budget, of course, but not at the cost of our freedom. America's survival requires that we go forward with our defense spending program. The most sobering experience I've had in this job is learning of the growing danger that we face. Even with the defense budget that we've proposed, we will not begin to close the gap with the Soviet Union until the middle of this decade -- or later.

We in America seek to live in peace. War is repugnant, and we're rightly awed by forces of nuclear destruction in the world today. When I accepted my party's nomination for this office, I said we must not be naive or foolish. Four times in my lifetime America has gone to war, sending its young men to die on foreign soil, and never once did we go to war because we were too strong. Our challenge today is to ensure that foreign aggressors are not tempted again by a false perception of American weakness.

We've made clear our commitment to peace and stability in the world and our willingness to negotiate mutual arms reduction with potential adversaries. But no American President must ever sit across the negotiating table from someone dedicated to the destruction of our way of life unless our military strength is such that those on the other side of the table have a darn good reason to legitimately negotiate a reduction of weapons for their own feeling of security.

It is being argued that we should cut defense spending to reduce the deficit. Well, if we eliminated all of the major weapons programs that are scheduled in this budget, we would reduce next year's giant deficit by only $6\1/2\ billion in our $3 trillion economy. Most of the money in our defense budget is not for newfangled equipment or the latest in weaponry; most of it will go for essential manpower, maintenance, and readiness. The American people expect their planes to fly, their ships to sail, and their helicopters to stay aloft. There will be no retreat in the commitment of this administration to make sure that they do.

You'll recall that last November 18th, I called for the Soviet Union to dismantle their missiles aimed at Western Europe. In return, we would forego any deployment of corresponding systems that we were planning. The United States stands firmly behind that proposal today, and our negotiators recently put it on the table in Geneva.

Well, let us also be clear about something else. A nuclear freeze at this time would legitimize a position of great advantage for the Soviets. They would have no incentive to make actual reductions. In Europe, for example, their forces are greater than ours by a factor of at least 3 to 1, and some estimate it to be at least 6 to 1. A freeze would leave us and our allies on very thin ice, and as President, I will never permit that.

Now, there are others who say that the only way to balance the budget is to raise your taxes. Our taxes went up by more than 200 percent in the last 10 years, and during those 10 years we ran up the biggest string of budget deficits in our history. Now, can they believe it would be any different at this time?

Oppressive taxation is like a ball and chain on our economy, weighing it down by discouraging initiative, by punishing hard work, by making investment no longer worth the risk. When President Johnson asked for increased taxes to balance the budget, he had a surplus that first year.

Today, an informal poll reveals that some who didn't support that effort are not only opposed to the further cuts that we believe must be made, they're talking of adding almost $30 billion to the budget that we have sent up to the Congress. They would raise taxes to reduce the deficit.

I haven't given up on a balanced budget. I still believe, as I have since we started spending more than we took in, that deficits have been a plague on our economy. But the cure lies in reducing the size of government, in controlling programs that heretofore have been labeled ``uncontrollable.'' Now, Lord knows I want to erase the red ink from the bottom line of the budget, but not by taking more money from the working people in order to do it. We must not raise taxes on men and women who are already taking pay cuts just to keep their jobs.

A citizen with a problem should be able to take a bus to city hall for an answer, he shouldn't have to take a jet to Washington. Removing the possibility of solving problems where they occur, forcing Americans to accept the dictates of a faraway bureaucracy has to be one of the more serious mistakes of this century.

We've proposed the broad outlines of a plan to restore accountability to government. It includes the transfer to our States of more than 40 Federal programs in the areas of education, transportation, community development, and social services. And we want to send back to you the tax sources to pay for them as well. The centerpiece of the proposal is the almost dollar-for-dollar swap of two of the largest areas of welfare. The Federal Government would take over Medicaid in exchange for State assumption of Aid to Families with Dependent Children and food stamps.

Now, this proposal is still in the planning stage. I'm looking forward to working with you in the weeks and months ahead as we develop the details and discuss the alternatives that will make it work. But there is one aspect on which all should be clear: We will not turn our backs on people, communities, or States in need of help. We will not create winners and losers, turning States and regions against each other. Our goal has been and will remain to bring prosperity to all Americans in every part of our country. We will hold fast to the guarantees of equal justice and opportunity for all Americans. We will protect those precious civil rights that define what it is to be an American.

Senate. He said, ``I believe . . . the most urgent . . . problem confronting this Republic today is the threat to the traditional system of federalism.'' Such a system, he said, has produced the most good for the most people in the history of this nation. The future of our country depends on our ability to preserve this idea of partnership.

Rumors of secession swept the city. In the crowded banquet room of the Indian Queen Hotel, 24 men rose to toast the dissolution of the Union. And then the President rose to his ramrod-straight six-feet-one, and beneath his thick brush of iron-grey hair, his eyes fixed as bright and fierce as an eagle's on John C. Calhoun. He said, ``Our Federal Union: it must be preserved.'' They were only seven words, but they were among the most important any American has ever spoken.

As history passes, we find our system of government pulled and twisted, first in this direction and then in that. Jackson's contemporaries sought to destroy it by tipping the balance too far toward the States. In our time, it is threatened by those who would place all the weight in a centralized National Government.

In this time when we and our people are so severely tested, it will help to remember the courage that President Jackson could summon from the convictions in his heart. Let us draw on the same strength as we face the hard decisions ahead, as we withstand the swirling tides of changing political trends. Like Jackson, let us simply do what is right to preserve our Federal Union, which is in fact a federation of sovereign States. This is the last, best hope of man on Earth.

President Reagan participated in a wreath-laying ceremony, commemorating the birthday anniversary of President Jackson, at the tomb of the former President, which is located in a garden near the mansion.

Following his address to the State legislature, the President attended a fundraising reception for the Tennessee Republican Party at the Radisson Plaza Hotel in Nashville. He then traveled on Air Force One to Oklahoma City, Okla., where he attended a fundraising reception for the Oklahoma Republican Party at the Skirvin Plaza Hotel. He remained overnight at the hotel.

Before I begin my planned remarks this morning, I would like to speak again to the question of controlling nuclear arms, a subject of deep concern to all Americans, to our allies, and to the people of the world. The hope of all men everywhere is peace -- peace not only for this generation but for generations to come. To preserve peace, to ensure it for the future, we must not just freeze the production of nuclear arms, we must reduce the exorbitant level that already exists.

Those who are serious about peace, those who truly abhor the potential for nuclear destruction must begin an undertaking for real arms reduction. President Brezhnev has proposed a unilateral moratorium on further deployment of SS - 20 missiles in Western Europe. Well, I say today, as I said yesterday, and as I made clear on November 18th, a freeze simply isn't good enough, because it doesn't go far enough. We must go beyond a freeze.

When President Brezhnev offers to stop deployments in Western Europe, he fails to mention that these are mobile missiles. It doesn't matter where you put them, since you can move them anywhere you want, including back to Western Europe. And even if east of the Urals, they could still target most of Western Europe.

Our proposal, now on the table in Geneva, is that we not deploy any of the intermediate missiles in Europe, in exchange for Soviet agreement to dismantle what they now have there. And that's fair. That is zero on both sides. And if President Brezhnev is serious about real arms control -- and I hope he is -- he will join in real arms reduction.

People from all over the world came here to claim a bit of land -- their part of America -- and to make a new life. These people confronted the most undeveloped country known to man with optimism, self-pride, and rugged independence.

Edna Ferber's epic ``Cimarron'' captured this spirit when her hero proclaimed, ``Here everything's fresh. It's all to do, and we can do it. There's never been a chance like it in the world. We can make an . . . empire out of this Oklahoma country. . . .'' Well, this is the vitality that captured the imagination of the world; it's the fabric of which Oklahoma and America are made.

Standing here today, it's easy to forget the pessimism -- so uncharacteristic of America -- that swept this country only a short while ago. Two decades of economic folly had brought our people to the edge of despair.

In the closing months of 1980, our once-proud economy was gasping for breath. Inflation had been running at double-digit levels for 2 consecutive years, with no relief in sight. At the same time, unemployment was near 8 million. The savings rate had plummeted to the lowest of any industrial country, and interest rates were the highest that they'd been since the War Between the States -- 21\1/2\ percent.

The very character traits that built our country were under attack as never before. Instead of job-creating investment, people put their money into nonproductive inflation hedges. And who could blame them? High taxes and inflation, meanwhile, undermined the incentive to work or save. Quick deals became safer than long-term, economy-building projects.

We couldn't have stayed on the path we were on. You know it, and I know it. With some fine bipartisan cooperation in the Congress, including most of Oklahoma's congressional delegation, we've charted a course that will lead to a better life for all Americans. We've come a long way already.

Vice President Bush is directing an energetic attack on excessive Federal regulation that strangles progress at every turn. Already, the number of new pages in the Federal Register, the book which lists new regulations, has been cut by a third. Two hundred million hours of filling out Federal forms and records by individuals, businesses, local officials, and State employees will be eliminated this year. That's the equivalent to 95,000 people working on redtape 40 hours a week for the entire year.

But we think the fundamental problems have been addressed, and the gloom and doomers notwithstanding, our country is ready to move into high gear. Two years ago the American people seemed resigned to high levels of inflation, even during economic downturns. It was called stagflation. Last year we were able to bring the inflation rate down to an annual rate of 8.9 percent and an average of 4.8 percent for the last 3 months. And last month, it was only 3\1/2\ percent. Now that drop in inflation meant that an average family of four in Oklahoma with an income of $22,600 was better off by $701 in purchasing power. Now this year, even more purchasing power will be saved. In short, we're well on our way to licking inflation, and that's the first big step toward getting the economy back on its feet.

The interest rates are, of course, significant. Some would have you believe that high interest rates are a policy of this administration. Well, let's set the record straight on that. We inherited those interest rates, rates which were, as I said, running over 21 percent. We've decreased them by more than one-fifth, and that downward trend should continue. We're getting interest rates down, but what we will not do is resort to a quick fix that might unleash runaway inflation again.

I know how frustrating these times are for so many who are living right on the ragged edge. I grew up in a family in the Great Depression that felt the pain of economic downturns. I saw what unemployment at that time did to my own father. Today, all of us must remain conscious of the suffering behind the statistics. This realization should give us the resolve to get to the heart of our economic ills.

One area of justifiable concern is the deficit. And believe me, we take it as seriously as any problem facing us. But let's recognize why such a huge deficit is projected. It is not, as some would have you believe, a product of our tax cuts. Our program went into effect October 1st, but the American people have yet to experience any real cut in their taxes. So far, we've simply decreased the size of the already scheduled tax increases that were passed in 1977.

During the last 20 years, just about any interest group with a high-sounding purpose and enough funds to hire a lobbyist was able to wangle a commitment of some kind from the Federal Government. Many on Capitol Hill were like that gal in the musical ``Oklahoma'' who just couldn't say no. [Laughter] The big spenders of the last two decades got us in a terrible fix by committing us to finance too many things we just can't afford. They always started easy, like a dollar down and pay later, and pay we did. And that's where this deficit came from.

The answer, of course, is reducing government spending. And to that end, I'll talk to anyone with constructive suggestions. I hope to cooperate with the Congress to achieve this. But my first and foremost responsibility is to the American people who are still suffering from the failed policies of the past.

However, let me say this. Bringing down the Federal deficit cannot take priority over the security of the United States. The top priority of the Federal Government is the safety of this country. If the choice must be made between balancing the budget -- and I want to do that -- or national security, I must come down on the side of national security.

Now, I know there are some who disagree with that and what we're doing. But they don't have the information that goes with having this job. I would be irresponsible if I did not present a budget that would restore our ability to defend ourselves.

Another controversial decision was the decontrol of oil. One Senator -- and not from Oklahoma -- predicted that gasoline prices would top out at $2 a gallon because of that action. Other shrill voices crying doom were heard. Some of the media gleefully reported charges that we were contributing to inflation. But as Mark Twain once said of his reported death, it was greatly exaggerated. As you know, none of the catastrophic predictions came true.

The last administration's moral equivalent of war, which depended on government planning, bureaucracy, and regulation, gave us higher prices and shortages. Decontrol unleashed the competitive powers of the marketplace and gave us more supply, more conservation, and lower prices. We've reduced our imports by nearly half.

Those who credit the world oil glut for stable energy prices miss the point. Unleashing our domestic oil industry and continued conservation by the American people have helped create this favorable world energy situation.

Oil control -- or decontrol, was just a first step; other energy issues remain. The phase-in of complete decontrol of natural gas is one. I believe that, ultimately, decontrol would be good for the American people. In the meantime, we plan to move forward with the elimination of energy and the Energy Department and to further reduce the regulatory burden on energy producers.

One issue which required compromise, perhaps more than I'd have liked, was the windfall profits tax. Political reality prevented its elimination, but let me point out that our tax reform package, with the strong support of Senator Don Nickels and others in your delegation, did eliminate this tax for a great many royalty owners and independent producers. And there are 200,000 royalty owners and 5,000 independent producers running 66,000 stripper wells in the State of Oklahoma alone.

While we're talking about taxes, I'd like to mention a tax that I've always considered especially repugnant. It severely threatens survival of the family farm and the family-owned business. We didn't get the inheritance tax totally abolished, but I am proud to say that our tax bill did eliminate the inheritance tax for surviving spouses and raised the exemption on farms from $175,000 to $600,000 by 1987.

Now, few if any have been harder hit by the cost-price squeeze than American farmers. I am happy that we have helped stabilize their energy costs, and we're doing our best to open new markets for their products. The last thing they need is a tax that prevents them from passing on their farms to their family. I applaud your efforts to rid your State of this onerous tax on widows and farming families.

Washington has been on a several-decade taxing spree, usurping tax sources that might better be left to local and State governments. In the last 5 years, between 1976 and 1981, Federal taxes doubled, and Federal deficits increased to almost record levels.

Rogers knew. During the last two decades, we witnessed a centralization of power and authority totally alien to the American way. It has undermined the system of checks and balances and the division of powers that have long protected the freedom of our people.

Today, our citizens are far removed from those who make decisions that dramatically affect their lives. Often individuals are confronted with edicts issued thousands of miles away by people for whom no one has ever voted. This isn't freedom. It is not democracy. And it does not work.

Now, this is not a partisan issue, although some would use that tactic in order to distract us from our task. I believe that those who try to undercut or ignore this issue do so at their own peril. The people are justifiably frustrated and angry. A few years ago, they felt the same way about taxes.

Washington. They theorize that central planning is more efficient. With all due respect to that opinion, after nearly half a century of big government waste and blundering, it's kind of hard to take their argument seriously.

Others who oppose a transfer of authority back to the States claim the States are unable or unwilling to handle the responsibility. But isn't this just a nice way of saying that State governments are filled with heartless incompetence?

During my years as Governor of California, I found State and local government to be in the hands of conscientious people who are certainly more in tune with the desires and needs of local citizens than the Federal Government, 3,000 miles away, could possibly be, no matter how compassionate and well-intentioned it might be.

The argument, of course, is also made that it's easier to affect the Congress than a State legislature, that Congress is more responsive, or so they say. Well, that seems rather odd. It suggests that influencing 535 elected officials in Washington -- men and women who must be concerned about the entire country -- is easier than getting the attention of 149 legislators in Oklahoma City.

Well, after listening to that, one gets the impression that someone isn't being candid. Perhaps some oppose federalism not because the States are incompetent, but because they're too efficient; not because they're unresponsive, but because they're too responsible.

The truth may be that special interest groups enjoy dealing with unelected officials with the power to hand out tax money -- officials far removed from localities, and all collected in one place, not in 50. It's the lack of responsiveness to the people paying the bill that makes this relationship with the Federal bureaucracy so attractive.

Working out details for such a change of direction is never easy. Perhaps a starting point for the dialog can be the broad proposal that I outlined during my State of the Union message. Briefly, it suggests the transfer of 45 categorical programs to the States, along with the funding sources and authority to manage them. The list includes everything from education to community development, from transportation to social services.

What I've described as the centerpiece of the federalism initiative is the almost dollar-for-dollar swap of the two largest areas of welfare. The Federal Government would take on the cost of Medicaid and, in exchange, the States would assume the responsibility and authority for Aid to Families with Dependent Children and food stamps.

Already, I've met with a host of State and local officials, and much to the pundits' surprise, our meetings have been frank and productive. Mayor Jim Inhofe of Tulsa has been especially supportive. I look forward to working with Jim and with other Oklahomans during this sorting-out process, so that what is finally submitted is not my plan but is, instead, our plan.

Those who sincerely doubt that States have the capability to reassume their rightful role often point to incidents of mistakes or corruption uncovered at the State level. Well, I suggest that such disclosures and subsequent corrections are evidence that the system is working. When all you're hearing is good news, that's the time you should start to worry and wonder.

Certainly, taking government further away from the people is no solution. Instead, we must tap the innovation and creativity of our people that is just waiting to be brought into play. I can think of few better States that demonstrate America's potential than Oklahoma.

Recently, when Federal funds were cut for a glass-enclosed botanical garden in Oklahoma City, private business rushed forward with more than $5 million to complete the project. One of your Congressmen, Mickey Edwards, has told me about the Opportunities Industrialization Center, a former CETA program now generating private support in order to provide training for those who lack marketable skills.

That Oklahomans are willing to shoulder the cost of worthwhile programs is no surprise. Helping one another is instinctive in a frontier State. Your programs relating to the elderly, like the Foster Grandparents and the RSVP programs, are especially praiseworthy in this regard.

My friend from California, Bill Banowski, can't say enough good things about you folks. Recently you've raised almost $65 million, mostly from the private sector, to be used for an energy center at the University of Oklahoma. Upon completion, it will make that university a world leader in energy-related study. Similarly, Oklahoma State University is known for its outstanding contributions to the science of agriculture. In these two areas of utmost importance to the well-being of America -- energy and agriculture -- Oklahoma is setting the pace.

Your parents and grandparents knew that statehood was something of which to be proud. They weren't satisfied with being a territory of the Federal Government, and I don't think that you are either. Working together, and with God's help, we can rebuild a Federal system created by proud and independent pioneers. Together we can ensure that our children can be just as proud, independent, and free as those who came before us -- free in this federation of sovereign States.

Governors William G. Milliken of Michigan and James A. Rhodes of Ohio, whose States have been affected recently by severe storms and flooding. The flood area includes portions of southern Michigan, northern Ohio, and northern Indiana.

On departing Oklahoma, Air Force One flew over Bartlesville so that the President could view the damage caused by tornadoes which struck the area the previous day. The President then stopped in Fort Wayne, Ind., where he was met by Ohio Governor Rhodes, Governor Robert D. Orr of Indiana, and Mayor Winfield Moses of Fort Wayne. The President visited several sites in the flood area and spoke with local residents. He then returned to Washington and arrived at the White House late in the afternoon.

It is unfortunate that the Soviets did not choose to exercise real restraint before their SS - 20 buildup began. NATO, for its part, has been observing restraint on INF missiles for well over a decade, which the Soviets simply exploited.

In sum, President Brezhnev's offer is neither evidence of Soviet restraint, nor is it designed to foster an arms control agreement. Like previous such Soviet freeze proposals, this one seeks to legitimize Soviet superiority, to leave the Soviet Union free to continue its buildup, to divide the NATO Alliance, to stop U.S. deployments, and thus to secure for the Soviet Union unchallenged hegemony over Europe.

The United States has put forward concrete proposals in Geneva for the complete elimination of missiles on both sides, cited by Brezhnev in his remarks of today. We regret the Soviet Union apparently prefers propaganda gestures to concentrating on serious negotiations in Geneva. For its part, the United States, with the full support of its allies, will continue to implement both tracks of the December 1979 decision on the deployment of new systems to Europe and the pursuit of genuine arms control, which we hope will make those deployments unnecessary.

President Brezhnev's proposal to place limits on the operations of missiles submarines is also not a serious proposal. U.S submarines, by deploying to extensive ocean areas, are able to remain invulnerable to Soviet attack, and thus constitute a stable deterrent force. Reducing their area of operations in the world's oceans would increase their vulnerability and erode our confidence in their deterrent capability. The Soviet proposal, therefore, is entirely self-serving. Having made a large fraction of our land-based ICBM force vulnerable through their large ICBM buildup, the Soviets in this proposal are attempting to reduce the confidence we have in the sea-based leg of our deterrent.

The proposal for a ban on the deployment of ground-based, long-range cruise missiles is yet another transparent effort to disrupt NATO's 1979 two-track decision. Moreover, in focusing on sea-based as well as land-based, long-range cruise missiles, the proposal ignores the hundreds of shorter range cruise missiles that the Soviet Union currently deploys aboard its warships.

These four principles were highlighted by the President in his speech of November 18, 1981. They underlie our position in the current Geneva negotiations on the elimination of U.S. and Soviet intermediate-range nuclear missile forces. They also form the basis for our approach to negotiations with the Soviet Union on the reduction of strategic arms -- the START talks.

The President. Well, yes, I do. It's one more of sorrow than irritation. I think it's time to stop playing these political games. You know, a unilateral freeze leaves them with 300 missiles and 900 warheads aimed at Western Europe -- against nothing. And what we're talking about in Geneva and what I spoke about on November 18th, I really mean. We can erase and eliminate that entire threat for both the Soviet Union and the Bloc, the Soviet Bloc, and Western Europe, by a reduction of those missiles down to zero. I'm ready and willing to -- well, we are meeting on that -- I'm ready and willing to meet him on the discussion of the other, the strategic missiles at any time on the same thing.

Mr. Cromley. Mr. President, we have to ask you a question that particularly pertains to our part of the country. You're saying that the phase-in of complete decontrol of natural gas is a remaining goal. I wonder if you could tell us possibly when you might recommend that or push for it?

The President. Well, as soon as it would be practicable. Right now, the information we have from up on the Hill is -- with this battle over the budget and the taxes and so forth -- they just are very reluctant to even approach this or let it be touched. So, we're kind of waiting for signals there.

The President. Well, any attempt to do away with what I think are the three basic fundamentals that are part of the program. Now I'm not fixed in concrete as to every specific in our program, if someone can come up and show me better ways of approaching the cut idea, or if there are better ways of meeting the incentive thing that I think the tax cuts are aimed at in restoring the economy.

But what I meant the other day was, I would not hesitate to use that veto if it is a case of gutting either one of these three fundamentals; in other words, reducing our inability to redress the imbalance in national security, if it's one that's going to reverse the course of incentive taxation to get the economy going again, or if it's one that is not going to legitimately approach the need of reducing the cost and size of government.

And I still think, as I say, there's some room in there for flexibility if someone's got some practical suggestions that will help all this. You know, one suggestion that's been made is cutting defense spending by, say, $10 billion. Well, you could totally eliminate every one of the major weapons programs that are in the defense budget, and you'd only cut the budget by $6\1/2\ billion next year. You wouldn't have reached that $10 billion. So where are they going to get it? Now I think a much more practical thing with regard to defense spending is what we have started already putting together.

Now they're not going to go in there to see whether you should do away with a weapon program or not. They're going to go in and see down through that vast structure what no Secretary from up on top can see for himself, by the way -- are there business practices that you wouldn't put up with in private business?

The President. Yes, but I must say we've had some talks, and I think they hold to what -- they are legitimately trying to join with us in a path that we're taking. The trouble in the past has been that roller coaster. And the funny thing is, when they increase the money supply -- and this last time, the little spurt after the interest rates had started down, was because there was a spike going up.

I think now, the real thing that is holding the interest rates up can be found outside of the Fed and outside of government. There had been so much over the last 40 years -- this is the eighth recession since the war -- there had been so much of that roller coaster, and every time that we've had a problem like the unemployment -- the money market out there has seen them do this money thing and then they've seen the resulting raise in inflation.

And I believe that what we're really up against -- and I talked to some business leaders the other day back there from the Roundtable, and they affirm this -- that there just is a lack of confidence that it isn't going to be the same old game, that Congress won't go through with the budget reductions, that they will see the same pattern. And so they're not going to lend that money with the possibility that inflation is then going to shoot up.

The President. And it's averaged, since October 1st, the beginning of the fiscal year, it's averaged less than 5 percent. So, we think that we're doing -- but again, out there, they don't believe it's going to last. So they say they're waiting to see, that inflation's going to go up, or they're going to charge interest rates accordingly on the basis that they think it will.

The President. Yes, I think it is. Forgive me, but I think even more so perhaps where we get to the network news. I think there is a lack of responsibility that, on the basis of leaks -- and who knows where those are from or what motivates them -- they print things that actually can set us back.

Now, way back when the AWACS thing was going on, one such story, if I hadn't gotten on the phone, if there hadn't been a member of the Saudi royal family in the country to tip us off, all our efforts -- we're trying to recognize, we're trying to establish a bond with the Arab States, the more moderate Arab States, to where we can bring them into the peacemaking process with Israel. I don't think it does any good for us to be seen as just Israel and the United States on the one side and all of them on the other. Then we don't have any persuasive power. And this was what part of the AWACS was based on. And fortunately for this tipoff, I got on the phone. But it was a news story, just the kind you're talking about, in the same place. I got on the phone, and just in time, because in Saudi Arabia they were ready to call in the press and blast the United States, and that was the end of that.

But those things, and when I mentioned the network news -- in a time of recession like this, there's a great element of psychology in economics. And you can't turn on evening news without seeing that they're going to interview someone else who's lost his job, or they're outside the factory that has laid off workers and so forth -- the constant downbeat that can contribute psychologically to slowing down a new recovery that is in the offing.

The President. Well, with regard to the network news, I wonder sometimes if it isn't the battle of the ratings, the Nielsen ratings, and if they aren't more concerned with entertainment than they are with delivering news. It's an entertainment medium, and they're looking for what's eye-catching and spectacular, not necessarily --  -- . Is it news that some fellow out in South Succotash someplace has just been laid off, that he should be interviewed nationwide? Or someone's complaint that the budget cuts are going to hurt their present program?

We hadn't taken him off. He'd been taken off disability in 1980 because it was found then that he was holding a job and had been holding a full-time job for 3 years while he was drawing disability payments. And yet, they ran it as if it was something that we had just done.

Mr. Cromley. Could I ask you about deficits for a minute, Mr. President? It seems that everybody from the right to the left is saying that your deficit is too high. I'm sure you think it's too high, too.

Yet, it seems to be a ``Catch-22'' situation -- that is, they say they're not going to do anything about it, about anything in your economic program, until there's a lower deficit. Is there anything that can be done that you see?

The President. Yes, the deficit is based on that, bringing down that spending. Now, there may be additional areas where we can reduce further, and we should be definitely thinking about it, but I'm just wondering if we can get that kind of bipartisan action with an election coming up or whether one side is willing to accept the situation in return for having some campaign issues.

Now, here we are, asking for $31 billion cut. The other side is trying to make an issue out of the deficit. Now, the deficit went up simply because of the recession. If you add one percentage point of unemployment, you add $27 billion to the deficit. It isn't that we had goofed in the estimates we had originally made, we made the estimates based on the situation at that time. And then when the interest rates persisted as long as they did -- and incidentally, then the money supply was way below the target mark -- if those persist, and then we have the unemployment that we've had, up had to go this deficit.

Right now, they think that we're being rosy. Stockman added a few billion dollars to the deficit the other day. Now, what was he doing it on? He was doing it because he felt conscience-bound, as we all do, on the projection -- now, it's purely a projection, a drought could change all this -- that we're going to have bumper crops to the point that the projection is that prices are going to be lower for the farmers, which is going to increase the government's payments to the farmers.

Now, at this very time that we're asking for these, and asking -- look, we'll talk to them about any additional cuts that can further bring this down -- an informal poll of subcommittee chairmen in the House the other day found that among them -- totals $29 billion in additional spending that they're discussing in their committees.

Now, where would the deficit for '82 have been if we'd gone with the budget that we had inherited? And where will that deficit that they're talking about be in '83 if they refuse to make the $31 billion in cuts?

The President. How active in the congressional campaigns? Well, all that I can do. I know that there's no way that a person could probably intervene. But I think in fundraising, I think the making of commercials, radio and TV, for candidates -- I want to do all I can, because I think it's all important. We've had here, last night, and in the two stops yesterday before here, Alabama and Tennessee, both instances, they had fundraisers in connection with that after I'd spoken with the legislatures. And so I'm going to do all that I can in that regard.

Three weeks ago, in an address to the Organization of American States I presented a comprehensive proposal designed to help the peoples of the Caribbean Basin cope with a crisis of unprecedented proportions. Today, I am transmitting this plan to Congress.

Today, both their economic well-being and security are threatened. Economic disaster is consuming our neighbors' money reserves and credit, it's forcing thousands of people to immigrate, and threatening even the most established democracies. Extremist groups and violent minorities are exploiting this economic misery to gain new footholds in this hemisphere. If we don't act now, the dangers will grow. New Cubas will arise, and the cost of ensuring our security to the south will escalate.

The plan I'm offering today addresses the underlying economic crisis that offers opportunities to the foes of freedom. Our program, like the crisis itself, is unprecedented and consists of mutually reinforcing measures in the fields of trade, investment, and financial assistance. The package is a balanced one, and every component is essential. It's not foreign aid as usual, but a program that is based on unique American practices that we know work.

It will support our neighbors' efforts to achieve economic progress, political democracy, social justice, and freedom from outside intervention. By encouraging a more productive and dynamic private sector, it will develop the jobs, goods, and services which the people of the Basin need for a better life. This is our contribution. Others in this hemisphere are also increasing theirs. Our willingness to act boldly has been a catalyst.

Colombia, which is itself a developing country, is increasing trade credits, balance of payment swaps, and technical assistance, and will extend trade preferences. Canada will more than double its assistance. Mexico and Venezuela, in addition to the $700 million a year oil facility, are increasing other programs including trade preferences. Our countries agreed jointly to ask the Europeans and Japan to pitch in, too, and we'll be meeting with them soon.

I'm acutely conscious that we ourselves are going through a period of economic difficulty. I wouldn't propose this program if I were not convinced that it is in our vital national interest. The economies of these countries are small, the impact of the trade measures will develop slowly.

On February 24, before the Organization of American States, I outlined a major new program for economic cooperation for the Caribbean Basin. Today I am transmitting this plan to the Congress for its action.

The economic, political and security challenges in the Caribbean Basin are formidable. Our neighbors need time to develop representative and responsive institutions, which are the guarantors of the democracy and justice that freedom's foes seek to stamp out. They also need the opportunity to achieve economic progress and improve their standard of living. Finally, they need the means to defend themselves against attempts by externally-supported minorities to impose an alien, hostile and unworkable system upon them by force. The alternative is further expansion of political violence from the extreme left and the extreme right, resulting in the imposition of dictatorships and -- inevitably -- more economic decline, and more human suffering and dislocation.

The crisis facing most of the Basin countries is real and acute. Deteriorating trade opportunities, worldwide recession, mounting debt burdens, growing unemployment and deepseated structural problems are having a catastrophic impact throughout the region. This economic disaster is consuming our neighbors' money reserves and credit, forcing thousands of people to emigrate, and shaking even the most established democracies.

The program I am presenting to Congress today is integrated and designed to improve the lives of the peoples of the Caribbean Basin by enabling them to earn their own way to a better future. It builds on the principles of intergrating aid, self-help and participation in trade and investment which I emphasized at the Cancun Summit last October. It is a different kind of assistance program for developing countries, based on principles and practices which are uniquely American and which we know have worked in the past. It will help revitalize the economies of this strategically critical region by attacking the underlying causes of economic stagnation. Most significantly, it helps expand economic opportunities for the people of the Caribbean Basin to make possible the achievement of a lasting political and social tranquillity based on freedom and justice.

I want to emphasize that this program is not an end in itself. What we seek in the final analysis is to help the people in the Basin build for themselves a better life, not just economically but across the full spectrum of human needs and aspirations. History, and particularly the history of this Hemisphere, has shown that a pluralistic society with strong, free private institutions -- churches, free trade unions, businesses, professional and other voluntary associations, and an independent press -- is our best hope in moving toward that ultimate goal.

Our development program takes this into account; it will encourage progress in the beneficiary countries toward reasonable workplace conditions and opportunities for workers to associate freely and bargain collectively.

The United States has been developing this program in close consultation with the countries of the region and with other donor countries. Last July, we joined with Canada, Mexico and Venezuela to launch a multilateral action program for the region. It was agreed that each country would develop its own program but within a multilateral consultative framework. Mexico and Venezuela are operating an oil facility for the Caribbean Basin. Canada is more than doubling its aid. The program I am presenting today is our contribution.

We have worked carefully with both government officials and the private sector in the Basin countries to assess their needs and their own priorities. We have also consulted with other potential donors, including Colombia, as well as multilateral development institutions. This program is part of an overall coordinated effort by countries within and outside the region. Its structure will ensure not only that our own actions will be effective, but that their impact will be multiplied by the efforts of many others.

El Salvador: $128 million. El Salvador's economy is in desperate straits. The insurgents have used every tactic of terrorism to try to destroy it. El Salvador desperately needs as much assistance to stimulate production and employment as we can prudently provide while also helping other countries of the region.

Costa Rica: $70 million. Costa Rica has a long tradition of democracy which is now being tested by the turmoil of its economy. Once Costa Rica has embarked on a recovery plan, it will need significant assistance to succeed in restoring investor confidence and credit to its hard-hit private sector.

Honduras: $35 million. The poorest country in the Central American region, Honduras faces severe balance of payments constraints, spawned primarily from falling prices of major exports and rising import costs.

Jamaica: $50 million. Jamaica's recovery is under way but continued success is still heavily dependent on further quick-disbursing assistance to overcome a shortage of foreign exchange for raw materials and spare parts.

Dominican Republic: $40 million. The Dominican Republic is attempting to adjust to drastically-reduced economic activity brought on primarily by falling prices of its major export crop (sugar) and heavy dependence on imported oil. Critical economic reforms must take place in a difficult political climate as elections grow near. Once the free trade provisions go into effect, the Dominican Republic will also receive as a result of the duty-free quota for its sugar exports immediate benefits going beyond the $40 million indicated here.

Belize: $10 million. Newly-independent Belize faces a perilous economic situation brought on by falling sugar prices and stagnant growth. Belize needs short-term assistance as a bridge to the development of its own considerable natural resources.

Although not a part of the legislation which I am transmitting today, the FY 1983 aid request is an integral part of our overall program for the Caribbean Basin. We cannot think of this program as a one-time injection of U.S. interest and effort. If it is to succeed it must be a sustained commitment over a number of years. I strongly urge the Congress to approve this request in full.

States. Their development must be enhanced by our policy toward the rest of the region. We have consulted closely with Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands about the Caribbean Basin Initiative and the legislation I am requesting today will reflect Puerto Rican and Virgin Island interests in many important ways.

To further the integrated agricultural development of the Caribbean Basin, we will make greater use of the agricultural and forestry research, extension and training facilities of the Federal Government and those of Puerto Rico and the United States Virgin Islands, especially the tropical agricultural research facility at Mayaguez, Puerto Rico.

All these elements in the Caribbean Basin program are inextricably linked together, and to the fundamental objective of helping our neighbors help themselves. A key principle of the program is to encourage a more productive, competitive and dynamic private sector, and thereby provide the jobs, goods and services which the people of the Basin need for a better life for themselves and their children. All the elements of this program are designed to help establish the conditions under which a free and competitive private sector can flourish.

Most countries in the Basin already recognize that they must reform many of their economic policies and structures in profound and sometimes painful ways in order to take advantage of the new economic opportunities of this program. We -- the United States and other outside donors -- can offer assistance and support, but only the people in the Basin themselves can make this program work.

Some of the benefits of this program will take considerable time to mature; others are designed to have an immediate effect. But the challenge is already upon us; the time to begin is now. I urge the Congress to act with maximum speed.

I also urge the Congress to consider very carefully any changes in this program. The actions in trade, aid and investment are inter-related. Each supports the other, so that together they comprise a real spur toward the entrepreneurial dynamism which the area so badly needs. A significant weakening in any of them could undermine the whole program.

In the Caribbean Basin, we seek above all to support those values and principles that shape the proud heritage of this Nation and this Hemisphere. With the help of this Congress, we shall see these values not only survive but triumph in a Caribbean Basin which is a community of peace, freedom and prosperity.

Irishmen and their descendants have always played a significant role in America's history. Some of our most fiery patriots, the ones who inspired the colonies on to independence, were of Irish blood. Now, some historians might suggest they were trying to settle a score with England. I don't know why anyone should think such a thing. [Laughter] The truth is, there are few people on this planet whose hearts burn more with a flame of freedom than do the Irish. And maybe that's why so many were moved to come here and be part of our noble experiment. In a world awash with dictatorships and despotism, we can be proud that Ireland and the United States remain dedicated to the principles of liberty.

Now, just a moment ago, the Minority Leader of the House, Congressman Michel, just came up and presented me with a shillelagh, and the suggestion was made that I might use it to get legislation through the Congress. [Laughter] Now, that's one of the few things I hadn't thought of, Mr. Prime Minister. If you've got any pointers in the use of this, I'd be most grateful.

Nancy and I are pleased to have you join us on this special day. It's grand to have you here in this house, which I might add was designed by another of Erin's sons, as was the Great Seal of our nation. And now, I would ask all of you to join with me in a toast to our honored guests, Prime Minister and Mrs. Haughey.

The Prime Minister. Mr. President, I would like to thank you for your kind words of welcome and for the warmth and splendor of your hospitality. My wife and I and the members of our party are overwhelmed by the friendliness and cordiality shown to us on this short visit to your great country.

President, was designed by an Irishman and is in itself a symbol of the manner in which the history of our two countries is woven together. To be received in the White House by a President who bears an Irish name and cherishes his Irish heritage is a unique and special experience.

The United States, Mr. President, was the first nation in the world's history to be founded on a dream. And it was a dream which over the years has comingled with reality -- sometimes as dreams will, outshining it, and at other times, again fading away from it. But in those valleys which all nations experience, when the reality has seemed to fail a dream, there have not been wanting great statesmen and men of courage to reshape the destinies of this land and to recall their countrymen to the brightness of the original vision. And if the United States has been for its citizens ideal in fact, dream and reality, so it has been for millions of Irish men and women also.

I need hardly remind a St. Patrick's Day gathering of that deep wish for a new life across the sea which for so long sustained so many of our countrymen, or of the countless thousands who came to these shores in sorrow and bewilderment and found what they had scarcely dared to hope for -- found that their own personal individual dream had at last come true. But though they made their own of this great new land, they rarely severed their ties with home. And the letter from America has entered deep as folklore and as fact into the Irish consciousness, into our literature, our tales of the past, our family memories.

Europe, we dreamed the American dream and shared the American reality along with you. The ancient nation of Ireland, emerging in this century into a modern state, has been founded on those same ideals which you were the first to set forth. Wolfe Tone, the first Irish political thinker to conceive the dream of an Irish Republic where all whom God had created equal should be recognized as equal, all whom God had created free should really be free, was deeply influenced by the fact that there was already in existence beyond the sea a great new nation, conceived in liberty and dedicated to equality.

The greater part of the island of Ireland today has become a modern state, where all are free and equal before the law, where bigotry and discrimination have faded away, and sectarianism holds no place in our laws, our constitution, or our daily lives.

And in speaking of these things to Americans, I know the sympathy and understanding they will evoke. For no man can speak of freedom and equality to Americans without striking chords -- of the lamps burning in the belfries of New England, of those farmers that stood by the bridge at Concord, or of the great document that the Founding Fathers composed at Philadelphia.

But there's one thing we Irish have not yet achieved and of which we are constantly reminded everywhere we go in this great Capital City, where the memory of Abraham Lincoln and his struggle to save the American union and to avoid the partition of his country are so beautifully and so splendidly commemorated.

Whereas Lincoln sought to prevent the partition of his country, we are seeking to bring to an end the partition of ours. And the obstacles to that goal are in part the age-old ones which so nearly sundered the young United States -- misunderstanding, ignorance, prejudice, suspicion, and fear.

We have pledged ourselves to overcoming these obstacles to further the reconcilement of the two great traditions of our island -- to give unto that end any pledge that may be sought, any guarantee that may be thought necessary, and to making unassailable constitutional arrangements for those in the northern part of Ireland who may feel a special need for such provisions.

Countless millions of ordinary Irish men and women have by their labor and their sacrifice contributed to the power and the stature of this great American Republic, and in their name, I look confidently for support and encouragement for our endeavors in Ireland today.

Ireland holds a special place in the affections of millions of Americans. And it is my hope that that feeling will inform American policy and actions and ensure that the encouragement of Irish unity ranks high among her international objectives. There is much to be done. And the first thing is that Britain be encouraged to seek more positively and persuade more actively a change in attitudes and outlooks, which would pave the way for unity and so enable her final withdrawal from Ireland to take place with honor and dignity.

And for more than seven centuries, against all comers, they held the only pass through their territory of Y Regan in the Slieve Bloom Mountains. They held it against friend and foe. And the English, at one stage in their long and unsuccessful efforts to conquer our country, paid the O'Reagans a great compliment. Their commanders, methodical men, prepared and sent to London, maps on which were marked the names of the most redoubtable Irish chieftans, those from whom the strongest resistance was to be expected.

Incidentally, before -- we're going to have entertainment here, and I know you're going to love it, because I've heard these two wonderful artists before -- but I also mention that while government is often very lacking in timing, not this time. Yesterday, we swore in, to be effective as of today, our new Ambassador to Ireland, Pete Dailey.

Ladies and gentlemen, you have been hearing Frank Patterson, and Eily O'Grady at the harp and the piano. And in another part, the major part of their lives, they are Mr. and Mrs. Frank Patterson. And they're renowned throughout Europe and their own country. They have recorded, if you're interested in hearing that again. I'm not only grateful to them for being here, giving of their wonderful talent to us, but grateful that you sang this other song after ``Danny Boy,'' because if you'd stopped on ``Danny Boy,'' I wouldn't have been able to talk. [Laughter] We were very, very moved in the audience here. But we're grateful to you, and we're honored by your presence.

The spell cast on us by a small island 3,000 miles away began more than a century ago when Irish immigrants first came to this land -- immigrants whose sweat and labor built our economy, whose hearts and minds shaped our literary and intellectual history, whose smiles and mirth gave us the gift of laughter, whose conscience and spirituality reminded us of the importance of religious faith in our lives.

Irish sea'' cannot help but reflect on a tragic irony: Northern Ireland is troubled by conflict and violence. We in America who owe so much to our kinsmen of both Irish and British heritage, Protestant and Catholic alike, can never be indifferent to the problem of violence in Northern Ireland. That is why we seek to contribute in any way we can to a lasting, peaceful solution that will bring to an end years of conflict and violence.

Ireland. There have been grounds for optimism for the future. The level of violence continued its generally downward trend. In this country, U.S. law enforcement authorities confiscated a large number of weapons intended for terrorist hands in Ireland. Perhaps most important, despite the sorrows of the past year, there are signs that the climate has improved for moderate political solutions.

We will continue to stand by our policy: to urge the parties in Northern Ireland to come together for a just solution and to condemn all acts of terrorism and violence. We believe a lasting solution can be found only through a process of reconciliation between the two traditions in Northern Ireland and between Britain and Ireland. We encourage and applaud such efforts. We particularly welcome the British and Irish Governments' widening of the framework of their cooperation to this end.

But as much as we wish for a just and peaceful settlement, we in the United States cannot chart a course for the people of Northern Ireland. If solutions are to endure, they must come from the people themselves.

We stand unalterably opposed to the forces of violence and discord in Northern Ireland which obstruct the process of reconciliation so necessary to peace. Those who advocate violence or engage in terrorism will have no welcome in the United States.

Last year, I called on all Americans to question closely any appeal for financial or other aid from groups involved in the Northern Ireland conflict to ensure that contributions do not end up in the hands of those who perpetuate violence, either directly or indirectly. Today, I renew that request.

As we look to the future, we can be proud that the United States already is making an important contribution toward economic and social progress in Ireland. We are proud of our role in strengthening the Irish economy. There are over 300 American companies with manufacturing plants in Ireland. This investment by American industry shows a clear commitment to a future based on peace and well-being for the people who live in Ireland, North and South.

This administration will maintain the U.S. commitment to facilitate growth of additional job-creating investment, investment that will benefit all the people of Ireland. In the meantime, we encourage the American private sector to continue to assist in creating more job opportunities in Ireland.

In affirming these principles of our policy toward Northern Ireland, I wish to add my appreciation and support for the many true friends of Ireland in this country, in the Congress and among the public, who continue to speak out against violence and in support of peace and reconciliation.

Ireland, and I join them in the prayer that our hopes will soon be realized. It is by assisting in commercial development, combating terrorism, and encouraging the process of peaceful reconciliation that we in America can do our part to bring peace to Northern Ireland.

Sec. 3. The Director of the Office of Personnel Management, in consultation with the heads of executive agencies, shall ensure that personnel policies and classification standards meet the needs of executive agencies for a professional procurement work force.

These men have great records of service to their country, and I'm more than proud and confident of what this is going to mean in the caliber of our Armed Services to have these gentlemen serving. And I shall certainly be seeking their advice at every opportunity.

But as I also said then, we have an easy answer. If he really means he wants a lessening of the tension over nuclear weapons, well, all he has to do is join us in Geneva in the elimination of nuclear, intermediate-range weapons in all of Europe.

The President. Well, there have been significant savings already -- which the Secretary, in his quiet way, just made without grandstanding about them -- or the budget would have had bigger figures right now that they would have had to ask for.

But in addition to that, we have appealed to the civilian sector, the business and industrial sector, for task forces who are going to be able to come in to all of our agencies and go all the way down into those things that it would be impossible for just one person in charge of an agency to see, and find out where there are areas that modern business practices might update and make more efficient government operations.

Europe on the various steps that we can take. I wouldn't be able to speculate now, but I don't like to discuss options anyway as to whether there are additional things that we can do. But we're going to do everything we can.

But I'm especially delighted to be here today. It's not just that I've had the privilege many times during the past few decades of addressing the NAM audiences, I also have vivid recollections of the 1950's and 1960's, when you were one of the few business groups speaking out forcefully against America's disastrous drift towards bigger and bigger government. For many years, your Washington representatives led a lonely challenge against the policies of tax and tax and spend and spend, that were once the watchwords of Washington wisdom, passwords to success in the Nation's Capital.

Today in Washington, the talk is of the danger of Federal spending, deficit financing, and bureaucratic intrusion. The nightly news, the newspapers, and the journals are filled with stories and articles about the price we've paid for our years of budget-busting extravagance.

The statistics tell a grim story. Between 1976 and 1980, inflation more than doubled; the prime rate went up 220 percent. As we prepared to take office a little more than a year ago, the prime rate stood at an astounding 21\1/2\ percent. Investment, savings, and productivity were drying up, and it wasn't long before the recession -- that freight train from the marshaling yards of liberal economics -- hit us full force. Business confidence declined, and unemployment headed right for the roof.

Even those statistics don't tell the whole story -- the human price we've paid: farmers facing foreclosures; businessmen staring at bankruptcy; ironworkers in Steubenville and autoworkers in Detroit and black teenagers in Newark standing in unemployment lines; manufacturers and entrepreneurs like yourselves, whose drive, initiative, and confidence has transformed America into an economic giant, now facing growing frustration and helplessness in the wake of a shrinking economy and a hostile business climate.

National Association of Manufacturers and what you were saying many years ago: That you can't drink yourself sober or spend yourself rich, that you can't prime the pump without pumping the prime, that you can't give government all the running room it asks for without stampeding the money supply and running up inflation and unemployment.

Our administration has been reminding the American people that the economic mess we inherited last year and the recession we're in now is the legacy of years of misguided policy. But we intend to do more than just point to the mistakes of the past.

You know, I sometimes find myself remembering a story they tell about that great baseball manager, Frankie Frisch. One day he sent a rookie out to play centerfield. The rookie dropped the first fly ball that was hit to him, let a grounder go between his feet, and when he did get his hands on the ball, threw it to the wrong base. Frankie stormed out of the dugout, grabbed his glove, and said, ``I'll show you how to play this position.'' And the next batter slammed a drive right over second base. Frankie came in on it, missed it completely, and fell down when he tried to chase it.

Well, we inherited many mistakes by others, but we're not going to just bemoan the past. We think we've put together an imaginative, aggressive program for economic recovery. It's already cut the rate of growth in Federal spending nearly in half, cut taxes for individuals and business by over $300 billion. We have indexed taxes to the rate of inflation, taking away government's hidden incentive to inflate the currency, and cut the stifling increase in new Federal regulations by a third.

In spite of this, our proposals weren't even enacted into law before certain voices -- the same voices that in the past had recommended the easy solutions of tax and tax and spend and spend -- came up with more easy solutions. Rather than come to grips with the problems of excessive Federal spending, they urged us to once again make government bigger by increasing its revenue.

Now, let me be the first to say some of those suggestions came from those who were perfectly sincere and troubled, as all of us are, by the projected size of the Federal deficit. But some of these suggestions also came from professional insiders, who have a vested interest in large bureaucracies and who think they're protecting a political constituency by keeping it helplessly and permanently dependent on government.

Now, this nation has serious economic problems, but we're moving forward with a program we believe effectively addresses these problems. It has brought about revolutionary changes of enormous benefit to both individual Americans and to American businessmen.

What we need now is not last-minute haggling or displays of blatant self-interest. We need the support that only America's businessmen can give us. We need you to participate in our task forces on private sector initiatives and government cost cutting, but most of all, we need you to get on with the business of economic recovery, to look for imaginative ways to invest and grow and to provide jobs for the unemployed.

From the very beginning, you in the National Association of Manufacturers have supported this administration's program. And when the pressure was turned up a few months ago by those who demand quick fixes and fine tuning -- I might add, those who got us into the recession in the first place and who now want to deprive working Americans of their tax cuts this July -- you kept the faith. You spoke out in defense of our recovery program. You understood that we can only deal with the problems of deficits and unemployment by putting the brakes on extravagant government once and for all, by cutting taxes and putting more disposable income into the hands of the American worker, by ensuring real economic growth that creates jobs, stimulates investment, and gives every American a leg up on the economic ladder.

Ladies and gentlemen, thank you. We're mighty grateful. And I would be remiss if I didn't extend a personal note of thanks to your chairman, Luke Williams, and your president, Sandy Trowbridge, for their service on our cost control and private sector task forces.

But while I do thank you today, I also want to ask you to continue your invaluable support. Will you take a message home with you, a message that doesn't always get to the American people by way of the media or government pronouncements?

My real point is this. Presidents, even Thomas Jefferson, have their moods just like everyone else, including members of the press. Some of the things we say and do regarding each other may cause a little momentary frustration or misunderstanding, but that's all it is. So, I hope I didn't touch a nerve with any of the press a few days ago, because I think that most of the time the overwhelming majority of them are doing a fine job. And as a former reporter, columnist, and commentator myself, I know just how tough their job can be.

Washington until many months later. One Cabinet member in the former administration put it very well. The toughest job in Washington, he said, is being able to tell the difference between ``the tides, the waves, and the ripples.'' Actually, that's been the problem with the perceptions of many experts, pundits, and insiders. They tend to concentrate so much on the ripples, they can't see the waves and the tides. Psychology is a very important factor of economics. A continued drumbeat of despair about the recession can prolong that recession.

Now, one example: A few of us here can recall a much grimmer month of March -- no, not the one that saw Julius Caesar done in. It was 1943, the Allies were losing the battle of the Atlantic, the only event Churchill said that ever really frightened him during the war. In that terrible month, more than 500,000 tons of Allied shipping went down. Thousands of merchant seamen lost their lives. England was left with only a 2-month supply of food and materiel, and the experts in the British Admiralty seriously doubted that England's lifeline across the Atlantic could be kept open.

But then suddenly, only a month later, it all changed. Innovations in the convoy system, escort training, radio and radar use, long-range aircraft that had been accumulating for months were finally brought to bear. The ``U'' boat wolf-packs sustained enormous losses. Two months later, Hitler's admirals were conceding defeat in the Atlantic. And by June, Allied convoys crossed the ocean without the loss of a single ship.

Or think back to the economic situation in this country shortly after the war. In 1946 inflation and unemployment were climbing, our gross national product dropped by an alarming 15 percent. And once again, many of the experts only looked at the narrow data. They predicted a return of the Depression and advised the reinstitution of wartime economic controls.

More recently, we heard all those predictions about the energy crisis -- disaster was just over the horizon, gasoline was going to cost $2.00 a gallon, oil reserves would dry up, the Western economy would be held hostage by OPEC or strangled by the exorbitant cost of oil.

Inflation is a problem that throughout history has brought many nations and empires to their knees. Only a year ago, it was the source of the gravest concern to everyone in Washington -- number one problem to the people in the polls. It's finally coming down and coming down substantially. We ended 1981 with a Consumer Price Index of 8.9 percent for that year -- 3\1/2\ percent below that of 1980. That meant that on every dollar earned, 3\1/2\ cents less was eaten up by inflation. This meant something to the poor and the elderly, especially. A family on a fixed income of $8,500 had $255 more in purchasing power, now, because of the decline in inflation, than it otherwise would have had.

But the encouraging signs continue. Since the beginning of the fiscal year in October, inflation has averaged less than 5 percent. The rate for January stood at only 3.5 percent. And last month, for the first time in 6 years, the Producer Price Index actually declined.

There's also been a quiet, steady, but important improvement in the rate of growth of personal savings, a rate that had been declining at alarming margins before we came into office. In the first quarter of 1981, the growth in the savings rate stood at 4.6 percent; by the fourth quarter, that figure was up to 6.1 percent. I think as business men and women you know how important savings are to the investment and loan picture. It's a picture that must improve -- and is improving -- if we're going to have dramatic economic growth.

And there's one more, other important point about this growth in personal savings -- its relationship to the size of the Federal deficit. The fear has often been voiced that the increase in the deficit will force government to crowd out other borrowers in the money markets and boost up interest rates. And so it has over the past years and decades.

But looking ahead, Federal borrowing in 1983 and 1984 will be several times less than the total private savings resulting from our tax cuts. We expect $260 billion more in private savings in 1984 than in 1981. So, you can see the private savings will far outweigh the projected increases in the deficit. Private borrowers aren't going to be crowded out; they're going to find more credit available precisely because of the tax cut program that we have already enacted.

Even more important, by one crucial standard we will actually be making progress in the battle against deficit spending in the years ahead. With normal projected growth in the next few years, the Federal deficit will account for only 1.7 percent of the gross national product. That'll be a considerable improvement. For example, the percent of the gross national product that was consumed by the deficit in 1976 was more than double that -- 4 percent.

What I'm saying is that the decline in inflation and the increase in personal savings are two early signs of recovery, signs that have strong implications for the future. And this is going to help us control our deficits and trigger the increase in business investment and credit markets that we all want to see.

I think there are other positive developments that are slowly taking place today in government and in the economy -- developments that result from the sweeping but subtle changes we brought about in the last year. For example, the changes we've recently seen in industrial production and housing starts support our assertion that we're on the verge of a turning point in the economy.

I think that you as business men and women know what this regulatory cutback is eventually going to mean to you in savings from paperwork, litigation, and labor. One Ohio businessman wrote to us in this spirit and mentioned his personal frustrations with burdensome regulations. He cited an item from the Toledo area Small Business Association bulletin. Now, actually, when I saw it, I recognized that I had first seen it a number of years ago.

Well, I thought you'd like to know we've had our researchers working around the clock to find that cabbage regulation. [Laughter] Possibly, the story is more folklore than fact. But whichever, I think it's one case where a bit of folklore can convey a lot of wisdom.

Although the voters believe by overwhelming margins that this is one of the most serious problems in government, I noticed that whenever I talked about it in the last campaign, the eyes of many of my friends in the media would glaze over and they'd stop taking notes, maybe because I said it so often. But I've figured out a way to interest the press corps in the waste and fraud story.

One government agency, the General Services Administration, we talked about in the campaign had been racked by scandal. It had estimated losses of more than $160 million, just due to waste and fraud. GSA, now, is the agency that buys the Federal Government's supplies and acts as its landlord. Some were calling it the worst-run agency in the government. It actually had a history of dismissing or demoting whistleblowers who tried to expose the waste and the wrongdoing.

But our campaign against waste and fraud goes far beyond just one Federal agency. For the first time, we have the Inspectors General from all the Federal agencies working closely together in a council on integrity and efficiency.

One of the most innovative techniques developed by this group is a new computer matching program. We've already found more than $64 million in social security in this way and black lung disability payments that were highly questionable. They were going to people who were dead -- some of them for as long as 7 years.

Manhattan District Attorney's office to the Kennedy Justice Department. His audits have found serious fraud and waste in CETA and other Labor Department programs. His recent drive against fraud and abuse in the Federal Employee Disability program brought more than 50 indictments in the last year alone. And, for the first time, really, Tom McBride is moving ahead with a program that will employ the rarely used powers of Federal statutes like the Rico Act to fight organized crime and infiltration into legitimate unions.

So there they are: a small businessman from New Hampshire, a young FBI agent from Chicago, a dedicated prosecutor who got his start in a Democratic administration. These are the kind of appointments that have broken the bureaucratic mold in Washington. But over the long run, these men and others like them are going to make a difference in the cost of government and the kind of government.

Now, this is part of the message that I hope you'll take away with you this afternoon: that after a little more than a year, this administration has made important changes in Washington that are going to bring about economic recovery, make government more efficient and responsive, and make it a servant of the people, not the other way around.

You know, for a long time my party has borne the unfair burden of being portrayed as the party of bookkeepers, bankers, and the bottom line. But I think Americans are beginning to see us maybe as the party of growth, expansion, and opportunity. But let it be understood: This administration wants to achieve economic growth by reducing government intrusions in order to expand human freedom, value individual excellence, and make the American dream a reality for all our citizens.

I was pleased the other day to read that one scholar at the Hudson Institute noted that mankind also had undergone enormous changes for the better in the past two centuries, changes that aren't always so readily noticed or written about. He said that ``Up until 200 years ago, there were relatively few people in the world. All human societies were poor. Disease and early death dominated most people's lives. People were ignorant, and largely at the mercy of forces of nature.

Well, we do live today as that scholar suggested, in the middle of one of the most important and dramatic periods in human history -- one in which America can serve as the catalyst for an era of unimagined human freedom and dignity. I think we're ready to assume that responsibility.

Few generations in all of history have ever been called upon to preside as ours has over a great period of transition -- a single generation that went virtually from the horse and buggy to landing a man on the Moon. And there are great and greater days ahead.

American agriculture has achieved a record of productivity unmatched by any other food and fiber system on earth. In 1820, a farmer in this country produced enough food to feed himself and three other persons. By 1940, that same farmer was feeding himself and eleven other people. Today a single American farmer is capable of satisfying the food requirements of seventy-seven individuals -- a sevenfold increase in the course of forty years. This quantum leap in the productivity of our agricultural community makes it possible for the United States to respond to the demands of a burgeoning international population without imposing unnecessarily high food prices on American consumers.

The contributions of this nation's agricultural sector are not limited to its capacity to produce a plentiful supply of food. Once agricultural commodities leave the farmgate, they generate economic activity which creates job opportunities for 19 million nonfarm workers. The success of our farmers in marketing their production abroad has enabled this nation to sharply reduce its balance of trade deficit and to pay for its energy imports. Our farmers are the critical link in a food production chain that consistently yields the most wholesome and varied range of foodstuffs known to man. In addition, the farm community enhances our quality of life by helping preserve the family and the individual as meaningful components of modern American society.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 18th day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

In fact, it proved impossible to secure U.N. action. As a result, Egypt and Israel, with the participation of the United States, entered into negotiations for the creation of an alternative multinational force and observers. These negotiations resulted in the signing on August 3, 1981 by Egypt and Israel of a Protocol for that purpose. The Protocol established the MFO and provided in effect that the MFO would have the same functions and responsibilities as those provided in the 1979 Treaty for the planned U.N. force. Included are: the operation of checkpoints, reconnaissance patrols, and observation posts; verification of the implementation of Annex I of the Peace Treaty; and ensuring freedom of navigation through the Strait of Tiran in accordance with Article V of the Peace Treaty. By means of an exchange of letters with Egypt and Israel dated August 3, 1981, the United States agreed, subject to Congressional authorization and appropriations, to contribute an infantry battalion, a logistics support unit and civilian observers to the MFO, as well as a specified portion of the annual costs of the MFO. The U.S. military personnel to be contributed comprise less than half of the anticipated total MFO military complement of approximately 2,500 personnel.

Congress affirmed that it considered the establishment of the MFO to be an essential stage in the development of a comprehensive settlement in the Middle East. The President was authorized to assign, under such terms and conditions as he might determine, members of the United States Armed Forces to participate in the MFO, provided that these personnel perform only the functions and responsibilities specified in the 1979 Treaty and the 1981 Protocol, and that their number not exceed 1,200 at any one time.

Armed Forces will become involved in hostilities. Egypt and Israel are at peace, and we expect them to remain at peace. No hostilities are occurring in the area and we have no expectation of hostilities. MFO forces will carry combat equipment appropriate for their peacekeeping missions, to meet the expectations of the parties as reflected in the 1981 Protocol and related documents, and as a prudent precaution for the safety of MFO personnel.

While I am sympathetic to the assertion that this bill responds to an understandable concern that our nation must prepare against the possible disruption of energy supplies, this legislation grew from an assumption, which has been demonstrated to be invalid, that giving the Federal Government the power to allocate and set prices will result in an equitable and orderly response to a supply interruption. We can all still recall that sincere efforts to allow bureaucratic allocation of fuel supplies actually harmed our citizens and economy, adding to inequity and turmoil.

Today I have ample powers to take the steps necessary to protect national security, meet our treaty obligations and assure essential public health and safety functions. The supplies in the Strategic Petroleum Reserve and significant production in the National Petroleum Reserve also ensure that petroleum for truly essential needs will be available. What I do not have, do not want and do not need is general power to reimpose on all Americans another web of price controls and mandatory allocations.

We must recognize that an interruption of a significant portion of foreign energy supplies, whether because of armed strife, human choice or natural disaster, will involve real costs to the United States and the world. Proper preparation beforehand, and free trade among our citizens afterward, can mitigate these costs, but no magic federal plan can simply make them go away.

Controls can only shift losses from one set of Americans to others, with vast dislocation and loss of efficiency along the way. This was very amply demonstrated during the supply interruptions of 1973 - 74 and 1978 - 79. Those interruptions precipitated much higher oil prices, but they did not cause gas lines and shortages. It took government to do that.

The bill could be counterproductive to our preparedness efforts. In the event of a supply interruption, the best protection will be stockpiling and plans for switching to less costly ways to achieve our goals. This bill would discourage self-protective measures, because it tells the public that those measures will be nullified by government allocations and controls or that such measures are unnecessary because the government will guarantee them low-priced energy in the event of any disruption.

The current world oil situation, with declining prices and ample supplies, provides the best opportunity for future preparedness. This is why the Administration continues to add to the Strategic Petroleum Reserve as fast as permanent storage becomes available. By the end of this year we will have nearly tripled the size of the Reserve in two years. All citizens who are concerned about the possibility of shortages and higher prices in the future should use the current opportunity to prepare in ways that are appropriate to their situation.

This legislation does contain one important feature, which should be adopted immediately as a separate Act. Since 1974 the United States has participated with other countries in the International Energy Agency, in an effort to improve our effectiveness in combatting international energy problems. A coordinated response to any international oil supply disruption through the IEA requires cooperation by private American oil companies in ways that are not possible absent statutory authorization. This authorization, contained in Section 252 of the Energy Policy and Conservation Act, has been extended routinely since its enactment in 1975. The most recent extension expires on April 1st of this year. This authority should again be extended, and H.R.

The Afghan New Year, which begins today, dawns on a nation in turmoil. The traditional celebration on March 21, 1982, will be stifled by the stark reality of the suffering of a people under occupation or in exile from the intolerable conditions in their homeland. The year ahead appears to offer the prospect of a continuing bitter struggle and even wider devastation, rather than the blessings of peace and prosperity, which are the natural right of the Afghan people. Our heart goes out to the Afghan people in these terrible times.

We cannot accept the transparent Soviet rationale for their invasion of Afghanistan, namely, that they were invited in by the Afghan Government. How can the Soviets explain the mysterious death of the President who supposedly invited them in and his replacement by a Soviet nominee who had conveniently been living in Eastern Europe? Nor can we accept the Soviet claim that the cause of the conflict in Afghanistan is external interference on the part of powers other than the Soviet Union itself. There has, indeed, been external interference in Afghanistan. But that interference has been committed by the Soviet Union itself, which, utterly without provocation, invaded that free and nonaligned nation and imposed its will on an independent people.

Nevertheless, let me make clear that, to the extent that legitimate Soviet security interests may be engaged along the Soviet border with Afghanistan, we are confident that these interests can be adequately protected through negotiated understandings. Virtually the entire community of nations is already on record as supporting the concept of a return to the previous status quo, in which Afghanistan was a nonaligned nation threatening no one.

The war against Soviet aggression is a hard and lonely struggle. It is waged in remote mountain valleys far from the reach of international media. We want to penetrate that wall of silence with the powerful Voice of America. Therefore, I have decided the Voice will begin broadcasting as soon as possible in Pushtu, complementing the broadcasting we are already doing in Dari. The brave men and women most directly involved in the fighting need to know we are with them. We will now be communicating with them in the two major languages of Afghanistan.

On this solemn occasion, I would like to appeal directly to President Brezhnev to join with us and other like-minded nations in a genuine and intensive search for a peaceful resolution of the tragic conflict in Afghanistan. A sensible and creative proposal was put forward last year by the European Community for a two-stage international conference on Afghanistan. Obviously, the principal purpose of such a conference -- or of any realistic negotiations -- would be to engage the Soviet Union in a serious discussion of a settlement involving the prompt withdrawal of their occupation force from Afghanistan. For this reason, we and others were particularly disappointed that the Soviet Union rejected this proposal. Today I call on Mr.

The tragedy of Afghanistan must not be allowed to drag on endlessly. This conflict imperils the stability of the region. It has seriously poisoned the international environment. Afghanistan itself is being brutalized. The suffering of the Afghan people is immense. I earnestly hope that the Soviet Union will join with us in an urgent effort to bring a swift withdrawal of its forces to end this needless conflict.

States Government's international activities in the field of science and technology. As a supplement to this report, the Department of State, in collaboration with interested departments and agencies, has prepared the attached study which contains a more detailed description and analysis of the Government's international non-military scientific and technological activities.

Nobel prizes compared to 28 from all other countries combined. The magnitude, quality, and diversity of our R & D resources will continue to make cooperation with the United States in science and technology at individual, institutional, and governmental levels highly attractive to other nations.

Nor do we hold a monopoly on the world's supply of scientific talent. The industrialized democracies of Western Europe, Canada, and Japan have established strong national programs in science and technology. Several other countries, such as Mexico, Brazil, South Korea, the People's Republic of China, and Israel have built their own capabilities for carrying out scientific and technological activities in selected areas of special concern to them. Thus, just as the United States can profit from and be stimulated by vigorous international competition in science and technology, we can also profit through international cooperation, which extends and complements our own efforts and helps us achieve our national objectives.

Federal Government acting, at most, as a catalyst. An important aspect of this Administration's science policy is to encourage such private sector cooperation. American universities have made tremendous contributions to the development of science abroad. International collaboration among industrial firms in areas such as transportation, industrial utilization of space, communications, and energy production can serve important national interests as well as the interests of the firms involved.

Almost every technical agency in the United States Government carries out programs with important international components. Many of the problems with which these agencies deal -- such as health, environmental protection, and agricultural production -- do not recognize international boundaries. They are world-wide in scope and impact. Governments everywhere invest precious resources in basic and applied research to tackle these problems. Our agencies constantly seek out and are sought out by the best foreign scientists and institutions for collaborative work in areas of common interest. In doing so we build stronger relationships with our partners abroad and help develop common approaches to common problems.

Columbia were among our Nation's proudest achievements. But let us remember that many of our friends abroad made substantial contributions to the Shuttle program. Canada provided the remote manipulator system, the ``Canadarm,'' first used on Columbia's second flight, at the cost of $100 million. In December our European Space Agency (ESA) partners presented the first Spacelab module to the United States. This billion dollar facility is scheduled to fly aboard the Shuttle in 1983. It will enable American and European scientists to carry out astronomical investigations of the sun and distant parts of the universe, and to perform the most ambitious experiments ever attempted in space's zero-gravity environment.

Since NASA's inception, this country's civilian space programs have been open to foreign participation. Almost all of NASA's programs have an international element, and many of them, like Shuttle, have a very large foreign component. The Federal Republic of Germany's contribution to the Galileo mission to Jupiter will total approximately $100 million, and ESA's contribution to development of the Space Telescope will total almost $130 million. Both we and our foreign partners clearly benefit from such collaboration on large-scale, high-cost programs.

The same is true in many other fields. It is especially true today when fiscal restraint in our agencies' programs is required if we are to restore our Nation's economic health. Since many other nations face similar economic difficulties, it is becoming increasingly important that we all reach beyond our borders to form partnerships in research enterprises. There are areas of science, such as high energy physics and fusion research, where the cost of the next generation of facilities will be so high that international collaboration among the western industrialized nations may become a necessity. We welcome opportunities to explore with other nations the sharing of the high costs of modern scientific facilities.

We must also work with our partners for less duplication of scientific facilities. Our scientists will travel abroad to make use of unique facilities there just as foreign scientists will come to the U.S. to work in our laboratories.

Canada, and Japan. It is to these countries that our government agencies most frequently turn for partners for the simple reason that their capabilities are generally closest to our own. But several other countries, such as Mexico, China, South Korea, Brazil, and Israel, have made impressive strides in developing their own capabilities in science and technology, and they have in selected areas become attractive partners for our government agencies.

In this past year, special emphasis has been placed on the development of our scientific and technological relations with Mexico and the People's Republic of China. Our programs with both of these countries are models of the positive contribution which mutually beneficial scientific cooperation can make to our overall relations with other countries. Both Mexico and China have recognized the importance of building their own scientific institutions. These countries deal with us as equals in areas such as arid lands management and earthquake prediction. I look for cooperation between the United States and these and other rapidly developing countries to expand as their capabilities grow.

Soviet Union. Potentially, American scientific collaboration with the Soviet Union could be highly beneficial to the entire world. It is easy to imagine the problems which might be solved by the cooperative efforts of the two largest scientific establishments in the world, and indeed, it was that vision which prompted President Nixon to launch the cooperative scientific and technological program with the Soviet Union a decade ago.

As a result of all this, many American scientists began independently and personally to boycott the bilateral exchanges with the Soviet Union, and the potential for scientific cooperation with the Soviet Union was diminished even before the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan. That event led to an official curtailment of the level of cooperative activity under the eleven bilateral technical agreements to a small fraction of the pre-invasion level. Following the Soviet involvement in the tragic repression in Poland, I announced on December 29, 1981, that three of our bilateral scientific and technical agreements which come up for renewal in the next six months would not be renewed. Furthermore, I requested a complete review of all other exchanges with the Soviet Union. That review is currently under way. Future cooperation with the Soviet Union depends on the steps they take to comply with recognized norms of peaceful intercourse among nations.

I have dealt so far with those international scientific and technological activities which we undertake as a means of extending our own resources for solving the problems we share with others. We also recognize that science and technology should play a central role in our assistance to developing nations.

This Administration intends to emphasize the role of science and technology in our bilateral development assistance programs, particularly in the areas of food and energy. Increasing food production in developing countries is critically important. We have always made food and agriculture an important emphasis of our aid programs. In addition to direct food aid we have underwritten successful agricultural research abroad, welcomed thousands of foreign students to our finest institutions, and helped make available throughout the world discoveries of the high-yielding seed varieties of the Green Revolution.

At Cancun I proposed that task forces be sent to developing countries to assist them in finding new agricultural techniques and transmitting to farmers techniques now in existence. It is expected that such task forces, whose expertise has been tailored to address the specific areas identified by the host governments, will visit several countries in 1982. Peru has already been selected as the first country to receive a task force.

Our energy bilateral aid program will stress technical assistance rather than resource transfers. We will support intensified energy training programs for technicians from developing countries, and efforts to help developing countries more efficiently utilize their resources.

The United States absorbs about one-half of all manufactured goods exported by the non-OPEC developing countries to the industrialized world. Our companies have been at the forefront in establishing manufacturing capabilities in the developing countries. Thus, we will work with developing countries to improve the climate for private investment and for the transfer of technology that comes with such investment.

We are also looking to build a stronger, long-term relationship between our universities and the developing countries. The Agency for International Development (AID) is experimenting with several new mechanisms for assuring greater continuity in the involvement of American universities and their scientific talent in development assistance programs. Additionally, more than 150,000 foreign students are enrolled at present in science, mathematics, and engineering programs in American universities. When these foreign students return to their native lands they maintain ties with American institutions, and this becomes a continuing channel for the development of the indigenous scientific and technological capacities of the developing countries.

The Department of State plays a central role in ensuring that international scientific activities are consistent with our foreign policy objectives. Over the past year, the Department of State has continued its efforts to upgrade the scientific and technical skills of its officers.

To carry out the commitment to greater emphasis on science and technology in our development assistance program, AID has, over the past year, reorganized and strengthened its science and technology capabilities, and placed a high priority on the effective use of these in planning and implementing its programs. AID established a new Bureau for Science and Technology charged with providing leadership in this area. A new Science Advisor to the Administrator of AID was appointed and a competitive research grants program was started by his office.

I believe that the health of the American science and technology enterprise is essential to meeting our principal objectives: sustained economic recovery, enhanced national security, and improved quality of life for our people. The same is true for our friends abroad. International scientific and technical cooperation can help both us and our friends to reach our respective national goals. We intend to continue our participation in international research and development programs on the basis of mutual benefit and mutual interest, and to identify the most fruitful areas for cooperation.

One of the most important places where rapid changes are occurring, of course, is right here in the United States. During most of the 1970's, oil production here in the United States was falling steadily while domestic energy prices were rising, and our reliance upon foreign energy sources was increasing at a dangerous clip.

States has increased, prices for consumers have dropped somewhat, and the reliance upon OPEC has also diminished. Many point to the onset of recession as the primary cause of these changing conditions in the United States. Clearly, the deterioration of our domestic economy has played some role. It is clear, however, that deeper and more significant forces are at work in the energy field -- forces that should continue at work after the economy begins its recovery. Oil use has declined far faster in the last few months than the recent recession alone would have indicated.

First, that the forces of a free marketplace are now having a positive impact upon America's energy outlook. The substantial increases we are now seeing in the search for domestic oil and in the achievement of greater energy efficiency both illustrate the power of market incentives.

We now have enough oil in our strategic petroleum reserve to replace all direct Arab OPEC imports for 140 days. Moreover, our degree of dependence upon foreign oil is declining: In recent weeks, oil imports have accounted for less than 30 percent of our consumption -- the lowest level since 1971. At long last, we are weakening the OPEC hammerlock.

Now let me sound a cautionary note. Just because we have improved our situation does not mean we have solved it. The oil crisis of the past is obviously not over. As Secretary Jim Edwards has said, ``We have to realize that the difference between a glut -- a word we really shouldn't use -- and a shortage is a matter of only a few million barrels of oil a day. We're not as secure as some people think.'' He points out that we still rely upon the Middle East for 41 percent of our oil imports. Here at home, the cost of energy will probably continue to rise because the cost of finding it will rise. Whatever happens in the short-term on oil, we must also continue the transition to an era of fission, fusion, coal, and renewable resources.

Jack, [Secretary of Agriculture John R. Block] thank you very much. And thank all of you very much, and welcome to the White House. It isn't really, technically that -- I know there's a street in between -- but this is part of that same shop over there, too. We're delighted to have you for these briefings, and I've been looking forward to meeting you personally.

Thomas Jefferson who said that farmers are God's chosen people, but nowadays they must be asking, chosen for what? I've always thought that when we Americans get up in the morning and see bacon and eggs and toast and milk on the table, we should give thanks that American farmers are survivors. They're the real miracle workers of the modern world. They're keepers of an incredible system based on faith, freedom, and hard work that feeds us and sustains millions of the world's hungry as well.

I'm told that in 1820 a farmworker produced enough food products for himself and 3 other people. By 1920 he produced enough for 8 people, and now the number that he feeds has risen to 77. Agriculture has also become one of our biggest employers -- the mealticket for millions of workers from farm suppliers, bankers, hired hands, all the way through the system to supermarket clerks.

In 1981 the $28 billion agricultural trade surplus offset almost half of our petroleum deficit. In fact, our agricultural exports account for about 40 percent of the world's total agricultural trade and one-fifth of America's merchandise export earnings. This bounty from our nation's farms has been a little too easy for us to take for granted. We've never really had nationwide food shortages.

I believe that our administration is lucky to have an Illinois farmer named Jack Block, who never lets me or any member of our Cabinet forget our farmers. Through your group, I'd like to thank the farmers of America for so strongly supporting our economic recovery program. You know, our plan is a little like farming: You prepare the ground, you plant the seeds, you tend the field and weed it, and then you hope the harvest will bring a bumper crop -- in this case, for the American economy.

As a part-time rancher myself, I share an appreciation for this system -- a chance to own your own land, to work it by the sweat of your brow, and take risks for profits. So often we forget the risks they are taking. A drought or a terrible storm is usually little more than a temporary inconvenience for city dwellers. For farmers it can mean a whole year's work and investment wiped out.

But right now many of our farmers must be wondering if the sky hasn't fallen. I know this is an extremely difficult period for them. The U.S. agriculture is in the third straight year -- the third year of an economic recession. A vicious cost-price squeeze, high interest rates, and uncertain markets have combined to erode many farmers' confidence and hopes for prosperity.

But the tragedy of what is going on right now is that much of this misery didn't have to happen. I believe the first bodyblow to agriculture fell in January 1980, when contracts for the sale of our farm products to the Soviet Union were blocked in retaliation for its invasion of Afghanistan. The impact was immediate and severe. Farm prices declined, and our entire agricultural marketing system -- elevators, barge lines, railways, millers, exporters -- was disrupted.

According to both private and government estimates, billions of dollars in output and services were lost. Thousands of jobs were lost. And taxpayers immediately had to shell out more than $2 billion to help soften the blow. Other countries didn't hesitate to increase their production and displace U.S. sales. No one knows for sure what the ultimate impact of that ill-advised embargo will be, because such actions affect trade patterns for years.

Now, it's also worth noting that the Soviets are still in Afghanistan suppressing an innocent people, who yearn to be free. And while the Soviets experienced some economic problems, that predicted cutback in their meat production never materialized as a result of our action. By increasing grain imports from other sources, by seeking out meat imports from other countries, and by expanding the use of substitute feeds, the Soviets were able to maintain their meat inventories.

On top of the Soviet embargo, farmers were hard hit by the policies of the late seventies that led to sharing [soaring] inflation and interest rates. Inflation went from 4.8 percent in 1976 to 12.4 percent in 1980. And during that period, interest rates shot all the way up from 6.5 percent to 21.5 percent. The farmer, like any other small businessman lives or dies on his ability to sustain an adequate cash flow. And when that cash flow is reduced to a trickle by high inflation and interest rates, the farmer sometimes has no option but to shut down his operation. And to all this, the recent bumper crops, we understand why the cost-price squeeze is so bad and threatens to strangle the vitality of American agriculture.

One other problem I didn't mention is that excellent weather overseas has created a large, worldwide surplus. The one exception, of course, is the Soviet Union. You know, I can hardly remember a year when Soviet harvests were not victimized by bad weather. And I've seen a lot of harvest seasons, as I'm constantly being reminded.

I've listened, asked questions, and probed for answers. I think we know what needs to be done to get agriculture back on track. And one of the first things is to make the Federal Government get its own house in order so we can reduce its claim on our national resources and end its interference with the marketplace. That's what our economic recovery program is all about. And let me say again how grateful we've been to receive the strong support of the farm community.

In our first 12 months, we've cut nearly in half the growth in Federal spending. The inflation rate has dropped to 8.9 percent, and since October 1st, it's running about 4.1 percent. Last year's drop in inflation means that an American family of four earning the median income of $24,000 had $754 more in purchasing power than if inflation had not come down.

Prime interest rates were 21.5 percent, as I said, at the end of 1980. We've got them down by 5 percentage points. They're still much too high, but if everyone stiffens their spine and does what still needs to be done on spending, we'll bring those interest rates down more.

The growth in regulations has been cut by a third. My goodness, I can remember that nest of regulations -- some years ago, a fellow running an oil station on the chosen route in the East here down to Florida and right around the Mason-Dixon line. And he had a little patch of -- triangle of ground between the -- where the driveways and the sidewalk and the street met. So, he planted a few cotton bushes in there, and then when he'd see a license plate coming in from up north, he'd give them a cotton boll off one of those bushes as a souvenir of their crossing the Mason-Dixon line. He was hailed in by the government, because he was planting cotton without an allotment.

Personal and business taxes have been reduced to stimulate savings, investment, work effort, and productivity. The provisions for accelerated depreciation will benefit many small enterprises in agriculture. The 25-percent personal rate reduction helps the small firms that pay their taxes by personal rates, not corporate rates. And this is another reason why that personal tax cut must be protected.

One of the features of our tax program that I'm most proud of addresses a special problem for farmers and family-owned businesses. It's not right that widows and children must lose just to pay Uncle Sam what generations of love and toil created. So, the estate tax exemption will increase to $600,000 by 1987, and of even greater help, there will be no estate tax for a surviving spouse, the widow or widower.

We know that the Federal Government also has an important role to play as partner to the farm community. I think the gist of that role is to help the farmer do what he can't do on his own -- promote basic research, seek out new markets, counter any unfair trade practices of our trading partners, provide a measure of protection from erratic weather and natural disasters, and create the proper environment so the forces of supply and demand can more efficiently allocate resources. We're fully committed to do this.

European Economic Community. We're challenging in the GATT the European Community's open-ended use of export subsidies on certain agricultural products where we feel they've gained an inequitable share of world trade as a result of those subsidies.

We're pressing the Japanese to remove nontariff trade barriers that prevent us from fully benefiting from our comparative advantage in agricultural production. A U.S.-Japan working party will meet in Washington the week of April 12th to discuss the GATT consistency of Japan's agricultural quotas with a view toward liberalizing those restrictions.

In the past 8 years, our stop-and-go export actions have weakened our reputation as a reputable supplier. If we're to take full advantage of our agricultural resources, we must establish a clear policy for the benefit of our farmers, those who market our crops, and those who buy our commodities at home and abroad. And for this reason, I am presenting today our long-term policy on farm exports.

The agriculture export policy of the United States will ensure three essential priorities. First, no restrictions will be imposed on the exportation of farm products because of rising domestic prices.

Farm prices go up, and farm prices go down. High prices signal market-oriented farmers to produce more, and they will if we allow them to compete freely in export markets. This is best for everyone from farmer to consumer.

Second, farm exports -- as I've already indicated -- will not be used as an instrument of foreign policy except in extreme situations and as part of a broader embargo. Agricultural commodities are fungible; that is, they're easily interchanged for the same commodity from other nations. For this reason the embargo of 1980 was almost totally ineffective, and yet it caused great economic hardship to U.S. agriculture. And we won't repeat such an action.

Third, world markets must be freed of trade barriers and unfair trade practices. We must continue to pursue this objective aggressively. World economic health will be improved and strengthened by freer agricultural trade. Our great agricultural system must be turned loose to benefit not only Americans but people throughout the entire world.

During the first year of our administration, I think we've turned an historic corner. We're ending the destructive inflation and financial disorders of the seventies. We're restoring incentives for personal enterprise. And we've begun to dismantle the regulatory straitjacket and reverse the dangerous erosion of our military strength.

Our recovery program was passed too late to avert the present painful slump brought about by past pump-priming and those 21\1/2\-percent interest rates. There's no quick fix for the economy or for our farmers. Weather will still be a major factor in determining when prices make a recovery. Some farmers will not make it through this difficult period of readjustment. But I think the vast majority will. And they're going to discover a better environment to conduct their business and realize a meaningful profit.

I am not going to turn my back on the farmers of America and undo all the good that we've begun to put in place. If we stay on course and shun retreat, we'll bring prosperity back to our farmers and to the nation's economy.

Now, I again thank you very much for coming today, and I understand that I'm getting run out of here now for another meeting. But Jack Block is going to stay with you. You might have some questions that you'd like to ask, and Jack will take care of that while I move on.

Government of the Soviet Union should cease its abuses of the basic human rights of its citizens, in particular the right to freely practice one's religion and the right to emigrate to another country.

I wholeheartedly join with the Congress in renewing our call to the Soviet Government to cease its repressive actions against those who seek the freedom to emigrate or to practice their religious or cultural traditions. These freedoms are a fundamental part of our American heritage, and their denial is a matter of the deepest concern to our government and citizenry. We urge the Soviet Union to take positive steps to ensure that its policies and practices conform with its international obligations to respect the individual rights of its citizens.

This fifty-first observance of Pan American Day invites us to celebrate the common heritage that inspires and guides our unique regional approach to problem solving through the Organization of American States.

The OAS has fostered hemispheric friendship and well-being through its peacekeeping efforts, peaceful settlement of disputes, protection of individual rights and human dignity, promotion of industry and trade, and sponsorship of meaningful cultural exchanges. Its humanitarian concerns are evident in the programs of such specialized agencies as the Inter-American Children's Institute, the Pan American Health Organization, and the Inter-American Institute for Cooperation in Agriculture.

Peace, prosperity, and freedom throughout the Americas continue to be the most deep-seated desires of the nations and peoples of this hemisphere. The OAS has symbolized these desires through a permanent system of regional inter-American cooperation. It has provided a forum where members meet freely in friendship, cooperation, and mutual respect to address common problems and differences.

During this special week, the people of the United States extend cordial greetings to their brothers and sisters throughout the hemisphere. We reaffirm our commitment to the spirit of solidarity and to the ideals and goals of the inter-American system. And we express our strong support for the Organization of American States as a strong vehicle for translating that commitment into reality.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 22nd day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

In my January 26th State of the Union address, I indicated that a new effort would be made to revitalize decaying areas that had been left out of America's economic mainstream. These areas, whose citizens have often lost hope for a better tomorrow, have failed to respond to decades of massive Federal aid programs. Clearly a new approach is needed to bring hope and opportunity to these troubled areas. And today we propose an experimental program that'll test just such an approach.

Enterprise zones offer a bold new means of invigorating economically crippled communities and improving the life of some of our most disadvantaged citizens. Rather than bureaucratic controls and regulations, a method that has failed, we seek to focus the vigor and innovation of the marketplace on these enclaves of despair. By reducing taxes, by eliminating unnecessary regulations while protecting the health, safety, and civil rights of our citizens, by improving local services, and by involving neighborhood organizations, we will begin to improve areas formerly written off as hopelessly depressed and provide jobs for those who need them the most.

In keeping with our firm belief in the principles of federalism and our confidence in the ability and integrity of government at the grassroots level, the legislation I am proposing today maximizes the options of the State and local governments. Working with these other levels of government as partners and unleashing new economic incentives for the private sector, I'm confident that we can make enterprise zones a valuable tool for spurring economic and social revival where they're most needed.

Clearly, decades of spending programs have done little more than subsidize the status quo and make wards of the government out of citizens who would rather have a job than a handout. It's time for us to find out if two of the most dynamic and constructive forces known to man -- free enterprise and the profit motive -- can be brought to play where government bureaucracy and social programs have failed.

We've received a broad range of bipartisan support for the enterprise zone concept. And I would especially like to thank these distinguished Senators and Representatives who are standing with me here today for their special contributions and leadership of the enterprise zone proposal.

The Enterprise Zone concept is based on utilizing the market to solve urban problems, relying primarily on private sector institutions. The idea is to create a productive, free market environment in economically-depressed areas by reducing taxes, regulations and other government burdens on economic activity. The removal of these burdens will create and expand economic opportunity within the zone areas, allowing private sector firms and entrepreneurs to create jobs -- particularly for disadvantaged workers -- and expand economic activity.

Enterprise Zones are based on an entirely fresh approach for promoting economic growth in the inner cities. The old approach relied on heavy government subsidies and central planning. A prime example was the Model Cities Program of the 1960's, which concentrated government programs, subsidies and regulations in specific, depressed urban areas. The Enterprise Zone approach would remove government barriers freeing individuals to create, produce and earn their own wages and profits. In its basic thrust, Enterprise Zones are the direct opposite of the Model Cities Program of the 1960's.

Enterprise Zones will not require appropriations at the Federal level, except for necessary administrative expenses. States and cities will still have the option of allocating discretionary Federal funds for their Enterprise Zones if they desire, or to appropriate additional funds of their own for such zones.

Enterprise Zones must be more than just a Federal initiative. State and local contributions to these zones will be critically important in the selection of the zones, and probably determine whether individual zones succeed or fail. In the spirit of our new policy of Federalism, State and local governments will have broad flexibility to develop the contributions to their zones most suitable to local conditions and preferences.

Third, new efforts to improve local services, including experimentation with private alternatives to provide those services. Eliminating inefficiencies of monopolized government services and increasing reliance on the private sector are key parts of the overall Enterprise Zone theme.

Finally, involvement in the program by neighborhood organizations. These organizations can contribute much to the improvement of Enterprise Zone neighborhoods. They can also help to ensure that local residents participate in the economic success of the zones.

The initial designation and establishment of each zone will depend on local leadership and initiative. To obtain the Federal incentives for Enterprise Zones, State and local governments must first nominate the zones within the eligible areas as defined by the Federal legislation.

These areas will include all areas in UDAG-eligible jurisdictions which have recently experienced significant unemployment, poverty or population loss. Based on these criteria, there will be more than 2,000 cities, rural areas and Indian reservations with Enterprise Zone eligible areas.

The Secretary of HUD will be authorized to designate up to 25 zones in each of three years for the application of the Federal incentives. The actual numbers designated will depend on the number and quality of the applications.

The Enterprise Zone program is, thus, a potential source of economic assistance to distressed areas of all types, shapes and sizes, all across the country. Rural areas as well as large urban areas will be eligible to become Enterprise Zones.

Federal designation of nominated zones will not be automatic or routine. Rather, the Secretary will evaluate the various applications on a competitive basis, choosing the best applications for the limited number of Federal designations available each year. A key criterion in this competitive process will be the nature and strength of the State and local incentives to be contributed to the zones, consistent with the overall Enterprise Zone theme of creating an open market environment by removing government burdens. Other important factors will also be considered.

In evaluating State and local contribution packages, the Federal Government will be highly flexible. For example, the Secretary of HUD will not insist upon any particular item of tax or regulatory relief. A weakness of incentives in one area, such as tax relief, could be offset by greater strength in another area, such as regulatory relief. It should be remembered, however, that the incentive packages will be competitively evaluated against each other.

Each Enterprise Zone will last for the period chosen by the nominating State and local governments. The Federal incentives will apply to an approved zone for this entire period, up to a maximum of 20 years plus a 4-year, phase-out period.

The Federal tax reductions applying to Enterprise Zones will be substantial. They will include reductions for employers, employees, entrepreneurs and investors. They will include incentives for capital investment, for hiring workers, particularly disadvantaged workers, for increasing work effort, and for starting and building up new businesses. They will include reductions in corporate income taxes, individual income taxes and capital gains taxes.

The Treasury Department estimates that with this tax package the designation of 10 to 25 zones in the first year of the program will result in $124 - $310 million in lost Federal tax revenues for that year. The cost of the program will increase in future years as additional zones are designated and as zone activity increases.

Title III of the Act describes the Federal regulatory relief to apply within Enterprise Zones. Under these provisions, State and local governments will be authorized to request relief for their approved zones from any Federal regulation, unless it would directly violate a requirement imposed by statute. Federal regulatory bodies will be authorized to weigh these requests under Congressionally-mandated standards, and to relax these regulations when it is in the public interest to do so, given the goals of the Enterprise Zone program.

This special authority would expressly not apply, however, to any regulations to carry out a statute or Executive Order designed to protect any person against discrimination because of race, color, religion, sex, martial status, national origin, age or handicap. It would also expressly not cover any regulation whose relaxation would likely present a significant risk to the public safety, including environmental pollution. The minimum wage law would not be covered by this authority because it is specifically imposed and spelled out by statute.

These contributions can be from each of the four basic categories noted earlier: tax relief; regulatory relief; improved local services; and neighborhood organizations. More traditional urban efforts, such as job training, minority business assistance or infrastructure grants, can also be contributed to the zone.

Consistent with the Administration's policy of Federalism, the Federal Government will not dictate to State and local governments what they must contribute to the zones. The program is designed for creative and innovative experiments by State and local governments within the zone areas. The program retains the flexibility for these governments to tailor their contributions to suit local needs and preferences.

Even the cost of State and local tax relief should be modest because of the weak economic activity currently existing in potential Enterprise Zone areas. If the program is successful in stimulating new economic activity, these losses will be substantially offset by increased revenues from the new activity, State and local expenditures would be reduced as individuals who formerly received government aid are employed in the zone.

The legislation we advance today is based on the pathbreaking work of many Members from both sides of the aisle who offered Enterprise Zone bills in prior sessions of Congress. We commend these efforts and anticipate that these innovative individuals will work for early, bipartisan passage of this legislation.

More than government expenditures and subsidies, residents of economically-depressed areas need opportunities. This is the focus of the Enterprise Zone program. The program will identify and remove government barriers to entrepreneurs who can create jobs and economic growth. It will spark the latent talents and abilities already in existence in our Nation's most depressed areas.

Director, Office of Cabinet Affairs, and Staff Assistant to the President. His duties have included managing issues through the Cabinet and Cabinet Council systems and providing a point of contact between the White House and offices of the Cabinet members.

Henry, [Dr. Henry A. Kissinger, former Secretary of State] I thank you very much for such an eloquent presentation of this cherished award. It is a deep personal honor to be the fourth President and the thirtieth American to receive the Charles Evans Hughes Gold Medal of the National Conference of Christians and Jews.

For more than half a century now, the Conference itself has lived up to that ideal, striving with courage, dedication, and humanity to promote the ideals of brotherhood and tolerance that our nation was founded upon.

But for Brotherhood Week to take on its fullest meaning, it must live the year-round in the heart of every citizen. This has always been the American ideal. And if it is one we've not always lived up to, the fact that generation after generation, century after century, Americans have sacrificed to bring the ideal closer to reality says something good about that national spirit.

Hatred, envy, and bigotry are as old as the human race itself, as too many tragic passages in the history of the world bear witness. What is new and daring and encouraging about the American experiment is that from the beginning, men and women strove mightily to undo these evils and to overcome the prejudice and injustice of the old world in the virgin soil of the new.

The way has never been easy, and even our best efforts have left us far short of utopia. But generation by generation, year by year, we've come a long way down the road to a just society. It took a bloody, tragic civil war to end the abomination of slavery. Thousands had to lay down their lives before that great evil could be undone. But it was undone, and the descendants of slave owners and slaves alike today enjoy the same standing under law as free citizens of a free republic.

The battle against discrimination still goes on, and much remains to be done. But in a single generation, an entire nation recommitted itself to the cause of equal rights and used the full force of the law to ban once and for all racial bias in public education, in hiring, and in the voting booth.

I recall tonight another important chapter in the advance of brotherhood that took place during my lifetime. It began earlier in this century, in 1928. This conference was born out of it. Maybe I shouldn't admit it, but I was already a teenager at the time; that was the year of my high school graduation.

We've come so far since then. It's hard to remember the wave of hatred and bigotry that swept the country when, for the first time, a Catholic won the Presidential nomination of one of our great national parties. But I remember, and we all should remember the gallant fight that Al Smith waged against prejudice. Even in defeat, he struck a blow for tolerance and shamed the forces of bigotry. It took another 32 years before a Catholic would be nominated again, but in 1960 John Kennedy proved that the American people had overcome the last vestiges of anti-Catholicism. It took time -- too much time -- but at last the spirit of brotherhood prevailed.

And you know, it really is. We in America have been blessed with a sacred opportunity and a sacred quest. At times it may only seem like the imperfect reflection of a perfect dream, but to all whose ancestors came here as immigrants -- whether they were non-conformist Protestants fleeing persecution in the 17th century, Irish-Catholics fleeing famine and injustice in the 19th century, Jews fleeing pogroms at the turn of the century, or the Asian boat people and Soviet dissidents of today -- all came to seek a higher goal than just mere physical survival. There was, and is, an element of moral principle in our national fiber that makes a difference. Americans are brothers not because we share the same past and the same ancestry, but because we share the same ideals and the same hopes for the future.

Last week, I addressed the Alabama State Legislature in Montgomery. Only two blocks from where I spoke, a courageous American named Martin Luther King organized a struggle for racial equality that led to historic changes in our society. He walked in the footsteps of other martyred Americans of other races and other ages. He, too, was an American pilgrim. The sacrifice that Martin Luther King made brings tears of sorrow, but the good he did brings tears of gratitude and a message of hope.

The struggle goes on. To be alive and to be human is to struggle for what is right and against what is not. Our nation today is engaged in a serious and, at times, even acrimonious debate over what policies will best serve the interests of America and a troubled world.

Here at home, there are wide differences over how best to tackle the twin problems of recession and inflation. The debate continues over how best to divide the responsibilities between the Federal Government and State governments, and between the public and private sectors, in our constitutional duty to promote the general welfare.

You know, back in the New Deal days, many critics of Franklin Roosevelt accused him of trying to destroy the free enterprise system. Well, F. D. R.'s answer was simple: He wasn't out to destroy our political and economic freedom; he was out to save it at a time of severe stress that had already caused democracy to crumble and fascism and totalitarianism to rear their ugly heads in so many other countries. In America, freedom was saved, and it gave us the strength to rescue a strife-torn Western world in the 1940's and 1950's.

Well, today I'm accused by some of trying to destroy government's commitment to compassion and to the needy. Does this bother me? Yes. Like F. D. R., may I say I'm not trying to destroy what is best in our system of humane, free government; I'm doing everything I can to save it, to slow down the destructive rate of growth in taxes and spending, to prune nonessential programs so that enough resources will be left to meet the requirements of the truly needy.

Through increased funding for Medicaid and Medicare, the Federal Government will provide medical care for some 47 million aged, disabled, and needy Americans -- about 20 percent of our total population and 99 percent of those over 65.

And approximately $2.8 billion will be spent on training and employment programs providing skills for almost 1 million low-income, disadvantaged people -- 99 percent of whom will be below the age of 25 or recipients of Aid to Families with Dependent Children.

The list goes on and on, but I won't drown you with statistics. I simply want to point out that we do care and the facts prove it. Government does have a responsibility to do many of these things because our citizens -- you, the most generous people on Earth -- have so ordered.

But there's more to brotherhood than government-inspired and administered charity. In recent years, too many of us have tended to forget that government can't properly substitute for the helping hand of neighbor to neighbor. And in trying to do so, government has, to a great extent, brought on the economic distress that mires us down in recession.

Out of this economic distress, however, can come opportunity -- the opportunity to remember our heritage of brotherhood, our responsibility to care for each other not through impersonal government programs alone but through the giving of ourselves with love and compassion.

For this reason, I have asked William Verity, head of Armco, to head up a nationwide effort to recall to all of us our capacity for great and unselfish deeds. You in this organization are proof that that spirit still lives in America.

There on a muddy dike, which was just barely inches above the flood crest, hundreds of young people -- some hardly in their teens -- all lined up, passing heavy sandbags to raise the level of the dike. They were volunteers from all over the area who had seen what was happening on television. Evening was coming on, and they had been at this since early morning, but they showed no sign of stopping.

I wasn't exactly properly dressed for the occasion, but I couldn't resist getting in line and joining them for the little time I was there. Now, a roster of their names would probably reveal a variety of ethnic backgrounds. As would be true of any group of Americans, they included different races and religions, I know -- but who asked? And the line was coeducational -- girls and boys. Looking at their fresh, wholesome and, yes, happy, enthusiastic faces, even though they'd been there since early morning, I was looking at the future of America and, believe me, the future looked mighty good.

This story has a happy ending. Before the crisis passed -- for once the weatherman wasn't completely correct -- there were 30,000 people of all ages, inspired by them, piling more than a million sandbags on those battered old dikes. And now the flood waters are receding, and the people are being able to go back and start the clean-up of their homes.

The spirit of brotherhood which you exemplify doesn't stop at our own borders. In the field of foreign policy, right now there are differences of opinion about how best to restore America's power and status in the world, and how best to meet the threat of totalitarian aggression. And there's disagreement over how best to deal with volatile, challenging problems in Latin America and the Middle East.

But while we may disagree over tactics in all these areas, we stand united as Americans in our underlying commitment to basic principles -- economic stability and growth at home, peace, freedom, and a better life for peoples everywhere. Those of us who've been selected by the American people to serve in government have the bottom-line responsibility to put these principles into practice -- to foster an economic recovery program at home and a national security policy that will give America the strength we need to survive in a dangerous world and to stand by our friends on the frontlines of freedom.

In the Middle East, in particular, a strong, credible America remains the best guarantor of Israel's integrity and survival as a free nation. A strong, credible America is also an indispensable incentive for a peaceful resolution of differences between Israel and her neighbors. America has never flinched from its commitment to the State of Israel -- a commitment which remains unshakable.

But for our commitment to be taken seriously, American strength and American integrity must also be taken seriously -- by friends and potential foes alike. Restoring both our strength and our credibility is a major objective of this administration. It deserves the support of all those who share concern not only for our own country's security, but also for the security of our friends and allies.

I am keenly aware of the costs of our defense program and will in the weeks and months and years ahead seek true savings and efficiencies. But we must refute the misguided belief that our defense program can be arbitrarily reduced and still guarantee our national security.

The Soviet Union has built up a military machine unequaled in all man's history, and that arms buildup gives every indication of continuing. When I took office, the Soviet quest for military supremacy, combined with our own unwillingness to maintain American defenses, had produced a very dangerous momentum in their favor.

We cannot allow that momentous -- or ominous, I should say, momentum to continue if we want to survive. The hopes of all Americans for a better life, for more opportunity, for better futures for our children, can only be realized if we're safe and free.

Though not small, the cost of our program represents an historically reasonable share of our resources, must be devoted to this, and is far less than a potential disaster a weakened America could face at the hands of a ruthless, powerful foe.

And so I say, just as those outside this hall who spoke with such passionate conviction earlier this evening {The President was referring to demonstrators outside the hotel.] that, yes, there will at times be disagreement over the path that we should take. But can't such a dialog be carried on with decency and understanding, without a tone of hatred? Our ability to carry on a dialog, a debate, has always been the pillar of our strength in this land. And even as we disagree, we can remain as one in seeking a common destiny -- a society that is just and humane and free.

Christian or Moslem, northerner or southerner -- has a full right and obligation to participate in shaping these policies and the programs designed to implement them. Our national dialog should reflect the rich diversity of our free, pluralist society, and that diversity should be one of our greatest prides.

In the final analysis, under the Constitution, the President and the Congress must determine national policy and the national interest. But every citizen and every citizens' group is guaranteed the right to speak out, and must be encouraged to do so without fear of reprisal or defamation.

In the office I hold, and as a recipient of this award, I pledge to you that I will continue to do everything in my power to enhance and protect the freedoms we cherish as a pluralist society. The rights of all our citizens are sacred -- in the eyes of God and under the Constitution of the United States. It's the Federal Government's responsibility to protect those rights for each and every citizen wherever that citizen may be, at the point of bayonet if necessary.

In one of the most poignant entries in her diary -- and in a far more tragic context than anything we face today -- Anne Frank wrote on July 15th, 1944, ``In spite of everything, I still believe that people are really good at heart.'' To those who see only the problems and shortcomings of American society, I say: In spite of everything, our land and people are not only good but strong of heart.

Already, we've made this cherished land the last best hope of mankind. It's up to us, in our generation, to carry on the hallowed task. It is up to us, however we may disagree on policies, to work together for progress and humanity so that our grandchildren, when they look back on us, can truly say that we not only preserved the flame of freedom, but cast its warmth and light further than those who came before us.

Prior to the dinner and presentation ceremony, the President and Mrs. Reagan attended a reception for head table guests in the Trianon Room at the hotel. Following his remarks, the President returned to Washington, D.C.

Q.  --  -- nonetheless, we're not taking it as the ultimate in quick fix. If the questions are blunt, it's because we'd like to be very serious with you, and we'd like to take back some good messages for our readers about what's going on, the problems that you're facing, and some of the anxieties that they've both got.

The President [Laughing]. Well, if he continues the pattern that he held here with regard to balancing budgets and so forth, yes. The jobs aren't that dissimilar, although he might find a whole legislature a little bit more to handle than just a city council. But he's -- after all, he was a Member of Congress, and so he knows his way around there, too.

The President. Well, I tell you, though, it's amazing what we learned there. It worked, because when it was created was at the low spot, right after 1964. And we had torn the party wide open in California. I don't think it was more divided any place in the country than it was after the bitter '64 election. And that simple thing, the Eleventh Commandment, took hold, and organizations like the Women's Federated -- the Republican clubs, they adopted statewide and just simply said they would not support any Republican winner after the primary who had not observed in the primary the Eleventh Commandment. And '66, a united party elected almost all the constitutional officers -- the Governor -- that was when I ran. And it just -- it did the job.

Q. Yes. Thank you. If I could talk about the economy -- you know, I don't think there's any question that the budget cuts are going to have a pretty dramatic effect on the life of the average New Yorker. And what we'd like to know is how we can tell our readers how to face this. I mean, are we going to tell them that we're biting the bullet now in order to make things good, or do we have to accept the fact that the life of wine and roses is over? I mean that's the kind of question strap-hangers ask us every day.

The President.  --  -- our national reductions. They're reductions in the rate of increase. The '83 budget will be bigger than the '82 budget. The '82 was bigger than the '81. The difference is that before, and when we came to office, the Federal spending was increasing 17 percent a year. And we have more than cut that in half. But it still means -- we've cut that rate of increase in half -- but it still means that there is more. Now, there are certain individual programs that have been cut simply because we found that -- mismanagement or they were ineffective. I can give one example.

Food stamps: I hear the downbeat talk about things of this kind and hunger and so forth. There'll be five [The President later corrected himself to say he meant two times as many food stamps] times as many food stamps as there were in 1978. The increase is that much.

Q. That aside, with the economy the way it's going and with job training, should we be looking forward to putting our kids through college, or one kid through college and one kid through job training? Should all kids go through college, or should some kids not go through college and go to job training, maybe a carpenter or a bricklayer or someone?

The President. Well, no, I'm just talking about those who choose to go to college or try to, and those who -- there are others who have no interest in going to college and who go on in a different direction. And I don't think there ought to be any compulsion about one or the other though.

The President. No, not at all. We've been meeting -- and granted, there are different proposals and ideas, but I think all of them sincerely intended. The simple problem is we are in a kind of emergency situation. And I think we have to treat it -- and when you, a moment ago, said that, about biting the bullet and so forth, I think even though I have pointed out that as far as the really, truly needy are concerned, I think we are maintaining the safety net.

But I do believe that we've got to recognize that this recession has been the result of a number of years of practices that have led to these high interest rates. Now, today there's only one thing that causes those high interest rates, and that is that right out in the money markets themselves -- even though last month inflation was only running at a 3-percent rate, annualized rate, that we've come all the way down to that. And since October 1st, averaging it out since October 1st, it has averaged 4.1 percent. Now, that would indicate that interest rates, which are dictated by inflation -- if you're going to lend money and you know that there's an inflation rate that every year is depreciating the value of the dollar you lend, you have to get back enough in interest to offset that, plus the earnings that you want on top of that money.

If -- at a 3-percent interest rate, you could say that, or -- I mean, an inflation rate -- that interest rates should be less than 8 percent, and they're not. And one of the reasons is, having been burned over the last few decades so many times, the markets just don't believe that inflation is not going to go back up. They have seen that roller coaster effect of the money supply zooming up as it did in 1980 -- the fastest rate of increase in our history in the last 6 months of 1980. But then when they pulled the string on it, it zoomed way down below what it should be, and supply and demand -- the result was that inflation went zooming up again. And this, I think, is what the money market suspects.

The President. Well, right now you see -- you know, the battle goes on as it did the last year, and so we have submitted billions of dollars, tens of billions of dollars in cuts, and so far there's no indication that the opposition is going to accept those.

I feel that we are going to get together. We have to. But I think we also have to get together something -- in the same tone of what you said -- of: ``Look, government is the cause of this; government has to restore the balance.'' Government has to reduce the amount of money that it's taking from the people. Government has to allow the private sector -- the economy to expand, provide the jobs the people need, and that means continuing on this anti-inflationary pattern.

The President. Well, I have to believe that we're going to see a few points' drop between now and summer -- now, not as much as I'd like to see, but I think we are going to see that. And maybe then as there are increasing signs that we are bottoming out in this recession, then I think we might see more of that.

Q. Two points is very significant, if you said by summer. Even if you are wrong, say, like even by next winter -- I mean, for this particular region, two points, maybe three points. Do you really think we could do it in 6 months? Two or three points' drop, people could get homes two or three points less?

The President. Yes, I have to believe that. We've seen that one start down and that there was a little flurry and like a half a point up and a half a point here. But I think that was the beginning, and I think -- I know that I'm really basically speaking of short-term loans. What the situation will be with long-term, I think is going to depend on what we -- and by ``we'' I mean myself and the Congress, all of us -- come up with in this program, how closely they come to meeting what we've asked for with regard to reductions in spending, that sort of thing.

Q. Yes, we'd really like you to expand a bit more on how optimistic you are on the outcome of the budget struggle between yourself and Congress. I mean, this time, the number of rallying points that you have at your disposal are a good deal more limited to start with anyway than this time last year.

The President. Well, I'm still optimistic, because I know that there are well-intentioned people up there on both sides of the aisle that really are serious-minded about the welfare of the Nation. And I think when the chips are finally down that we will.

The President. Well, not -- no, there've been maybe a dozen proposals, but they didn't meet what I think are the three basics. I think that the program that we have in place is the best answer, the fundamentals of that program, for getting us back on a sound economic footing. And it calls for a reduction, of course, in government spending, a real reduction. It calls also for the national security and ensuring the national security. And it calls for the incentive tax cut program that we sponsored both in the individual and the business accelerated depreciation and so forth.

Now, I think that any program -- I think there's flexibility in there in a number of ways. If you'll remember, we discussed last year that I am willing to look at the tax structure for those places where, maybe, there are people getting unintended and undeserved tax breaks who should be -- in other words, I hate to use the term that was given birth last year and then everyone thought it was a euphemism for tax increases, but, no, when I said, ``revenue enhancements,'' well, we were talking about this thing. You know, to -- I just read as late as today that it is estimated that $95 billion is lost in tax revenues every year. Well, that's as much as they're talking about for the whole deficit. But that type of thing. Suggestions in that.

If they're -- someone will come in and if they want to discuss differences with regard to where government spending should be cut, but certainly coming back to the same goal of reducing government, my feet aren't in concrete on those things. But so far nothing has been forthcoming except some voices raised saying to me, ``Well, we don't like what you've submitted. Submit something else.'' Well, I negotiated too long for a union to believe that that's the way you do it.

The President. If it could be done practically. But we really looked at that because, yes, we were interested in that. We were interested, because I think if we'd gotten the whole package last year, if they had given us the tax cut beginning in January of 1981, 10 percent and not the 5 percent, I think very likely we could have avoided this recession. And so, I would think about that.

The President. I think they are, and we've tried to meet with leaders of various groups and organizations in the Jewish community to explain -- particularly last year over the AWACS deal -- what it was that we were trying to do. And I can assure you -- in fact, it will be in my remarks tonight -- that we remain, without qualification, pledged to the security and the support of Israel.

Here is Israel, virtually one of the smallest of the nations, outnumbered a hundred to one, basically by countries that -- other than Egypt -- have still -- well, until Saudi Arabia softened its position -- declaring that Israel does not have a right to exist as a nation. So, Israel retains a military capacity that is backbreaking for them.

The answer to Israel's security is long-time peace. The United States is dedicated -- and was before I ever got here, as witness Camp David -- to helping in this process. I think that one of the only ways we can bring this about is if we can persuade, particularly the more moderate Arab nations, to see this situation as Egypt did -- and Egypt was the one that was at war -- and to bring them into where we can sit down and they can recognize that we intend to be fair as an outsider in here trying to help.

Q. Is the thought, Mr. President, that previous to that, that the American Government was so, to coin a phrase, ``pathologically tied into Israel,'' that even the moderate Arab countries felt they were so threatened, not so much by Israel but by the so-called almighty American arm and got scared into something and doing something that they would not have normally done. And then by -- what you're saying is by balancing it, we both have a right hand and a left hand.

The President. Well, no, I don't think they were. I think that you'll find among those same moderate nations that they have much more of a concern of the threat of the Soviet Union in the Middle East. And Egypt certainly did not. Sadat did not change because of any pressure from us.

The President.  --  -- but this was all that I said to the Senators. I told them that I believe that this was the most useful step in the pursuit of peace. And many of them -- they were -- and I must say, the Senators that I talked to were most sincere in their views, even those that -- their concern was the security of Israel. And I got their votes when I was able to persuade them that it was equally my concern.

Q. Mr. President, you also sent those Senators, I think I recall correctly, and to the Congress, a letter in which you pledged that the planes would not be -- the deal wouldn't go through unless certain conditions were fulfilled, one of which was that the United States would share in the intelligence gathered and have a say in the supply of that to any third party.

The President. I thought he was very effective. And his explanation, I have to say, I second what he was saying, because this is the concept that we have. And all the evidence that we have substantiates this, that here is the middle road.

Rica, who, well -- Costa Rica was the showcase of democracy. But now, Nicaragua was a perfect example of where there was a coalition for the revolution, and against, in that case, you might say, the extreme right. But the coalition, the moderates and the leftists and so forth, got together. But once the victory was achieved, pretty soon the moderates were no longer part of the government.

The President. We showed our intention to Nicaragua at the very beginning when we renewed a grant to them. And the grant was on -- this was before they were quite as openly left -- before they'd gotten rid of some of their moderates. And we withdrew the balance of the grant when we found they'd lied, because they -- at the time of the grant, they promised us that they would not in any way intervene in Salvador.

The President. Well, we took the money away from them. But right now, you know, there is the possibility they themselves have expressed the willingness to talk. Mexico has suggested itself to intervene.

In all these places, I know it's quite a checker game, but it doesn't mean that we're interested in one and neglecting another. Right now, I think with this election coming up, Salvador -- and we didn't start that, it was there -- has been the key. And yet our aid economically is several times greater than anything we're doing with regard to military supplies to help them.

Soviet rearmament, and it's got to the point where the United States has to do its own bit of catching up to rationalize the situation and bring some balance into confronting situations. And we also have the capital of the world, the Western capital. Do you give some thought from time to time or is there any current approach to thinking in terms of the use of our main weapon in that area, of capital, of the capital which the Soviet Union, the Soviet bloc obviously wish to borrow with which (a) to buy food, and (b) of course, to buy high Western technology with which to make even a bigger quantitative leap in their rearmament program?

The President. Now, I'll be meeting with him when I get back. He just got back this weekend, and so I haven't had a report. This is what he's talking to the allies about, is the curtailing of credit to the Soviet Union, because I think they've run out of hard cash and they economically are very vulnerable right at the moment.

They've deprived their people; they've lowered their standard of living just to continue with this massive buildup. And I must say they've been tremendously successful with it. They're -- not only quantitatively but qualitatively -- militarily they have been an industrial giant. And this is one of the reasons why we can't retreat on what we're doing, because I believe we've come to the point that we must go at the matter of realistically reducing, if not totally eliminating, the nuclear weapon, the threat to the world.

And I think to do that we have to sit across the table from them with the strength that we haven't had for the last decade in which they've got a stake in maybe doing something of this kind, and particularly now in their economic situation. But before this we were unilaterally disarming. They didn't have to give in and make any deal about disarming. And I think what we're doing in Geneva reveals something about their lack of sincerity now in this whole matter, because we don't have anything there and they have 300, and we're saying we won't put anything there if you'll take your 300 away. And they so far haven't been willing to meet.

Section 1. The Director of the Office of Personnel Management shall make arrangements for such national voluntary health and welfare agencies and such other national voluntary agencies as may be appropriate to solicit contributions from Federal employees and members of the uniformed services at their places of employment or duty. These arrangements shall take the form of an annual Combined Federal Campaign in which eligible voluntary agencies are authorized to take part.

Sec. 3. In making arrangements for the Combined Federal Campaign, the Director is authorized, in his discretion, to consult with the Departments and agencies concerned, representatives of the employees and members to be solicited, and, to the extent practicable, representatives of voluntary agencies seeking to participate in a Combined Federal Campaign.

Sec. 4. The arrangements made by the Director shall (a) ensure that all contributions are voluntary, that there is no coercion, and that individuals have the option of disclosing their contribution or keeping it confidential, (b) designate the specific period during which the annual solicitation may be conducted, and (c) permit only one annual solicitation except in cases of emergency or disaster appeals for which specific provision shall be made by the Director.

Sec. 5. Subject to such rules and regulations as he shall prescribe, the Director may authorize a local principal combined fund organization to manage a local Combined Federal Campaign. Such authorization shall, if made, ensure at a minimum that the local principal combined fund organization operates subject to the direction and control of the Director and such local Federal coordinating entities as he may establish; manages the local campaign fairly and equitably; consults with and considers advice from interested parties and organizations; and publishes reports of its management of the local campaign.

Sec. 6. The forms for the solicitation of funds shall clearly specify the eligible agencies and provide a direct means to designate funds to such agencies. Where allocation of undesignated funds by the local principal combined fund organization is authorized by the Director, prominent notice of the authorization for such allocation shall be provided on the solicitation forms.

Sec. 7. This Order shall not apply to solicitations conducted by organizations composed of civilian employees or members of the uniformed services among their own members for organizational support or for the benefit of welfare funds for their members. Such solicitations shall be conducted under policies and procedures approved by the head of the Department or agency concerned.

Sec. 9. Executive Order No. 10927, as amended, is revoked. Notwithstanding that revocation, directives issued under that Order shall continue in effect until revoked or modified under the provisions of this Order.

Well, we're delighted you could all come. And I won't use that cliche from so many mystery movies -- you all know or are wondering why I asked you here. You all know. I just hope that Bill Verity and John Filer are right -- that your being here means that you're ready to make a commitment to this project. It's not only close to my heart, it's important to the future of our country. We want to rebuild America, not from the government down, but from the people up, all of us together as partners, community by community, and I'm asking you today to help us make it work.

Our system of economic freedom has provided more opportunity, more mobility, more abundance, and distributed it all more widely among our people than any time or anywhere else on Earth. Personal initiative, ingenuity, industry, and reward helped make America the envy of the world. I say ``helped,'' because always there was that extra dimension of faith, friendship, and brotherhood that made us good neighbors, good people, and made America a great country.

Americans can rally together in times of trouble. Certainly it was a terrible tragedy for many people, but at the same time you had to be inspired by what you saw. My first sight was walking up to a dike -- the water was right at the level of the top of the dike and standing on that dike, hundreds of young people who had volunteered, standing there in a line and passing those heavy sandbags to keep that dike line up above the flood crest. One of them gave me his boots, and so I took my place in the line for a little while. A young lady told me she'd been there for 3 days. They were all volunteers, girls and boys from all backgrounds, all the mix that you would find anytime, anyplace in America, of the kind of people that make up an American group. And looking at their happy and enthusiastic faces while they were doing this -- and I heard they'd been there since early morning and it was coming on evening, then, and there was no griping about what was going on -- I just looked at them, and I thought I was looking at the face of the future in America. And I can tell you, the future looked mighty good.

I know they were well-intentioned with all the social experiments, but too often their cure only led to despair and dependency for the very people that needed genuine opportunity. The era of rising savings, investment, productivity growth, and technological supremacy that we once knew somehow seemed to slip further from our grasp. Did we forget that government is the people's business, and every man, woman, and child becomes a shareholder with the first penny of tax paid? Did we forget that government must not supersede the will of the people or the responsibilities of the people in their communities? Did we forget that the function of government is not to confer happiness on us, but just to get out of the way and give us the opportunity to work out happiness for ourselves?

Now, these are not Republican or Democratic principles; they're American principles. Thirty years ago, John F. Kennedy said, ``Only by doing the work ourselves can we hope in the long run to maintain the authority of the people over the state. Every time that we try to lift a problem from our own shoulders and shift that problem to the hands of government, we are sacrificing the liberties of the people.'' Well, he was right. We must reaffirm our faith in the people and put America's future back in their hands. Now, this doesn't mean, however, that we abandon our responsibilities to those in need.

For 1983, we have proposed that 28 percent of all Federal spending go to the elderly, an average of $7,850 per individual in payments and services; that the Federal Government subsidize approximately 95 million meals per day. In percent, that's 14 percent of all the meals that are served in the United States. Almost 7 million post-secondary awards or loans will be available to students or their parents through Federal student assistance programs. Through increased funding for Medicaid and Medicare, the Federal Government will provide medical care for some 47 million aged, disabled, and needy Americans, about 20 percent of our total population and 99 percent of those who are over 65.

Approximately $2.8 billion will be spent on training and employment programs, providing skills for almost 1 million low-income, disadvantaged people, 90 percent of whom will be below the age of 25 or recipients of Federal aid to families. Spending on essential services will not go down, as some would have us believe, it'll go up.

But you know as leaders of your major national organizations that too much taxing, spending, and control from Washington leads to bigger and bigger problems. Only when the human spirit is allowed to invent and create, only when individuals are given a personal stake in deciding their destiny and benefiting from their own risks, only then can societies remain dynamic, prosperous, progressive, and free.

So we're restoring incentives for personal enterprise. We're encouraging self-reliance again. And as a complementary action, we've launched a nationwide effort to encourage citizens to join with us, find where need exists, and then to organize volunteer groups to meet those needs.

Bill Verity, Chairman of our private sector initiatives task force, is spending about 23 hours every day. He's recently retired, so he's taking it easy. [Laughter] He's doing this, trying to build partnerships between the public and private sectors in every community of America.

Already, 20 Governors have expressed an interest in forming statewide task forces and several have started putting in place their own statewide groups. Eighty to ninety community partnerships are already in existence in one form or another. And now, many new groups are being formed, thanks to the efforts of his task force.

This is a good beginning. But today, with you, we want to kick off a much greater effort. What we need now are your organizations, which do such a fine job representing individual groups at the grassroots, to step in and help us. The corporations, unions, churches, family farms, and mom-and-pop stores all across the country look to you for leadership.

We're not asking you to take over the social welfare system. What we're asking is that you give generously of your time, your know-how, and your imagination. And then we'd like to publicize your own good works, so that together, we can strengthen this system which is such a mighty engine for human progress.

I hope that we can count on your making private sector initiatives a top priority for the balance of this administration. Some of you are already taking the initiative. Let me just cite a few examples of what's being done to point out the enormous potential for good, nationwide.

National Alliance of Business. NAB is coordinating a major campaign to find jobs for youth this summer, targeting 100 cities across the country. They'll be looking to you for support. And I should warn you, this won't be the last time you hear from me about this project.

Sandy Trowbridge, president of the NAM, has requested his members to offer special help to job-training agencies, city halls, colleges, school systems, and neighborhood groups, to provide worthy social services. Sandy has stressed that there's a clear-cut relationship between stable, productive communities and the ability of companies to attract and retain skilled employees. And he's even gone ahead and printed up this brochure, which is kind of a checklist to help firms assess their community's needs and then decide how to help.

This problem is especially troubling in the black community, where too many of our black children are not acquiring the skills they will need. Led by Dr. Nathan Wright and Mrs. Leon Sullivan, black Americans are planning to mobilize over 60 major organizations and 500,000 black community volunteers to attack this problem at its root. The drive will be called the National Assault on Illiteracy program, and you can be sure that we'll be looking to help them any way we can.

Fort Wayne -- within 24 hours after they were up there on the dikes and doing that, the volunteers started, and they ended up with 30,000 volunteers who laid a million sandbags. And even with the oncoming rain, additional rain, the dikes held, and Fort Wayne people are now going back to their own homes; the waters have gone down.

I think it's significant that despite these difficult times when you would expect the average charity drive to fall short of its goal, that the United Way set a new record in last year's campaign. The dollar value of total time volunteered by Americans is now estimated at $64\1/2\ billion. One recent poll showed that 44 percent of adults who got involved in volunteer work in the last year did it because someone asked them. Isn't that really what it's all about? -- that each of us does have an obligation, a personal responsibility to give something back to this country which has given us so much? We can't all be the best, but we can each give our best, and America deserves no less.

You know that name; he's coach of the New York Rangers. But as you probably remember, he coached those young Americans of our Olympic hockey team that made us so proud at Lake Placid when they defeated that great Russian team. Coach Brooks was in the locker room with his team before they took the ice. He wanted to fill his players with confidence to play the game of their lives, and he told them, ``You're born to be a player; you are meant to be here at this time.

Well, this is your moment -- our moment, I should say, yours and mine -- our chance to correct the mistakes of the past, our chance to justify the brief time that we spent here. We're not asking you for a miracle; we're doing what needs to be done. So help us do what we know is right and help us to do what we know will work.

Now, forgive me, but I'm already late for my next appointment. And Bill Verity and John Filer will have some important business with you. So I leave it to them, and again, God bless you, and thank you very much for being here.

This year, 1982, marks the 25th anniversary of the signing of the Treaties of Rome. These documents established the European Community, then the second largest trading entity in the world and an emerging influence in international relations.

European friends to develop an integrated community.'' Every administration since then has supported that goal. We believed then, and believe now, that a united Europe would achieve economic progress, would play a more effective role in world affairs, and would be better able to join the United States in preserving world peace and security. The European Community has more than redeemed our faith in its purposes. We should not underestimate the progress made in the past quarter century. From a gleam in the eyes of Jean Monnet and others, the Community has become an irreversible and dynamic reality.

Let me reaffirm clearly the support of this administration for European unity. We consider a strong and united Europe not a rival, but a partner. As we enter the second quarter century of relations between the European Community and the United States, we face economic and political challenges as difficult as those which confronted our predecessors in 1957. However, the relationship between Western Europe and the United States has changed fundamentally. In those days the United States was the dominant partner, and Europe had a more dependent role. Now the economic weight of the two sides is more evenly balanced. The gross domestic product of the European Community is comparable to that of the United States. The United States looks to Europe today for cooperation in a spirit of full partnership commensurate with its economic and political importance.

Both Europe and the United States recognize that partnership involves responsibilities. These responsibilities apply to the economic area in particular where we both have the responsibility to avoid actions which have an adverse impact on our trading partners and to preserve our free trading system. They also extend to our common security interests, where we have the responsibility to cooperate on support for like-minded countries seeking closer Western ties, and to resist the efforts of those who do not share our values to extend their power and influence. The European Community, as well as the United States, will provide responsible leadership in these areas in the years ahead.

I have every confidence that in the coming quarter century, we will build an even more productive relationship between the European Community and the United States. As we commemorate the achievements of men like Jean Monnet, we must follow his example and those of the other giants of that generation, looking ahead with vision, courage, and optimism.

America has recently embarked upon a new path in energy -- a path that is leading us toward greater production, expanded storage, and reduced reliance upon foreign energy sources. Those who voted to sustain this veto fully understood that greater energy independence is the best preparation America can make for the future.

Among the blessings of this wonderful land are our free institutions. Americans are guaranteed freedom of speech, religion, and the press and the right to assemble and petition for the redress of grievances. Our citizens cherish their liberty and their right to be protected against the unwarranted intrusion of government. Our freedoms have been hard-won and will be preserved.

Other countries are not so fortunate. Time and time again, individuals, groups, and whole peoples have been subjected to tyrannies and deprivations. When thoughtful Americans witness the oppression, even terror, that is so prevalent in many other parts of the world, they cannot help but feel a deep and abiding appreciation for, and renewed loyalty to, our own Nation and its ideals.

Americans prize their diversity but are united in a shared allegiance to our Nation's tradition of justice and liberty for all. We have fought for these traditions in the past, and we will not permit their erosion in the future.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 24th day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

Scientific advancements in recent years have dramatically expanded the role of nurses in our health care system, and their knowledge and skills have increased to keep pace with new technologies and methods of treatments.

President Reagan. President Pertini, today all America welcomes you with an open heart. This, I understand, is your first visit to the United States. We consider it an honor to have with us a friend who has sacrificed so much for the cause of freedom.

Mr. President, Italy and the United States stand shoulder to shoulder in the defense of democratic government and human freedom. In these perilous times, both our peoples may find comfort in the partnership that has developed between our nations. The great Roman orator Cicero once said, ``Friendship makes prosperity more brilliant and lightens adversity by dividing and sharing it.'' Well, whether it be good times or bad, our two peoples have demonstrated beyond any doubt that Italy and the United States are and will be friends.

This bond is not solely due to the magnificent contributions Americans of Italian descent have made in this land. Certainly all Americans are aware of these contributions in the arts, in business and industry, and in government. They are monuments of which we are rightfully proud. Our brotherhood is one of soul as well as blood. If there had never been a migration from your country, we would still be kindred spirits because of our common ideals.

It is said that actions speak louder than words. Well, if that be true, certainly all the world has heard your message. Your country was one of the first major powers to step forward to participate in the Sinai peacekeeping force. Just as vital to peace was your willingness to provide the Alliance the means of maintaining a credible nuclear deterrent as a counterbalance to a massive Soviet buildup. And you were quick to support the oppressed peoples of Afghanistan and Poland.

These commitments to peace and freedom demonstrate that Italy is no passive ally or fair-weather friend but instead is an indispensable partner. One would expect nothing less from a people that produced men like Giuseppe Garibaldi, in whose heart burned a flame that united all of Italy.

In recent years, the Italian people have fought a grim battle against a foe every bit as threatening to freedom and independence as foreign tanks or nuclear missiles. A gang of brutal and inhuman thugs, aided and abetted by foreign powers, sought to destroy Italy's democracy by acts of sheer terror. You, Mr. President, know better than most the consequences of submitting to such gangs and what this could mean. The fight against these terrorists has been costly. Aldo Moro and many others, men and women who had much to contribute, who still had much to live for, were cut down.

It takes a special kind of strength to face such an adversary while maintaining democratic institutions. All those who love liberty have prayed for your success. Today I congratulate you and the Italian people for your fortitude. It appears that you are on your way to victory over these cowardly criminals.

Mr. President, the world is entering a new era of human history. The time commonly known as the postwar period has come to a close. Human freedom faces tremendous challenges. Its future rests upon the shoulders of the citizens of a small number of democratic nations. This heavy weight must be carried, or it will be lost for generations, as Rome with all her glory was destroyed by the barbarians and then engulfed by the Dark Ages. The preservation of freedom is not a task for the weak. We have confidence that the Italian people, rich in heritage and strong in character, like the people of the United States, will meet the historic responsibility before us.

Common Market, an agreement that has demonstrated even to the most skeptical that free and independent nations can successfully and effectively work together for mutual benefit. Today, let us, the representatives of two powerful forces, decency and freedom, agree that we will face the challenges of the future together and that in times of prosperity and adversity our friendship will stand.

United States and my great pleasure in listening to your words at the start of this my first visit to this great country are the fruit of a very deep-rooted friendship and understanding between our peoples, for it was to the American Revolution, its inherent principles, and also to the declaration of rights that the Italian looked as they brought about the unity of Italy in the Risorgimento. And it was to Rome, to Italy, and to their history that often turned the thoughts of those Americans who in Philadelphia drafted the Constitution of the United States.

Over more than two centuries, the contacts between our peoples have become extremely close in all fields. A precious blood tie has grown up between us. You number among the people of the United States that group of Italians who have proved so industrious, vigorous, and loyal. And we Italians will never forget that American soldiers have twice lost their lives for the independence and liberty of Italy and Europe during two world wars. This friendship between Italy and the United States does not, therefore, follow the dictates of cool diplomatic calculation, but instead has its roots in the fertile ground of the history of our peoples.

The conversations which myself and the Minister of Foreign Affairs, Mr. Colombo, are to have with you, Mr. President, as well as with other officials of the government and Congress of the United States, these conversations will provide an important forum for the discussion of many aspects of the Italo-American relations and common intents as proposed within the framework of the Atlantic Alliance.

Mr. President, the main reason for my presence here on American soil is, however, to bear witness to certain cherished ideals, aspirations, and values, for it was through these that the Pilgrim Fathers and those fleeing from political, religious, and racial persecution found in America the opportunity to live a peaceful, free, and civilized life.

For these same ideals, we have fought together in Europe. And for these same ideals, we much continue to struggle with tenacity and optimism within the framework of international bodies and institutions. In this way, we reaffirm to the maximum our common faith in free and freely governed peoples.

In our talks this morning, I made a point of reiterating to President Pertini the deep admiration which Americans feel for the constructive and courageous role Italy is increasingly playing on the world stage.

Our country, of course, has special reasons for appreciating that role. We applaud Italy's consistently strong support for the Atlantic Alliance. We applaud her decision to participate actively in the search for a Middle East peace. We're deeply moved by the tireless battle she is waging against the scourge of international terrorism -- a battle so recently dramatized for us with the heartlifting liberation of General Dozier by Italian security forces.

President Pertini's long and sometimes lonely fight against the evils of totalitarian oppression give him exceptional credentials as a man of integrity and resolution. He was among the first to speak out publicly against Soviet actions in Poland. For this reason, I welcome the chance to share his insights on a number of critical international issues, including the Polish crisis, the continuing Soviet occupation of Afghanistan, and our joint determination to defeat international terrorism, the situation in Central America, and the status of the peace process in the Middle East.

President Pertini [In Italian]. I am very pleased with my meeting with President Reagan, which I looked forward to for a long time and which has fully met with my expectations. I was certain that we would immediately understand one another. Our talk was characterized by that cordiality and frankness which mark the relationship between our two countries.

Even before leaving on this trip I had had the opportunity to emphasize to you members of the press how sincerely we Italians share with the other Europeans, possibly to an even greater degree, the deep appreciation for the decisive help given us by the Americans during the last two world conflicts, to defend the independence and liberty of our continent, how deeply we feel the need to keep alive the common ideals of our Western civilization -- a love of freedom, of social justice, of peace, of human rights, and therefore the reciprocal understanding between these two shores of the Atlantic.

I have also recalled how there exists between Italy and the United States still another deep bond -- as sentimental as it is real -- that of the presence in America of so many citizens of Italian origin.

All these reasons for a strong and lasting understanding, based on common ideals, have been recalled by President Reagan and me in our meeting today, a meeting which, from the very beginning has engendered between us a spontaneous flow of friendship.

We have also reviewed those political and economic issues most relevant to the current international climate, which will be discussed in depth by Secretary of State Haig and Foreign Minister Colombo. We will be able to continue our warm and fruitful exchange of ideas when President Reagan returns my visit in Rome next June.

I'm looking forward to furthering my direct contact with the dynamic American way of life, here in Washington and in my successive visits to other great cities in the United States. I will be happy to meet firsthand the generous American people, for whom I have deep admiration and who have moved me with the warmth of their welcome.

Zoos and aquariums play a major role in the cultural life of our nation, providing a wholesome recreational and educational environment for more than 125 million visitors and a living classroom for some 20 million school children each year.

Among the 200 zoos and aquariums located in the United States are some of the finest facilities in the world. Many of our zoos and aquariums have pioneered in efforts to conserve the thousands of species they house. They have also collaborated with institutions around the globe to preserve wildlife and to develop more sophisticated techniques for exhibiting animals in a natural setting.

Animals are a universal language, and they have appeal to people everywhere. By enabling us to experience animals firsthand and to learn about their habitats, zoos and aquariums have become a valuable and unique asset.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-fifth day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

In the course of continuing discussion of the United Nations ``evaluation'' of the intercommunal negotiations, the Greek Cypriot and Turkish Cypriot negotiators met on February 1, 8, 18, and 22 and March 3, 10, 17 and 22. The negotiators are examining the ideas and concepts postulated by the ``evaluation'' seeking agreement on ``points of coincidence'' among the issues under discussion between the communities. Meetings have been serious and businesslike focusing on detailed analysis of specific points.

The United Nations deserves our high praise for its rare combination of patience and energy in working to resolve the Cyprus problem. United Nations Secretary General Perez de Cuellar has repeatedly expressed his interest in working to resolve the Cyprus issue. This commitment combined with his unique background on the Cyprus problem reinforces hopes for progress.

Likewise, the Special Representative of the Secretary General on Cyprus, Ambassador Gobbi, is proceeding with remarkable diplomatic skill to promote an environment congenial to substantive negotiation.

United States to assist the United Nations in its effort to foster a just, fair and lasting settlement to the Cyprus problem. Resolution of the Cyprus problem is a priority for the United States and, as evidenced by the United Nations sponsorship of the intercommunal talks, an international priority as well. We believe that the intercommunal negotiations, as epitomized by the ongoing discussion of the United Nations ``evaluation,'' provide the best course for resolving the Cyprus dilemma.

Doubtlessly, the negotiating path will be protracted with obstacles to be overcome. With patience, energy and innovative effort, however, mutually acceptable solutions to outstanding differences are possible.

Tonight we honor a man who, had he never become President of his country, would still inspire awe from those who meet him. The overwhelming respect of his countrymen has resulted in his election by an unprecedented margin -- 832 out of 995 votes cast in the electoral assembly. This tribute was due to the recognition by all Italians of his courage and integrity, and he hasn't let his people down.

President Pertini has been second to none in upholding those principles of political freedom which bind all who love liberty. Shortly after his election, he said, ``If someone offered me, who has always been a socialist, the most radical social reform at the expense of freedom, I would refuse, because freedom must never be bartered away.'' Such commitment to freedom found in decent people of both left and right offers us all hope for a better tomorrow.

All of his life, President Pertini has tried to remain true to these ideals. As a young man, he fought the onslaught of fascism then threatening humanity. He was imprisoned for his opposition to Mussolini and later was sentenced to death by the Nazis. This kind of brutal experience turned many in those days away from democracy and toward totalitarianism. President Pertini never wavered from his democratic ideals.

As it was for many nations, the last decade was a trying time for Italy. Italy faced a sinister challenge that shook its system to the roots. Like Fascists and Nazis, Red Terrorists sought to undermine faith in democracy by demoralizing the people. The Italian people needed a symbol of strength and a symbol of courage and they found that symbol in President Pertini.

One of his first actions was to protest the trials of Soviet dissidents in Moscow. Few Western leaders have expressed such sincere moral outrage over Soviet oppression in Afghanistan and Poland. Perhaps tonight we should realize that the solidarity that unites all those devoted to freedom far transcends the limited differences between the democratic right and the democratic left.

Our earliest settlements flourished on the banks of our river systems -- our first avenues of transportation that serve us still. Following trails blazed by the pioneers traveling west, the Interstate Highways remind us of the great strides we have taken in transportation.

Completion of the transcontinental railroad in 1869 ushered in a new era of transportation. Steel tracks stretched across the country to open the west, link our seacoasts, and strengthen American commerce.

From its humble beginnings at Kitty Hawk, the U.S. aviation industry has grown to include a vast network of airports and commercial and private aircraft that fly millions of people and an ever-increasing amount of cargo.

As our cities grew, transit systems developed to provide people with affordable and convenient transportation. This century brought the automobile, truck, intercity bus, and an expanded road system that includes thousands of miles of Interstate Highways.

The American maritime industry connects the inland and coastal ports of the United States with port cities around the globe and transports U.S. agricultural, mining, and industrial products to foreign shores.

Each of these elements of our transportation system also contributes to a vital concern -- our national defense. The great capacity of our system to move supplies and to transport men and equipment in times of emergency is a cornerstone of our defense. It allows our nation to respond rapidly and in force to threats to our security anywhere in the world.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 25th day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

But, good afternoon and welcome to the White House. It's a great pleasure, and I'm happy to have this opportunity to speak together with you. In Mark, chapter three, there's a verse that's associated with Abraham Lincoln -- that a house divided against itself cannot stand. Divisions among the American people have been a concern of many Presidents, not just President Lincoln.

If I believed some of the things that I've heard and read about this administration's program, I'd be concerned, too. [Laughter] We've been accused of just about everything. But the accusation, seriously, that bothers me the most is the charge that we don't care about the poor and the disadvantaged. And it bothers me because it isn't true.

When I was elected, our country was facing a major economic crisis. Inflation, running at 14 percent, was destroying people's savings and brutally attacking the elderly and others on fixed incomes. At the same time, unemployment had reached just about 8 million. The prime interest rate was 21 percent, destroying the dream of home ownership for everyone but a very select few.

We couldn't permit this to go on. If inflation had kept running at the rate it was before the 1980 election rather than the rate that we've achieved in the last 6 months, a family of four on a fixed income of $15,000 would be $994 poorer in purchasing power than they are today. I don't have to tell you what an extra $994 means to people of that income, or anyone else for that matter.

And contrary to popular perception, we've brought down interest rates five points already and more progress is expected. Unemployment remains too high; there is no question about that. It was too high when I entered office. But I can assure you we're doing our level best to create a revived economy that will mean more jobs and more opportunity for all Americans.

I don't think anyone in this room quarrels with the goal of a healthy economy. Yet some would have you believe that we've attacked the poor in order to accomplish our goals. This administration has been criticized, for example, for reducing a job-training program in this time of great unemployment from $3.2 billion to -- in the budget we've requested for '83 -- $1.8 billion.

But many of you are aware that we've proposed a 14-percent increase in direct spending for traditionally black colleges in the 1983 budget over what was spent in 1982. Similarly, we've budgeted increases for Head Start, social security, Medicaid, Medicare, and other safety net programs.

When people complain about budget cuts, what they're often referring to is a cut in the rate of increase that had been planned for some social programs. The fact is that overall social spending is higher this year than it has ever been, and it will be higher next year than it is this year.

But let's admit one thing: It's necessary to get control of the cost of some of these spending programs, because some of them were too top heavy with bureaucracy. Some well-meaning programs robbed recipients of their dignity, trapped them into a dependency that left them with idle time, less in self-respect, and little prospect of a better future.

Now, this is not a white or a black issue; it's a basic human issue of how a free government should treat its citizens of all races. And even with the best of intentions, many of the old programs failed millions of our citizens. You know that and I know that. And the time has come to try something new.

Just a few days ago, I sent the Congress enterprise zone legislation which provides powerful incentives for job-producing businesses to locate in the economically blighted areas. We want to make it profitable for business to provide opportunity to some of this country's most deprived citizens. If this experiment works, it can provide a blueprint for future projects all across America.

Yes, we're trying new methods, and when that happens people sometimes get nervous. But there was much more to fear from standing still, as overgrown government collapsed under its own weight in runaway taxes.

Inflation and interest rates undermine the national economy. I honestly believe it's better to create jobs by restoring the economy than to provide handouts. And I believe a majority of Americans of all races agree. Nothing will be better for our people and for a healthy economy than that.

Now, this doesn't mean that we shouldn't be concerned about the desperate condition of the less fortunate. I'm aware that as members of the black clergy, you are in the frontline providing help for those who need it most. You represent a noble heritage. Black churches started colleges when the doors of learning in other colleges were closed. And black churches provided a place for the elderly, care for the sick, and counseling for the troubled when there was just no other way.

I believe that America's churches, white and black, have an important role to play in the life of this nation. Our Savior said, ``inasmuch as ye have done it unto one of the least of these, my brethren, you have done it unto me.'' Well, too many churches are Sunday morning churches and not seven-day-a-week churches.

The President. I believe the black clergy can lead the way. You've already shown, with faith and hard work, how much can be accomplished. And I hope your example will teach other churches about their potential.

Now, this isn't to suggest that charity can replace all government programs. But wouldn't it be better for the human spirit and for the soul of this nation to encourage people to accept more responsibility to care for one another, rather than leaving those tasks to paid bureaucrats?

I hope that this visit will help us understand each other a little better. I've long subscribed to a belief that a lot of the ills of the world will disappear when we talk to each other instead of about each other.

A year ago when members of your executive committee met with me at the White House, we shared our hopes for reducing the growth of government spending. Your 2-percent solution proposal was considered carefully in the design of our program, and with your help, we were able to convince the Congress to make that program the law of the land. I thank you for your hard work and ask for even more as we continue our struggle to reduce the size and appetite of the Federal Government.

You are the professionals the rest of us turn to -- not only to buy and sell our homes but, increasingly, to help us find ways to afford them. You deal with America's families every hour of your working day -- young couples anxious to make a new start in life, families moving for new opportunities, ones that need space, ones that now need less space, and elderly couples looking for a place to retire.

But the dream of ownership, home ownership that is your stock-in-trade, has turned into a nightmare -- not suddenly, not overnight, but after a decade or more of economic abuse. After years of fiscal blundering in Washington, after the big spending, big government policies of the past brought our national economy to the brink of disaster, home ownership has become an impossible dream now for too many of our people.

In America, private ownership has been the bedrock of our social system. But through the values of neighborhood, work, and family that such ownership encourages -- though they're necessary to our future health and well-being today -- too many American families can no longer afford the price of an average new home.

We will not look the other way as the rock upon which we have built this society continues to crumble. We will work to restore health to our ailing housing industry, and in so doing, help to restore health to our national economy.

You're not asking the Federal Government for multi-billion dollar bailout schemes. You recognize, as I do, that budget-busting bailouts will only aggravate the interest rate problem -- the underlying problem in the housing industry.

On my direction, Secretary Pierce and a Cabinet-level task force have developed a plan for short-term relief of the housing industry. This morning, I'm pleased to announce a series of several early actions that we will take in response to their findings.

First, changes will be undertaken regarding the mortgage revenue bond program to loosen the arbitrage restriction and broaden our definitions of distressed areas. And since the basic program is already in place, we can move quickly. These changes will make it possible for State agencies to provide mortgage funds for 50,000 more homebuyers at lower cost.

Today, in excess of $500 billion dollars are invested by pension funds, and that figure is expected to grow to some $3 trillion by 1995. Of that amount, only 10 percent is currently invested in mortgages. The increase in pension fund investment in mortgages will be determined by the pension plans themselves, both union and private pensions. These changes are not intended to water down basic ERISA investment protections but to demonstrate our commitment to eliminating barriers and unlocking important new doors to broader investment in the housing market.

Now, third, we're easing existing guidelines to expand the number of potential homebuyers qualifying for FHA [Federal Housing Administration] mortgage loans. And this action will be of particular benefit to those purchasing their first homes, such as lower-cost condominiums, and will allow relatives to assist young people in the down payment.

I created a housing commission to review the entire range of housing policy. Its report is due within the next 5 weeks. And today, I'm establishing a working group of the Cabinet Council for Economic Affairs, chaired by Secretary Pierce, to bridge our short-term measures and the structural reform proposals of our housing commission. Formation of the working group now will ensure prompt action to rejuvenate housing.

Let me state, categorically, that for this administration, housing is one of our highest social priorities. Our policies for this industry are based on the essential right to private property. And in private property, nothing is more important than home ownership. I also want to state my firm, personal commitment to preservation of the homeowner mortgage tax reduction [Deduction {White House correction}] and maintenance of the important roles of FHA and GINNIE MAE [Government National Mortgage Association]. You have my pledge that this administration will take no precipitous action. Our actions will be measured against the ability of the private sector to bear more responsibility in home financing.

Homeownership creates incentives for people to save and invest -- a unique stabilizing force in our democratic system. Unfortunately, years of inflation and high interest rates have put today's housing industry in transition and crisis. Consumers can't buy; sellers can't sell; and builders can't build. Interest rates have come down from their dizzying heights, but they have not come down enough. Recent gains in controlling inflation, in the savings rate, in tax incentives, and in budget reductions will continue to push them downward, but the only hope for long-term improvement in interest rates is for the Congress to join me in a bipartisan effort to cut spending.

We must reduce these intolerable budget deficits that have haunted us for so many years. We must all realize that our economic problems and the problems of your industry are neither Republican nor Democrat. They hurt us all. They're the painful consequences of a spending addiction that has mushroomed out of control -- consequences inflicted on all of our citizens, in every region, in every station, and of every age. We will not pit party against party, State against State, or class against class in the demagoguery used by some of our critics. Those who would lead our people must recognize that we're all Americans and that our collective fate must rise or fall as one nation and one people. Our solutions must be fair and compassionate -- and they must be bipartisan.

Now, I have no quarrel with those who cry out every evening on the network news against the size of our projected deficits. I abhor them, too. What I don't understand is how many of those same people can then retreat from the spotlight to vote in some congressional committee to spend even more. How can they carp about deficits in one breath, and vote to make them bigger in the next? They're part of the problem, not the solution.

In the array of choices before us, however, there are three areas in which there must be no retreat on fundamentals -- on fundamentals: the ability of this nation to maintain a strong defense, relief for the weary and overburdened American taxpayer, and reduction in the exorbitant growth of Federal spending.

Attempts to saddle this administration with the blame for economic problems long-in-the-making only sink our economy deeper in the quagmire of partisan debate. And they don't fool anyone, either. The American people don't believe it and never will. This administration holds no patent on recession. We didn't invent sky-high interest rates and inflation or the tragedy of unemployment.

In 1980 alone, no less than three different national economic policies were tried. Our economy was jerked in one direction after another in a vain effort to trim sails to each change in the political breeze. Well, I believe we have in place a solid program for economic recovery, and it's going to do the job. With your help and with a bipartisan coalition in the Congress, we have cut the peoples' taxes, held down government spending, cut the growth of regulations, and urged the Federal Reserve to maintain a slow and steady growth in our money supply. Our programs will encourage saving and investment and provide incentive for our people to work harder, produce more, and expand our economy.

It's true that the budget we've proposed includes deficits, but let me reassure you, I have no intention of giving up on balancing the budget. I have given no ground in my belief that government deficits, spending more than we take in, are a plague on our economy. I am open to any and all suggestions to reduce the size of the Federal deficit in a way that does not endanger our freedom.

We must learn from the mistakes of the past. Government doesn't tax money to get its needs, it taxes to get money it wants. Big government has a way of spending all the money it can get its hands on, and then some. And in the last 10 years, America's taxes have gone up by more than 200 percent, and we still had the largest string of deficits in our history.

Not only does this excessive taxation put a ball and chain around our economy, it simply does not solve our spending problem. Federal programs have been growing like Topsy. In the last 15 years, the cost of food stamps has gone up 16,000 percent. Now, I've said that number before, but I think you have to pause to really take it in. Medicaid and Medicare have gone up by more than 500 percent in the last 10 years. We don't have a trillion-dollar debt because we haven't taxed enough; we have a trillion-dollar debt because we spend too much.

Once you realize the staggering rate at which government programs have been growing and the reckless way it has been spending, our proposals to cut the rate of increase appear in their true light -- as a moderate, necessary remedy to a serious, potentially fatal economic illness.

Our historic tax cuts last year didn't cut our revenues. The U.S. Treasury will continue taking in more money every year than the year before. In 1981, personal taxes actually went up by about $41 billion. If we were to repeal the so-called 1983 tax cut and our indexing provision, the tax bill for the average working family would increase by hundreds of dollars per year. Our tax cuts only partially offset the historic tax increases that are already on schedule.

America's needy. There's no question that we must protect those who are truly needy, care for those who are sick, feed those who are hungry, and shelter those who are cold. And we must build a better economy that provides a job for every American who wants one.

But some of our leaders seem to have forgotten where prosperity comes from. America's abundance was not a gift from government or anyone else. Free enterprise, not government, is the source from which our blessings flow, and we in this administration intend to restore it.

Our program has already begun to work. After unprecedented years of double-digit inflation, we ended 1981 with inflation measured for that past year at 8.9 percent. In the last 5 months, it has been down to 4\1/2\ percent. We have begun to tame the inflation monster.

Now, let me put those gains into a more human context. If inflation had kept running at the rate it was before the 1980 election rather than at the rate we've achieved in the last 6 months, a family of four on a fixed income of $15,000 would be $994 poorer in purchasing power than they are today.

The decline in the inflation rate and new incentives for saving have strong implications for future prosperity and financing the budget deficit. We project that Federal borrowing in 1983 and 1984 will be several times less than the total private savings pool, and we believe that proportion to be a direct result of the tax cuts. We expect $260 billion more in private savings by 1984 than in 1981. Private savings will far outweigh the projected increases in the deficit.

These economic gains are early harbingers of recovery, signs that have strong implications for future prosperity. And the return of American prosperity is the most compassionate program anyone can offer.

For the sake of the young couple who wants to buy their first home but can't afford today's interest rates, we've designed an economic program geared to a healthier economy that will have lower interest rates and make the dream of their own home come true.

For the sake of the automobile workers who have just volunteered to take unprecedented pay cuts in order to keep their jobs, we're bringing down the inflation that would have cut their real incomes even more, further threatening the tenuous security for which they've sacrificed.

For those who are out of work and looking for jobs, we're cutting the excessive taxing and spending to open the way to more productivity and more employment. Our whole program is geared to generating new jobs and new opportunities for all of our citizens.

And for the sake of our elderly, pensioners, and senior citizens trapped by inflation, we have finally begun to control the cost of living. Last month, for the first time in 6 years, the Producer Price Index actually declined. I don't mean the rate of increase went down, I mean there was no increase -- there was an actual decrease.

There are no sugar pill remedies for serious illnesses. The damage of a generation of economic abuse cannot be erased overnight. But there is a cure. I believe the best hope for Americans -- and that includes those of you in the housing industry -- is the sustained recovery of our economy, continued low inflation, declining interest rates, increased employment, and a rise in the real income of our people. But we can only work this cure if we hold firm to the recovery program now in place.

In the words of Thomas Paine: These are times that try men's souls. We need more than summer soldiers and sunshine patriots. If we believe in principles of free enterprise that made our country great, we must stand up for them again, today. We must draw anew on the individual strength, ingenuity, and vision that built America. But our gaze is not set on the past; it's firmly fixed on tomorrow. We must not mortgage our children's future to pay for the mistakes of today. The choice before our generation is grave but clear: We must either face and solve our problems now or surrender to them forever.

Join us in our effort to renew our way of life. Stay with us, as I'm sure you will, as we pass through this dark corner in time. In your communities, and tomorrow in the Congress, spread the word that you have faith in these programs, that together we can sustain the courage and the patience of our people, and together we can restore the health of our nation.

The United States has significant political, security, economic, environmental, and scientific interests in Antarctica. These are reflected in the Antarctic Treaty of 1959. The system established by that treaty has permitted its parties, who maintain different positions concerning claims to territorial sovereignty in Antarctica, to work together to further scientific research and to ensure that Antarctica does not become the scene or object of international discord.

The President also decided that the National Science Foundation will continue to budget for and manage the entire U.S. Program in Antarctica, including logistic support activities, so that the program may be managed as a single package. The U.S. Antarctic Program would continue to draw upon logistic support capabilities of other government agencies, including the Departments of Defense and Transportation, on a cost-reimbursable basis.

The significance of this Convention lies not only in its environmental and resource management provisions and objectives; it also represents an important example of international cooperation among the Consultative Parties of the Antarctic Treaty.

The President. Well, I can't tell you how thrilled I am sure everyone in this country is about what has happened. And we were all watching to see you come in, and really, our thoughts and prayers have been with you every second that you've been up there. And again, just our heartfelt congratulations and our thanks for all that you've done and all that it means to America.

Colonel Lousma. I hope that all Americans everywhere consider the Columbia their spacecraft and these two guys that happened to have the great good fortune to have a ride in it. It's really a beautiful machine.

The President. Well, we feel that way. This is the third successful flight, and I think the very fact of the delay and then having to choose an alternate landing space has again contributed a great deal to the awareness of the flexibility and the potential that there is in that aircraft. And again we thank you all for being willing to do this.

The President. Yeah, there's a press conference, but that question -- because it ties in with this same question here. No, it's not so much from that, I think. And I remember the same feeling when I was a Governor, that government does seem to move so slowly and there is so much to be done that I think you'd have that feeling even without getting shot.

GSP except when imported from the beneficiary countries listed opposite those articles, is modified by substituting therefor the General Headnote 3(c)(iii) set forth in Annex IV, attached hereto and made a part hereof.

On behalf of the people and Government of the United States of America, I congratulate the people and Government of El Salvador on your successful constituent assembly elections. The Salvadoran people have clearly repudiated violence and voiced their commitment to a democratic future.

United States and their Government take this opportunity to express their support for the restoration of democracy in El Salvador, and to offer their admiration for this moving demonstration of the popular will.

Economic sanctions against the Soviet Union and Poland in response to the repression in Poland were imposed in December 1981. These political and economic measures affecting our relationship with these countries were designed to convey that we cannot and will not conduct ``business as usual'' with the perpetrators and those who aid and abet them. The annual East-West Trade Report for 1981 will cover these sanctions in greater detail.

Twice in my lifetime I've seen the world plunged blindly into global wars that inflicted untold suffering upon millions of innocent people. I share the determination of today's young people that such a tragedy, which would be rendered even more terrible by the monstrous inhumane weapons in the world's nuclear arsenals, must never happen again. My goal is to reduce nuclear weapons dramatically, assuring lasting peace and security.

Last November, I stressed our commitment to negotiate in good faith for the reduction of both nuclear and conventional weapons. I made a specific proposal to eliminate entirely the intermediate-range missiles. We remain committed to those goals.

Vienna, along with our allies, we're negotiating reductions of conventional forces in Europe. And here in Washington, we're completing preparations for talks with the Soviets on strategic weapons reductions.

We know all too well from past experience that negotiations with the Soviet Union must be carefully prepared. We can't afford to repeat past mistakes -- to arrive hastily at an arms control process that sends hopes soaring, only to end in dashed expectations.

Senate and House calling for major, verifiable reductions of U.S. and Soviet nuclear weapons to equal force levels. This is an important move in the right direction, and these points are essential elements of a truly effective arms control agreement -- elements which are consistent with the views of this administration. I commend Senators Jackson and Warner and Congressman Carney and all those who joined with them in this important initiative.

I have and I will continue to seek realistic arms control agreements on nuclear and conventional forces. I want an agreement on strategic nuclear weapons that reduces the risk of war, lowers the level of armaments, and enhances global security. We can accept no less.

America's national security policy is based on enduring principles. Our leaders and our allies have long understood that the objective of our defense efforts has always been to deter conflict and reduce the risk of war, conventional or nuclear. Together with our partners and the Atlantic Alliance, every President in the postwar period has followed this strategy and it's worked. It has earned the overwhelming bipartisan support of the Congress and the country at large, and it has kept world peace.

Yesterday, with the successful completion of the Columbia space shuttle's latest mission, I think we were all reminded of the great things the human race can achieve when it harnesses its best minds and efforts to a positive goal. Both the United States and the Soviet Union have written proud chapters in the peaceful exploration of outer space. So, I invite the Soviet Union to join with us now to substantially reduce nuclear weapons and make an important breakthrough for lasting peace on Earth.

Q. Mr. President, the experts say that the Russians are far ahead of us in some nuclear weaponry, and we are far ahead of them in terms of the Polaris missile and so forth. And we also have the capability of swift, massive retaliation against the Soviets. Under those circumstances, why don't we seek negotiations for a freeze now and carry on to reductions? That way we can halt the making of doomsday weapons and save billions to help poor people.

The President. Helen, I know that there are people that have tried to figure this out. The truth of the matter is that on balance, the Soviet Union does have a definite margin of superiority, enough so that there is risk and there is what I have called, as you all know, several times, ``a window of vulnerability.'' And I think that a freeze would not only be disadvantageous -- in fact, even dangerous to us with them in that position -- but I believe that it would also militate against any negotiations for reduction. There would be no incentive for them, then, to meet with us and reduce.

Let me call your attention to what's going on in Geneva. They have 300 intermediate-range missiles with 900 warheads aimed at all of Western Europe, and that includes northern Africa and the Middle East. And there was no talk of any reduction of those weapons until our allies asked us to supply them with intermediate-range weapons as a deterrent and which would be placed in the countries of Western Europe. And then when I made my proposal last November, the Soviet Union is sitting down and talking with us on that.

Pershing II missiles that -- the ground-launched cruise missiles -- that he would take some kind of retaliatory step. Did you interpret this as a threat? And if so, how are you responding to him in private, or how do you plan to respond to him?

The President. Well, I know that we're looking at all these various statements and so forth and analyzing them to see what they may mean. Frankly, I myself am inclined to believe that this is just part of the dialog that goes on and part of a kind of a propaganda campaign that is aimed at making them look like the peacemakers and as if we're the seekers of war. And that is completely contrary to fact.

The President. The only place that he could install them in this hemisphere would be in Cuba, which is his satellite now, although they're working up to where it might be Nicaragua -- also considered that. But this would be in total violation, even though there have been other things we think are violations also in the 1962 agreement, at the time of the missile crisis. And then there are options open to us that I would prefer not to discuss, because, as you know, I don't like to discuss the things that we could or might or might not do.

Q. Mr. President, even some of your closest Republican allies on Capitol Hill are calling on you now to show some flexibility in negotiating for a budget compromise, not only in defense spending but in social security and in other entitlement programs. Why aren't you accepting their advice?

The President. Well, I am listening, and I'm not inflexible and remaining a Great Stone Face, as they say, down here. Jim Baker's been up on the Hill now for 2 weeks listening and gathering the various views of what they're suggesting.

With regard to social security, I feel there that we have to point out that we now have a bipartisan commission -- as a result of last year's arguments and debates -- that is considering the entire matter of social security.

With regard to further cuts, I am open to hear and willing to hear any proposals. I think that the most important thing we can do in the present situation to benefit all the people who are suffering so in this recession is a further cut, a further reduction in Federal spending. And I'm open to any suggestions on that.

With regard to revenues or defense spending, I have to say that for one thing we're going to have a citizens task force whose first stop is going to be the Defense Department in an effort to find, as I'm sure in any area in government, we can find areas where management improvements can be made that will result in great savings.

The one thing that I have said is that we can't accept in the defense field some kind of a reduction that would set us back in the course we've taken to rebuild our defenses, in view of the Soviet superiority. But it is possible that there are things that can be done without hurting that.

The President. I don't think there's a single thing there -- I mean, a single thing in which you could say one way or the other. For example, yes, unemployment has increased, because of the recession. But I would remind you, that we had almost as much -- we had in the neighborhood of 8 million unemployed back then, before we came here. We had interest rates of 21\1/2\ percent.

Well, they're 16. That's still too high, and it is those high interest rates that are delaying our coming out of this recession. We had 12.4 percent inflation. Inflation is now down and has for the last 5 months been running at only 4\1/2\ percent.

We're working now with them with regard to the cutting off of credit to nations like that and to the Soviet Union, which we know is behind the whole Polish problem, at the same time that we're doing everything we can to try and help the Polish people without having it appear that their government is providing that help -- some $55 million in grain and corn that was provided by us -- other things that we've been trying to do through the Catholic Charities, and we're watching.

Q. Mr. President, the right-wing parties in El Salvador taken together seem to have won the election there. Will we back any government that abandons the social reforms that are now underway there, and specifically, would we back a government headed by Major D'Aubuisson?

The President. Let me just say, we're watching this very carefully. I think that it would give us great difficulties if a government now appeared on the scene that totally turned away from the reforms that have been instituted. But I think right now -- and before we begin inviting trouble or looking for that -- we, all of us, should have been a little bit inspired by what took place there in that election.

This morning Senator Kassebaum, the Congressmen who were with her in the trip down there to be observers at the election have just told some things that ought to make us a little ashamed of ourselves and how much we take for granted the ability or the right to vote. They told of a woman standing in the line who was hit by a ricochet, a bullet ricochet -- refused to leave the line to have her wound tended until she had voted.

They told of another woman who was personally, individually threatened with death by the guerrillas, and she told them -- if she voted -- and she told them, ``You can kill me, you can kill my family, you can't kill us all.'' They turned out in the face of that in greater numbers than we did.

She said also that the attitude -- and I wish more of this had been seen by Americans -- she said that the people, whenever they saw them, the people there in those voting lines called out their gratitude to the United States for the fact that we have been helping them.

Q. I did indeed. Mr. President, you have failed to endorse a constitutional amendment to balance the budget. Can you ever support a constitutional amendment to balance the budget, considering that your proposals have no balanced budget and deficits well out into the out-years?

Now, I won't go into the specifics of the particular proposal that is there, but the concept -- and I am looking at that to see what it's going to contain, because I think that a balanced budget amendment must also carry with it a limitation on taxes. It must contain a limit so that in the future you couldn't just always have a balanced budget by simply sending the bill to the taxpayers for whatever the deficit might be.

Q. Mr. President, in view of the very precarious position that many of our leading corporations are in, how do you look at the Chrysler type of bailout? And has your administration made any reserves for that, and how safe is the Federal deposit insurance company?

The President. I think that the things that we're trying to do -- the tax breaks that we have put into our program and that are now in place, the regulatory relief that we're giving these industries, I believe, should be able to take care of their particular problems. There's been no approach to us as yet from those industries about any kind of bailout.

Q. Mr. President, in your first press conference, you referred to the Soviet Union as having shown a pattern of, I believe you used the word ``lying and cheating'' over the years. Tonight you're calling upon a return to civilized conduct and a sustained negotiation on nuclear arms. Have you, in your 15 months in office, formed any different opinion than you came into office with about the Soviet Union? Are they more conciliatory than you thought they were?

The President. No, I don't think they've changed their habits. I think, however, they're in a more desperate situation than I had assumed that they were economically. Their great military buildup has -- and at the expense of denial of consumer products, up to and including food for their people -- has now left them on a very narrow edge, and that's why we're proposing to our allies a shut-off of credit with regard to the Polish and the Afghanistan situation.

Q. Mr. President, you've said several times recently that the accusation that bothers you most is that you don't care about the poor and disadvantaged. You point out that spending on social programs hasn't really been cut, but the rate of increase slowed. And yet a number of studies, including one by the Congressional Budget Office, say that the poorest people will lose the most from last year's budget cuts, let alone the ones which have been proposed for this year.

The President. Well, this is the thing, Bill, that we've been trying to correct. And many of the special-interest groups who have various of these programs as their particular interest have been criticizing us and suggesting that we somehow have been cutting them all off. And what we've tried to point out is that where we have tried to get a handle on these programs is where people who don't have a legitimate reason or right to be beneficiaries should be removed from the roles.

Maybe this is a time -- all the talk that's going around -- to expose once and for all the fairy tale, the myth, that we somehow are, overall, cutting the government spending. The budget that we've submitted for 1983 will be $32 billion bigger than the budget for this year. $758 billion -- and 43 cents of every one of those dollars -- will be going in direct benefits to individuals, either in cash or in services. Now, in the John F. Kennedy first budget, only 27 cents went in such benefits to individuals; 46 cents of his budget, of every dollar, went to defense.

We're not gutting the programs for the needy. The government insured student loans were in -- let's take the last budget of the preceding administration, 1980 -- were 1.4 billion. For our '83 budget we're asking 2.6 billion. The supplemental security income for the elderly poor and the blind was 6.5 billion; we're asking for 8.9 billion in our budget.

I think that sometimes people are jumping at a figure in some particular program and not looking to see -- as, for example, in an editorial in the paper this morning that struck at us because they said that we had less money for vaccinations for children and therefore there was going to be more sickness and perhaps more child death. Well, what they didn't see was that we actually have more money in for that program than we've had for others.

Social security and other programs such as that have a large and voting constituency. But welfare programs, nutrition programs, food stamp programs have a much smaller constituency. Your critics charge that proportionally larger cuts are being made there. How do you answer that?

The President. Well, I would answer it by saying that social security, which over the -- or social security -- we haven't touched social security. Food stamps, over the last 15 years, increased 16,000 percent. And just recently we've been doing some investigating so that we can intelligently treat with a program of that kind. And we have found in the first investigation that 57 percent of the stores that were investigated are selling items for food stamps that are banned, that food stamps are -- it's illegal to use food stamps to buy those things.

The President. I'm hopeful that it won't, because I have the pledge of my friend Menachem Begin and of President Mubarak that they are going forward -- and within the framework of the Camp David agreement -- to resolve all these other problems. I'm hopeful that we will see more progress on these talks after April 25th, when the transfer of the Sinai comes.

Israel claims that some of the mayors that they are ousting there are mayors that they themselves had appointed but that they believe have now become a part of the more radical PLO wing. But the Camp David agreement comes within the 242 and 338 of the United Nations, those Resolutions. And they have, as I say, have pledged to me that they're going to abide by that.

Q. Mr. President, in your stout defense of your budget, the big-ticket items in your budget, such as the 10-percent tax cut and increased defense spending, you seem to be almost alone, with the exception of Congressman Kemp. And we sense even many of your economic advisers and people who clearly have your best interests at heart -- Senator Laxalt comes to mind -- are saying both privately and publicly that they desperately want you to change that and bring the deficit down, try to bring the interest rates down.

The President. I don't believe that they're specifically talking about those basic fundamentals of the economic problem. I think, in the line of getting the interest rates down -- and I've had this also from quite some outside economic advice and from people out there in the money markets -- that one of the worst signals we could send would be an outright retreat from the fundamentals of the program.

Now, I'll call to your attention that we ourselves, last year, in getting those tax cuts, discussed areas of savings, or of tax revenues, many of them in the line of taking away unjustified tax breaks that were never really intended in the regulations, things of that kind. And I'm open to discussion of anything of that kind.

But I believe that the basic tax cuts for business that were based around depreciation allowances, the 25 percent which should have been 30 percent, and retroactive to January 1st of 1981 -- and maybe we wouldn't have a recession today, but we couldn't get that much when we were trying to get it -- but I believe that that tax cut is absolutely vital. You don't increase taxes in a recession.

And actually, that tax cut, that whole 25 percent is doing little more than offsetting the gigantic tax increase that was passed in 1977, one of the largest, the single largest in our Nation's history, the social security payroll tax. And may I point out that with that gigantic tax increase in 1977, between then and 1981, there was $300 billion in additional tax revenues collected by government. There were $318 billion in deficits, in the same period.

It seemed to me that, first of all, we're stopping at Jamaica. This is where the whole Caribbean initiative began, was with Seaga's victory there and the taking away of the government from the virtually Communist control that it had been under. And we're moving on then to Barbados, where the Prime Minister there has set up a meeting with the heads of state of many of the neighboring islands there in the Caribbean.

Now, it is Easter, and everybody else is taking a vacation. The fact that while we're there I'm going to sit in the sand and maybe go swimming for a day before we come back hardly constitutes what I'd consider a vacation.

Q. Mr. President, you've talked often about the long-term goals of your economic recovery plan, but a lot of people are in trouble right now. They don't have jobs, and -- millions of them -- how long are you willing to let unemployment continue at current high levels before you take some sort of short-term emergency action to bring it down?

The President. Short-term, emergency actions that have been taken in the past -- and there've been seven previous recessions since World War II -- and that short-term has been a flooding of the money market, an artificial stimulant to bring down unemployment, and at the same time it usually skyrockets inflation. Now inflation is the cruelest thing and the cruelest tax on the poor, if we're taking sides as to who's for the rich or who's for the poor. And I just gave a figure on that a moment ago.

We have, in some of the hardest hit States, extended the unemployment insurance. There's nothing that strikes to my heart more than the unemployed, although at this time I think the farmers, the small business people, people in real estate and the construction industry, who are losing their businesses -- family-owned businesses -- and they can't get unemployment insurance, they're just out and broke -- is also a heartbreaking problem. But the answer to this has to be in a recovery of the economy.

The interest rates, remaining as high as they are, which are holding this up -- there is nothing that government can do about this except hope that we can prove to them that we are serious about continuing this program. Those interest rates aren't staying up because of anything that the Fed is doing or anything that government is doing. They're staying up, because after being burned a half a dozen times in these previous efforts by government, we find that the money markets just don't believe that we'll stay the course, bring down government spending, and hold inflation down.

The President. Well, we've been thinking that possibly this summer would be -- we would be ready as far as our own team is concerned. It takes a lot of work to prepare for one of these. You don't just go and sit down at the table and say let's talk about nuclear weapons. And then there will have to be our own review. We've had quite a talented group working on this.

When we're ready, then, of course, setting a date will depend somewhat on the whole international situation. There could be things that could make it seem a little unseemly to propose such a meeting. But I would be hopeful that possibly we could do this by this summer.

These measures are required now because the world economy faces economic and financial problems which are without precedent in the postwar era. There is a natural tendency in time of recession, high unemployment and international economic uncertainty toward protectionism and financial contraction -- reactions which were the seeds of the depression of the 1930s. The International Monetary Fund was created in the aftermath of World War II, largely at the initiative of the United States, to provide a constructive counter to those tendencies and prevent a recurrence of the slide into world depression.

The IMF remains the centerpiece of international efforts to deal with these problems in an orderly and constructive way, by supporting its members' efforts to correct their balance of payments problems through adoption of sound economic policies. However, the IMF's resources are under serious strain. Its ability to commit the medium-term financing necessary to allow member countries time to implement corrective economic policies is likely to be exhausted during the course of 1983 or early 1984. It is essential that the IMF have adequate resources to fulfill its vital responsibilities. Failure to resolve current world economic and financial difficulties in an orderly manner would result in a downward spiral of world trade and billions of dollars in simultaneous loan losses. This would pose a fundamental threat to the international economic system, and to the U.S. economy. Prospects for the economic recovery and expansion necessary to generate new jobs would be dashed, not only in the United States, but around the world.

I therefore strongly recommend prompt enactment of legislation to give effect to the proposed increase in the United States quota in the IMF and to the proposed increase in United States participation in the IMF's General Arrangements to Borrow.

The world's current economic problems are attributable to several factors, including the rapid inflation of the 1970s, the twin oil ``shocks'' of that decade, high interest rates, the worldwide recession, and countries' failure to adjust to a rapidly changing world economic environment.

These developments led to a very rapid rise in international lending and a build-up in external debt which in some cases, particularly in a period when inflation is being brought under control, are no longer sustainable. Major borrowers abroad are finding it extraordinarily difficult to find the financing needed to sustain economic activity, purchase essential imports, and service their external debts. As a consequence, important segments of the United States economy and financial system, and a number of countries of critical importance to America's national interests, are in a vulnerable position. The health of the United States economy and the well-being of its citizens are tied directly to the recovery and growth of other nations. Our own self-interests, therefore, demand that we demonstrate the leadership required to assure an orderly transition in a turbulent world environment.

The dependence of the United States on the world economy has grown rapidly. Today, nearly 20 percent of total U.S. goods produced are exported abroad. Some 40 percent of our agricultural production is exported. U.S. banks account for about one-third of total international bank lending, and they rely heavily on foreign sources for loanable funds. All told, more than 5 million U.S. jobs depend on exports, and those jobs in turn depend on healthy markets abroad. Foreign trade accounted for four out of every five new jobs in U.S. manufactures in the late 1970s. Our services trade surplus grew more than elevenfold between 1970 and 1980. Our surplus in high technology trade has increased from $7.6 billion to $30 billion in that period. Combining goods and services, estimates show that one-third of U.S. corporate profits derive from international activities. Going one step further, our trade relationships with the developing countries have expanded even more rapidly than our overall trade. In the last few years, trade with LDCs has accounted for nearly 40 percent of the overall growth of American exports.

Clearly, the United States has a major direct interest in assuring a strong world economy and a smoothly functioning international monetary system. Conversely, sharp cutbacks in imports by borrowing countries, necessitated by economic collapse or inadequate financing, would have a direct and damaging impact on not only our financial system but on American workers, farmers, manufacturers and investors. On the banking side, sudden losses on foreign loans would squeeze earnings and capital positions. This in turn would impair banks' ability to finance world trade and could lead both to a reduction in their ability to lend to domestic customers and to higher interest rates.

The IMF plays a key role in helping its member countries make the economic adjustments needed to correct their economic problems and restore their creditworthiness in the world marketplace -- adjustments at the national level which are the essential ingredient of a sound international economy. The IMF also provides strong support for a more open trade environment through economic programs which emphasize reliance on market-oriented economic policies.

The proposed increase in IMF resources is one part of a comprehensive strategy to resolve current world economic problems. This strategy involves adoption of sound adjustment measures by borrowing countries; IMF support in helping those countries design their adjustment programs, in formulating comprehensive financing plans to accompany their adjustment efforts, and in providing a portion of the financing required; continued provision of financing by the commercial banking system where borrowers undertake and implement a sound IMF supported economic program; official willingness to provide emergency short-term liquidity support, where that is essential in the interim while IMF adjustment and financing programs are developed and put in place; and achievement of a broad-based, non-inflationary recovery in the industrial nations, which will provide expanding markets and a basis for the adjustments borrowers must make. The IMF is at the heart of this strategy. It simply must have adequate resources to fulfill its vital responsibility.

I believe the United States is on the verge of an impressive, non-inflationary and sustained recovery. Recovery in the United States is important to global recovery; but, by the same token, failure to deal effectively with problems facing the international economy could quickly undermine our own domestic economic efforts and prospects. Approval by the Congress of the proposed increases in our IMF quota and our participation in the General Arrangements to Borrow is a critically important component of our program to assure economic recovery and growing employment in the United States.

A report of the National Advisory Council on International Monetary and Financial Policies, which provides background information on the proposed increases in the U.S. quota in the IMF and in U.S. participation in the General Arrangements to Borrow, is being transmitted to the Congress separately. I strongly urge the Congress to consider the proposed increases promptly and favorably.

The President today announced his intention to appoint James S. Dwight, Jr., to be a member of the Advisory Commission on Intergovernmental Relations for a term of 2 years. He will succeed Eugene Eidenberg.

Our great national struggle to make this economy well again is beginning to pay off. For the sake of every American, it is imperative that the Congress work with our administration in a bipartisan spirit to build a lasting recovery that will create more jobs. If we do, and we resist going back to the inflationary policies of the past, we can create an era of prosperity filled with new opportunities for the American people.

One, Congress shall continue to have complete access to any and all documents they seek in conjunction with the oversight of EPA. At the President's direction, Congress is not to be denied access to any document. These instructions extend agreement with the Levitas committee [Subcommittee on Investigations and Oversight of the House Committee on Public Works and Transportation] to all committees.

The President also reaffirmed his direction to the Justice Department that they move forward as expeditiously as possible with the investigation of all allegations of misconduct at EPA. This reaffirms the directions he gave on February 15th in a letter from Fred Fielding [Counsel to the President] to the Attorney General.

I have to say one thing about my very good friend and my minister, Donn Moomaw. You know he was a linebacker for the Bruins. When I was Governor, I took him to a couple of football games in which the Bruins were playing. I thought my playing days were over, but you should sit beside him in a stadium when the Bruins are playing. It gets to be a pretty physical experience.

But I'm pleased that my pleasant but official duties of welcoming the Queen permitted me to be here with you today. I must admit that every time I visit California, it gets harder and harder -- and, Pete, you're going to find this out -- to get on that plane and go back East. Even with the bad weather out here, it's better than most parts of the world.

A few weeks ago, we had a blizzard in Washington. Some of the Californians on my staff learned what it means to be snowed in. Yet even when the temperature was below freezing and snow covered the ground, believe it or not, joggers were still seen making their daily run. Although those hardy souls certainly had more tenacity than most, they represent a dramatic change of attitude that's taken hold over the last two decades. Today, as never before, Americans are actively engaged in personal exercise and physical fitness programs, a health trend we should all encourage.

The Ways and Means Committee, the all-powerful committee of the House of Representatives, in an overwhelming, bipartisan move has voted 32 to 3 in favor of, and sent out to the floor, the social security compromise plan. And that was Chairman Dan Rostenkowski and then the ranking minority leader, Barber Conable, and the subchairman, Jake Pickle. And I hope that the full House and Senate will follow their lead and protect social security for years to come by showing the same bipartisanship. And this will also guarantee, I think if they will continue on that, a solid economic recovery.

Now, I know we've got a good number of Olympians with us today. Some have been, for one reason or another, introduced. But I just wondered if all, present and past, of the Olympic athletes who are here today could stand up so that we can give them a round of applause -- for what they've done, what they're doing and going to do. The truth is I just really wanted to see them all.

Well, you know, when I was a bit younger, being involved in athletics I, like so many others, dreamed about the Olympics. I didn't get very close to them. The closest, I think, was at the University of Illinois. It was the State track and field championships for the high schools of Illinois. I was on the 880 relay, and I can remember handing off the baton to our anchorman. We didn't win, because there was a young fellow that was also anchorman on a high school team from Chicago: Ralph Metcalfe went on to win gold medals in '32 and in '36 in the Olympics.

He and Jesse Owens were very, very special to my generation. I can remember what a great source of pride it was when they won that day in Berlin and Adolf Hitler, with his Aryan supremacy stupidity, had to stand up and swallow that stupidity when the gold medals were placed around the necks of some of our fine black athletes.

How can we ever forget the moment when another boxer, a young man, George Forman, from an underprivileged background, proud to be representing our country at the Olympics in Mexico City at a time when there was great ill feeling and the age 30 was a barrier to some in this country and all, and then he -- how he had it throughout the fight, where he had it, I'll never know -- but when victory was announced and he stood in the middle of that ring and suddenly unfurled a small American flag and stood with that flag raised, it was a thrill, I think, for everyone in our country, I say it was in the turbulent sixties. He showed us that whatever divides us, it's not as strong as what keeps us together.

And then there were those young men at Lake Placid, that team that -- their coach told them before the game, before they went out to meet the Russians, and he said, ``You were born for this moment. This is your moment.'' And I think we'll never forget the picture of those young fellows after that victory there on the ice, those young Americans when they certainly were not the favorite to win by a long ways, but they did.

Win or lose, we've always been proud of our athletes. And I think that all of you, especially you here at the front table -- Don Miller and Peter Ueberroth, George Moody, and Don Crivellone -- can be rightfully proud of the part that you're playing. You and others who are providing the support for our team, as well as those who are helping to organize the event itself, deserve more than a word of thanks. And I'm happy today to be able to extend it to you on behalf of the American people.

I appreciate the magnitude of the task that you've taken upon yourselves, the pricetag for selecting, training, and supplying your Olympic team, as you've told us, $77 million. Raising that money and making sure that it's spent effectively is an enormous responsibility. And this year Americans are not only supporting their own team, but they're also responsible for the games themselves.

Today you're part of a noble American tradition of direct citizen involvement. If it weren't for citizens like you who take it upon themselves to support our athletes, the American team would be left wanting, as it has many times in the past. Unlike some other countries, American teams, as you well know and as has been told here today, do not receive government grants or Federal tax dollars. And that gladdens my heart, not just because we've got financial problems in Washington but because I just think that there are a lot of things that we were in danger of drifting into a feeling in this country that, well, it was always government's turn to do it, let government do it.

The task of organizing the games is worthy of Yankee ingenuity. With that operating budget, as you've been told, of nearly a half-billion dollars, next year's games will show the world what Americans without government subsidy can accomplish. These games will reflect the excellence, the hospitality, and the spirit of accomplishment that are so much a part of our way of life.

I understand that there are already signs of the swelling public support. The corporate community, as evidenced by you who are here today, has stepped forward in a big way in, among other things, financing specific construction projects needed for the games. And I think we're all grateful for this example of corporate citizenship.

One of the top priorities of our administration has been to encourage the American people as individuals, as organizations in private and in business life to get more directly involved in getting things done, solving problems, and helping each other. Private initiative is our most precious American resource, and it's as alive today as it was when our ancestors used to join in barn-raising parties when it was needed for a neighbor.

But on the other hand, you know, there's something that's not all too bad about that. I think it's great that bad news is considered -- or the bad events and happenings are considered worthy of news; and the good deeds are so commonplace in America that they're not news, so they don't get the attention. But maybe we'll just have a few days and do that.

There are similar stories right here in California, the folks in a rather small town, Temecula. They got together and built themselves a sports park, held fundraising barbecues and dinners. And those that didn't have money, volunteered the time and energy. And now the young people of that community have baseball diamonds for Little League and other sports events, just due to what's traditional Americanism.

Cross Month. Talk about timing, in the last few days Californians have had tornadoes, hurricane-force winds, earthquakes, floods. And the Red Cross, Salvation Army, and a host of other volunteer organizations have swung into action.

There is a place in all of this for government, a legitimate place. I, just before I came in here today, talked to Governor Deukmejian. And I know that the request is coming to expand the disaster area of California quite sizably and include a number of the counties that have been hard hit in this recent storm. And I was pleased to tell him that old, hardhearted me -- [laughter] -- we will expedite the answer to his request.

California. These organizations are, of course, based on voluntary support and represent the best, again, that there is about this country. I hope that when the winds stop and the floodwaters recede, people here in California especially will remember what's been done, and even more important, will remember to do their part to support these private efforts. The job they've done in the last few days is really something to be proud of.

Our country has been blessed with people who understand that whether or not their community will be the decent place they want it to be depends on them. And we're here today in that same spirit. Millions of young people will be watching the games, as you've been told, young people from all over the world as well as our own children, the fiber of tomorrow's America. And I know we won't let those kids down and won't short-change our country by doing anything less than a first-class job. In a free society, it all depends on us.

Your Majesty, I welcome you this evening on behalf of the American people and, in particular, on behalf of the people of my home State of California. We're honored by your presence in our country and in this State.

That particular tour, and this cultural landmark that we're in tonight, reflects the diversity of our people, who've built a unique nation from many cultures on the firm foundations of democracy and law which, in large measure, we inherited from Britain. It represents a dedication we share with our British cousins: the peaceful furtherance of art and science for the enrichment and progress of all mankind.

It's also appropriate to recall that in a special way San Francisco, which has become home to so many different people, represents the culmination of our nations' great wartime alliance. Of course, the local links to Great Britain go back much further. One of the first titled tourists to visit this area, Sir Francis Drake, arrived long before the city did. Not only was there no room at the inn; there was no inn. [Laughter] But its greatest hours came centuries later.

We're challenged to restrain and reduce the destructive power of nuclear weapons; yet, we must maintain our strength in the face of the enormous military buildup of our adversaries. And nationally and internationally, we face the challenge of restimulating economic growth and development without rekindling inflation.

All this, we can do. We will find the strength to meet these dangers and face these challenges because it beats within the hearts of free societies and free men. We need only look about us for inspiration. This beautiful city and this great State testify to the power and the vision of free men, inspired by the ideals and dedication to liberty of John Locke, Thomas Jefferson, John Stuart Mill, and Abraham Lincoln.

Now, we have had the memorable experience of visiting you in your home State of California and of seeing your ranch at Santa Barbara. I knew before we came that we had exported many of our traditions to the United States. But I had not realized before that weather was one of them.

But the miracle of the space shuttle or of the silicon chip lies not in the wizardry of electronics, but in the genius and shared, dedicated determination of men and women. That is what speaks loudest in California.

I think of the families who struggled against impossible odds, leaving their dead in places whose names still bear witness to their desperation to make their way to the west coast. In today's prosperity, their fortitude is often overlooked. But it is their character and courage which have permeated each succeeding generation.

By far the most important idea which we share is our belief in freedom, as you made clear in your speech at Westminster last year. It is an idea whose power is such that some men will go to as great lengths to suppress it as others will to keep it alive, as our two countries have fought to keep it alive.

We are deeply grateful for the unstinting contribution of the United States to the maintenance of the Western alliance. For our part, no one who knows the British and their history could have any doubt about our steadfastness as an ally or our willingness to stand up in defense of the values which we all hold dear. I say that not to strike a solemn note but to state a simple truth.

We have enjoyed ourselves and greatly appreciate the warmth of your hospitality. What will remain afterwards is more significant -- the cementing of a relationship. From time to time, friendships must be publicly reaffirmed. My visit has given me the opportunity to reaffirm the ideals which we share and the affection that exists between our people -- without which the formalities of alliance would be meaningless, but from the certainty of which our two countries continue to draw strength.

The Government of Romania has implemented a decree requiring any Romanian citizen wishing to emigrate to repay in convertible currency the costs of education received beyond the compulsory level. This decree conflicts with the letter and spirit of section 402 of the Trade Act of 1974, which is intended to remove barriers to freedom of emigration. I therefore declare my intention to terminate Romania's most-favored-nation tariff status and other benefits effective June 30, 1983, if the education repayment decree remains in force on that date.

Forgive me for a bit of nostalgia here. I remember so well those previous eight times, and many of them during those happy days in Sacramento. And this time, I can claim the best of both worlds: a California homecoming and a reunion with my fellow members of the Commonwealth Club -- all wrapped up in one. And Nancy and I couldn't think of a better way to spend our anniversary.

But it is a pleasure to be back here where the crossroads of trade are meeting places for ideas that stretch our sights to the limits of the horizon and beyond. This Golden Gate city is a place where entrepreneurs with great dreams, daring, and determination chart new paths to progress through the winds and waters of commerce.

You provide an appropriate setting for an American challenge for the eighties. With the help of your vision, courage, and leadership, we can begin the first leg of a new voyage into the future, a future in which commerce will be king, the eagle will soar, and America will be the mightiest trading nation on Earth.

Our forefathers didn't shed their blood to create this Union so that we could become a victim nation. We're not sons and daughters of second-rate stock. We have no mission of mediocrity. We were born to carry liberty's banner and build the very meaning of progress, and our opportunities have never been greater. We can improve the well-being of our people, and we can enhance the forces for democracy, freedom, peace, and human fulfillment around the world, if we stand up for principles of trade expansion through freer markets and greater competition among nations.

In dealing with our economy, more is in question than just prosperity. Ultimately, peace and freedom are at stake. The United States took the lead after World War II in creating an international trading and financial system that limited government's ability to disrupt trade. We did this because history had taught us the freer the flow of trade across borders, the greater the world economic progress and the greater the impetus for world peace.

Western security and the confidence of the people of the free world. Too many otherwise free nations adopted policies of government intervention in the marketplace. Many people began thinking that equity was incompatible with growth, and they argued for no-growth societies, for policies that undermined free markets and compromised our collective security.

There can be no real security without a strong Western economy, and there can be no freedom unless we preserve the open and competitive international and financial systems that we created after World War II. Prosperity alone cannot restore confidence or protect our basic values. We must also remember our objectives of peace and freedom, and then we can build a prosperity that will, once again, lift our heads and renew our spirits.

Now, I'm not going to minimize the problems that we face or the long, tough road that we must travel to solve them. For a quarter of a century after the Second World War, we exported more goods each year to the rest of the world than we imported. We accumulated a surplus of funds which was invested at home and abroad, and which created jobs and increased economic prosperity. But during the past decade, we began importing more than we were exporting. Since 1976 imports have exceeded exports every year, and our trade deficit is expected to rise sharply in this year of 1983.

In the past few years, high, real interest rates have inhibited investment, greatly increased the value of the dollar, and made our goods -- as a result -- less competitive. High interest rates reflect skepticism by financial markets that our government has the courage to keep inflation down by reducing deficit spending.

Well, if the history of our great nation and the character of this breed called American mean anything at all, it is that when we have believed in ourselves, when we pulled together, putting our wisdom and faith into action, we made the future work for us. And we can do that now.

Every citizen has a role and a stake in helping the United States meet her trade challenge in the eighties. We need jobs. Well, one of the best job programs we can have is a great national drive to expand exports, and that's part of our program.

We have only to look beyond our own borders. The potential for growth is enormous: a $2 trillion market abroad, a chance to create millions of jobs and more income security for our people. We have barely seen the tip of that iceberg. Four out of five new manufacturing jobs created in the last 5 years were in export-related industries, and yet 90 percent of American manufacturers do not export at all. We believe tens of thousands of U.S. producers offer products and services which can be competitive abroad. Now, many of these are small- and medium-sized firms.

But progress begins at home. Our economic reforms are based on time-tested principles: spending and monetary restraint to bring down inflation and interest rates and to give leaders [lenders] confidence in long-term price stability; less regulatory interference so as to stimulate greater competition; and growth of enterprise and employment through tax incentives to encourage work, thrift, investment, and productivity.

Now, we've suffered a long, painful recession brought about by more than a decade of overtaxing and spending and, yes, government intervention. But recession is giving way to a rainbow of recovery, reflecting a renaissance in enterprise. America is on the mend.

Inflation has plunged from 12.4 percent in 1980 to just 3.8 in the last 12 months. And in the last 6 months, it's been running at 1.4. We've sought common sense in government and competition, not controls in the marketplace. Two years ago, we accelerated the deregulation of crude oil, and we heard ourselves denounced for fueling inflation. Well, the national average for a gallon of gasoline when we took office was $1.27, and now you can buy it in most places for less than a dollar. The prime interest rate was a crippling 21\1/2\ percent. Now, it's down to 10\1/2\. Tax rates have been cut. Real wages are improving. Personal savings and productivity are growing again. The stock market has hit a record high. Venture capital investments have reached record levels. Production in housing, autos, and steel is gaining strength. And new breakthroughs in high technology are busting out all over. Katy, bar the door. We're on our way back.

Well, maybe I'm old-fashioned, but I don't think pitting one group of Americans against another is what the Founding Fathers had in mind. This nation was not built on a foundation of envy and resentment. The dream I've always believed in is, no matter who you are, no matter where you come from, if you work hard, pull yourself up and succeed, then, by golly, you deserve life's prize.

And trying for that prize made America the greatest nation on Earth. Let us create more opportunities for all our citizens. And let us encourage achievement and excellence. We want America to be a nation of winners again.

So you might as well know that we will not turn our backs on the principles of our recovery program, especially on the principles of free trade. The great English historian, Thomas Babington Macaulay, wrote more than a century ago that free trade, one of the greatest blessings which a government can confer on a people, is unpopular in almost every country. Well, for some, times haven't changed.

There's a great hue and cry for us to bend to protectionist pressures. Well, I've been around long enough to remember that when we did that once before in this century, something called Smoot-Hawley, we lived through a nightmare. World trade fell by 60 percent, contributing to the Great Depression and to the political turmoil that led to World War II.

We must plug the holes in the boat of open markets and free trade and set sail again in the direction of prosperity. No one, no one should mistake our determination to use our full power and influence to prevent anyone from destroying the boat and sinking us all. There's a fundamental difference between positive support of legitimate American interests and rights in world trade and the negative actions of protectionists. Free trade can only survive if all parties play by the same rules. But we're determined to ensure equity in our markets. Defending workers in industries from unfair and predatory trade practices is not protectionism, it's legitimate action under U.S. and international law.

Now, one example of protectionist legislation that could quickly sabotage recovery is the local content rule. This legislation, proposed in the Congress, would force foreign and domestic manufacturers of automobiles sold in the United States to build their cars with an escalating percentage of U.S. parts and domestic labor. The Congressional Budget Office concluded that this would destroy more jobs than it would save. And that's true. It would add substantially to the cost of a new car.

What the proponents of this bunker mentality never point out is that the costs of protectionism for one group of workers are always passed on to another group down the line. And once such legislation is passed, every other industry would be a target for foreign retaliation. We would buy less from our partners. They'd buy less from us. The world economic pie would shrink. Chances for political turmoil would increase dramatically.

Rather than reacting in fear with beggar-thy-neighbor policies, let us lead from strength and believe in our abilities. Let's work at home and abroad to enhance the ability of U.S. producers and industries to compete on a fair and equal basis in the international marketplace.

We're very excited about some landmark legislation that I signed last year -- signed, as a matter of fact, here in California -- the Export Trading Company Act. It's an innovative idea based on teamwork. I'm confident it will create thousands of new exporters, and I hope some of them are sitting in this room. The law is designed to attract manufacturers, export-management companies, banks, freight-forwarders, and other export services into joint efforts to gain foreign markets.

The Commerce Department is holding seminars across the country to promote the legislation, and the response has been remarkable. Thousands have attended and, in some cases, the numbers were so overwhelming people had to be turned away. The majority of attendees have not been lawyers, tax accountants or, forgive me, bankers -- [laughter] -- but business people, the people who can take this legislation and use it. They can expand our markets, become exporters, or sell to export trading companies who can do it for them. The bottom line will be a breakthrough in exports, higher growth, lower deficits, and a tremendous surge in new jobs and opportunities for our people. Each billion dollars that we add in exports means tens of thousands of new jobs.

More companies will seek the world of exports when they realize that government is not an adversary. It's your partner, and I don't mean senior partner. We have eased, substantially, taxation of foreign-earned income and introduced a 25-percent tax credit for research and development. We're also working to reform the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, not to weaken safeguards against bribery but to remove disincentives that discourage legitimate business transactions overseas.

Another obstacle is export controls on technology. A backlog of 2,000 applications greeted us when we arrived in office. Well, we eliminated those and relaxed export controls on low technology items that do not jeopardize our national security. Still, there are limits. I'm confident each of you understands that we must avoid strengthening those who wish us ill by pursuing short-term profits at the expense of free world security. Trade must serve the cause of freedom, not the foes of freedom.

We're also designing a tax alternative to the Domestic International Sales Corporation that will fully maintain existing incentives to our exporters. We've begun a Commodity Credit Corporation blended export credit program for our farmers, and that's in addition to the increases this year in the regular loan guarantee program for promoting U.S. farm exports.

Silicon Valley -- and to revive our leadership in manufacturing, we've implemented an R. & D. policy to enhance the competitiveness of U.S. industry in the world economy. In our 1984 budget, we've asked for significant increases for basic research, and we will seek to improve the teaching of science and mathematics in secondary schools so tomorrow's work force can better contribute to economic growth. We will also seek to encourage greater and more creative interaction between university and industry scientists and engineers, through programs similar to the one between Hewlett Packard and Stanford University. Finally, we're taking steps to encourage more industrial R. & D. through changes in our tax and antitrust policy, and we will attempt to remove legal impediments that prevent inventors of new technology from reaping the rewards of their discoveries.

Supporting American producers gives us the means to press our trading partners toward more free and open markets. We're challenging the unfair agricultural trade practices of Japan and the European Community, and we're charting a new course for the products of the future. We have agreed to a work program with the government of Japan to eliminate trade and investment barriers to high technology industries. We have also established a working group with the Japanese to actively explore opportunities for the development of abundant energy resources.

America is leading its trading partners toward renewed growth around the world. The world economy, like ours, has been through a wrenching experience -- a decade of inflation, ballooning government spending, and creeping constraints on productive enterprise. Other countries, including many of the developing countries, are now making major efforts to restrain inflation and restore growth. The United States applauds these efforts, and we're working in the International Monetary Fund to keep a firm focus on the role of effective domestic policies in the growth and stability of the world economy.

But for all countries, international trade and financial flows are extremely important. Either the free world continues to move forward and sustain the postwar drive toward more open markets, or we risk sliding back to the tragic mistakes of the thirties, when governments convinced themselves that bureaucrats could do it better than entrepreneurs. The choice we make affects not only our prosperity but our peace and freedom. If we abandon the principle of limiting government intervention in the world economy, political conflicts will multiply and peace will suffer. And that's no choice at all.

The United States will carry the banner for free trade and a responsible financial system. These were the great principles at Bretton Woods, New Hampshire, in 1944, and they remain the core of U.S. policy. We will do so, well aware of the changes that have occurred in the international trade and monetary system.

In trade, for example, we've practically eliminated the barriers which industrial countries maintain at the border on manufactured products. Today, tariffs among these countries average less than 5 percent. Our problems arise instead from nontariff barriers which often reflect basic differences in domestic economic policies and structures among countries. These barriers are tougher to remove. Well, we're determined to reduce government intervention as far as possible and, where that is unrealistic, to insist on limits to such intervention.

In trade with developing countries, on the other hand, tariffs and quotas still play a significant role. Here, the task is to find a way to integrate the developing countries into the liberal trading order of lower tariffs and dismantled quotas. They must come to experience the full benefits and responsibilities of the system that has produced unprecedented prosperity among the industrial countries.

We've taken the lead, proposing the Caribbean Basin Initiative to encourage poor- and middle-income countries to trade more, and we proposed a North-South round of trade negotiations to maintain expanding trading opportunities for more advanced developing countries.

At the GATT ministerial meeting last November, the United States took the lead in resisting protectionism, strengthening existing institutions, and addressing the key trade issues of the future. While we're not totally satisfied with the outcome of that meeting, we'll continue in our support of free and equal trade opportunities for all countries.

Expanding trade is also the answer to our most pressing international financial problem -- the mounting debt of many developing countries. Without the opportunity to export, debt-troubled countries will have difficulty servicing, and eventually reducing, their large debts. Meanwhile, the United States will support the efforts of the international financial community to provide adequate financing to sustain trade and to encourage developing countries in the efforts they are making to improve the basic elements of their domestic economic programs.

Earlier this week I forwarded draft legislation to the Congress for additional American support for the International Monetary Fund. Leading by the IMF has a -- or lending, I should say, has a direct impact on American jobs and supports continued leading -- or lending by commercial institutions. If such lending were to stop, the consequences for the American economy would be very negative.

This spring, in May, the United States will host the annual economic summit of the major industrial countries in Williamsburg, Virginia. The leaders of the greatest democracies will have a quiet opportunity to discuss the critical issues of domestic and international economic policy and reflect on their individual and collective responsibilities to free peoples throughout the world. It's not a forum for decisionmaking. Each leader is responsible primarily to his or her own electorate.

And may I just interject here, something brand new in international relations has been brought about by one Prime Minister, Margaret Thatcher. When we sit around those summit tables, the protocol is gone, and we're all on a first-name basis.

Well, my dream for America, and I know it's one you share, is to take that kind of success story and multiply it by a million. We can do it. Albert Einstein told us, ``Everything that is really great and inspiring is created by individuals who labor in freedom.'' With all the wisdom in our minds, and all the love in our hearts, let's give of ourselves and make these coming years the greatest America has ever known.

We had almost 800,000 documents which we were ready to make completely available to them, and they turned us down. There were less than 100 documents which the Justice Department felt would have violated the principle of confidentiality, because they dealt with litigation and pending cases of that kind, and that this, in the hands of someone who might leak the information, could be adverse to what we might be faced with in such litigation. So, this decision was made by the Justice Department in keeping, I might add, with the tradition of executive privilege that goes all the way back to George Washington.

Justice Department as we have suggested, but are first made public -- and many of them without any substantiation -- we have made available to the congressional committees all of the documents. And those in which the Justice Department believes there is some sensitive thing, having to do with this litigation and so forth, are whited-out. But then they are able to -- we will tell them and inform them what is the nature of what is whited-out. So that in reality, they are being offered and given everything. And I think what's happened to them is their eyes have started to glaze over. There are so many documents, and they don't know how to get out of their request.

The President. Well, we're doing everything that we can to speed this up, because we believe that to bring the Arab nations that -- you might say, the more moderate Arab nations that have expressed to us now a willingness to negotiate with Israel and try to arrive at a long-term peace arrangement in the Middle East. But they have predicated it on that Lebanon must be allowed now to resume sovereignty over its own nation. And this calls for the leaving of Lebanese soil of all foreign troops -- the Israelis, the Syrians, and the remnants of the PLO that are still in there.

There has been some reason for optimism in the last few days. We have Ambassador Habib and his assistant, Philip Draper, over there helping in this negotiation. But we do want to get that settled and get to the table, then, on the whole, overall matter of international peace. And I can tell you, we will not retreat from every effort that is open to us to bring that about.

Mr. Weller. Now, back to our own hemisphere. The recent request for escalation of military aid to El Salvador appears to be the beginning of a replay of the early days of Vietnam. What assurances can you offer that this is not the case?

The President. I can give you assurances. And there is no parallel whatsoever with Vietnam. We have the instance here of a government, duly elected. And just a short time ago -- an election -- the people of El Salvador proved their desire for order in their country, and democracy, and that they had no sympathy whatsoever for the rebels who are armed, who are trained by countries such as Cuba and others of the Iron Curtain countries. They're supplied with weapons that come in by way of Nicaragua.

The threat is more to the entire Western Hemisphere and toward the area than it is to one country. If they get a foothold, and with Nicaragua already there, and El Salvador should fall as a result of this armed violence on the part of the guerrillas, I think Costa Rica, Honduras, Panama, all of these would follow. And I ask anyone -- 50 percent of everything that we have to import comes through the Caribbean, through the Panama Canal. It is vital to us that democracy be allowed to succeed in these countries, as I say it did in that last election.

Now, right now, El Salvador is considering calling a new election, hopefully before the year is out. But we had a bipartisan team of Congressmen go down and witness that last election, observe. The stories they came back with! They were converted, any who had had any doubts.

They told of a grandmother standing in that line who had been threatened by the guerrillas that if she voted on that day -- and incidentally, they had destroyed and bombed and burned over 150 buses so that people had to walk for miles in the hot sun to get to a polling place, but they did.

And they stood in line for hours. This woman said to them, ``You can kill me. You can kill my family. You can kill my neighbors. You can't kill us all.'' Another woman stood in the line and refused to leave the line. She had been shot by the guerrillas, wounded, and refused treatment until she had been able to mark that ballot. Then she would submit to treatment. And they came back, and we're convinced that, sure, there are things to be corrected down there, but we're working with them.

Now, what we mean by expansion is that we have a limit on 55 of our military personnel, only for the sake of training their forces down there. And they need that training. So far, we've only averaged -- for the last couple of years -- 37 of those 55 positions being filled. And right now, there are 45. We may want to go beyond that 55. But in no sense are we speaking of participation in combat by American forces. We are trying to give economic aid, which is necessary to their economy because of the destruction of powerplants and bridges and things of this kind, and industries. And we believe that the Government of El Salvador is on the frontline in a battle that is really aimed at the very heart of the Western Hemisphere, and eventually at us.

The President. Yes. As a matter of fact, we really had an example just the other day, when we started out here on this trip, of bipartisanship, when the all-powerful Ways and Means Committee -- heavily Democratic, of course, with a majority in the House -- chaired by Dan Rostenkowski, Democrat Representative, with Barber Conable, our minority leader, on that Committee -- when they brought out -- I think the vote was 33 to 2 -- the recommendation for the Commission's plan for social security, to restore its fiscal integrity. Now, that still will leave additional legislation, because that solves the short-range problem, and for a number of years, and gives us time, then, to deal with an actuarial imbalance that still exists out on the long-range, the 75-year plan for social security.

We are studying and looking at -- including that, the proposal there, as to whether that is the way to go -- but at a simplification of the tax structure. It is very much needed, and we would like to be able to bring it to the people.

Cyclical unemployment results from changes in the business cycle, the ups and downs of the overall economy. Almost half of our current unemployment program [problem] is cyclical -- the direct result of the recession. The best cure for cyclical unemployment is to get the economy moving again, and our economic program is doing just that.

Recently, the figures for industrial production, housing starts and sales and new orders for manufactured durable goods have all been good news. Just this week the index of leading economic indicators, a harbinger of what's to come, registered the biggest single jump in 33 years.

This improving economy will assist those who suffer from cyclical unemployment as business picks up and workers are called back to stores, factories, offices, and construction sites around the country.

We can move up job opportunities by accelerating certain government projects and aiding those in deep distress. The Congress and I are working out our differences on such legislation right now, and I would hope it could be on my desk for signature within the next week.

Now, the other kind of unemployment is structural. Structural unemployment is not the result of temporary slumps in the economy. It is caused by deep and lasting changes in science, technology, competitiveness, and skills. The structurally unemployed are those who don't have the skills demanded in today's workplace. Generally, we're talking about the long-term unemployed -- the displaced workers from declining industries and the young who lack work training and experience.

I know this is pretty dry stuff, but I think it's important to explain because structural unemployment is a problem that will be with us for some time. And, remember, that behind those dry terms are people -- black teenagers who desperately want a first job and older workers grappling with the adjustment of losing their life's work.

Up until now, no one has successfully addressed structural unemployment on a national scale. But next week, I will send the Congress a proposal that brings some important new approaches to the problem. We want to provide incentives for businesses to hire the long-term unemployed.

Under our proposal, a worker who's been unemployed for an extended period could convert the unemployment benefits he receives into job vouchers which would entitle his new employer to a tax credit. The overwhelming majority of those who've been unemployed for long periods would gladly trade their benefits for a job, if they could only find one. What they're looking for is an opportunity to become productive again. This voucher system gives them a better chance to do just that.

Training Partnership Act that helps displaced workers. This program will offer matching grants to the States for retraining, job search, and relocation assistance to displaced workers. And we also propose allowing States to use up to 2 percent of their unemployment insurance tax revenues -- that could mean an estimated $374 million of additional funds -- for reemployment assistance.

And, of course, I'm asking the Congress for over $3 billion for those programs that last year replaced the ineffective CETA program, where only 18 percent of the money was actually used for training the unskilled.

That old cliche that you can't get a job until you have experience and you can't get experience until you have a job really is true for too many young people, especially our minority young people, among whom the unemployment rate is a staggering 45 percent for black teenagers. One of the main reasons many youngsters have difficulty finding jobs, especially their first job, is the minimum wage. Employers simply aren't willing to pay this set wage rate to youth with no work experience. So, to help young people find jobs, I propose a youth opportunity wage at $2\1/2\ per hour, 25 percent below the regular minimum rate of $3.35.

Young people, of course, don't have to accept this amount, and I know many will be able to command the regular minimum wage. But this new wage will allow youngsters who don't have any experience to make a start in the workplace. What we're trying to do is get them some experience so they can move up the payscale.

Some people have feared that as a result of the new youth wage, businesses would replace adults with young people. Well, we've taken precautions so that won't happen. First of all, the youth wage will only be available during the summer months, when kids are out of school. And second, we will add provisions that absolutely prohibit businesses from displacing current workers by hiring young people at a lesser wage.

The American economy is on the mend. And one of the reasons is that we've finally begun to correct some of the past errors of government that brought on inflation, high interest rates, and recession. But as the economy mends, government can help to ease the painful transition for many of our people. The proposals I've outlined today do this by assisting the unemployed in finding the training, the help, and the jobs they desire and deserve.

The President. Let me, without directly replying to the things that have been said -- because I know we'll take care of that in the question-and-answer session that follows -- but Governor Atiyeh, Senator Hatfield, and Congressman Smith, and the people of Klamath Falls, I want to thank you all for welcoming me here and for these informative reports.

These are critical times, I know, for your industry, your workers, and your families. But my visit here and our improving economy convince me that together we can and will put the people of Klamath Falls and the rest of America back to work.

First, let me say what a pleasure it is for me to be in the great Northwest. When the rest of the country hears the name ``Oregon,'' I think everyone thinks of a rich, green land that lured so many west -- explorers, traders, and lumberjacks -- to a State of tall timber and wilderness. And when William Cullen Bryant wrote that ``forest groves were God's first temples,'' he must have seen the majestic sweep of Oregon in his mind's eye.

But, as you've said, Oregon and our mighty lumber industry have suffered greatly from this last recession -- mills shut down, workers were laid off, and businesses closed across the State. These problems were triggered by profligate spending, excessive taxation, and burdensome regulations imposed from the other side of the Nation, in Washington, D.C. Deficit spending and a tax system which allow the Federal Government to profit from inflation drove up prices. Interest rates hit 21\1/2\ percent. And suddenly the American dream of owning a home seemed an impossibility for millions of people.

With the housing industry on the rocks, the lumber industry ground to a halt. And Oregon's mills and forests fell silent. But in 1980 the people of Oregon, recognizing what was happening, voted an unmistakable mandate to clean up our economic mess. And in the last 2 years, that's just what I think we've been doing in Washington.

We've begun returning America to the strict principles of economic responsibility that made us great in the first place. We've made great strides toward limiting government's role in our marketplace and in the lives of our people. We've cut the growth in new regulations by a third, and government's rate of growth by 40 percent.

Incentive, hard work, and savings are being rewarded again by a reformed tax policy. We offset the largest tax hike in history that had been passed during the previous administration -- we offset it with the largest tax cut in history. A third installment of the tax-cut rate will take effect in a few, short months. And America's working families will reap the most benefits. Our tax indexing provision also ensures that cost-of-living raises won't push workers into higher tax brackets.

Meanwhile, we're tackling the monster of deficit spending, which still threatens the road to recovery. We've proposed a budget and a fiscal plan that will steadily reduce Federal deficits until eventually we balance the Federal budget. As a result, the economy is finally revving up.

America. Inflation has risen at an annual rate of only 1.4 percent for the last 6 months. And that's down from the agonizing 12.4 percent, which was the annual rate when we took office. That success, along with a moderate monetary policy, has enabled interest rates to come down, key to our recovery.

Many people just don't realize the parallel between the two. And this was why inflation was our prime target from the very first day in office. If you're going to lend money and the value of that money is depreciating because of inflation, you have to get an interest rate high enough to not only bring an earning on your money but to offset that depreciated value so that when the dollars are given back you receive the same purchasing power that you loaned in the first place.

Well, those rates dropped again last week and are now less than half of what they were in 1980. I believe they're going to go down even farther. Lower, more realistic interest rates are unlocking the chains that are binding our people, our businesses, and our economy. Still more improvement will free us to create the kind of prosperity that was our heritage and that we must restore for ourselves and for our children.

Already, overall productivity is improving. Our automobile industry is rebounding, and real wages are rising for the first time in several years. Unemployment, though still painfully high, has begun to dip, and the leading economic indicators have been signaling recovery for 8 out of the last 10 months. The latest report on those indicators released this week showed the largest monthly gain in more than 30 years.

Now, all this is good news for Klamath Falls, for Oregon, and for America. After nearly a 3-year slump, the forest products industry is coming back. I just left a lumber mill that has reopened, and I can tell you the whir of the machinery there was music to my ears. Since February of 1982, about 475 plywood mills and sawmills around the country have reopened or resumed full production. Here in the West, the number of employees directly affected by sawmill closures or production curtailments is half what it was a year ago.

Loggers and sawmill workers are going back to work. And when people in Klamath Falls go back to work, it means that papermakers, carpenters, homebuilders, and an endless array of others across America are also being called back to the job.

Your industry is still operating far below capacity, and many thousands of workers here still wait for that call-back notice. But our recovery is building and gaining in strength. And I believe it will be powerful and sustained.

We've had seven previous recessions since World War II in every one of which government rode to the rescue with a quick fix and an artificial stimulant and guaranteed that in anything from 2 to 3 years we would have another recession -- and it was always worse than the last. Each one started with a higher level of unemployment to begin with and with a higher inflation rate. This time we've tried to go back to the basic rules of economics that built this country and have a recovery that is based on commonsense business practices and that will be lasting and that will be without inflation.

I believe it will be powerful and sustained -- this recovery. It should be because, as I say, it is the result of time-tested, commonsense economic principles that have worked when they've been tried.

When I began speaking today, I described how other Americans view your abundant national wealth out here. I would like to add that when we think of your people, we think of independent men and women of strength and foresight, imbued with a frontier spirit. I wish the rest of the country could see and hear what I have today, because they would realize how richly that reputation is deserved. I think they'd appreciate, as I do, that the Oregon spirit is the American spirit and that with that spirit, there is no challenge too great for us to overcome.

They say that out here in the great Northwest the trees grow so high that it takes a whole week to see the top of them. Well, it's that way with good results, too. Sometimes the reward comes a long spell after you begin the effort. But anyone who's looked out over the top of an Oregon forest knows how worthwhile the wait can be.

So, I thank you for your vision, your hard work, and your faith in America. And together we're putting our country to rights again, and I think it'll be worth the effort and the wait. And I thank you for giving me this opportunity, and God bless you all.

I recognize some of the problems that have been pointed out here. I have a man right now working, investigating everything administrative that can be done with regard to this particular problem here. And we are going to continue to work on that to find out, first of all, all that we can do administratively.

Q. Mr. President, since last fall, our company employment has increased by over 750 full-time jobs. All of our plywood plants are now running. And we've realized a 13-percent productivity improvement in that same period. Now, this improvement is partly because of market recoveries.

The President. Yes. I don't think there would be any change in that at all. And, as a matter of fact, all of you know better than most some great misunderstanding, for example, about our national forests and the BLM land and all.

And I'm amazed, and I know you're all aware, of what people think is nature being preserved, but how such a useless tangle and then the taking over by lesser valued trees is taking place because there is a lack of harvesting in there that would keep those forests more alive and what they were supposed to be. But the tangle of downed trees that have been allowed to mature, grow old, and then, before their harvest, succumb to insect and age reveals that we have a long way to go in recognizing the assets we have and making full use of them, and at the same time retaining better forestland for those who want it for recreational purposes and all than we presently have.

Q. Mr. President, our company and many other small companies like ours have endured heavy financial losses in the last couple of years. We can't survive another downturn. Can we count on interest rates continuing at their present levels or, hopefully, lower?

The President. Hopefully, lower, because we're going to continue the fight against inflation that -- you know, most people have forgotten that for more than 30 years inflation was a deliberate, planned government policy. They called it ``the new economics.'' And I remember being out on the mashed-potato circuit about 25 years ago complaining about it, that it wouldn't work. They said that a little inflation was necessary to maintain prosperity. Well, I said a little inflation is like radioactivity. It's cumulative. And pretty soon, it gets out of control -- as it has.

And, as I say, these last 6 months -- for the year of '82, the official annual rate was 3.8, down from that 12.4. But for the last 6 months, it had been running at 1.4. And even industry had a part in contributing to institutionalizing that. When industry yielded wage contracts that raised wages above increase in productivity, then that became an increase in price that had to be passed on to the customer. And, thus, you built in further inflation. So, industry, itself, has got a hand in this battle; labor has a handle in this battle to ensure the projecton.

Q. Mr. President, we understand your recent recommendations concerning the deregulation of natural gas allows for a renegotiation of the contracts. Is it possible for this type of approach to be used in reference to government timber sale contracts?

We know there are two industries in this country that -- either one of them alone can start a depression or recession: the housing industry, the automobile industry. And because of the high interest rates, we got a double-whammy. It came from both. And it started, it was evident, clear back in late '78 and in '79, and just kept on skyrocketing and going to the present situation that we have.

So, those are all things that we want to look at, because we realize that half of the unemployment today may be structural and is -- the need for training for new industries and new jobs. The other half of it is brought on by the recession. And the only way to get that half back to work is to get this economy moving again.

Q. Mr. President, you may be aware that proposed additional wilderness legislation in the West would take millions of acres of land from our existing timber base. Would you consider vetoing any unreasonable wilderness proposals?

But I know that problem also. And, you know, there has been a great effort spread over a number of years by the Government to get possession of more land. Now, the United States Government owns one-third of all the real estate in the United States. And the bulk of that is here in the West.

In '66, when I was running for Governor -- and I remember I addressed a forestry products group in San Francisco, and my opponent went out and said that I, in my address, had said that if you've seen one tree, you've seen them all. I never said any such thing. But then it was outdoor recreational land. You remember that there was a big wave. They were even foreclosing on some mining claims, and they were buying up land and using eminent domain to do it, claiming that it was needed for the future so there would be outdoor recreational space. Well, finally when they'd exhausted about all they could do with that, then came the environmental surge and the urge that -- for the environment -- [inaudible].

But at one time one of the public officials in some of this land acquisition in Washington made a statement that was shocking. He said, ``In the beginning we urged the private ownership in order to get development of the land. Now it is necessary for government to regain control over the land.'' And I realize, yes, there are some areas that I think still should be protected, that are so unique -- I mean, in addition to the 80 million, to add to those. But let's be reasonable and sensible about that. And we intend to be. And if there is definite reason from an esthetic and the uniqueness of the land, a standpoint to do that, to add that to the wilderness, fine; but not to go out on the wholesale amounts that they are talking, because that wasn't the intention, and the private sector has not been guilty of rape of all the natural resources. There is today in the United States as much forest as there was when Washington was at Valley Forge.

Q. The President, many of our mills have their backs against the wall. They actually can't hold out much longer. Could you help to speed up the effort to find a solution to our timber contract problem?

The President. Yes, we shall work as fast as we can. I know that -- some other things -- I know that the threat of some subsidized import into America and so forth is being investigated by ITA, and that report is due in in July. But I know also that our Commerce Department is looking at some of that and expects to have an answer in May, after a thorough investigation.

But, yes, we want to do everything we can, because, as I say, your industry and all that surrounds it, housing and so forth, this can start and this can end a recession, this industry. And it's encouraging that -- and the word that was spoken about employees that are back at work. Just last October, the unemployment in your industry was just about 22 percent. It is now down to 14.1 percent. That's still too high, much too high. But that shows quite a sizable drop from October to the present. And we know that the housing starts are up at a level of about, annualized, a million seven. So, we're going to do everything we can.

Our idea is that -- when I said in my State of the Union address, I know some people cheered the one line, but cheered for the wrong reason -- when I said that government has a part to play, yes, it does. Government has a part to play by not doing the stupid things that it's been doing for so many years and by getting out of the way and getting off the back of business and industry.

Q. Well, Mr. President, we just can't thank you enough for sharing your insight into our forest products industry with us here today. It obviously is a historic day, a memorable occasion for all of us. We will make every effort to build on the spirit of cooperation you have extended to us. We believe we can play a very major role in your economic recovery, and we want to be a major part of it.

Q. Mr. President, we have -- you have a name [plate] sitting in front of you, but this is one that is out of about a 300-year-old Douglas fir. And it's got a little gold chain around there, and it memorializes our visit here in Klamath Falls with our industry here today. And we'd like to have you take that home with you.

It was with profound sadness and sorrow that I learned of the tragic deaths of three special agents of the United States Secret Service who gave their lives today in the service of their country. Pat LaBarge, Don Bejcek, and Don Robinson were professionals in every sense of the word -- men whose duty required the utmost in courage and dedication. Nancy and I extend our deepest sympathy to their wives, children, and families.

I would like to express my admiration and support for President Magana and his Government for announcing Presidential elections this year. The decision reflects the profound desire of President Magana and the Political Commission to achieve political reconciliation and to bring peace to that country. Through the effort of the Government's Peace Commission, the Presidential elections will be free and open to all -- I stress all -- political parties and groups who are committed to the peaceful resolution of disputes. We know that open, fair, free elections in that country is the political solution we all want. But more importantly, the people of El Salvador have already shown what they want. Their courage in going to the polls in overwhelming numbers last March, despite the threats from the insurgent groups, prove they want a political solution too.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Alfred S. Regnery to be Administrator of the Office of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention, Department of Justice. This is a new position.

I am transmitting to the Congress today legislation entitled, ``The Enterprise Zone Employment and Development Act of 1983.'' This legislation will provide for the creation of meaningful jobs within the private sector and the long-term revitalization of our Nation's most depressed areas. It is offered as one element of a comprehensive jobs package intended to attack unemployment, including such other elements as supplemental unemployment benefits, tax credits for hiring the long-term unemployed, a summer youth program, and additional funds for job training and relocation assistance.

Zone legislation in the 98th Congress. While this legislation carries forward the tax and regulatory relief measures of our earlier proposal in the 97th Congress, it contains several important additions which reflect the combined wisdom of the growing coalition supporting this idea, including the ideas of the small business community, State and local officials, labor organizations and the many members of Congress who studied and debated our earlier legislation. We are confident that the net result is strong, farsighted legislation designed to unleash the creative energies of our free market economy in our most distressed urban areas. In these difficult days of high unemployment, the legislation is drafted to be of direct, primary benefit to disadvantaged workers and the long-term unemployed.

The high level of success experienced by the dozen or so State and local Enterprise Zone programs is very encouraging. Prompt Federal action is warranted to bolster State and local efforts, and it is in that spirit that I urge the early enactment of this legislation.

The Enterprise Zone program will improve the private sector's ability to provide new employment opportunities, and in turn, urban regeneration. It creates a productive free market environment in economically depressed areas by reducing taxes, regulations and other government burdens on economic activity. The removal of these burdens will create and expand economic opportunity within the zone areas, allowing business firms and entrepreneurs to create jobs -- particularly for disadvantaged workers -- and expand economic activities.

Enterprise Zones are a fresh approach for promoting economic growth in the inner cities. The old approach relied on heavy government subsidies and central planning. A prime example was the Model Cities program of the 1960s, which concentrated government programs, subsidies and regulations in specific, depressed urban areas. The Enterprise Zone approach would remove government barriers, freeing individuals to create, produce and earn their own wages and profits.

Mindful of the need to control public expenditures, Enterprise Zones require no Federal appropriations other than necessary administrative expenses. Of course, states and cities have the option of allocating existing Federal funds for their Enterprise Zones if they desire, or to appropriate additional funds of their own for such zones.

Enterprise Zones are more than just a Federal initiative. State and local contributions to these zones will be critically important in the competitive, Federal designation of zones, and probably determine whether individual zones succeed or fail. In keeping with Constitutional requirements of federalism, State and local governments retain broad flexibility to develop the contributions to their zones most suitable to local conditions and preferences.

As defined by the Act, eligible areas include all UDAG eligible jurisdictions which have significant unemployment, poverty or population loss. Based on these criteria, currently more than 2,000 cities, rural areas and Indian reservations qualify. The Enterprise Zone program is a potential source of economic assistance to distressed areas of all types, shapes and sizes, all across the country.

Federal designation of nominated zones is not automatic. The Secretary of HUD will evaluate the various applications on a competitive basis, choosing the best applications for the limited number of Federal designations authorized. The key criterion in this competitive process will be the nature and strength of the State and local efforts to remove government burdens and to revitalize Enterprise Zone areas.

Thus, the Federal evaluation of State and local contributions will be highly flexible and not prescriptive. In this regard, the Secretary of HUD will not insist upon any particular item of tax and regulatory relief. A weakness of State and local incentives in one area, such as tax relief, could be offset by greater strength in another area such as regulatory relief.

The Federal tax reductions applying to Enterprise Zones are substantial. They include reductions for employers, employees, entrepreneurs and investors. They include incentives for attracting venture capital, hiring workers, particularly disadvantaged workers, and starting and building up new businesses. They include the reduction, and in some cases elimination, of corporate income taxes, individual income taxes and capital gains taxes.

The cost of the Enterprise Zone tax package should be minimal given the small amount of tax revenue presently generated in Enterprise Zones. Moreover, as the Enterprise Zone concept succeeds, the tax revenue attendant to increased economic activity should offset the tax losses in the initial years.

Title III of the Act describes the Federal regulatory relief applying within Enterprise Zones. Under these provisions, State and local governments may request relief for their Enterprise Zones from any Federal regulation, unless it would directly violate a requirement imposed by statute. There is no authority for any Federal regulatory relief within an Enterprise Zone without a request for such relief from both the State and local governments.

This regulatory relief authority expressly does not apply, however, to regulations designed to protect any person against discrimination because of race, color, religion, sex, marital status, national origin, age or handicap. It also does not cover any regulation whose relaxation would likely present a significant risk to the public safety, including environmental pollution. The minimum wage law would not be covered by this authority because it is specifically imposed and spelled out by statute.

The State and local contributions to the zones need not be costly. For example, regulatory relief, service improvements through privatization, and private sector involvement all entail no budgetary cost. Finally, as with the Federal tax relief, the cost of State and local tax relief should be modest because of the little economic activity currently existing in potential Enterprise Zone areas. State and local expenditures would be reduced as individuals who formerly received government aid are employed in the zone.

The legislation I am sending you today is based on the work of many Members from both sides of the aisle. I encourage these innovative individuals to work for early, bipartisan passage of this legislation.

I am sending to the Congress today legislation that will be of primary benefit to America's disadvantaged citizens in our most depressed areas. The Enterprise Zone Employment and Development Act is part of our comprehensive jobs approach, which will be forwarded later this week and which will include supplemental unemployment benefits, tax credits for hiring the long-term unemployed, additional funds for job training and relocation assistance, and other initiatives. Now that the economic recovery is bringing many laid-off workers back onto the job, it is time we concentrated on longer range problems of unemployment in disadvantaged areas.

The cost of the enterprise zone tax package should be minimal, given the small amount of tax revenue presently generated in enterprise zones. This program provides a great opportunity at a minor cost. The legislation is based on the work of many Members of Congress from both sides of the aisle, and I encourage these innovative individuals to work for early, bipartisan passage.

This legislation says that we as a nation are not stymied by our problems. It says we do have new ideas for the future. And it says to those who need our help the most that we have not forgotten them. We want all our citizens to share in America's recovery, and I believe this legislation will enable us to move closer to that goal.

Television has the power to shape thoughts, stir emotions, and inspire actions. It teaches, it sells, it entertains, it informs, and it has the capacity to influence powerfully the lives and values of our children. They learn much from television about the world, our society, and their place in it.

Television can communicate values that are consistent with our heritage and traditions and can portray those actions and attitudes that make for better citizens. It also can depict themes that are destructive of these values. Recognizing that children are at a formative and vulnerable stage in their lives, many individuals and groups have a great interest in television programming. These concerned citizens are working to improve the quality of television programs viewed by their families.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 7th day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

In recent years the number of poisonings among children has fallen dramatically, due in large measure to the introduction of child-protective packaging. At the community level, poison centers are an essential resource in reducing the incidence of serious injury resulting from accidental ingestions. By providing timely diagnostic and treatment information to medical practitioners and first aid instruction to anxious parents, poison centers have successfully worked to save lives.

Working together as sponsors of National Poison Prevention Week are national medical, pharmacy, nursing, dental, and hospital associations; health and safety groups; organizations representing manufacturers, packagers, and distributors of consumer products, including medicines; the media; and government agencies. Most of these groups have State and local chapters and affiliates that, along with community organizations, are the backbone of what has become a successful nationwide poison prevention program.

The history of American agriculture is an inspiring story of progress and sacrifice, high technology and individual effort, and frustration and success. It reflects the growth of our country from an untamed wilderness to the highly productive nation and world leader it is today.

Despite flood, frost, heat, hail, drought, and disease, Americans enjoy an abundance of diverse and high quality products. Our 2.4 million farms are the foundation for a trillion-dollar agricultural industry which employs 19 million farm people and which is the primary source of food and fiber for a third of a billion of the world's population. Each American farm worker produces enough food and fiber to support nearly 80 people -- a production achievement unmatched anywhere in the world and unparalleled in history.

They reflect the economic development of their country of origin, as well as the scientific advancement and artistic values of the people who produce and use them. Today, millions of Americans collect coins for both pleasure and profit.

Our Founding Fathers envisioned a nation whose strength and vitality would emerge from the ingenuity of its people and their commitment to individual liberty. They understood that a nation's prosperity is dependent on the freedom of its citizens to pursue their hopes, dreams, and creative ambitions. American entrepreneurs and small business owners enthusiastically embraced the challenges of freedom and through the miracle of the marketplace set in motion the forces of economic growth that made our Nation uniquely productive. This pattern of economic development has inspired people throughout the world to look to America for a better life.

The Nation grew as our free enterprise system became the mainspring of American progress by encouraging entrepreneurs to compete in meeting the demand for new products and methods of production. Competition enabled us to develop our human resources more effectively and enrich our society. With each new discovery, our perception of what could be achieved expanded.

Today small business plays an even more vital role in our national life and is responsible for the creation of well over half of the new jobs in our economy. Small business is also in the forefront of utilizing technological advances.

America's entrepreneurs and small business owners are among the most dynamic and innovative leaders of the business community. Their willingness to confront uncertainty with creativity and determination to succeed helps our Nation meet the challenges we face today. This spirit of accomplishment inspires Americans to look toward tomorrow with confidence and anticipation to the new opportunities open to future generations. By taking steps to encourage the formation and success of small businesses, America can help ensure its economic standing in the world.

Youth Exchange Initiative which I announced last May at the White House. For those of you who haven't seen it -- well, first of all, let me say I'm convinced that people-to-people programs like World Showcase and the International Youth Initiative are one of the best ways to build real understanding in the world.

Well, in a few years' time, we Americans will soar into the 21st century and again it will be on the wings of invention and the winds of change. This afternoon, I'd like to explain how you, our young people, can ride those wings and winds of the future to a better life.

Other aspects of the transition are more difficult and painful to bear. A large number of people are unemployed, not because of the recession but because their former jobs were in declining industries. Their skills are not in demand in the post-industrial America. And, as you know, this has caused grievous hardship.

I don't want any of you young people to suffer what some of your parents are experiencing. I want you to have the training and the skills to meet the future. Even without knowing it, you're being prepared for a new age. Many of you already understand better than my generation ever will the possibilities of computers. In some of your homes, the computer is as available as the television set. And I recently learned something quite interesting about video games. Many young people have developed incredible hand, eye, and brain coordination in playing these games. The Air Force believes these kids will be outstanding pilots should they fly our jets. The computerized radar screen in the cockpit is not unlike the computerized video screen. Watch a 12-year-old take evasive action and score multiple hits while playing ``Space Invaders,'' and you will appreciate the skills of tomorrow's pilot.

Now, don't get me wrong. I don't want the youth of this country to run home and tell their parents that the President of the United States says it's all right for them to go ahead and play video games all the time. [Laughter] Homework, sports, and friends still come first. What I am saying is that right now you're being prepared for tomorrow in many ways, and in ways that many of us who are older cannot fully comprehend.

But those of my generation, and now I have to say and of your parents' generation, cannot just assume that you will adapt to the future. We must conscientiously prepare you for the years ahead. We must provide you with a good education, with solid math and science instruction. Not only will math and science serve you well in meeting the future, it'll serve the Nation.

We Americans are still the technological leaders in most fields. And we must keep that edge. But to keep it, we need scientists and engineers and mathematicians. Many of you here today are above average in math and science skills. You have won awards for your knowledge; and you will be among the brightest of tomorrow's work force.

Japan, with a population only about half the size of ours, graduates from its universities more engineers than we do. In Japan, specialized study in mathematics, biology, and physics starts in the sixth grade. Or take the Soviet Union -- Soviet students learn the basic concepts of algebra and geometry in elementary school -- that's elementary school. And then they get 4 more years of advanced mathematics in high school. I have a feeling the kids in the Soviet Union have to hit the books a bit more than American students.

States is a slow learner among the major industrial nations. Like millions of other Americans, I'm a firm believer in the back-to-basics movement, because it is the basics that will best prepare us for the future. I think you would agree that if a young person doesn't receive adequate math and science teaching by age 16, he or she has lost the chance to become a scientist or an engineer.

Well, your generation will need better math and science skills than your fathers' generation. And the America of tomorrow will also need those skills more than the America of today. Since the future is technological, we simply must educate more people in the technological areas. And that's one reason I'm delighted to see more women going into scientific and engineering fields. I am especially pleased that eight women have been selected as astronauts for the shuttle flights -- all with advanced degrees, Ph. D.'s in engineering and physical sciences, two have medical degrees.

The relatively short supply of technically qualified people in the United States is not because we don't have enough students, men or women, interested in tomorrow's job opportunities. In fact, engineering schools have to turn away many qualified students. The principal reason is the shortage of engineering faculty in universities and qualified math and science teachers in the secondary schools. This shortage cannot continue. And I know you'll be happy to hear that we intend to improve the quality of math and science education. And right now we're working with the Congress to determine the funding necessary to begin reducing this shortage. We seek a fiscally responsible initiative in this area -- fair not only to your educational future but your economic future, as well.

Electronics Association's goal is to obtain contributions from its high technology companies equal to 2 percent of their research and development budgets. I also know businesses around the country are loaning computers and other equipment to schools to prepare students for the new age. It's this kind of commitment from the private sector that will eventually help us meet the math and science shortages that we face. That's a great thing -- if our visitors will forgive me for being chauvinistic -- that's a great thing about our country. Once we've determined what the problem is, we take out after it.

I know you young people are bombarded hourly with the problems the Nation faces. And, yes, we do have problems which all of us are working to solve. But you can't become paralyzed by these obstacles. This sounds like something you'll hear at graduation, but you really do have a wonderful future ahead of you. Don't be afraid of it. The future is what America has always represented. My generation wishes it had the years left to us that you have left to you. The things you'll see, the changes that you will experience -- we just can't imagine them all.

Thomas Wolfe that we heard in that program we've just seen, ``To everyone a chance, to all people, regardless of their birth, the right to live, to work, to become whatever their visions can combine to make them.'' This is the promise of America.

You, too, are the promise of America. And I came here to tell you today that I believe very much in you. I believe in your intelligence and your courage and your determination. And when the time arrives, the people of my generation will be very proud to turn America over to your care.

May I just, in the spirit of that program that we saw, also say something about the presence here of our gifts, of this exchange program where you, of the same age, will meet with those from other countries and get to know each other as human beings and as individuals. I have always believed that a lot of the problems in the world come about because people talk about each other instead of to each other. And maybe one day, with programs of this kind, you are setting the stage for the dream that has lived with mankind from the first and earliest days of history, and that is the dream of peace; that one day, knowing each other, it will be impossible for someone to say to you that there must be a war or that you must take arms and do away with these people that you have come to know so well.

And we shall do everything we can to see that this program prospers and goes forward and increases the ability of young generations like your own to meet and become acquainted with others around the world.

I've used up all of my time here, and I know they have other things for me to do, but I don't know that they will be as much of a high spot as this has been. And I just want to say to all of you, thank you, and God bless you all.

Community of Tomorrow (EPCOT) Center. He addressed outstanding math and science students from the central Florida area and guests of the center, after an introduction by Richard Nunis, executive vice president of Disney Enterprises.

Prior to his remarks, the President viewed ``The American Adventure,'' a film and animation presentation depicting a three-century rediscovery of America. The film was presented jointly by the American Express and Coca-Cola Companies and is the centerpiece of World Showcase, that portion of EPCOT which, through pavilion displays, recreates the architecture and culture of nine countries.

Fellowship Program, an educational and cultural exchange program designed to enable outstanding young adults to represent their various countries for 1 year in the pavilions of World Showcase. The fellowship program is part of the President's private sector initiative on international youth exchange.

On May 17, 1982, I transmitted for your consideration a proposed constitutional amendment to restore the simple freedom of our citizens to offer prayer in our public schools and institutions. I know that already this Session there is growing bipartisan support for the amendment and as I forward this package, I am calling on the Congress to act speedily to pass it.

The public expression through prayer of our faith in God is a fundamental part of our American heritage and a privilege which should not be excluded by law from any American school, public or private.

Of all the dispositions and habits which lead to political prosperity, religion and morality are indispensable supports. . . . And let us with caution indulge the supposition that morality can be maintained without religion. . . . [R]eason and experience both forbid us to expect that national morality can prevail in exclusion of religious principle.

I therefore beg leave to move -- that henceforth prayers imploring the assistance of Heaven, and its blessings on our deliberations, be held in this Assembly every morning before we proceed to business. . . .

Just as Benjamin Franklin believed it was beneficial for the Constitutional Convention to begin each day's work with a prayer, I believe that it would be beneficial for our children to have an opportunity to begin each school day in the same manner. Since the law has been construed to prohibit this, I believe that the law should be changed. It is time for the people, through their Congress and the State legislatures, to act, using the means afforded them by the Constitution.

Court and allow prayer back in our schools. However, the amendment also expressly affirms the right of anyone to refrain from prayer. The amendment will allow communities to determine for themselves whether prayer should be permitted in their public schools and to allow individuals to decide for themselves whether they wish to participate in prayer.

I urge that this amendment be quickly adopted, for the vast majority of our people believe there is a need for prayer in our public schools and institutions. I look forward to working with the Congress to achieve the passage of this amendment.

Today, American women of every ethnic origin, creed, and race play a vital role in our cultural, military, economic, social and political life. A woman serves as a Supreme Court Justice; there are women serving as university presidents, members of Congress, doctors, lawyers, astronauts, coal miners, corporate executives, members of the President's Cabinet, ranking military officers and leaders in civil rights, the diplomatic corps, cultural endeavors, private sector initiatives, truck drivers, and, very importantly, mothers and homemakers who continually strengthen the foundation of our country's greatness, the family.

During the past two hundred years, women have fought for the causes of abolition, health reform, elimination of child labor, temperance, voting rights, and improvement of industrial labor conditions. Their energy, persistence, and dedication to these causes have enlightened our Nation as to the needs of our society and frequently quickened our country's effort to effect positive change.

This memorable role of women in our Nation's history has been recorded in the written word and has been told as well in music, on canvas, in stone, and through poetry, novels, and the dance. In recognizing the outstanding achievements of America's women, we pay homage to an essential part of our Nation's heritage.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 8th day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

Our defense policy is based on a very simple premise: The United States will not start fights. We will not be the first to use aggression. We will not seek to occupy other lands or control other peoples. Our strategy is defensive; our aim is to protect the peace by ensuring that no adversaries ever conclude they could best us in a war of their own choosing.

What this means is that we design our defense program not to further ambitions, but to counter threats. Today, and for the foreseeable future, the greatest of these threats comes from the Soviet Union, the only nation with the military power to inflict mortal damage directly on the United States.

This also means that if the American people are asked to support our defense program, they must get the straight facts about this threat. The Defense Department's first edition of ``Soviet Military Power'' gave them those facts; this revised edition will keep them up to date and will give them a new opportunity to compare Soviet forces with our own.

The facts in this book are straightforward. The Soviets have not slowed the pace of their enormous military buildup. In little over a year, they have begun testing new models in almost every class of nuclear weapons. They are dramatically expanding their navy and air force, are training and equipping their ground forces for preemptive attack, and are using their military power to extend their influence and enforce their will in every corner of the globe.

Today, sharing in a very special moment, I say that the glory and honor of this moment belongs to the Lord who made it possible for me to be here and to experience it. And, indeed, the strength that I will call upon in fulfilling the oath that has just been expressed, again, will be His strength.

Mr. President, I cannot express my gratitude to you and my desire to, indeed, symbolize the compassion and caring I know you feel for the American people. In a sense, as a Member of Congress, I saw your prescription for America and, indeed, I could call you ``Dr. Reagan,'' because I believe the medicine is working. Indeed, although we enjoy spring in Washington, in a sense we are enjoying as well the beginning of a harvest of the economic wisdom that you have so wisely shared with our government and with the American people.

But there are still people in need, and they will be my special concerns as Secretary of the people's department of the government. I want to say, Mr. President, that my loyalty to you is not exceeded by any other concern, but it will be expressed in loyalty to the people. In serving the people in the Congress for all these years, I will draw upon that congressional experience and will serve you and the Nation with that same spirit. I will do everything in my power to make you and the Nation proud that a woman has been nominated to head this important department. As awesome as the task is, the resources of the good Lord and your own leadership are unlimited. I draw upon them and thank you for making this moment possible.

Seriously, Margaret is the daughter of Irish immigrants, and her first ambition was to play the concert piano. Lucky for us she chose a political career instead, where she might add harmony in a much more difficult place to create it. [Laughter] And during the 16 years in Congress, Margaret had been known for her boundless energy, her enthusiasm, and she'll need it in the job that she takes on as of today.

Federal department with 142,000 employees and an annual budget of $274 billion. Only two budgets in the world are greater than that -- the entire budget of the United States Government and the budget of the Soviet Union. It's a tough job, and I'm happy that a hard-working, dedicated, and thoroughly decent individual has been named as Secretary of that awesome job.

EPA documents that were considered to be enforcement-sensitive, because I have a constitutional obligation to the people -- and to those who have held this office in the past and will hold it in the future -- to ensure that the integrity of sensitive law enforcement documents be preserved.

I have recognized also, of course, that the legislative branch has legitimate oversight responsibilities as well. Accordingly, in February, pursuant to the suggestion of the U.S. District Court and consistent with the mandates of history, we sought to work out an agreement to accommodate the legitimate interests of both the executive and legislative branches. This was accomplished by the agreement reached with Chairman Levitas on February 18, 1983, which provided a means for Congress to have complete access to the documents sought.

O'Neill, and we have been proceeding to provide such complete access, other committees have demanded that the documents be physically turned over to them before they would accept the information. The debate on this issue, for our part, has been essentially legal. But it is now clear that prolonging this legal debate can only result in a slowing down of the release of information to the Congress -- thereby fostering suspicion in the public's mind that somehow the important doctrine of executive privilege is being used to shield possible wrongdoing. It is not in the public interest that any such suspicion be fostered.

While we continue to assert executive privilege, our concern is that the Congress have this information as soon as possible, with assurances that the enforcement-sensitive materials will be provided the necessary protection in order that their premature public release will not jeopardize our responsibility to enforce the law. We trust that pursuant to the additional agreement reached today with Chairman Dingell, the documents will be provided that protection. This agreement will be available to any other committee that seeks these EPA documents and is willing to abide by its terms.

Nation cleanse its air and water and make wiser use of its lands. I am personally very grateful to you for the fine -- and often courageous -- service you have given, and I share your pride in the progress we have made during your stewardship at EPA.

Over the past several weeks, I have been greatly disappointed that some persons have unjustly attacked you and have made unfair judgments based upon allegations and innuendo alone. You have responded with a grace and straightforwardness that have won you countless admirers across the Nation.

I do so with great regret, but it is now clear that my resignation is essential to termination of the controversy and confusion generated by the outstanding dispute over Congressional access to certain EPA documentary materials. Without an end to these unfortunate difficulties, EPA is disabled from implementing its mandate and you are distracted from pursuing the critical domestic and international goals of your administration.

I came to Washington to serve you, because I believe in you and the direction which you are setting for the country. I know of your strong commitment to the environmental goals of the people of the United States -- the protection of their health, and welfare, cleaner air, cleaner water, the wise use of our land. I have endeavored to reach those goals through a four point program: better quality of science; regulatory reform; more authority and responsibility in state government; and to do a better job of protecting the environment with fewer taxpayer's resources.

We are, in this Administration, for the first time, controlling the disposal of hazardous materials on America's land. We are, in this Administration, for the first time, cleaning up the by-products of a chemical revolution -- the benefits of which we have all enjoyed for the last forty plus years.

We have developed guidelines which will diminish the discharge of toxics into our nation's waterways. We have begun, for the first time, to test and regulate newly developed chemicals as required by the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act in 1976. We have cleared out a backlog of state actions which were pending federal decision making for long periods of time. We have delegated to state government a large share of our duties. And, we have achieved a real reduction in our operating budget and a real reduction in our work force.

I strongly believe that the principal of executive privilege is essential to maintaining the constitutional balance of power, and I have been the staunch defender of that principal since last Fall when I exercised it for you, pursuant to your direction.

To paraphrase your words, Mr. President, I also strongly believe that the privilege should not be exercised in any manner which would erode the confidence of the public in its servant, the government.

I look forward to serving you in a new endeavor in the very near future and hope that this action will terminate the controversy and confusion that has crippled my agency and prevents my dedicated colleagues at the Environmental Protection Agency from doing their jobs.

I want to take this opportunity to express my admiration -- and the gratitude of the American people -- for the responsible, bipartisan spirit the House of Representatives has demonstrated in its prompt passage of the bipartisan plan to save the social security system. I am particularly glad to have had the chance this afternoon to personally thank six leaders who played special roles in making this possible: Speaker of the House Tip O'Neill, Minority Leader Bob Michel, Ways and Means Chairman Dan Rostenkowski, the senior minority member of the committee, Barber Conable, Chairman Jake Pickle of the Subcommittee on Social Security, and, of course, Representative Claude Pepper.

In the months leading up to this critical vote -- and again over the past 24 hours -- we've seen men and women of both parties and many shades of opinion set aside their differences and join together for the good of the country. The result has been a new lease on life for one of our most basic government programs, social security -- a program that, directly or indirectly, affects the present and future well-being of every man, woman, and child in America, and generations yet unborn.

Over long months of study, debate, and deliberation -- and in close cooperation with the executive branch -- a fair, workable plan to save the system was hammered out by the National Commission on Social Security Reform. All of us had to make some compromises and settle for less than what any one faction might consider ideal. But we did it, and, as Speaker O'Neill promised, the House of Representatives has acted promptly and responsibly to pass the resulting bipartisan plan.

That is an achievement we can all take heart from. And I hope and believe it reflects a bipartisan spirit of putting people before party that will guide us all in meeting other national challenges in the days ahead.

The United States has long been a leader in developing customary and conventional law of the sea. Our objectives have consistently been to provide a legal order that will, among other things, facilitate peaceful, international uses of the oceans and provide for equitable and effective management and conservation of marine resources. The United States also recognizes that all nations have an interest in these issues.

Convention that was opened for signature on December 10. We have taken this step because several major problems in the Convention's deep seabed mining provisions are contrary to the interests and principles of industrialized nations and would not help attain the aspirations of developing countries.

However, the convention also contains provisions with respect to traditional uses of the oceans which generally confirm existing maritime law and practice and fairly balance the interests of all states.

First, the United States is prepared to accept and act in accordance with the balance of interests relating to traditional uses of the oceans -- such as navigation and overflight. In this respect, the United States will recognize the rights of other states in the waters off their coasts, as reflected in the Convention, so long as the rights and freedoms of the United States and others under international law are recognized by such coastal states.

Second, the United States will exercise and assert its navigation and overflight rights and freedoms on a worldwide basis in a manner that is consistent with the balance of interests reflected in the convention. The United States will not, however, acquiesce in unilateral acts of other states designed to restrict the rights and freedoms of the international community in navigation and overflight and other related high seas uses.

This will provide United States jurisdiction for mineral resources out to 200 nautical miles that are not on the continental shelf. Recently discovered deposits there could be an important future source of strategic minerals.

Within this Zone all nations will continue to enjoy the high seas rights and freedoms that are not resource related, including the freedoms of navigation and overflight. My proclamation does not change existing United States policies concerning the continental shelf, marine mammals, and fisheries, including highly migratory species of tuna which are not subject to United States jurisdiction. The United States will continue efforts to achieve international agreements for the effective management of these species. The proclamation also reinforces this government's policy of promoting the United States fishing industry.

While international law provides for a right of jurisdiction over marine scientific research within such a zone, the proclamation does not assert this right. I have elected not to do so because of the United States interest in encouraging marine scientific research and avoiding any unneccessary burdens. The United States will nevertheless recognize the right of other coastal states to exercise jurisdiction over marine scientific research within 200 nautical miles of their coasts, if that jurisdiction is exercised reasonably in a manner consistent with international law.

The Exclusive Economic Zone established today will also enable the United States to take limited additional steps to protect the marine environment. In this connection, the United States will continue to work through the International Maritime Organization and other appropriate international organizations to develop uniform international measures for the protection of the marine environment while imposing no unreasonable burdens on commercial shipping.

In addition to the above policy steps, the United States will continue to work with other countries to develop a regime, free of unnecessary political and economic restraints, for mining deep seabed minerals beyond national jurisdiction. Deep seabed mining remains a lawful exercise of the freedom of the high seas open to all nations. The United States will continue to allow its firms to explore for and, when the market permits, exploit these resources.

Now, Therefore, I, Ronald Reagan, by the authority vested in me as President by the Constitution and laws of the United States of America, do hereby proclaim the sovereign rights and jurisdiction of the United States of America and confirm also the rights and freedoms of all States within an Exclusive Economic Zone, as described herein.

The Exclusive Economic Zone of the United States is a zone contiguous to the territorial sea, including zones contiguous to the territorial sea of the United States, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the Commonwealth of the Northern Mariana Islands (to the extent consistent with the Covenant and the United Nations Trusteeship Agreement), and United States overseas territories and possessions. The Exclusive Economic Zone extends to a distance 200 nautical miles from the baseline from which the breadth of the territorial sea is measured. In cases where the maritime boundary with a neighboring State remains to be determined, the boundary of the Exclusive Economic Zone shall be determined by the United States and other State concerned in accordance with equitable principles.

Within the Exclusive Economic Zone, the United States has, to the extent permitted by international law, (a) sovereign rights for the purpose of exploring, exploiting, conserving and managing natural resources, both living and non-living, of the seabed and subsoil and the superjacent waters and with regard to other activities for the economic exploitation and exploration of the zone, such as the production of energy from the water, currents and winds; and (b) jurisdiction with regard to the establishment and use of artificial islands, and installations and structures having economic purposes, and the protection and preservation of the marine environment.

This Proclamation does not change existing United States policies concerning the continental shelf, marine mammals and fisheries, including highly migratory species of tuna which are not subject to United States jurisdiction and require international agreements for effective management.

Economic Zone remains an area beyond the territory and territorial sea of the United States in which all States enjoy the high seas freedoms of navigation, overflight, the laying of submarine cables and pipelines, and other internationally lawful uses of the sea.

Two years ago when I took office, the U.S. economy was suffering from back-to-back years of double digit inflation; interest rates exceeded 20 percent. The Economic Recovery Program which we put in place -- slowing the rate of growth of Federal spending, reducing the Federal tax burden, eliminating unnecessary regulations, and supporting a stable and moderate growth in the money supply -- has cleared the way for recovery and laid the foundation for a period of sustained, noninflationary economic growth. Unfortunately, every economy which has successfully made this transition has experienced a period of increased unemployment. Because the 1981 - 82 recession, closely following the 1980 recession, was longer and deeper than anyone in or out of government had predicted, it sent the unemployment rate to painfully high levels.

Nearly 60 percent of the unemployed had lost their previous jobs and were either looking for new ones or waiting for recall by their previous employers. Nearly 2 million of the unemployed were teenagers most of whom were looking for their first job or struggling with the difficult transition from school to work. Unemployment is particularly painful to the long-term unemployed. About 40 percent of those now out of work have been unemployed for more than 14 weeks and nearly one-fourth have been unemployed for 6 months or longer.

Reducing unemployment without reigniting the fires of inflation is the most significant domestic challenge we face. In designing policies to reduce unemployment, we must first have a clear understanding of its dimensions and its underlying causes.

There are two primary types of unemployment: cyclical unemployment and structural unemployment. Cyclical unemployment results from downturns in business conditions. As the general level of business activity declines, employers reduce their demand for workers, and unemployment increases; as the economy picks up, cyclical unemployment automatically goes down. Structural unemployment, on the other hand, is largely unaffected by swings in business conditions. It can result from the continuous change in a dynamic economy where some industries are declining while others are expanding; from a mismatch of skills needed for available jobs versus the skills in the available work force; from barriers to labor market entry; and from increases in the proportion of the population looking for work. Thus, structural unemployment will remain a problem even after the economy has fully recovered.

The present period of economic stagnation began in January 1980 when the economy went into a brief recession. The recovery that followed later that year was anemic, especially in construction and in many of our basic manufacturing industries. By mid-1981, the short upturn in economic activity could not be maintained, and the economy entered the current recession.

A major part of our current unemployment problem is the result of economic stagnation. The single most effective long-term cure for much of our unemployment problem is to get the economy moving again. There is every reason to believe that we are now on the road to economic recovery. Construction activity, which has significantly contributed to past recoveries, has shown marked improvement in recent months. Industrial production is up for two months in succession.

Automobile sales and new orders for manufacturing goods have also increased. Not least, the unemployment rate, normally a lagging indicator, has finally begun to moderate. The economic assumptions in my budget, which many have characterized as very cautious, project an increase of nearly 5 million additional jobs by the end of 1984. I am confident we can accomplish this without reigniting inflation.

Even after the economy has fully recovered, however, we will still face the challenge of structural unemployment. Government can play an important role in assisting three groups of structurally unemployed workers: the long-term unemployed, displaced workers, and youth.

Only by moving forward on all these fronts can we successfully meet the challenge of structural unemployment. The Employment Act of 1983, which I am sending the Congress today, contains a balanced and comprehensive set of programs to help the long-term unemployed, displaced workers, and youth secure productive jobs in our economy.

Many of the long-term unemployed will continue to face economic hardship during the coming months. Last year I signed legislation to assist them during this difficult period. In my State of the Union Address, I said I would propose the extention and modification of the temporary Federal Supplemental Compensation (FSC) program, which is scheduled to terminate March 31, 1983.

The program I am proposing provides additional unemployment compensation until the end of the current fiscal year to aid those individuals who have exhausted their unemployment insurance benefits and who have demonstrated workforce attachment and have lost their jobs through no fault of their own.

Our proposed extension will also eliminate the unnecessary complexity in the current program while continuing to provide the longest benefit durations in those states with the most severe unemployment problems.

This FSC program should help those who most deserve assistance. Our proposal will ensure this by changing the workforce attachment requirement and excluding voluntary job quitters. This approach is both fair and fiscally responsible.

While unemployment compensation reduces the hardship of being out of work, it does not help the unemployed to find work. We must adopt programs that will help the long-term unemployed secure jobs by providing incentives for businesses to hire them. Therefore, I propose supplementing the extension of FSC with a new job voucher to help the long-term unemployed obtain productive jobs. Under this new program, a worker eligible for FSC will be allowed to convert his or her unemployment benefits into vouchers that would entitle a new employer who hires the individual to receive a tax credit.

The job voucher program will have much broader coverage than existing employment tax credit programs, such as the targeted jobs tax credit. An employer will be able to use the voucher to offset state or Federal unemployment insurance taxes or Federal income tax liabilities. This new incentive to hire the long-term unemployed will extend to all private sector employers including nonprofit institutions. Of course, individual state unemployment trust funds will be reimbursed from Federal general revenues so as not to penalize the states. The employer hiring incentive would last for one year after March 31, 1983, six months beyond the termination date of FSC on October 1, 1983.

Extending FSC and establishing the job voucher program have the advantage that they can be enacted swiftly through Federal legislation. Unlike other elements of the unemployment insurance program, the states would not have to change their legislation. These proposals constitute a cost effective, fair, and efficient program to help those most in need and help them immediately.

Federal, State, and local tax and regulatory relief, and strong neighborhood and local participation, enterprise zones will offer a significant economic incentive to businesses, large and small, looking for opportunities to expand or revitalize their operations. Several provisions in the proposed legislation provide direct benefits and incentives to employers to hire, train, and promote disadvantaged workers, and the long-term unemployed. The increase in economic activity in these zones will offer new job opportunities for individuals and stimulate a revival in distressed local economies.

Displaced workers are a second group suffering structural unemployment. Our economy is currently undergoing extensive changes due to international developments, technological advances, and environmental needs. Many of these changes will help increase our productivity and improve our standard of living. But they also mean that many workers must face significant adjustments as some plants close and individual production lines are idled. While we as a nation must revitalize our industrial base to meet the economic challenges of the 1980s and beyond, we must also vigorously pursue labor market policies which ensure that our experienced workforce has the skills to match the needs of our expanding industries. Sustained economic growth and a rising standard of living can only be fully realized if our labor force receives the necessary training and if it is sufficiently mobile geographically and occupationally.

The Congressional Budget Office estimates that about 15 percent of those currently unemployed are displaced workers, defined as people who have lost their jobs from either declining industries or declining occupations. Of those from declining industries, nearly half are from automobiles, fabricated metals, primary metals, and wearing apparel; more than 60 percent reside in the northeast and midwest. Of those displaced from declining occupations, three-quarters are semi-skilled operatives and laborers.

Achieving enhanced employment security for our experienced work force is a shared responsibility. No single level of government or single segment of society has exclusive responsibility. All have significant roles.

The JTPA establishes a partnership among business, labor, and elected officials at the state and local levels. Through this partnership, the private sector, in cooperation with elected officials, will play a decisive role in planning and implementing programs to assure that training is responsive to the job needs of business and industry.

Since 1935, our unemployment insurance program has served the nation well in providing temporary financial assistance for unemployed workers. But, while income maintenance helps cushion the financial strain of unemployment, it does not directly assist people in finding jobs. I believe we can modify the Unemployment Insurance (UI) system to improve the occupational and geographic mobility of permanently displaced workers without violating the integrity and insurance nature of the system.

Recognizing the unique Federal-State structure of the system and that many different adjustment assistance policies may prove effective, the bill I am sending to the Congress would amend the Federal Unemployment Tax Act to allow states the flexibility to use up to 2 percent of state unemployment insurance tax revenues to pay for training, job search, and relocation assistance.

Young people are a third group suffering from structural unemployment. Unemployment among youth constitutes over 30 percent of our overall unemployment. The rate among the 16 - 21 age group is an unacceptable 23 percent, over twice the national average, and among minority youth, the unemployment rate of 44 percent represents the single most important social labor market problem.

Among adults, unemployment is primarily a matter of financial loss and temporary economic hardship. Most of our nation's youth, on the other hand, live in families in which they are the second or third breadwinner. Unemployment among the majority of youth, therefore, does not usually create severe financial hardship. In 1981, the annual income of families with unemployed youth averaged almost $25,000.

Prolonged periods of unemployment among many youths, however, often lead to serious long-term consequences. First, sustained unemployment can tempt some to channel their energies and ambitions into antisocial or criminal activities. Second, long-term unemployment undermines a young person's potential for success. Recent studies show that those who have prolonged unemployment during their formative years also have less stable employment and diminished earning capacity during their adult years.

Prolonged unemployment among youth is partially due to a lack of initial labor market skills. The problem of skill deficiencies is exacerbated by a lack of career-oriented job opportunities. To combat the problem of skill deficiencies, the Administration worked with Congress to enact the landmark Job Training Partnership Act (JTPA) of 1982. Under the Act, in FY 1984, $724 million in resources are targeted at economically disadvantaged youth in need of training. These resources will provide young people with a fresh chance to develop fully their potential for a productive career.

As a second step toward improving the job skills of our nation's youth, the Administration worked with Congress to extend the Targeted Jobs Tax Credit (TJTC) Program. As part of the extension, the program was modified to target resources more tightly on economically disadvantaged youth.

Enactment of enterprise zone legislation would be a third step in this process of improving employment opportunities for youth, particularly disadvantaged youth in our inner cities and rural areas. However, the problem of youth unemployment is too large and too severe for the Federal government alone to provide the sole remedy. The private sector must also help open up career-oriented job opportunities.

One of the most important causes of the lack of career-oriented jobs in which young people can start their careers is the minimum wage. When many young people first enter the labor market their job skills are well below those of older, experienced workers. In a free market, unhampered by government restrictions, young people could compensate for their relative lack of experience and skills by offering to work for a lower wage. Then, as they gain experience on the job, their growing skills would make them more valuable to employers and they would progress up the pay scale. The minimum wage destroys this opportunity: young people are prevented from offering their services at less than a government mandated wage. Faced with the prospect of hiring an unskilled youth at a wage in excess of the current value of his labor, many firms not surprisingly turn young people away. Unable to get an initial job, many young workers never learn the job skills that are needed to earn more than the minimum wage.

Evidence of the effects of the minimum wage is abundant. For nearly a century and a half, this nation experienced no significant youth unemployment problem. Then, just after the turn of the century, state legislatures began enacting minimum wage laws. At first, these mandated wages were not far from market wages and there was little impact. In 1938, however, the Federal government imposed a Federal minimum wage applicable to firms engaged in interstate commerce. Initially this meant that the Federal minimum wage was largely confined to manufacturing. The Federal minimum wage contributed to declining youth employment in manufacturing. But other industries such as retail trade and the service sector still provided an outlet for the energies of youth who wished to work.

To help those young people who want to work find jobs, I am proposing a youth employment opportunity wage for youngsters under the age of 22. This youth opportunity wage will be $2.50 per hour, 25 percent below the regular minimum wage of $3.35 per hour. Young people will not, of course, be forced to accept the lower wage, and many will receive more than $2.50 an hour.

I am not the first to propose a youth differential minimum wage; indeed, the government more than once has come close to implementing such a proposal. Each time it failed, however, due to concerns that adults would be displaced by younger workers. I am unconvinced by such arguments but I appreciate the concern behind them. Therefore, I am proposing that the youth employment opportunity wage only be effective during the summer -- specifically from May 1 to September 30. This is the period when the greatest number of youth are in the labor market and, therefore, the period in which this proposal will generate the most employment opportunities. By restricting the youth opportunity wage to the summer months, the jobs of older workers will be protected. An employer will not wish to disrupt his or her work force by attempting to use youth during the summer and adults the rest of the year.

To ensure that existing jobs are protected, the Employment Act of 1983 prohibits displacement of current workers by those hired at the youth employment opportunity wage. It also protects the wages of youth employed at the current minimum wage by prohibiting employers from reducing their rate of pay. Thus it expands youth employment opportunities, but not at the expense of older workers.

The Employment Act of 1983 is a balanced and realistic approach to addressing our economy's structural unemployment problem. It provides appropriate incentives for employers to hire the long-term unemployed. It provides needed financial assistance to men and women suffering from the hardship of prolonged joblessness, and provides Federal funds for a cooperative effort by industry, labor, and local officials in assisting displaced workers. It gives States the flexibility needed to further assist these workers, and supplements the major effort already underway to provide meaningful training to our disadvantaged youth by establishing a youth employment opportunity wage which will give all our youth a chance to get the work experience they need.

Our enterprise zone legislation will stimulate new jobs in economically distressed areas. Together these proposals will provide the foundation for expanding job opportunities for our unemployed. I urge the Congress to enact this legislation promptly.

The President. As you well know, I've long been urging that Republicans and Democrats work together in a spirit of bipartisanship to tackle the many great challenges that are facing the country. I'm pleased to note this morning that on two fronts we are making great progress -- social security and jobs.

A bipartisan coalition is also working very hard to produce a responsible jobs bill that will help to put Americans back to work. I strongly support those efforts, but I'm deeply disturbed by the possibility that the jobs bill will suddenly become a Christmas tree for special interest legislation.

In the meantime, there are many other areas where we must also achieve bipartisanship -- on issues ranging from the budget to providing critical assistance for Central America and the Caribbean. And today, I'm sending to the Congress legislation that is very special to me and certainly deserves strong bipartisan support in the Congress. This is a measure to address the problems of the hard-core unemployed. I know that Congress faces a long and imposing agenda this year, but we should take heart that America is finally climbing out of one of our most difficult recessions.

Because we worked so hard over the past 2 years to lay a foundation for economic recovery, we are definitely on the mend. Now, in order to assure a lasting recovery and a lasting peace, we owe it to the American people to make 1983 another year of great accomplishment in the Congress.

Q. Mr. President, on the jobs bill, on the threat of adding Christmas trees to it, the banking industry is trying to put in a provision to exempt themselves from that withholding tax. And your administration has also accused the banking industry of having interest rates that are too high.

The President. Well, all I can say is that this intensive lobbying they've done has led to a great distortion of the situation. Now, they've led many people to believe, or to ignore the fact of how many millions of people would be exempt from any withholding, that this would not -- as a matter of fact, virtually all senior citizens would be exempt. And I think that the banking industry would do a lot better to spend its time thinking about lowering interest rates than lobbying the way they are with regard to this legislation.

The President. You know, Helen, that I've always said that I resist saying in advance whether I will veto or not. There are always exceptions to rules, and this is an exception. Yes, I would veto such legislation.

Q. Mr. President, you talk of bipartisanship, but you seem to be a long way from any kind of bipartisan agreement when it comes to the question of aid for Central America. The Speaker called your version of the situation down there ``greatly overblown.'' Democrat Mr. Tsongas talked about blackmail in the idea that you had to get the money or there would have to be more advisers down there. What about that? And what about the idea that we could just keep on sending money down there, as the other side escalated, until we have ourselves another situation where we're in too deep to get out?

No, I think if you look at this situation honestly, here is a government that has been democratically elected in a country that has had a history back over the decades of military rule and no democracy. It is a government that has embarked on a land reform program, that has moved up an election for the President -- to have it this year instead of next year -- that had in the last election a greater turnout than this country has ever been able to muster, in spite of the fact that the voters were threatened with death by the guerrillas if they attempted to vote.

They are improving their justice system with regard to arresting people that are continuing the violence that once was a pattern in that country. And I think that it is an obligation here to try and help, as we have.

Now, our economic help to that country has been 2 to 1 over military help. And the military help has been limited to spare parts and supplies and so forth and individual trainers. We have had a couple of their battalions come to our country and train, and they are the best of the military down there now. There's a great need for training.

There's no blackmail of any kind intended. But I would like to call attention, also, that in our international aid in many other trouble spots in the world, it does seem peculiar that this is the only one where they seem to be raising objections. And yet, here is one that is a threat to the Western Hemisphere, to our own security, in fact.

The President. Where it ends with is recognition that the people of El Salvador, given a chance at the ballot box, have made it plain that they want order and peace and democracy. And this government there is making every effort to persuade the guerrillas -- to offer amnesty -- to persuade them to come in and participate in the democratic process and not try to shoot their way into a ruling position in government.

And where I think it ends is with a political and an economic solution. We're trying to help them economically. The economy is being destroyed by the guerrillas. Every time we read a little note about a power failure because they'd bombed some powerplant or facility; every time they do away with bridges and highways and transportation and so forth in their guerrilla attacks -- these leave people unemployed and industry stopped and so forth. And there has to be an end to that and a political solution to this problem. And that's what we're aiming at.

Q. Mr. President, you said that Anne Burford did nothing wrong, that she can leave EPA with her head held high. But there are allegations that she talked about -- admitted holding up the clean-up of one dump site because it might help California Governor Jerry Brown. There are also allegations that one of her top aides, James Burford -- rather James Sanderson, was involved in EPA decisions involving his legal clients. When you say that she did nothing wrong while the investigation of those charges is still outstanding, aren't you in effect saying that those practices are all right with you?

The President. No, I'm not saying anything of the kind. And I heard her last night on television make that statement about the site. And she said that possibly she made some remark to that effect. But it had nothing to do with the decision that was made. The decision was made on entirely different and practical grounds. And she also pointed out that with the election over, she still, due to those other reasons, still has not made the decision on that particular site in California.

And we, this administration, can be very proud of our record in environmental protection. And believe me, it tops what we found when we came here. And the fact that she was able to do it with a reduced budget -- well, I've asked everyone in our government to do things with a reduced budget and with fewer employees, if possible. That was what we came in here to do -- to make government more efficient, to eliminate waste and extravagance. And she has revealed that she is far more concerned with the national welfare and is a far bigger person than those people who have been sniping at her and who've been going public with unfounded allegations, accusations, and charges.

And she, from the very first, was willing to make every document available to them. It was myself, based on what I believe is -- well, I've always described this as, you aren't President; you are temporarily custodian of an institution, the Presidency. And you don't have any right to do away with any of the prerogatives of that institution, and one of those is executive privilege. And this is what was being attacked by the Congress.

And, at the same, we were willing to make available almost 800,000 documents to them and, more recently, to give them access in a kind of controlled way to protect, because of possible litigation, those that were confidential and sensitive. But she was willing to give them all, which shows, in my book, she had nothing to hide. But I don't think that the people who were attacking her were concerned about the environment. I don't think they were concerned about any possible wrongdoing. As a matter of fact, I think this administration and its policies were their target. And, frankly, I wonder how they manage to look at themselves in the mirror in the morning.

Q. Mr. President, much of the sniping, though, came from inside the White House -- from your staff; other people outside were orchestrated to do it. Governor Kean of New Jersey was not discouraged from coming down here and asking her to resign. How do you react to that? I mean, you didn't put a stop to that.

The President. I don't know of anything of that kind. I know that you were all citing these unnamed White House sources that thought that she would resign. And I will admit, there must be people -- I still would like to find them out and identify them -- there must have been people or they're probably the same people that said that about everyone else who was attacked in some way in our administration, and all of whom have been cleared completely. And yet, the same charges were made: Oh, it might be a political embarrassment. Well, I'm not that easily politically embarrassed. When I know and have faith in the individual, I am not going to yield to the first attack and run for cover and throw somebody off the sleigh.

Q. But the Republican polls now show that your policies are perceived by the public, your environmental policies, as being more favorable to polluters than to the public. Are you going to change any of your environmental policies now that Mrs. Burford has gone?

The President. That's all they've heard, but no one has given any evidence that that is true. I'd like to call your attention to the fact that in 8 years as Governor, California not only led every State in the Union, we led the Federal Government in environmental protection. We were the forerunners of the whole movement. And how this idea has come, I sometimes suspect that the lobbyists for the environmental interests feel they have to keep their constituents stirred up or they might not have jobs anymore.

Q. Well you think the slowness in getting the Superfund into action at a number of sites has contributed to that perception and the fact that you have been quoted in the past as talking about environmental extremism?

Q. Thank you, Mr. President. Back to El Salvador for a minute -- the civil war there has been going on for 3 years. With the aid that you're now proposing, do you feel that you have any idea when the conflict will stop, when it will be under control? Or is the United States prepared to make an open-ended commitment?

Guatemala, Panama, and others -- are holding meetings to see what they, regionally, can do about this. Now, we're not participating in those. We would be an interested observer. We certainly encourage that kind of thing.

But these are other countries that have adopted democracy. Costa Rica. I don't know of any country -- they don't even have an army. They are the most democratic country that you can imagine. Honduras has ended a long tradition of military rule and has a democratic form of government. And they all want to help because they recognize that this is an outside threat, really, to the security of the Western Hemisphere.

And I hope that it'll be a short time. I hope that these appeals and offers of amnesty will bring some of those people down from the hills. But I also have to recognize -- not be naive -- that these people up there in the hills are not just discontented peasants who have managed to get their hands on a military weapon. These are trained and highly equipped military forces -- trained and equipped and backed by outsiders by way, mainly, of Cuba, through Nicaragua.

And so I think that we have to stay with this. And I don't see why there is so much opposition to it. We have no intention of sending combat forces, nor have we ever been asked for combat forces. And there's no intention of us sending the adviser teams to be with combat units or anything. We're talking about simply giving their military some of the fundamental training to enable them to do the job.

I'd like to talk to you today about one of the most important issues that touches our lives and shapes our future: the education of America's children. We've always had a love affair with learning in this country. America is a melting pot, and education has been a mainspring for our democracy and freedom, a means of providing gifts of knowledge and opportunity to all citizens, no matter how humble their background, so they could climb higher, help build the American dream, and leave a better life for those who follow.

But in recent years, our traditions of opportunity and excellence in education have been under siege. We've witnessed the growth of a huge education bureaucracy. Parents have often been reduced to the role of outsiders. Government-manufactured inflation made private schools and higher education too expensive for too many families. Even God, source of all knowledge, was expelled from classrooms.

It's time to face the truth. Advocates of more and more government interference in education have had ample time to make their case, and they've failed. Look at the record. Federal spending on education soared eightfold in the last 20 years, rising much faster than inflation. But during the same period, scholastic aptitude test scores went down, down, and down.

As the leader of the free world, the United States must strengthen its defenses, modernize its industries, and move confidently into a new era of high technology. To do this, we need a smart and highly skilled work force. Yet, only one-sixth of our high school graduates have taken junior and senior level courses in science and math. And many U.S. high schools do not offer sufficient math to prepare graduates for engineering schools.

America can do better. We must move forward again by returning to the sound principles that never failed us when we lived up to them. Can we not begin by welcoming God back in our schools and by setting an example for children by striving to abide by His Ten Commandments and the Golden Rule? We've sent an amendment to the Congress that will permit voluntary prayer in school again.

But better education doesn't mean a bigger Department of Education. In fact, that Department should be abolished. Instead, we must do a better job teaching the basics, insisting on discipline and results, encouraging competition and, above all, remembering that education does not begin with Washington officials or even State and local officials. It begins in the home, where it is the right and responsibility of every American.

Our administration has put together an education package that addresses the challenge of restoring opportunity to families and excellence in our schools. It contains several proposals to help parents reestablish control and to assist them in meeting education costs.

First, tuition tax credits, which we've already sent to the Congress, will soften the double-payment burden for those paying public school taxes and independent or parochial school tuition. This proposal will help those who need help the most -- low- and middle-income families.

Second, we're proposing a voucher system to help parents of disadvantaged children. We want to give States or individual school districts the option of using certain Federal education funds to create vouchers so these parents can choose which school, private or public, they want their children to attend.

Third, we're proposing a system of educational savings accounts to help families save for college education. Parents will be able to save up to $1,000 per year, per child, with no tax on the interest.

These proposals will expand opportunities by allowing parents to keep more of their own money, rather than taxing it away to finance bigger bureaucracies. They will also increase healthy competition among schools. Without a race, there can be no champion, no records broken, no excellence in education or any other walk of life.

We're talking about no less than the future of this nation. Last Monday, I was pleased to meet 40 of America's top high school math and science students. I told them that science and technology are keys to prosperity, learning, and a better quality of life.

We've already sent legislation to the Congress to stimulate training of more math and science teachers. Another program we've proposed will encourage existing math and science teachers to go back to school themselves to update their own knowledge. And we're also beginning a new program, one I intend to participate in myself, to honor some of America's best science and math teachers. They are a true national resource.

Private sector initiatives can also make great contributions. We're encouraging corporations, community organizations, and neighborhood groups across the country to adopt schools and help them meet their education needs with funds, equipment, and personnel.

Just as we're now seeing a healthy revival of our national economy, we can improve America's educational system and make it the best in the world again. But we must not delay. I hope we'll have your support and the cooperation of the Congress.

Two years ago, I saw close up, very close up, two profiles of courage. Were it not for the brave efforts of Secret Service Agents Jerry Parr and Tim McCarthy, I might not be speaking to you here today.

Fortunately neither of these Federal officers nor Washington Patrolman Thomas Delahanty nor my own Press Secretary, Jim Brady, lost their lives that day near the Hilton, although three of these men suffered severe injury.

While serving their fellow citizens, however, other law enforcement officers, as we've been told today, have lost their lives. In recent months alone, no fewer, as you've been told, than 13 Federal agents have been killed while on the job. Their deaths remind us again of the difficult and the very hazardous tasks that we ask our Federal law enforcement officers to carry out. Sometimes they must perform these duties in unfamiliar surroundings, sometimes must deal at close hand with the most destructive and unpredictable elements in our society. Frequently, their work is as routine as anyone else's. But they know, without a doubt, that someday, perhaps today, they may face danger and, perhaps, even tragedy.

Just 9 days ago, tragedy did occur with the three Secret Service agents who died in that head-on collision on a mountain road in California. George Patrick LaBarge, Donald W. Robinson, and Donald Bejcek died performing their professional duties. They were driving to Yosemite National Park, where they were to provide protection for Queen Elizabeth.

It's beyond our understanding, or certainly we're not allowed to know, just why these things happen, why these men should have been riding at that moment in that car, just as it eludes our understanding why four FBI agents should be in a plane that crashed outside of Cincinnati, Ohio, on December 16th. Robert W. Conners, Charles L. Ellington, Terry B. Hereford, and Michael J.

Accounts of homicides so frequently are in the newspapers and the nightly news that they almost seem commonplace. But no murder is commonplace. When the victim is a law enforcement officer, there's an added dimension. Here, the assault is perpetrated not only against an innocent individual but also against the society he represents and is solemnly sworn to protect.

Medina, North Dakota, where they were attempting to serve a warrant on a man violating his probation on a tax evasion conviction. Correctional Officer Gary Lee Rowe was responding February 7th to an alert of a possible escape attempt when inmates in a Federal prison in San Diego fatally attacked him with an arsenal of homemade, metal weapons. Correctional Officer Gregory Johnnie Gunter lost his life on -- of all days -- Christmas, when despite being off duty, he attempted to settle a dispute between two angry mobs of prisoners in the Federal penal institution at Petersburg, Virginia.

It's wisely said that nothing worth having comes cheaply or easily. And the price of a free nation is sometimes counted in the dearest currency: human life. These 13 men, all the best of professionals, were dedicated Americans. They gave their lives in a continuing battle to preserve the domestic peace and to make America safe from those who would prey on the innocent.

Our approach must be one of great appreciation for their work and their lives, and it's only imperfectly expressed by the gathering here today. The family members of each of these men bear a unique burden. It's my wish that they will find solace in the loyalty and support and friendship of the professionals their loved ones worked with and in the respect and gratitude of our citizens for the job they did.

Finally, I hope and pray that all Americans will be inspired by the knowledge that each of these men died as few men do -- a hero. Someone had said once that ``a hero is no braver than anyone else; he's just brave 5 minutes longer.'' But the men we're talking about today are brave every minute, every hour around the clock, and have chosen that path of courage for their lives. And what of the heroism of those who share those lives and who know the possibility that each day holds?

Several years ago while I was still Governor of California, after a tragic assassination in our country, Secret Service were assigned to several of us in public office. And on weekends, when I could, I liked to get to the ranch and sometimes do a little target shooting and plinking at tin cans.

Note: The President spoke at 11:17 a.m. at the Department of Justice. The ceremony was attended by Attorney General William French Smith, Secretary of the Treasury Donald T. Regan, top Federal law enforcement officials, representatives of State and local law enforcement organizations, and family members of the deceased officers.

The President today announced his intention to nominate William F. Pickard to be a member of the Board of Directors of the African Development Foundation for a term of 6 years. This is a new position. Upon his confirmation, the President also intends to designate him as Chairman.

In each of our country's conflicts, our prisoners of war have endured extreme hardships and have been required to make great sacrifices. But even when facing the most extreme adversity, they have proudly defended American ideals. Their burden has been magnified when they were subject to mistreatment, torture, or death in violation of fundamental moral standards and international codes of conduct.

Our country is also acutely aware of the deep suffering experienced by the families of our servicemen held captive or missing in action. These families have faced a haunting uncertainty and awesome silence that tear at their hearts and earns the deep esteem of their countrymen.

American P.O.W.'s and M.I.A.'s are heroes who have gone beyond courage and beyond duty to an honored place in the souls of their fellow Americans. They symbolize the kind of singular sacrifice and devotion that has repeatedly proven instrumental in shaping our Nation's destiny.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 14th day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

The President. It's been a pleasure for me to meet and confer with Prime Minister Lubbers. This is his first visit to this country since becoming Prime Minister, head of the Dutch Government, and we've used the opportunity to discuss a wide range of issues.

One of the subjects discussed was, as you could well imagine, INF, the intermediate nuclear force discussions. We agreed that Western unity behind modernizing NATO's defensive capabilities and serious arms negotiations are essential to maintaining peace and security. Throughout the discussions this morning in the Oval Office and during a working lunch, it was evident the Netherlands and the United States continue to share a common outlook and a unity of purpose.

As the Dutch-American bicentennial reminded us last year, our bonds are tied by 200 years of friendship. We believe in the Atlantic Partnership, which has not only kept peace for 30 years or more but which has also improved the quality of life on both sides of the Atlantic. I have no doubt that we in America and the Netherlands, cemented by shared values and common interests, will continue to work closely together, seeking a world that is free from war, in which liberty and freedom of choice are respected.

Reagan as allies in the Atlantic partnership. How different in scale our countries are, we share a common task -- prosperity and freedom for our people, respect for the individual, and responsibility among nations.

We discussed the road to economic recovery, the importance of free trade and of fair trade relations between the United States and Europe, of compromises instead of harming each other -- the need, also, of monetary and budgetary policies which lower interest rates.

As NATO allies we discussed also security problems, the important and adequate contribution of the Dutch to a defense posture, sufficient to disencourage aggression. Of course, we discussed also INF. Preparations for the deployment of these weapons as a political and a military answer to the Soviet threat, the SS - 20's threat, are underway as scheduled. The Soviets have to understand that Geneva talks have to become now Geneva negotiations. President Reagan stated to me a deep, personal commitment to achieving an arms reduction agreement. In that endeavor, the alliance is united.

American, it is a special pleasure to welcome its brightest stars to the White House and our national home. You belong here. Your music belongs here, and I hope you agree it sounds pretty good when it bounces off these historic walls.

Someone once said that it's easier to understand a nation by listening to its music than it is by learning their language. And when you listen to country music, you hear the beauty of our wide open spaces, the emotions of a people whose hearts are as big and full as the land they live in. The country sound has become a good will ambassador for us all around the world -- through its variety, spreading an understanding of our basic values, our high spirit and determined self-reliance. And as others understand this music, they also understand and appreciate our deep-seated love of country, freedom, and God.

On behalf of all Americans, I want to congratulate the Country Music Association on its 25th anniversary, on the art form it has nurtured, and the music with which your members have enriched our lives. All America celebrates with you. And I particularly look forward to one whale of a concert at Constitution Hall. What an appropriate place to make music history with such a profoundly American tradition.

On behalf of the board of directors of the Country Music Association and the artists appearing here for the 25th anniversary show, I would like to express our sincere gratitude for you hosting this marvelous reception.

Mr. President, as a memento of the show and C.M.A.'s 25th anniversary, we would like to present to you for your record collection a personally autographed album from each of the artists that'll appear on the show tomorrow night. They're too heavy to pick up, so I'm not going to try to do that. [Laughter] So, these are the two cases here.

In addition, we have a special, personal, leather-bound copy of Billboard Magazine's special issue released this week commemorating this 25th anniversary. I'm going to just pick that up -- to see that, Billboard Magazine. And if we can get rid of that -- [laughter] -- we have one more deal.

It was once written that America is great because it is good, and if America ever ceases to be good, America will cease to be great. So long as Americans remain faithful -- in deeds as well as thought -- to the ideals embodied in our Constitution and furthered in our free institutions, our Nation's greatness will flourish.

American ideals as we go about our daily lives. When we participate in a free election, extend a helping hand to a neighbor, live responsible and productive lives, or teach a child through our own actions that all people are equal under the law, we manifest our allegiance to this great country.

We must never take our precious freedoms for granted. Rather, from time to time we must rededicate ourselves to the magnificent ideals of our great democracy -- liberty, justice, and dignity for all mankind.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 15th day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

On this special occasion, the ``wearin' of the green'' reminds the Reagan family of the adventurous souls of Erin who through the years have traveled to these shores. Their spirit and joy of life have not only benefitted generations that followed, but blessed this bountiful land with the qualities of wit and dedication we associate so affectionately with the Irish.

St. Patrick's faith and idealism kindled a fire that burns even today in the minds of Irish men and women. It is a flame of faith that, joined with the Irish love of liberty and laughter, song and scholarship, has left an unforgettable mark on Ireland, America, and the world.

Mr. Kraeutler is chairman of the board of Underwriters, Inc., in Morristown, N.J. He also serves on the boards of directors of several insurance corporations based in Morristown. In the past he served as senior vice president of the Church Insurance Co. and as vice president and manager of Frank B. Hall & Co.

As you know, my Administration has made major efforts to fight crime in America. Soon after taking office, I directed the Attorney General and other Federal law enforcement officials to improve the efficiency and coordination of Federal law enforcement, with special emphasis on violent and drug-related crime. This has been accomplished largely through the work of the Cabinet Council on Legal Policy, chaired by the Attorney General, as well as through leadership provided by the White House Office on Drug Abuse Policy. As a result of these efforts, Federal law enforcement is better coordinated than ever before.

Of even greater importance, this Administration is attacking crime at its source by providing increased resources to Federal law enforcement agencies for apprehension, conviction, and incarceration. Last October, for example, I announced a national strategy to cripple organized crime and put drug traffickers out of business. We established twelve interagency task forces in key areas of the country -- modeled in part on the Task Force that has been operating very successfully in South Florida -- to work with State and local law enforcement officials to shut down organized criminal enterprises. We established a National Center for State and Local Law Enforcement Training to assist and train State and local officials in combatting syndicated crime.

Our efforts are beginning to bear fruit. During 1982, for example, Federal cocaine seizures totalled nearly 12,500 pounds -- nearly three times the amount seized in 1981. Heroin seizures almost doubled, and seizures of marijuana increased by 50 percent. I have every reason to believe that these and other administrative actions will continue to increase arrests and convictions of persons who violate Federal law.

But administrative action, however successful, is not enough. If the forces of law are to regain the upper hand over the forces of crime, ensuring that criminals are convicted and put and kept behind bars, basic legislative changes are needed.

Improvements Act. Among its principal provisions, this legislation would have made major and urgently needed changes in our laws concerning bail, criminal forfeiture, and sentencing. It is unfortunate that S. 2572 was not enacted during the last Congress, but I look forward to working with the 98th Congress to secure, at long last, passage of critically needed substantive criminal law reform.

The legislative proposal that I am transmitting today provides a thorough and comprehensive reform of those aspects of Federal criminal law that have proven to be the largest obstacles in our fight against crime. Many of our proposals were considered by the 97th Congress. Others are new. Each is important in rolling back the tide of criminal activity that threatens our Nation, our families and our way of life.

Exclusionary rule. Under our proposal, evidence in a criminal case that may have been improperly seized, which is now excluded from evidence, would be admissible upon a showing that the officer making the seizure acted in reasonable good faith.

Narcotics enforcement. Our proposal would substantially increase the penalties for trafficking in drugs and would strengthen the regulatory authority of the Drug Enforcement Administration with respect to the diversion of legitimate drugs into illegal channels.

The bill contains many other important provisions, as well, concerning labor racketeering, capital punishment, consumer product tampering, and extradition, to name only a few. These proposals, taken together, will provide Federal law enforcement officials with important new tools with which to combat crime and will help once again to make our streets safe for all our citizens.

Arthur Godfrey was a familiar face and voice to millions of Americans over several generations and a broadcasting pioneer. In a long career, he not only won national popularity but triumphed over illness and physical disability in a way that was an inspiration to his fans. His tireless dedication to protecting our environment was one of many worthy causes he espoused as a concerned citizen.

Hearing that patriotic hymn sung so beautifully stirs up so many feelings -- pride in the strength of our land, goodness of our people, and gratefulness to God for being free and an American. We've all been treated to a magnificent show this evening, entertained by a galaxy of some of America's best known and best loved stars. I hope you all enjoyed it as much as the Bushes and the Reagans did.

And I also would like to congratulate the Country Music Association on its 25th anniversary. For a quarter of a century, C.M.A. has been encouraging, developing, and promoting the musical sound that comes straight from America's heart. They've spread a home-grown music around the world, and I can't imagine a better ambassador. Remember, country music's contributions are greater than just the songs, although it's given us some great ones -- Roy's [Roy Acuff] great ``Speckled Bird'' is one of my personal favorites. And the medleys sung tonight demonstrate the country's rich diversity.

But the best thing about country music is its people -- a large and God-fearing, patriotic bunch from the mainstream of America. Most of them grew up in rural communities or small towns like the rest of us, and when they sing and pick and play, they tell the world about what it means to most of us: our families, our God, and our country.

And on behalf of the Nation, never very far from its foot-stomping roots, thanks to C.M.A. and its people who bring us and the world such truly American music. And all I can say again to these wonderful people is, thank you all, and God bless you.

All Americans, and especially today's parents, are deeply concerned about our system of education -- and rightly so. For generations we have been justly proud of the quality and openness of our education system from kindergarten to postgraduate levels, both public and private. It has served the nation well, but now it is in need of significant changes in key areas.

The programs and budget requests I recommended to the Congress this year address a wide range of education issues. They reflect my strong conviction that education decisions should be made by parents, students, States and local officials. The national government also has an important, but limited, role to play in the education system. Thus, while I have worked to brake the runaway growth in education spending, my budget calls for over $13 billion for the coming fiscal year.

Within this total is over $4 billion for supplemental educational services for the educationally disadvantaged and for the handicapped. I have also included over $5.6 billion for post-secondary student aid.

In addition, I am asking the Congress to enact my Education Savings Account proposal. This bill speaks to another aspect of the education cost problem I have described: the difficulty parents have in saving for college costs.

Moreover, many of the nation's better job opportunities will be limited to those who have a higher education. So I have today proposed an additional special incentive for parents to begin, as early as possible, to set aside money for their children's college education.

Under my proposal many parents will be able to put aside up to $1,000 per year in special accounts whose interest income will be tax free. The full benefit will be available to all those with incomes below $40,000 per year; reduced benefits are included for families with incomes up to $60,000.

Over time, this tax incentive will greatly enhance parents' ability to contribute to the cost of the higher education they want for their children. It cannot, of course, substitute for the student's own work and savings, nor for Federal aid. It will, however, help to restore a better balance in the system and make meeting the family's share of education costs a less burdensome task in future years.

At the elementary and secondary level, we face different problems. The public education system, as it has evolved over the decades, is the backbone of American education and one of the great strengths of our democracy. However, many parents want to use alternative approaches to meet the educational needs of their children. This option should be theirs in our free society. But there can be meaningful choice only if our system also makes access to alternatives a reality.

Several weeks ago I sent to Congress a bill to make tuition tax credits available to all parents, within eligible income limits, who choose to send their children to nondiscriminatory private schools. Today, I am proposing a bill, the ``Equal Educational Opportunity Act,'' to permit States and localities to offer another kind of choice to parents whose children are selected for participation in our $3 billion compensatory education program, Chapter 1 of the Education Consolidation and Improvement Act.

Chapter 1 helps meet the costs of supplemental educational services, like remedial reading, for millions of educationally disadvantaged children each year. In some cases, we believe that the parents of those children would prefer a greater range of educational choice in their selection of a school. Under this bill, in States or school districts which choose to provide the option, parents would be able to participate in a voucher program to exercise that choice at whatever school they felt provided the greatest educational opportunity for their children.

I firmly believe that in districts where the voucher option is implemented, education will be strengthened for all. The potential for competition for enrollments and resources will raise the quality of both public and private education. Parents will gain a greater measure of control.

These three bills address central issues in American education. They will bring greater order and balance to Federal, family and student efforts to meet the rising cost of higher education. They will help bring parental choice and the benefits of competition to elementary and secondary education. They, and all my proposals in the education area, make clear the limited role of the Federal government and wherever possible restore more choice and control to the family. Their ultimate goal is more diverse, higher quality education for all Americans. I ask your suupport for rapid consideration and passage of these proposals.

Today is a time to honor and celebrate the enormous contribution to American life made by Irish immigrants. As frontiersmen in the American colonies and citizen soldiers in Washington's army, they helped found our Republic. Their ingenuity and effort built our economy, added to our spiritual values, and enriched our literature. Their humor enriches life's happy moments and makes life's setbacks more bearable.

Ireland. We deeply regret that some would use this day to enlist support for more violence and conflict on that small island which is so much in our hearts today. We cannot remain indifferent to the tragedy that confronts the people of Northern Ireland and which affects the Republic of Ireland, Britain, and their friends in the United States. Those who advocate or engage in violence and terrorism should find no welcome in the United States.

We condemn all such acts and oppose the forces of discord in Northern Ireland, which obstruct the process of reconciliation so essential for peace. We ask all Americans to refrain from supporting, with financial or other aid, organizations involved directly or indirectly in perpetuating violence. And we urge that those Americans -- and there are many -- who wish to help, lend their support and contributions to legitimate groups and organizations which work to promote reconciliation and economic cooperation.

Next to peace and reconciliation, Northern Ireland's greatest need is for jobs to bring hope and opportunity to all its people, especially the young. American companies which have invested in Northern Ireland already employ a significant percentage of its industrial work force, making a real contribution to its well-being. This administration will continue to encourage private investment in and the creation of more job opportunities in both Northern Ireland and the Republic.

Ireland, but we do have an obligation to urge our longtime friends in that part of the world to seek reconciliation between the two traditions in Northern Ireland and accommodation through democratic means. Durable, equitable solutions and peace cannot be imposed by outsiders, however well-meaning. Our role, accordingly, is to support efforts by the people and governments directly involved.

So, on St. Patrick's Day 1983, let us all celebrate our Irish heritage in fine style. But let us also remember those in Northern Ireland for which 1983 is one more year of terrorism and dim economic prospects -- and let us rededicate ourselves to helping to bring these twin evils to an end.

The President. Foreign Minister Barry and Ambassador O'Sullivan, Excellencies, on this day that is so special to all Americans, but especially to the 30 million of us that take pride in our Irish heritage, I want to thank you for the hospitality that you've again offered me here at the Irish Embassy.

Here in America the men and women whose patron saint we honor today have made an immeasurable contribution to the development of this nation. Even the White House has not been exempt from Ireland's spell. Many of our Presidents traced their roots to Ireland, and I'm proud to trace mine to Ballyporeen in County Tipperary.

And our links to Ireland are many and varied. We're grateful for the closeness of our historic heritage, just as we respect the proud independence of today's Ireland whose troops have worn the blue helmet of the United Nations in so many lands, including service today with the UNIFIL forces in Lebanon.

I've previously spoken about our concerns over the violence in Ireland and do not need to either elaborate nor in any way detract from what I and my predecessors in this office have already said, other than to emphasize again my support for a just and peaceful solution to the problems of Ireland and my strong condemnation of all acts of terrorism and violence. As I've said before, we believe that a lasting solution to the problems of Ireland can be found only in a process of reconciliation. And I again take this occasion on St. Patrick's Day to join with my fellow Americans who work and pray for an end to terrorism and violence.

I'm told that in Armagh, the ecclesiastical capital of Ireland since the days of St. Patrick, that there are two great cathedrals on the hills of that town, each dedicated to St. Patrick. I understand that late last year the Archbishop of the Protestant Church of Ireland and the Primate of the Roman Catholic Church in Ireland, the incumbents of those cathedrals, came together in a spirit of brotherhood and reconciliation to jointly sponsor a town celebration dedicated to peace and harmony. It is that message that I wish my fellow Americans to hear on this St. Patrick's Day. I encourage Americans of all faiths to walk together in such a spirit of reconciliation, rejecting violence in any form.

Some few but vocal Americans believe that differences between Irishmen can only be solved by violence and intimidation. They are no friends of Ireland. They disgrace the principles for which both Ireland and America stand. I would urge my fellow Americans not to listen to such people. I know that Foreign Minister Barry joins me in calling upon people everywhere to turn away from the moral bankruptcy of the men of violence and to help or heed, instead, the call for peace and reconciliation that is the true message which St. Patrick himself first brought to Ireland.

I was pleased to welcome some leading Republican Congressmen this morning. Our meeting began on a very positive note, because we had more excellent news on the economy. The inflation figures announced today show that producer price inflation over the past year has been cut by 80 percent from 2 years earlier. That's extremely good news, because it raises the purchasing power of every American.

In coming months, of course, the inflation figures may bounce around a little, but it's clear that we're finally breaking the back of inflation in the United States. And now that it's down, we have to keep it down.

Committee in the House, controlled by the liberal wing of the Democratic Party, has just come up with a truly dangerous budget proposal. The so-called Jones proposal is a declaration of war against the commonsense principles that are now rebuilding America. This isn't a step forward, but a giant step backward into an economic quagmire.

I'm not going to sit still for a proposal that makes a huge increase in taxes, guts our defense program, repeals many of the overdue welfare reforms that we have enacted, and adds an incredible $181 billion in domestic spending to what we've proposed. Clearly, this partisan Democratic budget is a dagger aimed straight at the heart of America's rebuilding program.

The Democratic proposal would throw our budget savings out the window and turn the clock back to pre-1981 when domestic spending was soaring out of control and we had double-digit inflation and 20-percent interest rates.

We worked very hard to give the American people their first real tax reduction -- a rate reduction in nearly 20 years. We wanted to permit citizens to keep more of the money they earn and to encourage them to save, invest, and help us increase worker productivity. All that's now happening. We're witnessing a renaissance in the values of thrift and enterprise. But the Democratic budget would crush the working people of America with $316 billion in new tax increases over the next 5 years.

Repeal of the third-year tax cut and indexing would have little impact on the wealthy. But it would cost a typical median-income family of four $3,550 in higher taxes through 1988. Nor would this tremendous tax increase reduce the deficit. To reduce the deficit, we don't want or need higher taxes. We need economic growth, a kind of growth that has already begun.

And we're making progress. But the Democratic budget would cripple those efforts, too, slashing our defense budget authority request by more than $200 billion through 1988. Nothing could bring greater joy to the Kremlin than seeing the United States abandon its defense rebuilding program after barely 1 year.

Pearl Harbor. He said, ``. . . I came to the conclusion that the whole thing is the result of the policy which the country itself pursued. The country was not ready for preparedness. Every time the President made an effort to get a preparedness program through the Congress, it was stifled.

I'm asking the members of our party, responsible Democrats, and every concerned American to work with us in opposing the liberal Democratic budget. We've come too far and worked too hard to see the recovery now underway destroyed by a reckless return to the failed policies of the past.

But I'm sending to Congress today our second annual report on the State of Small Business. The report was prepared by the U.S. Small Business Administration, which, under the leadership of Jim Sanders -- and Frank Swain is doing more than ever to assist and counsel America's small business men and women. I really think that that line should be: the men and women of America's small business.

But I'd also like to introduce Faith Whittlesey, my new assistant for public liaison. Would you stand up and -- [applause]. Faith will be the small business contact here at the White House. She's replacing Elizabeth Dole, and I know she'll continue the good work that was done by Elizabeth and Wayne Valis.

Before I describe the report and our administration's efforts in behalf of small business, I'd like to thank SCORE, the Service Corps of Retired Executives, for their fine example of volunteer spirit.

The report that I sign today proves once again that the millions of small businesses and the people who run them are vital to our economy and economic growth. They carry on a tradition dating to the foundation of our country -- a tradition of national strength deriving from the ingenuity, the independence, and individual liberty of our people. Our small business owners demonstrate through free enterprise that our national well-being is dependent on individual freedom to pursue our hopes, our dreams, and our creative ambitions.

As the report shows, small businesses contribute significantly to our daily lives. Almost half of all private employment is in small firms, and small businesses create more than half of all the new jobs and are an important source of new products and technologies. As business and civic leaders in their home States and towns, small business men and women improve the quality of life for all Americans.

Our economic recovery program was designed to strengthen the contributions of small business by reducing the heavy economic burdens weighing it down: runaway inflation, high interest rates, high taxation, and excessive regulation. We already have accomplished much, and I'm confident we'll see more progress in the months and years ahead. But if our economy and our people are to continue to climb out of recession, we must not tolerate any backsliding in the Congress. We must assure an economic climate in which America's small businesses can grow and prosper. If the Congress will work with us to do what is right and necessary, we can keep America on the upswing, ushering in a bright new age of lasting prosperity to outshine any other in our history.

Already the inflation, which had driven up small business costs and eroded profits, has dropped to a third of its former rate. For the last 6 months, inflation has risen at an annual rate of only 1.4 percent, the lowest 6-month rate in 18 years.

We've broken through tax barriers to capital formation and investment, and virtually eliminated estate taxes for a surviving spouse. And our tax indexing provision on individual tax rate cuts will make it easier for small business owners to fund and maintain their companies. These tax reforms are designed to spur saving, investment, and productivity.

There's an old economic axiom, still true today, that says, ``If people are not allowed to earn more by producing more, then more will not be produced.'' Well, that's why our tax incentives are critical to recovery. And we will not abide any tampering with them. The third year of the tax cut, scheduled to take effect in July, and tax indexing will benefit small business people and average working families the most. Their repeal would be a cruel blow, an unfair attempt to steal the just rewards of those Americans who've carried us through recession into recovery.

The Export Trading Company Act I signed last fall will also help small firms compete in foreign markets. And the Small Business Innovation Development Act, which I signed last July, will direct more Federal research and development funds to small high-tech firms, the enterprises that always have been leaders in innovation.

One of the reforms I'm proudest of is the requirement that Uncle Sam pay his bills on time or pay an interest penalty. This obvious and overdue improvement in the way Government does business will help the many small firms with Federal contracts. And speaking of doing business with the Federal Government, we've expanded the amount of Federal procurement going to small business, especially firms owned by minorities and women. Last year almost $45 billion in Federal procurement went to small companies, and that's an alltime record.

As you can see, this administration is dedicated to restoring and preserving a free-market environment in which small businesses can grow, create jobs, and earn the healthy profits that benefit us all. We can do this only in an economy free of inflation's scourge, with monetary and fiscal soundness, and a rational regulatory policy.

But already, liberals in the House have proposed a budget that would undermine the improving economy with a frontal assault on the policies that have gotten America on the mend. Unable to break their spending addiction, these Members have proposed reversing the hard-won, domestic spending cuts achieved during the last 2 years. Money for these excesses, they claim, can be found by slashing our defense program to dangerous levels and engorging the tax share of our gross national product to the highest levels in history. Such a plan not only would gamble with the security of the United States, it would plunge us once again into the no-man's land of spend and spend and tax and tax. We must not permit them to drag us back into that swamp.

America has taken its first cautious steps toward recovery. There is no doubt about that. Our progress will grow more bold and dramatic in the weeks and months ahead, but only if we hold fast to the economic policies that have gotten us this far.

And as this report indicates, small businesses have an important role to play. Recent surveys show strong optimism in the small business community. Owners are again planning new purchases, inventory development which will fuel the recovery. Many millions of our people dream of working for themselves and running their own businesses. It's risky to be sure, as you well know.

Well, generation after generation of hardworking Americans have understood that truth and used it to build the most prosperous nation on Earth. As I sign this report today, let us remember that success for small business and for America is one in the same.

Let us remember that prosperity, like profits, must be earned. It'll never come as a gift from government or anyone else. If we return incentives to risktakers and entrepreneurs, we'll free our people to create good times ahead, restoring hope and opportunity for everyone.

Small businesses represent an important part of the American economy. The efforts of men and women who operate small businesses are vital to the Nation's economic growth. As documented in the attached Report, small businesses have performed relatively well during the recent recession. As the economy continues to recover, small business has a vital role to play. My Administration's economic program will enhance the ability of small business to meet these challenges.

Small businesses can make several important contributions to economic recovery. About forty percent of private sector employment is in small, independently-owned businesses. We need to recognize the small business role in our economy, particularly in job creation. This is especially important in light of current high levels of unemployment.

Small businesses are important sources of product and process innovations. Small business efforts provide needed flexibility for our economy to meet foreign competition and changing economic realities. There exists a great reservoir of export potential in the small business community and we need to make greater efforts to use that resource.

Inflation, high interest rates, excessive taxation, and burdensome regulation are serious problems for small business, and their abatement has been the key goal of my economic program. While we have made much progress on these fronts, our most important small business priority remains the assurance of an economic climate of opportunity for small businesses to grow and prosper.

The Federal government is imposing fewer regulations and less paperwork on small business, and agencies are working with the Regulatory Flexibility Act to minimize the burden of regulations on small firms.

Tax barriers to investment in small firms have been reduced. I supported and signed legislation to reform Tax Code Subchapter S, making it easier for new, small corporations to enjoy the benefits of limited personal liability for corporate debts, while being subject to individual income tax.

The purchase by the Federal government of goods and services from the private sector should utilize efficient and able small firms to the extent possible and practicable. As detailed in the Report which follows, we have expanded the amount and proportion of Federal procurement from small, minority, and women-owned firms.

The Social Security System must be sound. The recommendations of the Bipartisan Commission provide a plan that is fair to the retired as well as to the workers and the employers who must share in the tax burden. We must not assume that employers who create jobs have bottomless pockets to support an unreformed system. Thus, we support the National Commission's balanced package to assure solvency of the Social Security System.

We will vigorously pursue Federal enactment of enterprise zone legislation to encourage the location of business, large and small, in designated areas where growth has lagged. We will ensure that enterprise zone incentives are meaningful to small firms so that their prospect for growth is high.

Worker retraining will be important to many of our unemployed who are caught in the shift of our economy away from some of its traditional industrial patterns. Small firms are leading that shift, and we must utilize the expertise and judgment already available in small firms. The Congress should enact my proposed jobs tax credit for the long-term unemployed. This will increase the incentives for employers to hire new workers.

We have made significant progress in slowing the growth of regulation, and must reinforce our efforts to reduce existing regulatory burdens, especially those that disproportionately undermine small business opportunities.

Our government policies on procurement must be administered so as to utilize the best that small firms have to offer in goods and services. The role of government should not include performing services and activities that can effectively and efficiently be carried out by the private sector, and we will work for policies which increase reliance on the private sector.

The central parts of our economic programs are in place and the recovery has already begun. The flexibility and the energy that enable our economy to recover in situations such as this are found in great doses among small businesses. To help small business realize its full economic potential, I am calling upon the Congress and upon the members of my Administration to be always mindful of the important role small business plays in our economy.

This statement and the following Report are the second I have presented to Congress as required in Title III of Public Law 96 - 302. I believe that our continued efforts to explore and understand the importance of small business to our economy will lead us to join together to pursue policies which will foster the growth of this critical sector of the American economy.

The President. Oh, well, there was no surprise, first of all. Nancy had, as you know, been in her presence a great deal. She was there for the wedding. And then her gracious invitation to us at Windsor, our ride together and all there, so it wasn't any surprise that -- it was only just reinforced and strengthened as to what a truly fine and gracious lady she is. But I think so unlike what most people would have of a concept of royalty. But she's a delightful person.

Mr. Brandon. If I may switch to a different subject -- your Orlando speech. In your Orlando speech you talked about the confrontation of the United States and the Soviet Union as a confrontation of good and evil, and darkness and light. And that gave the impression, at least, that there is really no logical conclusion except war and that reconciliation would be very difficult between the two powers. And I'm just wondering how you reconcile that outlook with your aims for peace.

The President. Well, Henry, I don't think that those who were there and heard the entire speech would take it that way. I think it is somehow lifting that out of context -- of this line and this description as the focus of evil and so forth. Certainly their entire beliefs, beginning with the disbelief in God -- their entire beliefs are so contrary to what we accept as morality. Witness a Kampuchea and an Afghanistan and so forth.

But no, what I was pointing out there, and I still believe is time-tested and proven, is not the inevitability of war, but a recognition and a willingness to face up to what these differences are in our views and between us, to be realistic about it.

But let me just point out a couple of things. We've seen, under the guise of diplomacy and detente and so forth in the past, efforts to kind of sweep the differences under the rug and pretend they don't exist. I have stated, very frankly, what I believe the differences are, but at the same time, I have expressed my determination and my belief that peace is achievable. I'm very concerned with those people who somehow seem to think -- without their realizing they're thinking them -- that they're building in their mind a kind of ``war is inevitable''. I can't subscribe to that at all.

Chancellor Kohl, have been trying to persuade you to put forward a new initiative of an interim solution -- still with the zero option as the ultimate goal -- but to come forward with an interim solution. I gather that you are very seriously considering such a move.

The President. Well, let me say that, Henry, this is a difficult thing to answer. And I'm sure they know this also. Because we do stay in constant consultation, and we aren't going to do anything without continuing consultation with them. And I must say they have all expressed great appreciation for the fact that unlike some previous times when we acted unilaterally, that we do recognize our responsibility as allies.

The difficulty in answering is, when you're at a negotiating table -- and off and on I spent about 25 years in labor-management relations at a negotiating table -- you can't talk openly about your strategy or what you're going to do. But I can only point to this fact, that from the very beginning when I announced the total elimination, the zero option, I said at the same time we will negotiate in good faith any legitimate or reasonable proposal, and that remains true today. But to get into a discussion of where you're going or what you're going to do, that just is bad negotiating strategy.

The President. Except that all of them are still openly supportive of our deployment of missiles, our own missiles there, as was originally decided in 1979. So, that's a little different than advocating a position and wanting an open agreement. If you ever did such a thing, that, then, becomes the beginning point for negotiation. Our beginning point for negotiation is total elimination.

Mr. Brandon. Well, I understand that there are two views, more or less, two views in the administration -- one that feels that you should wait until the missiles are beginning to be put in place in Europe, because then the Soviet Union will be under pressure to make concessions, or that you should come forward with your own initiatives -- take the lead and come forward with something that proposes equality but is something less than zero-zero option.

The President. Well, again, as I say I mean, Henry, I don't think that there are any divisions in the sense that splits here, and one faction against another faction on this. Obviously, in discussing all the ramifications, there are going to be people with different ideas than others and a variety of viewpoints as to timing or numbers or things of that kind. There is one thing in which we're in total agreement on, and that is that the ultimate goal should continue to be the zero base, the elimination of that whole class of weapons, for the sake of the world if nothing else. We're also in agreement on the fact that there must be no change in our plan to begin deployment on schedule.

The President. Well, no, what I said then, and what I have just said here, is we have announced our ultimate goal and we will, as I said from the very first -- we're ready to negotiate in good faith any reasonable proposal or suggestion on the way to the ultimate goal.

Mr. Brandon. I understand that you're beginning to come under pressure to -- I'm now talking about U.S.-Argentine relations -- to give the kind of certification that would be necessary for the United States to sell arms to the Argentine again.

The President. Well, I think that would be a little presumptuous. I think this is -- as a result of the action taken there, this is something to be determined between the United Kingdom and Argentina.

The President. Well, I'm very hopeful. I think that we have made some progress toward the first step that we believe is absolutely necessary, in getting into that, and that is the withdrawal of all the foreign forces,the PLO, the Syrians, and the Israelis from Lebanon and give the new Government of Lebanon a chance to establish its own sovereignty and heal the wounds that have been open there for so long -- the factionalism and so forth. I think that's absolutely vital, and we want to cooperate in any way we can to help bring that about. As I say, Foreign Minister Shamir has been here, and then the Foreign Minister of Lebanon, Salem, and the really senior statesman, elder statesman there, Salaam, the former Prime Minister. And we continue -- Phil Habib [The President's Special Representative for the Middle East] is going back now again -- we continue to try and help them work toward an elimination of  the differences. And the differences have grown less. So, as I say, we're optimistic.

Mr. Brandon. You know there are a lot of Middle Eastern experts, or so called, who believe that unless you put certain pressures on Israel, there will be no moratorium on the building of settlements in the West Bank. How do you feel about that?

The President. Well, the West Bank -- there certainly is no illegality to the building -- that based on the Camp David agreement and the period of discussion that was supposed to then take place, with no one having a claim for or against doing such things. This, of course, would be where the negotiations then would begin toward the real peace negotiations with, presumably, King Hussein involved in those negotiations. And I think, as I've said before, that what really has to be resolved is the -- an arrangement involving, on one side, land -- territory -- and on the other, the need for security. And this is what has to be worked out. That one can find the Israel -- have the security -- that they don't have to remain an armed  camp at the great expense that it has been to their economy. And this is going to take compromise with regard to territory -- on the other side -- and resolution of the Palestinian problem which -- you've got a great many human beings there that you just can't pretend they don't exist.

The President. [Inaudible] -- that's the reason for the negotiations. And again, just as I was talking about our own negotiations, with regard to arms, negotiations sometimes in labor-management may describe it. They've been presented as one side asks for the moon and the other side offers green cheese. And they then talk their way to a point between those two extremes and settle it.

Mr. Brandon. Mr. President, I know you're not talking about your future plans, but if you decided to run for another term, what would be your objectives -- that you feel you haven't been able to achieve in the first 4 years -- for the next round?

The President. Oh, I think we have a long way to go in two major departments. One of them, the restoration of our ability to be secure nationally, field a national defense and so forth, and the other, however, is the economic situation. Now, so far, we haven't begun to get all that we asked for in our plan. But I think that now, after all of the criticism and all of the sniping and all of the sneering at what they called Reaganomics, there is so much evidence that the plan, even partially employed, was successful, that I'm beginning to wonder if they won't decide to look for another name, rather than Reaganomics, now that it's going to be a successful plan and not a failure -- but that the economy is looking ahead for the balance of this decade to get back to a balanced budget.

And I would still like to see that then affirmed in the Constitution, so that we can never again go down that road that we have in these last few decades. That we can begin paying back on the national debt, reducing that -- when you stop to think that the interest alone on our national debt is greater than the total cost of the United States Government not too many years ago. To do that, and to recognize that there is a certain level as to the percentage of gross national product that government takes for itself and takes from the people in taxes, that if you go beyond that level, you then do disrupt the economy and cause the kind of problems that we've had.

This country can actually affect the economy worldwide. And I think our conquering, so far -- not completely conquered, let us say our winning over inflation so far -- to take it down from double digits, from 12.4, sometimes reaching as high as 13 - 14, to where for the last 6 months it's only been running 1.4 percent. But the job isn't going to be finished for awhile.

As you look at the projections out through the years, there is a lot yet to be done. But we have embarked on a different course. I can remember when the people on our side, the Republicans -- and you realize I'm talking the party not personal -- over these years what needs to be done, the Republican Party and the Democratic Party, the debate they engaged in was kind of a rearguard action on the part of the Republicans against the ever-increasing desire of government to spend, to intervene in the marketplace, to become even more powerful, and thus eventually oppressive on the people -- much of what you've seen happen in your own country. The debate today in government is not that debate anymore -- of the trying to hold back on that increase. The debate is both sides agreeing to reduced spending and reduced government, and the argument is only about how much to reduce it. And I think that's quite a triumph.

Mr. Brandon. I wondered, because of the decline in the oil price that would be little will benefit to the majority of countries in the world, but it will be to the detriment of two or three countries, like Mexico, Nigeria. I wonder whether you've at all considered the possibility of taking the advantages that the majority of the countries have accrued to them -- could be used to sustain and help the countries that are suffering from the decline of the oil price.

The President. Well, we have been of help, and we have been with our contributions to the international banks, those funding agencies, but also in direct help. For example, as I told our friends and allies in the summit meeting at Versailles -- the discussion of the Third World and our view is that you help them develop their own economies, not constantly be mendicants with their hands out waiting for someone to give them something. We, every year, buy more of the production of those countries than all the rest of the world put together. And we think that this is the way to go. We think, also, that if we are able to alter the economic situation, that some of those same countries have the highest rates of inflation in the world, and thus even though it's going to be -- there's going to be a temporary readjustment with those reduced revenues. But if on the other hand, for the whole world economic picture -- they see their own costs going down, this will serve to make that adjustment for them, and they too will wind up better off. But, no, we're not going to retreat from the help that we've been able to give, and as we resolve some of our own problems we're able to help more.

The President. I can't say that I have a hard and fast view on that. I think it is something for all of us to look at. Maybe that'll be one of the subjects of discussion in the Williamsburg summit this spring.

The President. I can't go that far. I can only say that I think we need to look at it. I don't believe that the monetary system has been the disruptive factor in bringing on this economic recession we've been in. I think inflation is what led to the high interest rates. The lender has to get back -- when the loan is repaid -- he has to have gotten back, in interest, all the depreciated value of the money that he loaned that is going to be repaid -- paid back in inflation in money of lesser value than when he had loaned it. And so, up go the interest rates. I think right now they're higher than they need to be -- the real interest rates. I think what we're seeing, because of our own rate of inflation -- they should be much lower -- but I think what we're seeing is timidity. They're not quite sure yet that we're going to stay the course and that this is going to continue. They've been through, well, in our own country, seven recessions -- I guess this one's number eight -- since World War II, and every one of them, as they came out, resulted in higher inflation and each time higher than the last, so that we've been on an ever increasing scale that way.

I think that there is beginning to be this confidence that this time the recovery, that we're bringing about, is based on sound economic policies and not artificial stimulants. When they're aware of that, I think we'll see further reductions in the interest rates and, as a result of that, we'll see further prosperity.

The President. Well, for one thing I recognize that it would be awfully easy -- I've always been an outdoorsman, to use that expression, always, living in California, been able to get to our ranch, ride a lot, and so forth. But it would be very easy here to sit at that desk, and you go home in an elevator -- [laughing] -- at the end of the day, and come back to work in an elevator. It's very difficult to get outside at all. It would be very easy to let that become your lifestyle, but fortunately we resisted. And we have a little gymnasium upstairs there, and I have a daily routine that we work out at the end of every day. And, frankly, I have to say physically I think I feel better than I did a couple of decades ago.

The President. Not as much as people think. You're insulated in the sense that if you decide to leave the grounds you're a group -- [laughing] -- quite a group. You can't just go out and walk down the street and drop in at a drugstore for a bottle of aspirin or something. But on the other hand, you have much more contact with people than anyone is inclined to believe.

People that I've known back over the years and former schoolmates and so forth, I stay in touch with both by correspondence and the other. And then I've done something that I did when I was Governor. I realize I can't read all my mail -- several hundred thousand letters a month. But I instructed there, and I've instructed here -- a very wonderful lady there in charge of that mail department does a good job of knowing the kind of mail that I want to see -- and not just the friendly letters; the ones that've got a challenge in them and so forth, letters from young people and so forth -- and constantly sends me a representative sampling of the mail. And not only for me to read, but usually the letters she's picked, I answer myself. So, I don't feel out of touch.

The President. Yes. I can see that. I think what I would resist is a kind of get-acquainted meeting just to have a meeting because, I think, such a meeting raises people's expectations so high that then we'd just be able to say, ``Well, we got acquainted and said `hello''' and not have any result.

The President. That's right. No, you never have such a meeting with a precondition on what's going to result. You can have -- determine in advance the subjects that you think should be discussed between you.

The President. I can't honestly say whether it be this year or next. I know that there are no plans immediately or in the near future for one. But I would expect that there would be such a meeting before the first term is out.

Tomorrow at 11:30 p.m. is the first day of spring, and it coincides with an important change in our economy. A season of hope is giving way to a season of progress. We're seeing the proof that our great national struggle to make our economy well again is beginning to pay off. Yes, we have a long way to go, but factories are reopening, workers called back, production in housing, autos, and steel picking up, and new breakthroughs in high technology busting out all over.

Unfortunately, it's still true that the more things change, the more they stay the same. America is on the mend, but this recovery could be stopped dead in its tracks if big spenders in the Congress have their way. I was greatly encouraged when we had some bipartisan success on a couple of sticky problems. But unfortunately, those who place their faith in big government and heavy spending reverted to type.

Right now, House liberals are pushing a budget -- the so-called liberal Democratic budget -- that, if implemented, would reverse the progress we've made and wreck our program to rebuild the economy. They want to throw out the window much of the domestic budget savings we've achieved over the last 2 years. And they would go much further, seeking $181 billion in higher domestic spending over the next 5 years, excesses that would send the budget, prices, and interest rates soaring out of control and our economy into a tailspin.

To cite just one example, Medicare would be driven into bankruptcy by the failure of their budget to address its problems. Our proposed budget meets the needs of our people without bankrupting the system.

Ignoring the Soviets' tremendous advantage in military forces, the liberals would cripple our efforts to modernize America's defenses. To put it bluntly, their budget gambles with our security and safety. Their proposed $163 billion cut in defense spending over the next 5 years would put the United States right back in the position of military vulnerability we were in after a decade of neglect in the 1970's.

We were shocked to learn when we got here that we had so many ships that couldn't leave port, planes that couldn't take off, and helicopters that couldn't stay aloft -- all of this because of our lack of spare parts, sometimes of crew, inability to keep things repaired, or shortage of fuel.

We've begun to do something about that, and we've made real progress with our investment in peace through strength. But passage of the liberal budget would seriously undermine our rebuilding progress. Here are just some of the things that we might have to do if they have their way: deactivate one active and one reserve division; decommission one entire carrier battle group and some two dozen other ships; deactivate three Marine Corps fighter squadrons; deactivate two active and two reserve Air Force tactical fighter wings and six continental U.S. air defense squadrons; terminate major weapons programs from each service; sacrifice hard-won gains in readiness and sustainability by cutting our budgets for major repairs and ammunition by 25 percent and by cutting back on troop exercises and training.

The other part of the liberal budget is a huge $315 billion tax increase on wage earners. And here, too, they would pretend to reduce the Federal deficit, but by putting you deeper in the hole. That never works, and nothing could be more unfair or less compassionate. Their unfair tax increases would put a choke hold on Main Street America. They would eliminate the third year of your tax cut, which provides maximum benefit to families earning between $10,000 and $50,000, the very same families they claim we're hurting. But they are the families who will benefit most by the July tax cut.

They also want to eliminate our historic reform of tax indexing. Indexing will protect you from being pushed into a higher tax bracket when you get a cost-of-living raise. Indexing prevents government from stealing a greater percentage of your earnings and leaving you with less purchasing power. And indexing helps low- and medium-income wage earners the most for one simple reason: The rich are immune to bracket creep. They're already in the top tax brackets.

Attempts to take away the third year of your tax cut and indexing are simply gimmicks so they can spend more of your money. A typical median-income family would have to pay $3,550 in higher taxes through 1988.

Well, let me make one thing plain: After all our national struggle to reduce inflation, to begin controlling a government which grew bloated at your expense, to bring down interest rates and make the dollar worth something again; after helping you to increase personal savings, worker productivity, and our industrial and military strength; after winning the fight to lower your taxes so we could restore hope and build new incentives into the economy -- after all these hard-won victories earned through the patience and courage of every citizen, I don't want America's recovery and security to be sacrificed on an altar of discredited hand-me-down theories. And if you'll help us, they won't be.

Over the past week, it has become crystal clear that there is one man in this country better qualified than anyone else to take charge of the Environmental Protection Agency. And today, I'm pleased to announce my intention to nominate that man, William D. Ruckelshaus, to become the next Administrator of the EPA.

I have given him the broad, flexible mandate that he deserves. Bill Ruckelshaus will have direct access to me on all important matters affecting the environment. I've also authorized him to conduct an agencywide review of the personnel and resources to ensure that the EPA has the means it needs to perform its vital function. And I've urged Bill to run an open, responsive operation, a goal that I know he shares with me.

Let me add a personal note. Back in the early 1970's, as Governor of California, I had the opportunity to deal personally with Bill Ruckelshaus as Administrator of the EPA. We were rightly proud of our State's environmental record, and in many ways, California led the Nation environmentally. But there are always going to be some things that could stand improving, and there are always bound to be some differences in policy and perspective between State and Federal authorities. In reconciling those differences, in enforcing the law, and in creating a constructive working relationship between his Agency and its State counterparts, Bill Ruckelshaus deeply impressed me. He was tough, fair, and highly competent.

Now, I'm proud of my environmental record as Governor of California, and I deeply believe that this administration has done a good job over the past 2 years. But I also believe that we can do better, and that after the dust settles and the country sees Bill Ruckelshaus at work in the EPA, our people will recognize that this administration's commitment to a clean environment is solid and unshakeable.

This nomination is, of course, subject to Senate confirmation. But I want to make it clear today, as this process gets underway, that Bill has my complete and unqualified support. He's the right man for the right job at the right time.

Mr. Ruckelshaus. Thank you very much, Mr. President, for your kind remarks and for your expression of intention to nominate. That, of course, is dependent on my clearing all the various reviews that have to occur over the next 2 or 3 weeks before I will be able to actually get over to EPA and take charge.

And I witnessed -- from the Pacific Northwest -- some of the problems that my old Agency has had. And needless to say, I witnessed that from afar, and it did not occur to me until very recently that I would have anything to do about it. Last week, Mr. President, you asked me to consider helping out. And it's my belief, as a citizen of this country, if the President of the United States asks you to assist on a matter that's important to the country, you have an obligation to take that request seriously.

Naturally, it was sudden. The reason it has taken me 3 or 4 days to come to an affirmative decision on this request is because of the personal considerations involved. I had to discuss this at some length with my wife and family. And after having done so and resolved all those problems, and having discussed with the President, with Mr. Meese, and Mr. Baker their commitment to the environment, their commitment to the goals of this Agency, and the kind of support that the President has assured me and assured the country now that he would give me, I am delighted to accept his intention to nominate.

As far as my own views on the environment are concerned, the question of whether we are going to clean up the environment of this country is long over. That debate occurred back in the 1960's and resulted in all kinds of address to environmental problems by States and the Federal Government in a massive outflow of laws and regulations.

The question of today is not ``whether,'' the question is ``how'' -- how do we proceed to deal with this enormously complex mix of problems involving air pollution, water pollution, solid waste, and all of the problems that EPA has to deal with that affect public health and the environment?

I guess my immediate task, as I see it, is to stabilize EPA, is to re-instill in the people there the dedication to their task, to their job, that they have had from the outset of that agency and to get on with this enormously complicated job of cleaning up our air and water and protecting our citizens against toxic substances.

I believe that the President has given me the tools that I need to do the job, most important of which are his personal support. He has given me the flexibility to define the problems and to suggest solutions and, on that basis, I'm going to do the best job I can for him and for the country to divine and to serve the public interests.

Q. We have one for the President first. Mr. President, let me -- let us just ask you if you think that it was the philosophy that your appointees brought to the EPA or what they thought was your philosophy on the environment that caused some of the problems over there in the first place?

Q. Mr. President, will Mr. Ruckelshaus be able to be truly independent of both interference from the White House on political grounds and interference from industry? Does he have a mandate to be independent of that kind of interference?

Mr. Ruckelshaus. Let me try to respond to that. When I was there before there were always -- a constant flood of speculation, charges about various industrial intervention into EPA. There was never any substance to it when I was there, and there won't be any substance to it now.

It is our job, my job, the job of that agency to serve the public interest. That includes all of the public. And when we have charge -- we are charged with regulating a segment of our society, we're going to do so fairly. It's very important to underscore ``fairly.'' We are going to do our best to interpret the mandate that Congress has given us and interpret that in a way that achieves environmental improvement in this country. I don't think that necessitates confrontation. I don't think it necessitates us shaking our fist at anybody. It entails a lot of hard work and a lot of dedication to seeing that those laws are properly administered.

Q. To follow up, what do you think of the testimony that has been heard on Capitol Hill about political interference, about Dow Chemical rewriting reports in the past? What about the stewardship of the agency so far?

To the extent that any charges are leveled, I have no idea whether they're right or wrong. We will do the best we can to investigate the substance of those charges, and if they prove to be correct, why, appropriate action will be taken. But I don't want to prejudge that, because I have no idea.

Q. Mr. President, a lot was made last week of your statement about environmental extremism and trying to turn the White House into a bird's nest. I mean, is that the way you feel about environmentalism?

Now, that was an extreme statement, too. But it was about those people that believed that in the name of progress it warranted destroying the purity of our waters and the quality of our air and so forth.

I think one of the things that set some of those committees off was the fact that the Superfund for the clearing up of toxic waste dumps -- now, if you understand and go back, you've got to remember that there was a time when the so-called toxic waste, and not too long ago, was being simply disposed of the way we've disposed of any kind of garbage -- put it in a hole some place, do this with it and that. But it was not being villainous or venal; we didn't understand those drugs or those things. It was like in California, not too many years ago, discovering, for the whole Nation, what caused smog. No one had known before. And so things were done without evil intent.

Now, there are thousands and thousands of those dumps throughout the country. And the EPA has the task of not only finding and identifying all of them but then determining which constitute the most immediate danger and, therefore -- because you can't deal with all of them at once -- going to work on a priority basis on those.

And evidently, there were some disputes -- and particularly on the part of some on the Hill -- as to whether right decisions had been made on some of these. I think that they had made sizable progress and were well underway toward establishing -- they had already some several hundred that they believed were the prime and the priority dumps to be cleaned up.

And this is what I think all of the fuss was about. And I would like to point out that in all the allegations and everything -- accusations, just like so many other things, no one has presented any facts at all.

Mr. Ruckelshaus. When my views on regulation and on the environment and the protection of the public health changed, to the extent they've changed, was when I was at EPA. I went into EPA with a lot of assumptions about scientific certitude, about pollutants, about our ability to measure them, about our ability to abate them with the technology that was available at a reasonable cost, and the only thing necessary to gain compliance with the environment was to start enforcing the laws.

After I got there and after I was, frankly, there about 3 months, I discovered this problem was a lot more complex than I realized when I first arrived, and that we have a whole mix of extraordinarily complicated, difficult problems to solve under the calmest of circumstances. And when you add to that complicated mix the emotion that can be generated around some of these problems, it just becomes four or five times as complicated.

Q. What about this agency review that you're going to be conducting? The budget has been cut deeply at EPA the last couple of years, some say disproportionately. A lot of people who are sympathetic to the administration's goals say there aren't resources over there. Might your agency review lead to rethinking that question?

Mr. Ruckelshaus. Oh, it well might. But I'm certainly not going to prejudge that. These are the kinds of questions that I will have to deal with in confirmation, that I will have to deal with, frankly, when I get to the agency and better understand it. And I think that, rather than prejudge any of that, I'd better wait until I'm there.

Today we commemorate stocked cupboards, healthy children, the spirit of enterprise, railroad cars and trucks heavy with food, free men and women living and working on their own land, government workers researching and developing scientific farming techniques, fields overflowing with grain and cotton and corn and vegetables, orchards laden with fruits and nuts, pastures dotted with cattle and hogs. I had to get that last one in here or the Secretary wouldn't let me speak. [Laughter] But most importantly, we commemorate all the people who plant and harvest, transport, market, and distribute America's food and fiber.

Have I left anyone out? Yes, because I want you, the employees of the Department of Agriculture to know that this day is your day, too. You've been doing a tremendously professional job, and I'm grateful for your dedication. I know you've been putting your nose to the grindstone implementing the 1981 farm bill. You started the PIK program from scratch and have done an admirable job. Believe me, I know how hard it is to get the word out sometimes, and our cheese operation went from zero to full steam ahead overnight.

So, whether you've been part of our efforts to increase exports, handling the very sensitive work over at the Farmers Home Administration, or taking care of any of the other myriad of responsibilities of this Department, thanks for all you're doing.

Today, we salute an endeavor that is vital to our well-being, yet one Americans have been so successful at that it's often taken for granted: agriculture. All of us should be grateful to God for making American abundance possible and grateful to the families and all the others involved in agriculture for taking over from there.

Well, the Lord's help, along with muscle and sweat and sophisticated technology and modern business methods are producing some miracles today. Farm output has jumped more than 89 percent since 1950, with agricultural productivity rising more than four times faster than industrial productivity per hour worked. One hour of labor on the American farm today produces 15 times as much as it did 60 years ago. American production of food and fiber, always admirable, now holds the rest of the world in awe. With less than three-tenths of 1 percent of the world's farmers and farmworkers, our country produces -- think of it, less than three-tenths of 1 percent -- produce 65 percent of the world's soybeans, 48 percent of the corn, 32 percent of the sorghum, 25 percent of the oranges, 31 percent of the poultry, 26 percent of the beef, and the list goes on and on.

Well, this was never more true than today. With stores and markets overflowing, our citizens each consume 1,408 pounds of food annually. Their relative health, creativity, and high energy level can, to a large degree, be traced to a diet that is the envy of the world. And yet, we spend less than 17 percent of our disposable income on that food. That's the lowest rate of any people anywhere in the world.

The health of our economy is also tied to agriculture. American agriculture, taken as a whole, is an industry so vast that it stretches the imagination, with assets exceeding $1 trillion, employing 23 million people -- 22 percent of America's work force.

And we aren't just feeding ourselves. Today, wheat harvested in the Great Plains is eaten as pasta in Italy. Our soybeans are part of the soy sauce used in the Orient. Our cottonseed is pressed into oil and shipped to Venezuela. Our grain is consumed in Russia. And African children are fed by the tillers of Nebraska soil.

In 1982 our agricultural export revenue was five times what it was in 1970, helping to offset the increased cost of energy imports over this period. Today, two of every five agricultural acres are devoted to export and over one-fourth of all farm income comes from sales overseas. Our agricultural exports use rural elevators, grain terminals, railroads, canals, seaports, ships, barges, and warehouses. It's a vast network, incredibly efficient in providing income for tens of millions of people and feeding many millions more.

In the United States we're proud of what our free people, with the profit motive and private property, have produced, and that is especially true of agriculture. Our agricultural system is a national treasure, and this administration is unflinching in its commitment to maintain and strengthen agriculture's role in the American economy.

Yet, as proud as we are of American agriculture, all of us should be aware of -- and I know you who are present in this hall are -- and sensitive to the weight borne by the American farmer in recent years. A decade of overspending and overtaxing shot interest rates sky-high and unleashed devastating inflation on all of us. Nowhere was it felt more than down on the farm. They were the greatest victims of the cost-price squeeze.

Surviving has been a job in itself, but I think it's fair to say that although the winter has been harsh, it's going to be a beautiful spring. We've planted the right seeds, and now economic recovery is popping up all over the country. And America's farmers aren't going to be left out.

The prime interest rate is down to 10\1/2\ percent. It was 21\1/2\ just before we came here. And I told these people here on the platform and will tell all of you: that, along with spring this morning, came an announcement from the Department of Commerce that the growth in gross national product for the first quarter of '83 was 4 percent. In the last quarter of '82, it was going down 1.1 percent. In our own estimates, we only predicted it was going to be going up 1\1/2\ percent in this first quarter.

Do you remember when we decontrolled the price of oil and some so-called experts howled that it would add to inflation and predicted that the price of gas would go above $2 a gallon? Well, decontrol unleashed a stampede of exploration, contributed to the oil glut, and brought oil prices down from -- or gas prices down from about $1.27 a gallon, when we started, to below a dollar now in most of the country. The decline in the price of diesel has been a godsend to the American farmer.

